
NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DUMMY II
Goosebumps - 31
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
My name is Amy Kramer, and every Thursday night I feel a little dumb. That’s
because Thursday is “Family Sharing Night” at my house.
Sara and Jed think it’s dumb, too. But Mom and Dad won’t listen to our
complaints. “It’s the most important night of the week,” Dad says.
“It’s a family tradition,” Mom adds. “It’s something you kids will always
remember.”
Right, Mom. It’s something I’ll always remember as really painful and
embarrassing.
You’ve probably guessed that on Family Sharing Night, every member of
the Kramer family—except for George, our cat—has to share something with the
rest of the family.
It isn’t so bad for my sister, Sara. Sara is fourteen—two years older than me
—and she’s a genius painter. Really. One of her paintings was chosen for a show
at the art museum downtown. Sara may go to a special arts high school next
year.
So Sara always shares some sketches she’s working on. Or a new painting.
And Family Sharing Night isn’t so bad for Jed, either. My ten-year-old
brother is such a total goof. He doesn’t care what he shares. One Thursday night,
he burped really loud and explained that he was sharing his dinner.
Jed laughed like a lunatic.
But Mom and Dad didn’t think it was funny. They gave Jed a stern lecture
about taking Family Sharing Night more seriously.
The next Thursday night, my obnoxious brother shared a note that David
Miller, a kid at my school, had written to me. A very personal note! Jed found
the note in my room and decided to share it with everyone.
Nice?
I wanted to die. I really did.
Jed just thinks he’s so cute and adorable, he can get away with anything. He
thinks he’s really special.
I think it’s because he’s the only redhead in the family. Sara and I both have
straight black hair, dark green eyes, and very tan skin. With his pale skin,
freckled face, and curly red hair, Jed looks like he comes from another family!
And sometimes Sara and I both wish he did.
Anyway, I’m the one with the most problems on Family Sharing Night.
Because I’m not really talented the way Sara is. And I’m not a total goof like
Jed.
So I never really know what to share.
I mean, I have a seashell collection, which I keep in a jar on my dresser. But
it’s really kind of boring to hold up shells and talk about them. And we haven’t
been to the ocean for nearly two years. So my shells are kind of old, and
everyone has already seen them.
I also have a really good collection of CDs. But no one else in my family is
into Bob Marley and reggae music. If I start to share some music with them, they
all hold their ears and complain till I shut it off.
So I usually make up some kind of a story—an adventure story about a girl
who survives danger after danger. Or a wild fairy tale about princesses who turn
into tigers.
After my last story, Dad had a big smile on his face. “Amy is going to be a
famous writer,” he announced. “She’s so good at making up stories.” Dad gazed
around the room, still smiling. “We have such a talented family!” he exclaimed.
I knew he was just saying that to be a good parent. To “encourage” me. Sara
is the real talent in our family. Everyone knows that.
Tonight, Jed was the first to share. Mom and Dad sat on the living room
couch. Dad had taken out a tissue and was squinting as he cleaned his glasses.
Dad can’t stand to have the tiniest speck of dust on his glasses. He cleans them
about twenty times a day.
I settled in the big brown armchair against the wall. Sara sat cross-legged
on the carpet beside my chair.
“What are you going to share tonight?” Mom asked Jed. “And I hope it isn’t
another horrible burp.”
“That was so gross!” Sara moaned.
“Your face is gross!” Jed shot back. He stuck out his tongue at Sara.
“Jed, please—give us a break tonight,” Dad muttered, slipping his glasses
back on, adjusting them on his nose. “Don’t cause trouble.”
“She started it,” Jed insisted, pointing at Sara.
“Just share something,” I told Jed, sighing.
“I’m going to share your freckles,” Sara told him. “I’m going to pull them
off one by one and feed them to George.”
Sara and I laughed. George didn’t glance up. He was curled up, napping on
the carpet beside the couch.
“That’s not funny, girls,” Mom snapped. “Stop being mean to your brother.”
“This is supposed to be a family night,” Dad wailed. “Why can’t we be a
family?”
“We are!” Jed insisted.
Dad frowned and shook his head. He looks like an owl when he does that.
“Jed, are you going to share something?” he demanded weakly.
Jed nodded. “Yeah.” He stood in the center of the room and shoved his
hands into his jeans pockets. He wears loose, baggy jeans about ten sizes too big.
They always look as if they’re about to fall down. Jed thinks that’s cool.
“I… uh… learned to whistle through my fingers,” he announced.
“Wow,” Sara muttered sarcastically.
Jed ignored her. He pulled his hands from his pockets. Then he stuck his
two little fingers into the sides of his mouth—and let out a long, shrill whistle.
He whistled through his fingers two more times. Then he took a deep bow.
The whole family burst into loud applause.
Jed, grinning, took another low bow.
“Such a talented family!” Dad declared. This time, he meant it as a joke.
Jed dropped down on the floor beside George, startling the poor cat awake.
“Your turn next, Amy,” Mom said, turning to me. “Are you going to tell us
another story?”
“Her stories are too long!” Jed complained.
George climbed unsteadily to his feet and moved a few feet away from Jed.
Yawning, the cat dropped on to his stomach beside Mom’s feet.
“I’m not going to tell a story tonight,” I announced. I picked up Dennis
from behind my armchair.
Sara and Jed both groaned.
“Hey—give me a break!” I shouted. I settled back on the edge of the chair,
fixing my dummy on my lap. “I thought I’d talk to Dennis tonight,” I told Mom
and Dad.
They had half-smiles on their faces. I didn’t care. I’d been practicing with
Dennis all week. And I wanted to try out my new comedy routine with him.
“Amy is a lousy ventriloquist,” Jed chimed in. “You can see her lips move.”
“Be quiet, Jed. I think Dennis is funny,” Sara said. She scooted toward the
couch so she could see better.
I balanced Dennis on my left knee and wrapped my fingers around the
string in his back that worked his mouth. Dennis is a very old ventriloquist’s
dummy. The paint on his face is faded. One eye is almost completely white. His
turtle-neck sweater is torn and tattered.
But I have a lot of fun with him. When my five-year-old cousins come to
visit, I like to entertain them with Dennis. They squeal and laugh. They think
I’m a riot.
I think I’m getting much better with Dennis. Despite Jed’s complaints.
I took a deep breath, glanced at Mom and Dad, and began my act.
“How are you tonight, Dennis?” I asked.
“Not too well,” I made the dummy reply in a high, shrill voice. Dennis’
voice.
“Really, Dennis? What’s wrong?”
“I think I caught a bug.”
“You mean you have the flu?” I asked him.
“No. Termites!”
Mom and Dad laughed. Sara smiled. Jed groaned loudly.
I turned back to Dennis. “Well, have you been to a doctor?” I asked him.
“No. A carpenter!”
Mom and Dad smiled at that one, but didn’t laugh. Jed groaned again. Sara
stuck her finger down her throat, pretending to puke.
“No one liked that joke, Dennis,” I told him.
“Who’s joking?” I made Dennis reply.
“This is lame,” I heard Jed mutter to Sara. She nodded her head in
agreement.
“Let’s change the subject, Dennis,” I said, shifting the dummy to my other
knee. “Do you have a girlfriend?”
I leaned Dennis forward, trying to make him nod his head yes. But his head
rolled right off his shoulders.
The wooden head hit the floor with a thud and bounced over to George. The
cat leaped up and scampered away.
Sara and Jed collapsed in laughter, slapping each other high fives.
I jumped angrily to my feet. “Dad!” I screamed. “You promised you’d buy
me a new dummy!”
Jed scurried over to the rug and picked up Dennis’ head. He pulled the
string, making the dummy’s mouth move. “Amy reeks! Amy reeks!” Jed made
the dummy repeat over and over.
“Give me that!” I grabbed the head angrily from Jed’s hand.
“Amy reeks! Amy reeks!” Jed continued chanting.
“That’s enough!” Mom shouted, jumping up off the couch.
Jed retreated back to the wall.
“I’ve been checking the stores for a new dummy,” Dad told me, pulling off
his glasses again and examining them closely. “But they’re all so expensive.”
“Well, how am I ever going to get better at this?” I demanded. “Dennis’
head falls off every time I use him!”
“Do your best,” Mom said.
What did that mean? I always hated it when she said that.
“Instead of Family Sharing Night, we should call this the Thursday Night
Fights,” Sara declared.
Jed raised his fists. “Want to fight?” he asked Sara.
“It’s your turn, Sara,” Mom replied, narrowing her eyes at Jed. “What are
you sharing tonight?”
“I have a new painting,” Sara announced. “It’s a watercolor.”
“Of what?” Dad asked, settling his glasses back on his face.
“Remember that cabin we had in Maine a few summers ago?” Sara replied,
tossing back her straight black hair. “The one overlooking the dark rock cliff? I
found a snapshot of it, and I tried to paint it.”
I suddenly felt really angry and upset. I admit it. I was jealous of Sara.
Here she was, about to share another beautiful watercolor. And here I was,
rolling a stupid wooden dummy head in my lap.
It just wasn’t fair!
“You’ll have to come to my room to see it,” Sara was saying. “It’s still
wet.”
We all stood up and trooped to Sara’s room.
My family lives in a long, one-story ranch-style house. My room and Jed’s
room are at the end of one hallway. The living room, dining room, and kitchen
are in the middle. Sara’s room and my parents’ room are down the other hall,
way at the other end of the house.
I led the way down the hall. Behind me, Sara was going on and on about all
the trouble she’d had with the painting and how she’d solved the problems.
“I remember that cabin so well,” Dad said.
“I can’t wait to see the painting,” Mom added.
I stepped into Sara’s room and clicked on the light.
Then I turned to the easel by the window that held the painting—and let out
a scream of horror.
2
My mouth dropped open in shock. I stared at the painting, unable to speak.
When Sara saw it, she let out a shriek. “I—I don’t believe it!” she screamed.
“Who did that?”
Someone had painted a yellow-and-black smile face in the corner of her
painting. Right in the middle of the black rock cliff. Mom and Dad stepped up to
the easel, fretful expressions on their faces. They studied the smile face, then
turned to Jed.
Jed burst out laughing. “Do you like it?” he asked innocently.
“Jed—how could you!” Sara exploded. “I’ll kill you! I really will!”
“The painting was too dark,” Jed explained with a shrug. “I wanted to
brighten it up.”
“But… but… but…” my sister sputtered. She balled her hands into fists,
shook them at Jed, and uttered a loud cry of rage.
“Jed—what were you doing in Sara’s room?” Mom demanded.
Sara doesn’t like for anyone to go into her precious room without a written
invitation!
“Young man, you know you’re never allowed to touch your sister’s
paintings,” Dad scolded.
“I can paint, too,” Jed replied. “I’m a good painter.”
“Then do your own paintings!” Sara snapped. “Don’t sneak in here and
mess up my work!”
“I didn’t sneak,” Jed insisted. He sneered at Sara. “I was just trying to
help.”
“You were not!” Sara screamed, angrily tossing her black hair over her
shoulder. “You ruined my painting!”
“Your painting reeks!” Jed shot back.
“Enough!” Mom shouted. She grabbed Jed by both shoulders. “Jed—look
at me! You don’t seem to see how serious this is. This is the worst thing you’ve
ever done!”
Jed’s smile finally faded.
I took another glance at the ugly smile face he had slopped on to Sara’s
watercolor. Since he’s the baby in the family, Jed thinks he can get away with
anything.
But I knew that this time he had gone too far.
After all, Sara is the star of the family. She’s the talented one. The one with
the painting that hung in a museum. Messing with Sara’s precious painting was
bound to get Jed in major trouble.
Sara is so stuck-up about her paintings. A few times, I even thought about
painting something funny on one of them. But of course I only thought it. I
would never do anything that horrible.
“You don’t have to be jealous of your sister’s work,” Dad was telling Jed.
“We’re all talented in this family.”
“Oh, sure,” Jed muttered. He has this weird habit. Whenever he’s in trouble,
he doesn’t say he’s sorry. Instead, he gets really angry. “What’s your talent,
Dad?” Jed demanded, sneering.
Dad’s jaw tightened. He narrowed his eyes at Jed. “We’re not discussing
me,” he said in a low voice. “But I’ll tell you. My talent is my Chinese cooking.
You see, there are all kinds of talents, Jed.”
Dad considers himself a Master of the Wok. Once or twice a week, he
chops a ton of vegetables into little pieces and fries them up in the electric wok
Mom got him for Christmas.
We pretend it tastes great.
No point in hurting Dad’s feelings.
“Is Jed going to be punished or not?” Sara demanded in a shrill voice.
She had opened her box of watercolor paints and was rolling a brush in the
black. Then she began painting over the smile face with quick, furious strokes.
“Yes, Jed is going to be punished,” Mom replied, glaring at him. Jed
lowered his eyes to the floor. “First he’s going to apologize to Sara.”
We all waited.
It took Jed a while. But he finally managed to mutter, “Sorry, Sara.”
He started to leave the room, but Mom grabbed his shoulders again and
pulled him back. “Not so fast, Jed,” she told him. “Your punishment is you can’t
go to the movies with Josh and Matt on Saturday. And… no video games for a
week.”
“Mom—give me a break!” Jed whined.
“What you did was really bad,” Mom said sternly. “Maybe this punishment
will make you realize how horrible it was.”
“But I have to go to the movies!” Jed protested.
“You can’t,” Mom replied softly. “And no arguing, or I’ll add on to your
punishment. Now go to your room.”
“I don’t think it’s enough punishment,” Sara said, dabbing away at her
painting.
“Keep out of it, Sara,” Mom snapped.
“Yeah. Keep out of it,” Jed muttered. He stomped out of the room and down
the long hall to his room.
Dad sighed. He swept a hand back over his bald head. “Family Sharing
Night is over,” he said sadly.
* * *
I stayed in Sara’s room and watched her repair the painting for a while. She kept
tsk-tsking and shaking her head.
“I have to make the rocks much darker, or the paint won’t cover the stupid
smile face,” she explained unhappily. “But if I make the rocks darker, I have to
change the sky. The whole balance is ruined.”
“I think it looks pretty good,” I told her, trying to cheer her up.
“How could Jed do that?” Sara demanded, dipping her brush in the water
jar. “How could he sneak in here and totally destroy a work of art?”
I was feeling sorry for Sara. But that remark made me lose all sympathy. I
mean, why couldn’t she just call it a watercolor painting? Why did she have to
call it “a work of art”?
Sometimes she is so stuck-up and so in love with herself, it makes me sick.
I turned and left the room. She didn’t even notice.
I went down the hall to my room and called my friend Margo. We talked for
a while about stuff. And we made plans to get together the next day.
As I talked on the phone, I could hear Jed in his room next door. He was
pacing back and forth, tossing things around, making a lot of noise.
Sometimes I spell the word “Jed” B-R-A-T.
Margo’s dad made her get off the phone. He’s real strict. He never lets her
talk for more than ten or fifteen minutes.
I wandered into the kitchen and made myself a bowl of Frosted Flakes. My
favorite late snack. When I was a little kid, I used to have a bowl of cereal every
night before bed. And I just never got out of the habit.
I rinsed out the bowl. Then I said good night to Mom and Dad and went to
bed.
It was a warm spring night. A soft breeze fluttered the curtains over the
window. Pale light from a big half-moon filled the window and spilled on to the
floor.
I fell into a deep sleep as soon as my head hit the pillow.
A short while later, something woke me up. I’m not sure what.
Still half asleep, I blinked my eyes open and raised myself on my pillow. I
struggled to see clearly.
The curtains flapped over the window.
I felt as if I were still asleep, dreaming.
But what I saw in the window snapped me awake.
The curtains billowed, then lifted away.
And in the silvery light, I saw a face.
An ugly, grinning face in my bedroom window. Staring through the
darkness at me.
3
The curtains flapped again.
The face didn’t move.
“Who—?” I choked out, squeezing the sheet up to my chin.
The eyes stared in at me. Cold, unblinking eyes.
Dummy eyes.
Dennis.
Dennis stared blankly at me, his white eye catching the glow of the
moonlight.
I let out an angry roar, tossed off the sheet, and bolted out of bed. To the
window.
I pushed away the billowing curtains and grabbed Dennis’ head off the
window ledge. “Who put you there?” I demanded, holding the head between my
hands. “Who did it, Dennis?”
I heard soft laughter behind me. From the hallway.
I flew across the room, the head still in my hands. I pulled open my
bedroom door.
Jed held his hand over his mouth, muffling his laughter. “Gotcha!” he
whispered gleefully.
“Jed—you creep!” I cried. I let the dummy head drop to the floor. Then I
grabbed Jed’s pajama pants with both hands and jerked them up as high as I
could—nearly to his chin!
He let out a gasp of pain and stumbled back against the wall.
“Why did you do that?” I demanded in an angry whisper. “Why did you put
the dummy head on my window ledge?”
Jed tugged his pajama pants back into place. “To pay you back,” he
muttered.
“Huh? Me?” I shrieked. “I didn’t do anything to you. What did I do?”
“You didn’t stick up for me,” he grumbled, scratching his red curly hair. His
eyes narrowed at me. “You didn’t say anything to help me out. You know. About
Sara’s painting.”
“Excuse me?” I cried. “How could I help you out? What could I say?”
“You could have said it was no big deal,” Jed replied.
“But it was a big deal!” I told him. “You know how seriously Sara takes her
paintings.” I shook my head. “I’m sorry, Jed. But you deserve to be punished.
You really do.”
He stared at me across the dim hallway, thinking about what I’d said. Then
an evil smile spread slowly over his freckled face. “Hope I didn’t scare you too
much, Amy.” He snickered. Then he picked Dennis’ head up off the carpet and
tossed it at me.
I caught it in one hand. “Go to sleep, Jed,” I told him. “And don’t mess with
Dennis again!”
I stepped back into my room and closed the door. I tossed Dennis’ head
onto a pile of clothes on my desk chair. Then I climbed wearily back into bed.
So much trouble around here tonight, I thought, shutting my eyes, trying to
relax.
So much trouble…
Two days later, Dad brought home a present for me. A new ventriloquist’s
dummy. That’s when the real trouble began.
4
Margo came over the next afternoon. Margo is real tiny, sort of like a miniperson. She has a tiny face, and is very pretty, with bright blue eyes, and delicate
features.
Her blond hair is very light and very fine. She let it grow this year. It’s just
about down to her tiny little waist.
She’s nearly a foot shorter than me, even though we both turned twelve in
February. She’s very smart and very popular. But the boys like to make fun of
her soft, whispery voice.
Today she was wearing a bright blue tank top tucked into white tennis
shorts. “I bought the new Beatles collection,” she told me as she stepped into the
house. She held up a CD box.
Margo loves the Beatles. She doesn’t listen to any of the new groups. In her
room, she has an entire shelf of Beatles CDs and tapes. And she has Beatles
posters on her walls.
We went to my room and put on the CD. Margo settled on the bed. I
sprawled on the carpet across from her.
“My dad almost didn’t let me come over,” Margo told me, pushing her long
hair behind her shoulder. “He thought he might need me to work at the
restaurant.”
Margo’s dad owns a huge restaurant downtown called The Party House. It’s
not really a restaurant. It’s a big, old house filled with enormous rooms where
people can hold parties.
A lot of kids have birthday parties there. And there are bar mitzvahs and
confirmations and wedding receptions there, too. Sometimes there are six parties
going on at once!
One Beatles song ended. The next song, “Love Me Do”, started up.
“I love this song!” Margo exclaimed. She sang along with it for a while. I
tried singing with her, but I’m totally tone deaf. As my dad says, I can’t carry a
tune in a wheelbarrow.
“Well, I’m glad you didn’t have to work today,” I told Margo.
“Me, too,” Margo sighed. “Dad always gives me the worst jobs. You know.
Clearing tables. Or putting away dishes. Or wrapping up garbage bags. Yuck.”
She started singing again—and then stopped. She sat up on the bed. “Amy,
I almost forgot. Dad may have a job for you.”
“Excuse me?” I replied. “Wrapping up garbage bags? I don’t think so,
Margo.”
“No. No. Listen,” Margo pleaded excitedly in her mouselike voice. “It’s a
good job. Dad has a bunch of birthday parties coming up. For teeny tiny kids.
You know. Two-year-olds. Maybe three- or four-year-olds. And he thought you
could entertain them.”
“Huh?” I stared at my friend. I still didn’t understand. “You mean, sing or
something?”
“No. With Dennis,” Margo explained. She twisted a lock of hair around in
her fingers and bobbed her head in time to the music as she talked. “Dad saw
you with Dennis at the sixth-grade talent night. He was really impressed.”
“He was? I was terrible that night!” I replied.
“Well, Dad didn’t think so. He wonders if you’d like to come to the
birthday parties and put on a show with Dennis. The little kids will love it. Dad
said he’d even pay you.”
“Wow! That’s cool!” I replied. What an exciting idea.
Then I remembered something.
I jumped to my feet, crossed the room to the chair, and held up Dennis’
head. “One small problem,” I groaned.
Margo let go of her hair and made a sick face. “His head? Why did you take
off his head?”
“I didn’t,” I replied. “It fell off. Every time I use Dennis, his head falls off.”
“Oh.” Margo uttered a disappointed sigh. “The head looks weird all by
itself. I don’t think little kids would like it if it fell off.”
“I don’t think so,” I agreed.
“It might frighten them or something,” Margo said. “You know. Give them
nightmares. Make them think their own head might fall off.”
“Dennis is totally wrecked. Dad promised me a new dummy. But he hasn’t
been able to find one.”
“Too bad,” Margo replied. “You’d have fun performing for the kids.”
We listened to more Beatles music. Then Margo had to go home.
A few minutes after she left, I heard the front door slam.
“Hey, Amy! Amy—are you home?” I heard Dad call from the living room.
“Coming!” I called. I made my way to the front of the house. Dad stood in
the entryway, a long carton under his arm, a smile on his face.
He handed the carton to me. “Happy Un-birthday!” he exclaimed.
“Dad! Is it—?” I cried. I tore open the carton. “Yes!” A new dummy!
I lifted him carefully out of the carton.
The dummy had wavy brown hair painted on top of his wooden head. I
studied his face. It was kind of strange. Kind of intense. His eyes were bright
blue—not faded like Dennis’. He had bright red painted lips, curved up into an
eerie smile. His lower lip had a chip on one side so that it didn’t quite match the
other lip.
As I pulled him from the box, the dummy appeared to stare into my eyes.
The eyes sparkled. The grin grew wider.
I felt a sudden chill. Why does this dummy seem to be laughing at me? I
wondered.
I held him up, examining him carefully. He wore a gray, double-breasted
suit over a white shirt collar. The collar was stapled to his neck. He didn’t have a
shirt. Instead, his wooden chest had been painted white.
Big, black leather shoes were attached to the ends of his thin, dangling legs.
“Dad—he’s great!” I exclaimed.
“I found him in a pawnshop,” Dad said, picking up the dummy’s hand and
pretending to shake hands with it. “How do you do, Slappy.”
“Slappy? Is that his name?”
“That’s what the man in the store said,” Dad replied. He lifted Slappy’s
arms, examining his suit. “I don’t know why he sold Slappy so cheaply. He
practically gave the dummy away!”
I turned the dummy around and looked for the string in his back that made
the mouth open and close. “He’s excellent, Dad,” I said. I kissed my dad on the
cheek. “Thanks.”
“Do you really like him?” Dad asked.
Slappy grinned up at me. His blue eyes stared into mine. He seemed to be
waiting for an answer, too.
“Yes. He’s awesome!” I said. “I like his serious eyes. They look so real.”
“The eyes move,” Dad said. “They’re not painted on like Dennis’. They
don’t blink, but they move from side to side.”
I reached my hand inside the dummy’s back. “How do you make his eyes
move?” I asked.
“The man showed me,” Dad said. “It’s not hard. First you grab the string
that works the mouth.”
“I’ve got that,” I told him.
“Then you move your hand up into the dummy’s head. There is a little lever
up there. Do you feel it? Push on it. The eyes will move in the direction you
push.”
“Okay. I’ll try,” I said.
Slowly I moved my hand up inside the dummy’s back. Through the neck.
And into his head.
I stopped and let out a startled cry as my hand hit something soft.
Something soft and warm.
His brain!
5
“Ohhh.” I uttered a sick moan and jerked my hand out as fast as I could.
I could still feel the soft, warm mush on my fingers.
“Amy—what’s wrong?” Dad cried.
“His—his brains—!” I choked out, feeling my stomach lurch.
“Huh? What are you talking about?” Dad grabbed the dummy from my
hands. He turned it over and reached into the back.
I covered my mouth with both hands and watched him reach into the head.
His eyes widened in surprise.
He struggled with something. Then pulled his hand out.
“Yuck!” I groaned. “What’s that!”
Dad stared down at the mushy, green and purple and brown object in his
hand. “Looks like someone left a sandwich in there!” he exclaimed.
Dad’s whole face twisted in disgust. “It’s all moldy and rotten. Must have
been in there for months!”
“Yuck!” I repeated, holding my nose. “It really stinks! Why would someone
leave a sandwich in a dummy’s head?”
“Beats me,” Dad replied, shaking his head. “And it looks like there are
wormholes in it!”
“Yuuuuuck!” we both cried in unison.
Dad handed Slappy back to me. Then he hurried into the kitchen to get rid
of the rotted, moldy sandwich.
I heard him run the garbage disposal. Then I heard water running as he
washed his hands. A few seconds later, Dad returned to the living room, drying
his hands on a dish towel.
“Maybe we’d better examine Slappy closely,” he suggested. “We don’t
want any more surprises—do we?”
I carried Slappy into the kitchen, and we stretched him out on the counter.
Dad examined the dummy’s shoes carefully. They were attached to the legs and
didn’t come off.
I put my finger on the dummy’s chin and moved the mouth up and down.
Then I checked out his wooden hands.
I unbuttoned the gray suit jacket and studied the dummy’s painted shirt.
Patches of the white paint had chipped and cracked. But it was okay.
“Everything looks fine, Dad,” I reported.
He nodded. Then he smelled his fingers. I guess he hadn’t washed away all
of the stink from the rotted sandwich.
“We’d better spray the inside of his head with disinfectant or perfume or
something,” Dad said.
Then, as I was buttoning up the jacket, something caught my eye.
Something yellow. A slip of paper poking up from the jacket pocket.
It’s probably a sales receipt, I thought.
But when I pulled out the small square of yellow paper, I found strange
writing on it. Weird words in a language I’d never seen before.
I squinted hard at the paper and slowly read the words out loud:
“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.”
I wonder what that means? I thought.
And then I glanced down at Slappy’s face.
And saw his red lips twitch.
And saw one eye slowly close in a wink.
6
“D-d-dad!” I stuttered. “He—moved!”
“Huh?” Dad had gone back to the sink to wash his hands for a third time.
“What’s wrong with the dummy?”
“He moved!” I cried. “He winked at me!”
Dad came over to the counter, wiping his hands. “I told you, Amy—he
can’t blink. The eyes only move from side to side.”
“No!” I insisted. “He winked. His lips twitched, and he winked.”
Dad frowned and picked up the dummy head in both hands. He raised it to
examine it. “Well… maybe the eyelids are loose,” he said. “I’ll see if I can
tighten them up. Maybe if I take a screwdriver I can—”
Dad didn’t finish his sentence.
Because the dummy swung his wooden hand up and hit Dad on the side of
the head.
“Ow!” Dad cried, dropping the dummy back onto the counter. Dad grabbed
his cheek. “Hey—stop it, Amy! That hurt!”
“Me?” I shrieked. “I didn’t do it!”
Dad glared at me, rubbing his cheek. It had turned bright red.
“The dummy did it!” I insisted. “I didn’t touch him, Dad! I didn’t move his
hand!”
“Not funny,” Dad muttered. “You know I don’t like practical jokes.”
I opened my mouth to answer, but no words came out. I decided I’d better
just shut up.
Of course Dad wouldn’t believe that the dummy had slapped him.
I didn’t believe it myself.
Dad must have pulled too hard when he was examining the head. Dad
jerked the hand up without realizing it.
That’s how I explained it to myself.
What other explanation could there be?
I apologized to Dad. Then we washed Slappy’s face with a damp sponge. We
cleaned him up and sprayed disinfectant inside his head.
He was starting to look pretty good.
I thanked Dad again and hurried to my room. I set Slappy down on the chair
beside Dennis. Then I phoned Margo.
“I got a new dummy,” I told her excitedly. “I can perform for the kids’
birthday parties. At The Party House.”
“That’s great, Amy!” Margo exclaimed. “Now all you need is an act.”
She was right.
I needed jokes. A lot of jokes. If I was going to perform with Slappy in
front of dozens of kids, I needed a long comedy act.
The next day after school, I hurried to the library. I took out every joke
book I could find. I carried them home and studied them. I wrote down all the
jokes I thought I could use with Slappy.
After dinner, I should have been doing my homework. Instead, I practiced
with Slappy. I sat in front of the mirror and watched myself with him.
I tried hard to speak clearly but not move my lips. And I tried hard to move
Slappy’s mouth so that it really looked as if he were talking.
Working his mouth and moving his eyes at the same time was pretty hard.
But after a while, it became easier.
I tried some knock-knock jokes with Slappy. I thought little kids might like
those.
“Knock knock,” I made Slappy say.
“Who’s there?” I asked him, staring into his eyes as if I were really talking
to him.
“Jane,” Slappy said.
“Jane who?”
“Jane jer clothes. You stink!”
I practiced each joke over and over, watching myself in the mirror. I wanted
to be a really good ventriloquist. I wanted to be excellent. I wanted to be as good
with Slappy as Sara is with her paints.
I practiced some more knock-knock jokes and some jokes about animals.
Jokes I thought little kids would find funny.
I’ll try them out on Family Sharing Night, I decided. It will make Dad
happy to see how hard I’m working with Slappy. At least I know Slappy’s head
won’t fall off.
I glanced across the room at Dennis. He looked so sad and forlorn,
crumpled in the chair, his head tilted nearly sideways on his shoulders.
Then I propped Slappy up and turned back to the mirror.
“Knock knock.”
“Who’s there?”
“Wayne.”
“Wayne who?”
“Wayne wayne, go away! Come again another day!”
On Thursday night, I was actually eager to finish dinner so that Sharing Night
could begin. I couldn’t wait to show my family my new act with Slappy.
We had spaghetti for dinner. I like spaghetti, but Jed always ruins it.
He’s so gross. He sat across the table from me, and he kept opening his
mouth wide, showing me a mouth full of chewed-up spaghetti.
Then he’d laugh because he cracks himself up. And spaghetti sauce would
run down his chin.
By the time dinner was over, Jed had spaghetti sauce smeared all over his
face and all over the tablecloth around his plate.
No one seemed to notice. Mom and Dad were too busy listening to Sara
brag about her grades. For a change.
Report cards were being handed out tomorrow. Sara was sure she was
getting all A’s.
I was sure, too. Sure I wasn’t getting all A’s!
I’d be lucky to get a C in math. I really messed up the last two tests. And I
probably wasn’t going to do real well in science, either. My weather balloon
project fell apart, so I hadn’t handed it in yet.
I finished my spaghetti and mopped up some of the leftover sauce on my
plate with a chunk of bread.
When I glanced up, Jed had stuck two carrot sticks in his nose. “Amy,
check this out. I’m a walrus!” he cried, grinning. He let out a few urk urks and
clapped his hands together like a walrus.
“Jed—stop that!” Mom cried sharply. She made a disgusted face. “Get
those out of your nose.”
“Make him eat them, Mom!” I cried.
Jed stuck his tongue out at me. It was orange from the spaghetti sauce.
“Look at you. You’re a mess!” Mom shouted at Jed. “Go get cleaned up.
Now! Hurry! Wash all that sauce off your face.”
Jed groaned. But he climbed to his feet and headed to the bathroom.
“Did he eat anything? Or did he just rub it all over himself?” Dad asked,
rolling his eyes. Dad had some sauce on his chin, too, but I didn’t say anything.
“You interrupted me,” Sara said impatiently. “I was telling you about the
State Art Contest. Remember? I sent my flower painting in for that?”
“Oh, yes,” Mom replied. “Have you heard from the judges?”
I didn’t listen to Sara’s reply. My mind wandered. I started thinking again
about how bad my report card was going to be. I had to force myself to stop
thinking about it.
“Uh… I’ll clear the dishes,” I announced.
I started to stand up.
But I stopped with a startled cry when I saw the short figure creep into the
living room.
A dummy!
My dummy.
He was crawling across the room!
7
I let out another cry. I pointed to the living room with a trembling finger. “Mmom! Dad!” I stammered.
Sara was still talking about the art competition. But she turned to see what
everyone was gaping at.
The dummy’s head popped out from behind the armchair.
“It’s Dennis!” I cried.
I heard muffled laughter. Jed’s muffled laughter.
The dummy reached up both hands and pulled off his own head. And Jed’s
head popped up through the green turtleneck. He still had spaghetti sauce
smeared on his cheeks. He was laughing hard.
Everyone else started to laugh, too. Everyone but me.
Jed had really frightened me.
He had pulled the neck of his sweater way up over his head. Then he had
tucked Dennis’ wooden head inside the turtleneck.
Jed was so short and thin. It really looked as if Dennis were creeping into
the room.
“Stop laughing!” I shouted at my family. “It isn’t funny!”
“I think it’s very funny!” Mom cried. “What a crazy thing to think of!”
“Very clever,” Dad added.
“It’s not clever,” I insisted. I glared furiously at my brother. “I always knew
you were a dummy!” I screamed at him.
“Amy, you really were scared,” Sara accused. “You nearly dropped your
teeth!”
“Not true!” I sputtered. “I knew it was Dennis—I mean—Jed!”
Now everyone started laughing at me! I could feel my face getting hot, and
I knew I was blushing.
That made them all laugh even harder.
Nice family, huh?
I climbed to my feet, walked around the table, and took Dennis’ head away
from Jed. “Don’t go in my room,” I told him through clenched teeth. “And don’t
mess with my stuff.” I stomped away to put the dummy head back in my room.
“It was just a joke, Amy,” I heard Sara call after me.
“Yeah. It was just a joke,” Jed repeated nastily.
“Ha-ha!” I shouted back at them. “What a riot!”
My anger had faded away by the time we started Family Sharing Night. We
settled in the living room, taking our usual places.
Mom volunteered to go first. She told a funny story about something that
had happened at work.
Mom works in a fancy women’s clothing store downtown. She told us
about a really big woman who came into the store and insisted on trying on only
tiny sizes.
The woman ripped every piece of clothing she tried on—and then bought
them all! “They’re not for me,” the woman explained. “They’re for my sister!”
We all laughed. But I was surprised Mom told that story. Because Mom is
pretty chubby. And she’s very sensitive about it.
About as sensitive as Dad is about being bald.
Dad was the next to share. He brought out his guitar, and we all groaned.
Dad thinks he’s a great singer. But he’s nearly as tone deaf as I am.
He loves singing all these old folk songs from the sixties. There’s supposed
to be some kind of message in them. But Sara, Jed, and I have no idea what he’s
singing about.
Dad strummed away and sang something about not working on Maggie’s
farm anymore. At least, I think that’s what he was saying.
We all clapped and cheered. But Dad knew we didn’t really mean it.
It was Jed’s turn next. But he insisted that he had already shared. “Dressing
up like Dennis—that was it,” he said.
No one wanted to argue with him. “Your turn, Amy,” Mom said, leaning
against Dad on the couch. Dad fiddled with his glasses, then settled back.
I picked up Slappy and arranged him on my lap. I was feeling a little
nervous. I wanted to do a good job and impress them with my new comedy act.
I’d been practicing all week, and I knew the jokes by heart. But as I slipped
my hand into Slappy’s back and found the string, my stomach felt all fluttery.
I cleared my throat and began.
“This is Slappy, everyone,” I said. “Slappy, say hi to my family.”
“Hi to my family!” I made Slappy say. I made his eyes slide back and forth.
They all chuckled.
“This dummy is much better!” Mom commented.
“But it’s the same old ventriloquist,” Sara said cruelly.
I glared at her.
“Just joking! Just joking!” my sister insisted.
“I think that dummy reeks,” Jed chimed in.
“Give Amy a break,” Dad said sharply. “Go ahead, Amy.”
I cleared my throat again. It suddenly felt very dry. “Slappy and I are going
to tell some knock-knock jokes,” I announced. I turned to face Slappy and made
him turn his head to me. “Knock knock,” I said.
“Knock it off!” came the harsh reply.
Slappy spun around to face my Mom. “Hey—don’t break the sofa, fatso!”
he rasped. “Why don’t you skip the French fries and have a salad once in a
while?”
“Huh?” Mom gasped in shock. “Amy—”
“Amy, that’s not funny!” Dad cried angrily.
“What’s your problem, baldy?” Slappy shouted. “Is that your head—or are
you hatching an ostrich egg on your neck?”
“That’s enough, Amy!” Dad cried, jumping to his feet. “Stop it—right
now!”
“But—but—Dad—!” I sputtered.
“Why don’t you put an extra hole in your head and use it for a bowling
ball?” Slappy screamed at Dad.
“Your jokes are horrible!” Mom exclaimed. “They’re hurtful and insulting.”
“It’s not funny, Amy!” Dad fumed. “It’s not funny to hurt people’s
feelings.”
“But, Dad—” I replied. “I didn’t say any of that! It wasn’t me! It was
Slappy! Really! I wasn’t saying it! I wasn’t!”
Slappy raised his head. His red-lipped grin appeared to spread. His blue
eyes sparkled. “Did I mention you are all ugly?” he asked.
8
Everyone started shouting at once.
I stood up and dropped Slappy facedown on the armchair.
My legs were trembling. My entire body was shaking.
What’s going on here? I asked myself. I didn’t say those things. I really
didn’t.
But Slappy can’t be talking on his own—can he?
Of course not, I realized.
But what did that mean? Did that mean I was saying those horrible,
insulting things to my parents without even knowing it?
Mom and Dad stood side by side, staring at me angrily, demanding to know
why I insulted them.
“Did you really think that was funny?” Mom asked. “Didn’t you think it
would hurt my feelings to call me fatso?”
Meanwhile, Jed was sprawled on his back in the middle of the floor,
giggling like a moron. He thought the whole thing was a riot.
Sara sat cross-legged against the wall, shaking her head, her black hair
falling over her face. “You’re in major trouble,” she muttered. “What’s your
problem, Amy?”
I turned to Mom and Dad. My hands were balled into tight fists. I couldn’t
stop shaking.
“You’ve got to believe me!” I shrieked. “I didn’t say those things! I really
didn’t!”
“Yeah. Right. Slappy is a baaad dude!” Jed chimed in, grinning.
“Everybody, just be quiet!” Dad screamed. His face turned bright red.
Mom squeezed his arm. She didn’t like it when he got too angry or excited.
I guess she worried he might totally explode or something.
Dad crossed his arms in front of his chest. I saw that he had a sweat stain on
the chest of his polo shirt. His face was still red.
The room suddenly fell silent.
“Amy, we’re not going to believe you,” Dad said softly.
“But—but—but—”
He raised a hand to silence me.
“You’re a wonderful storyteller, Amy,” Dad continued. “You make up
wonderful fantasies and fairy tales. But we’re not going to believe this one. I’m
sorry. We’re not going to believe that your dummy spoke up on his own.”
“But he did!” I screamed. I felt like bursting out in sobs. I bit my lip hard,
trying to force them back.
Dad shook his head. “No, Slappy didn’t insult us. You said those things,
Amy. You did. And now I want you to apologize to your mother and me. Then I
want you to take your dummy and go to your room.”
There was no way they’d ever believe me. No way. I wasn’t sure I believed
it myself.
“Sorry,” I muttered, still holding back the tears. “Really. I’m sorry.”
With an unhappy sigh, I lifted Slappy off the chair. I carried him around the
waist so that his arms and legs dangled toward the floor. “Good night,” I said. I
walked slowly toward my room.
“What about my turn?” I heard Sara ask.
“Sharing Night is over,” Dad replied grumpily. “You two—get lost. Leave
your mom and me alone.”
Dad sounded really upset.
I didn’t blame him.
I stepped into my room and closed the door behind me. Then I lifted Slappy
up, holding him under the shoulders. I raised his face to mine.
His eyes seemed to stare into my face.
Such cold blue eyes, I thought.
His bright red lips curled up into that smirking grin. The smile suddenly
seemed evil. Mocking.
As if Slappy were laughing at me.
But of course that was impossible. My wild imagination was playing tricks
on me, I decided.
Frightening tricks.
Slappy was just a dummy, after all. Just a hunk of painted wood.
I stared hard into those cold blue eyes. “Slappy, look at all the trouble you
caused me tonight,” I told him.
Thursday night had been awful. Totally awful.
But Friday turned out to be much worse.
9
First I dropped my tray in the lunchroom. The trays were all wet, and mine just
slipped out of my hand.
The plates clattered on the floor, and my lunch spilled all over my new
white sneakers. Everyone in the lunchroom clapped and cheered.
Was I embarrassed? Take three guesses.
Later that afternoon, report cards were handed out.
Sara came home grinning and singing. Nothing makes her more happy than
being perfect. And her report card was perfect. All A’s.
She insisted on showing it to me three times. She showed it to Jed three
times, too. And we both had to tell her how wonderful she was each time.
I’m being unfair to Sara.
She was happy and excited. And she had a right to be. Her report card was
perfect—and her flower painting won the blue ribbon in the State Art Contest.
So I shouldn’t blame her for dancing around the house and singing at the
top of her lungs.
She wasn’t trying to rub it in. She wasn’t trying to make me feel like a
lowly slug because my report card had two C’s. One in math and one in science.
It wasn’t Sara’s fault that I had received my worst report card ever.
So I tried to hold back my jealous feelings and not strangle her the tenth
time she told me about the art prize. But it wasn’t easy.
The worst part of my report card wasn’t the two C’s. It was the little note
Miss Carson wrote at the bottom.
It said: Amy isn’t working to the best of her ability. If she worked harder, she
could do much better than this.
I don’t think teachers should be allowed to write notes on report cards. I
think getting grades is bad enough.
I tried to make up some kind of story to explain the two C’s to my parents. I
planned to tell them that everyone in the class got C’s in math and science. “Miss
Carson didn’t have time to grade our papers. So she gave us all C’s—just to be
fair.”
It was a good story. But not a great story.
No way Mom and Dad would buy that one.
I paced back and forth in my room, trying to think of a better story. After a
while, I noticed Slappy staring at me.
He sat in the chair beside Dennis, grinning and staring.
Slappy’s eyes weren’t following me as I paced—were they?
I felt a chill run down my back.
It really seemed as if the eyes were watching me, moving as I moved.
I darted to the chair and turned Slappy so that his back was to me. I didn’t
have time to think about a stupid dummy. My parents would be home from work
any minute. And I needed a good story to explain my awful report card.
Did I come up with one? No.
Were my parents upset? Yes.
Mom said she would help me get better organized. Dad said he would help
me understand my math problems. The last time Dad helped me with my math, I
nearly flunked!
Even Jed—the total goof-off—got a better report card than me. They don’t
give grades in the lower school. The teacher just writes a report about you.
And Jed’s report said that he was a great kid and a really good student. That
teacher must be sick!
I stared at Jed across the dinner table. He opened his mouth wide to show
me a mouth full of chewed-up peas.
Sick!
“You reek,” he said to me. For no reason at all.
Sometimes I wonder why families were invented.
Saturday morning, I called Margo. “I can’t come over,” I told her with a sigh.
“My parents won’t let me.”
“My report card wasn’t too good, either,” Margo replied. “Miss Carson
wrote a note at the bottom. She said I talk too much in class.”
“Miss Carson talks too much,” I said bitterly.
As I chatted with Margo, I stared at myself in the dresser mirror. I look too
much like Sara, I thought. Why do I have to look like her twin? Maybe I’ll cut
my hair really short. Or get a tattoo.
I wasn’t thinking too clearly.
I was too angry that my parents weren’t allowing me to go over to Margo’s
house.
“This is bad news,” Margo said. “I wanted to talk to you about performing
with Slappy at my dad’s place.”
“I know,” I replied sadly. “But they’re not letting me go anywhere until my
science project is finished.”
“You still haven’t turned that in?” Margo demanded.
“I kind of forgot about it,” I confessed. “I did the project part—for the
second time. I just have to write the report.”
“Well, I told you, Daddy has a birthday party for a dozen three-year-olds
next Saturday,” Margo said. “And he wants you and Slappy to entertain them.”
“As soon as I finish the science report, I’m going to start rehearsing,” I
promised. “Tell your dad not to worry, Margo. Tell him I’ll be great.”
We chatted for a few more minutes. Then my mom shouted for me to get
off the phone. I talked for a little while longer—until Mom shouted a second
time. Then I said good-bye to Margo and hung up.
I slaved over my computer all morning and most of the afternoon. And I
finished the science report.
It wasn’t easy. Jed kept coming into my room, begging me to play a
Nintendo game with him. “Just one!” And I had to keep tossing him out.
When I finally finished writing the paper, I printed it out and read it one
more time. I thought it was pretty good.
What it needs is a really great-looking cover, I decided.
I wanted to get a bunch of colored markers and do a really bright cover. But
my markers were all dried up.
I tossed them into the trash and made my way to Sara’s room. I knew that
she had an entire drawer filled with colored markers.
Sara was at the mall with a bunch of her friends. Miss Perfect could go out
and spend Saturday doing whatever she wanted. Because she was perfect.
I knew she wouldn’t mind if I borrowed a few markers.
Jed stopped me outside her door. “One game of Battle Chess!” he pleaded.
“Just one game!”
“No way,” I told him. I placed my hand on top of his head. His red, curly
hair felt so soft. I pushed him out of my way. “You always murder me at Battle
Chess. And I’m not finished with my work yet.”
“Why are you going in Sara’s room?” he demanded.
“None of your business,” I told him.
“You reek,” he said. “You double reek, Amy.”
I ignored him and made my way into Sara’s room to borrow the markers.
I spent nearly an hour making the cover. I filled it with molecules and
atoms, all in different colors. Miss Carson will be impressed, I decided.
Sara returned home just as I finished. She was carrying a big shopping bag
filled with clothes she’d bought at Banana Republic.
She started to her room with the bag. “Mom—come see what I bought,” she
called.
Mom appeared, carrying a stack of freshly laundered towels.
“Can I see, too?” I called. I followed them to Sara’s room.
But Sara stopped at her door.
The bag fell from her hand.
And she let out a scream.
Mom and I crowded behind her. We peered into the bedroom.
What a mess!
Someone had overturned about a dozen jars of paint. Reds, yellows, blues.
The paint had spread over Sara’s white carpet, like a big, colorful mud puddle.
I gasped and blinked several times. It was unreal!
“I don’t believe it!” Sara kept shrieking. “I don’t believe it!”
“The carpet is ruined!” Mom exclaimed, taking one step into the room.
The emptied paint jars were on their sides, strewn around the room.
“Jed!” Mom shouted angrily. “Jed—get in here! Now!”
We turned to see Jed right behind us in the hall. “You don’t have to shout,”
he said softly.
Mom narrowed her eyes angrily at my brother. “Jed—how could you?” she
demanded through clenched teeth.
“Excuse me?” He gazed up at her innocently.
“Jed—don’t lie!” Sara screamed. “Did you do this? Did you go in my room
again?”
“No way!” Jed protested, shaking his head. “I didn’t go in your room today,
Sara. Not once. But I saw Amy go in. And she wouldn’t tell me why.”
10
Sara and Mom both turned accusing eyes on me.
“How could you?” Sara screamed, walking around the big paint puddle.
“How could you?”
“Whoa! Wait! I didn’t! I didn’t!” I cried frantically.
“I asked Amy why she was going in here,” Jed chimed in. “And she said it
was none of my business.”
“Amy!” Mom cried. “I’m horrified. I’m truly horrified. This—this is sick!”
“Yes, it’s sick,” Sara repeated, shaking her head. “All of my poster paint.
All of it. What a mess. I know why you did it. It’s because you’re jealous of my
perfect report card.”
“But I didn’t do it!” I wailed. “I didn’t! I didn’t! I didn’t!”
“Amy—no one else could have,” Mom replied. “If Jed didn’t do it, then—”
“But I only came in here to borrow markers!”
I cried in a trembling voice. “That’s all. I needed markers.”
“Amy—” Mom started, pointing to the huge paint puddle.
“I’ll show you!” I cried. “I’ll show you what I borrowed.”
I ran to my room. My hands were shaking as I scooped Sara’s markers off
my desk. My heart pounded.
How could they accuse me of something so terrible? I asked myself.
Is that what everyone thinks of me? That I’m such a monster?
That I’m so jealous of my sister, I’d pour out all her paints and ruin her rug?
Do they really think I’m crazy?
I ran back to Sara’s room, carrying the markers in both hands. Jed sat on
Sara’s bed, staring down at the thick red, blue, and yellow puddle.
Mom and Sara stood over it, gazing down and shaking their heads. Mom
kept making clucking noises with her tongue. She kept pressing her hands
against her cheeks.
“Here! See?” I cried. I shoved the markers toward them. “That’s why I
came in here. I’m not lying!”
Some of the markers fell out of my hands. I bent to pick them up.
“Amy, there were only three of us home this afternoon,” Mom said. She
was trying to keep her voice low and calm. But she spoke through gritted teeth.
“You, me, and Jed.”
“I know—” I started.
Mom raised a hand to silence me. “I certainly didn’t do this horrible thing,”
Mom continued. “And Jed says that he didn’t do it. So…” Her voice trailed off.
“Mom—I’m not a sicko!” I shrieked. “I’m not!”
“You’ll feel better if you confess,” Mom said. “Then we can talk about this
calmly, and—”
“But I didn’t do it!” I raged.
With a cry of anger, I flung the markers to the floor. Then I spun around,
bolted from Sara’s room, and ran down the long hall to my room.
I slammed the door and threw myself facedown onto my bed. I started
sobbing loudly. I don’t know how long I cried.
Finally, I stood up. My face was sopping wet, and my nose was running. I
started to the dresser to get a tissue.
But something caught my eye.
Hadn’t I turned Slappy around so that his back was turned to me?
Now he was sitting facing me, staring up at me, his red-lipped grin wider
than ever.
Did I turn him back around? Did I?
I didn’t remember.
And what did I see on Slappy’s shoes?
I wiped the tears from my eyes with the backs of my hands. Then I took a
few steps toward the dummy, squinting hard at his big leather shoes.
What was that on his shoes?
Red and blue and yellow… paint?
Yes.
With a startled gasp, I grabbed both shoes by the heels and raised them
close to my face.
Yes.
Drips of paint on Slappy’s shoes.
“Slappy—what is going on here?” I asked out loud. “What is going on?”
11
When Dad came home and saw Sara’s room, he nearly exploded.
I was actually worried about him. His face turned as red as a tomato. His
chest started heaving in and out. And horrible gurgling noises came up from his
throat.
The whole family gathered in the living room. We took our Sharing Night
places. Only, this wasn’t Family Sharing Night. This was What Are We Going
To Do About Amy Night.
“Amy, first you have to tell us the truth,” Mom said. She sat stiffly on the
couch, squeezing her hands together in her lap.
Dad sat on the other end of the couch, tapping one hand nervously against
the couch arm, chewing his lower lip. Jed and Sara sat on the floor against the
wall.
“I am telling the truth,” I insisted shrilly. I slumped in the armchair across
from them. My hair fell over my forehead, but I didn’t bother to brush it back.
My white T-shirt had tear stains on the front, still damp. “If you would only
listen to me,” I pleaded.
“Okay, we’re listening,” Mom replied.
“When I went into my room,” I started, “there were splashes of paint on
Slappy’s shoes. And—”
“Enough!” Dad cried, jumping to his feet.
“But, Dad—” I protested.
“Enough!” he insisted. He pointed a finger at me. “No more wild stories,
young lady. Storytime is over. We don’t want to hear about paint stains on
Slappy. We want an explanation for the crime that was committed in Sara’s room
today.”
“But I am giving an explanation!” I wailed. “Why did Slappy have paint on
his shoes? Why?”
Dad dropped back onto the couch with a sigh. He whispered something to
Mom. She whispered back.
I thought I heard them mention the word “doctor”.
“Are you—are you going to take me to a psychiatrist?” I asked timidly.
“Do you think you need one?” Mom replied, staring hard at me.
I shook my head. “No.”
“Your father and I will talk about this,” Mom said. “We will figure out the
best thing to do.”
The best thing to do?
They grounded me for two weeks. No movies.
No friends over. No trips to the mall. No trips anywhere.
I heard them talking about finding me a counselor. But they didn’t say
anything about it to me.
All week, I could feel them watching me. Studying me as if I were some
kind of alien creature.
Sara was pretty cold to me. Her room had to be emptied out and a new rug
installed. She wasn’t happy about it.
Even Jed treated me differently. He kind of tiptoed around me and kept his
distance, as if I had a bad cold or something. He didn’t tease me, or tell me that I
reek, or call me names.
I really missed it. No kidding.
How did I feel? I felt miserable.
I wanted to get sick. I wanted to catch a really bad stomach flu or
something so they’d all feel sorry for me and stop treating me like a criminal.
One good thing: They said I could perform with Slappy at The Party House
on Saturday.
Whenever I picked Slappy up, I felt a little weird. I remembered the paint
on his shoes and the mess in my sister’s room.
But I couldn’t come up with one single explanation. So I practiced with
Slappy every night.
I had put a lot of good jokes together. Silly jokes I thought little three-yearolds would find funny.
And I studied myself in the mirror. I was getting better at not moving my
lips. And it was getting easier to make Slappy’s mouth and eyes move correctly.
“Knock knock,” I made Slappy say.
“Who’s there?” I asked.
“Eddie.”
“Eddie who?” I asked.
“Eddie-body got a tissue? I hab a teddible cold!”
And then I pulled back Slappy’s head, opened his mouth really wide, and
jerked his whole body as I made him sneeze and sneeze and sneeze.
I thought that would really crack up the three-year-olds.
Every night, I worked and worked on our comedy act. I worked so hard.
I didn’t know that the act would never go on.
On Saturday afternoon, Mom dropped me off at The Party House. “Have a good
show!” she called as she drove away.
I carried Slappy carefully in my arms. Margo met me at the door. She
greeted me with an excited smile.
“Just in time!” she cried. “The kids are almost all here. They’re total
animals!”
“Oh, great!” I muttered, rolling my eyes.
“They’re total animals, but they’re so cute!” Margo added.
She led me through the twisting hallway to the party room in back. Clusters
of red and yellow balloons covered the ceiling. I saw a brightly decorated table,
all yellow and red. A balloon on a string floated up from each chair around the
table. Each balloon had the name of a guest on it.
The kids really were cute. They were dressed mostly in jeans and bright Tshirts. Two of the girls wore frilly party dresses.
I counted ten of them, all running wildly, chasing each other in the huge
room.
Their mothers were grouped around a long table against the back wall.
Some of them were sitting down. Some were standing, huddled together,
chatting. Some were calling to their kids to stop being so wild.
“I’m helping out, pouring the punch and stuff,” Margo told me. “Dad wants
you to do your act first thing. You know. To quiet the kids down.”
I swallowed hard. “First thing, huh?”
I had been excited. I could barely choke down my tuna fish sandwich at
lunch. But now I began to feel nervous. I had major fluttering in my stomach.
Margo led me to the front of the room. I saw a low wooden platform there,
painted bright blue. That was the stage.
Seeing the stage made my heart start to pound. My mouth suddenly felt
very dry.
Could I really step up on that stage and do my act in front of all these
people? Kids and mothers?
I had forgotten that the mothers would all be there. Seeing adults in the
audience made me even more nervous.
“Here is the birthday girl,” a woman’s voice said.
I turned to see a smiling mother. She held the hand of a beautiful little girl.
The girl gazed up at me with sparkling blue eyes. She had straight black hair, a
lot like mine, only silkier and finer. She had a bright yellow ribbon in her hair. It
matched her short yellow party dress and yellow sneakers.
“This is Alicia,” the mother announced.
“Hi. I’m Amy,” I replied.
“Alicia would like to meet your dummy,” the woman said.
“Is he real?” Alicia asked.
I didn’t know how to answer that question. “He’s a real dummy,” I told
Alicia.
I propped Slappy up in my arms and slipped my hand into his back. “This is
Slappy,” I told the little girl. “Slappy, this is Alicia.”
“How do you do?” I made Slappy say.
Alicia and her mother both laughed. Alicia stared up at the dummy with her
sparkling blue eyes.
“How old are you?” I made Slappy say.
Alicia held up three fingers. “I’m fffree,” she told him.
“Would you like to shake hands with Slappy?” I asked.
Alicia nodded.
I lowered the dummy a little. I pushed forward Slappy’s right hand. “Go
ahead,” I urged Alicia. “Take his hand.”
Alicia reached up and grabbed Slappy’s hand. She giggled.
“Happy Birthday,” Slappy said.
Alicia shook his hand gently. Then she started to back away.
“We can’t wait to see your show,” Alicia’s mother said to me. “I know the
kids are going to love it.”
“I hope so!” I replied. My stomach fluttered again. I was still really
nervous.
“Let go!” Alicia cried. She tugged at Slappy’s hand. She giggled. “He won’t
let go!”
Alicia’s mom laughed. “What a funny dummy!” She grabbed Alicia’s other
hand. “Let go of the dummy, honey. We have to get everyone in their seats for
the show.”
Alicia tugged a little harder. “But he won’t let go of me, Mommy!” she
cried. “He wants to shake hands!”
Alicia gave a hard tug. But her tiny hand was still wrapped up inside
Slappy’s. She giggled. “He likes me. He won’t let go.”
“Oh, look,” her mother said, glancing to the door. “Phoebe and Jennifer just
arrived. Let’s go say hi.”
Alicia tried to follow her mom, but Slappy held tight to her hand. Alicia’s
smile faded. “Let go!” she insisted.
I saw that several kids had gathered around. They watched Alicia tug at
Slappy’s hand.
“Let go! Let me go!” Alicia cried angrily.
I leaned over to examine Slappy’s hand. To my surprise, it appeared that his
hand had clenched tightly around hers.
Alicia gave a hard tug. “Ow! He’s hurting me, Mommy!”
More kids came over to watch. Some of them were laughing. Two little
dark-haired boys exchanged frightened glances.
“Please—make him let go!” Alicia wailed. She tugged again and again.
I froze in panic. My mind whirred. I tried to think of what to do.
Had Alicia gotten her hand caught somehow?
Slappy’s hand couldn’t really close around hers—could it?
Alicia’s mother was staring at me angrily. “Please let Alicia’s hand out,”
she said impatiently.
“He’s hurting me!” Alicia cried. “Ow! He’s squeezing my hand!”
The room grew very quiet. The other kids were all watching now. Their
eyes wide. Their expressions confused.
I didn’t know what to do. I had no control for Slappy’s hands.
My heart pounded in my chest. I tried to make a joke of it. “Slappy really
likes you!” I told Alicia.
But the little girl was sobbing now. Little tears rolled down her cheeks.
“Mommy—make him stop!”
I pulled my hand out from Slappy’s back. I grabbed his wooden hand
between my hands. “Let go of her, Slappy!” I demanded.
I tried pulling the fingers open.
But I couldn’t budge them.
“What is wrong?” Alicia’s mother was screaming. “Is her hand caught?
What are you doing to her?”
“He’s hurting me!” Alicia wailed. “Owwww! He’s squeezing me!”
Several kids were crying now. Mothers rushed across the room to comfort
them.
Alicia’s sobs rose up over the frightened cries of the other three-year-olds.
The harder she tugged, the tighter the wooden hand squeezed.
“Let go, Slappy!” I shrieked, pulling his fingers. “Let go! Let go!”
“I don’t understand!” Alicia’s mother cried. She began frantically tugging
my arm. “What are you doing? Let her go! Let her go!”
“Owwwww!” Alicia uttered a high, heartbreaking wail. “Make him stop! It
hurts! It hurts!”
And then Slappy suddenly tilted his head back. His eyes opened wide, and
his mouth opened in a long, evil laugh.
12
I burst into the house and let the screen door slam behind me. I had taken the city
bus to Logan Street. Then I had run the six blocks to my house with Slappy
hanging over my shoulder.
“Amy, how did it go?” Mom called from the kitchen. “Did you get a ride? I
thought we were supposed to come pick you up.”
I didn’t answer her. I was sobbing too hard. I ran down the hall to my room
and slammed the door.
I hoisted Slappy off my shoulder and tossed him into the closet. I never
wanted to see him again. Never.
I caught a glimpse of myself in the dresser mirror. My cheeks were swollen
and puffy from crying. My eyes were red. My hair was wet and tangled, and
matted to my forehead.
I took several deep breaths and tried to stop crying.
I kept hearing that poor little girl’s screams in my ears. Slappy finally let go
of her after he uttered his ugly laugh.
But Alicia couldn’t stop crying. She was so frightened! And her little hand
was red and swollen.
The other kids were all screaming and crying, too.
Alicia’s mother was furious. She called Margo’s dad out from the kitchen.
She was shaking and sputtering with anger. She said she was going to sue The
Party House.
Margo’s dad quietly asked me to leave. He led me to the front door. He said
it wasn’t my fault. But he said the kids were too frightened of Slappy now. There
was no way I could do my show.
I saw Margo hurrying over to me. But I turned and ran out the door.
I had never been so upset. I didn’t know what to do. A light rain had started
to come down. I watched rainwater flow down the curb and into the sewer drain.
I wanted to flow away with it.
Now I threw myself onto my bed.
I kept picturing little Alicia, screaming and crying, trying to twist out of
Slappy’s grasp.
Mom knocked hard on my bedroom door. “Amy? Amy—what are you
doing? What’s wrong?”
“Go away!” I wailed. “Just go away.”
But she opened the door and stepped into the room. Sara came in behind
her, a confused expression on her face.
“Amy—the show didn’t go well?” Mom asked softly.
“Go away!” I sobbed. “Please!”
“Amy, you’ll do better next time,” Sara said, stepping up to the bed. She put
a hand on my trembling shoulder.
“Shut up!” I cried. “Shut up, Miss Perfect!”
I didn’t mean to sound so angry. I was out of control.
Sara stepped back, hurt.
“Tell us what happened,” Mom insisted. “You’ll feel better if you tell us.”
I pulled myself up until I was sitting on the edge of the bed. I wiped my
eyes and brushed my wet hair off my face.
And then, suddenly, the whole story burst out of me.
I told how Slappy grabbed Alicia’s hand and wouldn’t let go. And how all
the kids were crying. And the parents were all screaming and making a fuss. And
how I had to leave without doing my act.
And then I leaped to my feet, threw my arms around my mom, and started
to sob again.
She petted my hair, the way she used to do when I was a little girl. She kept
whispering, “Ssshh shhhh shhhh.”
Slowly, I began to calm down.
“This is so weird,” Sara murmured, shaking her head.
“I’m a little worried about you,” Mom said, holding my hands. “The little
girl got her hand caught. That’s all. You don’t really believe that the dummy
grabbed her hand—do you?”
Mom stared at me hard, studying me.
She thinks I’m crazy, I realized. She thinks I’m totally messed up.
She doesn’t believe me.
I decided I’d better not insist that my story was true. I shook my head.
“Yeah. I guess her hand got caught,” I said, lowering my eyes to the floor.
“Maybe you should put Slappy away for a while,” Mom suggested, biting
her bottom lip.
“Yeah. You’re right,” I agreed. I pointed. “I already put him in the closet.”
“Good idea,” Mom replied. “Leave him in there for a while. I think you’ve
been spending too much time with that dummy.”
“Yeah. You need a new hobby,” Sara chimed in.
“It wasn’t a hobby!” I snapped.
“Well, leave him in the closet for a few days—okay, Amy?” Mom said.
I nodded. “I never want to see him again,” I muttered.
I thought I heard a sigh from inside the closet. But, of course, that was my
imagination.
“Get yourself cleaned up,” Mom instructed. “Wash your face. Then come to
the kitchen and I’ll make you a snack.”
“Okay,” I agreed.
Sara followed Mom out the door. “Weird,” I heard Sara mutter. “Amy is
getting so weird.”
Margo called after dinner. She said she felt terrible about what had happened.
She said her dad didn’t blame me. “He wants to give you another chance,”
Margo told me. “Maybe with older kids.”
“Thanks,” I replied. “But I put Slappy away for a while. I don’t know if I
want to be a ventriloquist anymore.”
“At the party today—what happened?” Margo asked. “What went wrong?”
“I don’t really know,” I said. “I don’t really know.”
That night, I went to bed early. Before I turned out the light, I glanced at the
closet door. It was closed tightly.
Having Slappy shut up in the closet made me feel safer.
I fell asleep quickly. I slept a deep, dreamless sleep.
When I awoke the next morning, I sat up and rubbed my eyes.
Then I heard Sara’s angry screams down the hall.
“Mom! Dad! Mom! Hurry!” Sara was shouting. “Come see what Amy did
now!”
13
I shut my eyes, listening to my sister’s screams.
What now? I thought with a shudder. What now?
“Ohh!” I let out a low cry when I saw that my closet door was open a crack.
My heart pounding, I climbed out of bed and began running down the hall
to Sara’s room. Mom, Dad, and Jed were already on their way.
“Mom! Dad! Look what she did!” Sara screamed.
“Oh, no!” I heard Mom and Dad shriek.
I stopped in the doorway, peered in—and gasped.
Sara’s bedroom walls! They were smeared with red paint!
Someone had taken a thick paintbrush and had scrawled AMY AMY AMY
AMY in huge red letters all over Sara’s walls.
“Noooo!” I moaned. I covered my mouth with both hands to stop the sound.
My eyes darted from wall to wall, reading my name over and over.
AMY AMY AMY AMY.
Why my name?
I suddenly felt sick. I swallowed hard, trying to force back my nausea.
I blinked several times, trying to blink the ugly red scrawls away.
AMY AMY AMY AMY.
“Why?” Sara asked me in a trembling voice. She adjusted her nightshirt and
leaned against her dresser. “Why, Amy?”
I suddenly realized that everyone was staring at me.
“I—I—I—” I sputtered.
“Amy, this cannot continue,” Dad said solemnly. His expression wasn’t
angry. It was sad.
“We’ll get you some help, dear,” Mom said. She had tears in her eyes. Her
chin trembled.
Jed stood silently with his arms crossed in front of his pajama shirt.
“Why, Amy?” Sara demanded again.
“But—I didn’t!” I finally choked out.
“Amy—no stories,” Mom said softly.
“But, Mom—I didn’t do it!” I insisted shrilly.
“This is serious,” Dad murmured, rubbing his whiskery chin. “Amy, do you
realize how serious this is?”
Jed reached out two fingers and rubbed them over one of the red paint
scrawls. “Dry,” he reported.
“That means it was done early in the night,” Dad said, his eyes locked on
me. “Do you realize how bad this is? This isn’t just mischief.”
I took a deep breath. My whole body was shaking. “Slappy did it!” I blurted
out. “I’m not crazy, Dad! I’m not! You’ve got to believe me! Slappy did it!”
“Amy, please—” Mom said softly.
“Come with me!” I cried. “I’ll prove it. I’ll prove that Slappy did it. Come
on!”
I didn’t wait for them to reply. I turned and bolted from the room.
I flew down the hall. They all followed silently behind me.
“Is Amy sick or something?” I heard Jed ask my parents.
I didn’t hear the answer.
I burst into my room. They hurried close behind.
I stepped up to the closet and pulled the door open.
“See?” I cried, pointing to Slappy. “See? That proves it! Slappy did it!”
14
I pointed triumphantly at Slappy. “See? See?”
The dummy sat crossed-legged on the closet floor. His head stood erect on
his narrow shoulders. He appeared to grin up at us.
Slappy’s left hand rested on the closet floor. His right hand was in his lap.
And in his right hand he clutched a fat paintbrush.
The bristles on the brush were caked with red paint.
“I told you Slappy did it!” I cried, stepping back so the others could get a
better view.
But everyone remained silent. Mom and Dad frowned and shook their
heads.
Jed’s giggle broke the silence. “This is dumb,” he told Sara.
Sara lowered her eyes and didn’t reply.
“Oh, Amy,” Mom said, sighing. “Did you really think you could blame it
on the dummy by putting the paintbrush in his hand?”
“Huh?” I cried. I didn’t understand what Mom was saying.
“Did you really expect us to believe this?” Dad asked softly. His eyes stared
hard into mine.
“Did you think you could put the brush into Slappy’s hand, and make us
think he painted your name on Sara’s walls?”
“But I didn’t!” I shrieked.
“When did he learn how to spell?” Jed chimed in.
“Be quiet, Jed,” Dad said sharply. “This is serious. It isn’t a joke.”
“Sara, take Jed out of here,” Mom instructed. “The two of you go to the
kitchen and get breakfast started.”
Sara began to guide Jed to the door. But he pulled away. “I want to stay!”
he cried. “I want to see how you punish Amy.”
“Get!” Mom cried, shooing him away with both hands.
Sara tugged him out of the room.
I was shaking all over. I narrowed my eyes at Slappy. Had his grin grown
even wider?
I stared at the paintbrush in his hand. The red paint on the bristles blurred,
blurred until I saw only red.
I blinked several times and turned back to my parents. “You really don’t
believe me?” I asked softly, my voice trembling.
They shook their heads. “How can we believe you, dear?” Mom replied.
“We can’t believe that a wooden dummy has been doing these horrible
things in Sara’s room,” Dad added. “Why don’t you tell us the truth, Amy?”
“But I am!” I protested.
How could I prove it to them? How?
I let out an angry cry and slammed the closet door shut.
“Let’s try to calm down,” Mom urged quietly. “Let’s all get dressed and
have some breakfast. We can talk about this when we’re feeling better.”
“Good idea,” Dad replied, still squinting at me through his glasses. He was
studying me as if he’d never seen me before.
He scratched his bald head. “Guess I’ll have to call a painter for Sara’s
room. It’ll take at least two coats to cover up the red.”
They turned and made their way slowly from my room, talking about how
much it was going to cost to have my sister’s room painted.
I stood in the center of the room and shut my eyes. Every time I closed
them, I saw red. All over Sara’s wall:
AMY AMY AMY AMY.
“But I didn’t do it!” I cried out loud.
My heart pounding, I spun around. I grabbed the knob and jerked open the
closet door.
I grabbed Slappy by the shoulders of his gray jacket and pulled him up from
the floor.
The paintbrush fell from his hand. It landed with a thud beside my bare
foot.
I shook the dummy angrily. Shook him so hard that his arms and legs
swung back and forth, and his head snapped back.
Then I lifted him so that we were eye to eye.
“Admit it!” I screamed, glaring into his grinning face. “Go ahead! Admit
that you did it! Tell me that you did it!”
The glassy blue eyes gazed up at me.
Lifelessly.
Blankly.
Neither of us moved.
And then, to my horror, the wooden lips parted. The red mouth slowly
opened.
And Slappy let out a soft, evil, “Hee hee hee.”
15
“I can’t come over,” I told Margo glumly. I was sprawled on top of my bed, the
phone pressed against my ear. “I’m not allowed out of my room all day.”
“Huh? Why?” Margo demanded.
I sighed. “If I told you, Margo, you wouldn’t believe me.”
“Try me,” she replied.
I decided not to tell her. I mean, my whole family thought I was crazy. Why
should my best friend think it, too?
“Maybe I’ll tell you about it when I see you,” I said.
Silence at the other end.
Then Margo uttered, “Wow.”
“Wow? What does wow mean?” I cried.
“Wow. It must be pretty bad if you can’t talk about it, Amy.”
“It—it’s just weird,” I stammered. “Can we change the subject?”
Another silence. “Daddy has a birthday party for six-year-olds coming up,
Amy. And he wondered—”
“No. Sorry,” I broke in quickly. “I put Slappy away.”
“Excuse me?” Margo reacted with surprise.
“I put the dummy away,” I told her. “I’m finished with that. I’m not going
to be a ventriloquist anymore.”
“But, Amy—” Margo protested. “You loved playing with those dummies.
And you said you wanted to make some money, remember? So Daddy—”
“No,” I repeated firmly. “I changed my mind, Margo. I’m sorry. Tell your
dad I’m sorry. I—I’ll tell you about it when I see you.”
I swallowed hard. And added: “If I ever see you.”
“You sound terrible,” Margo replied softly. “Should I come over to your
house? I think I could get my dad to drop me off.”
“I’m totally grounded,” I said unhappily. “No visitors.”
I heard footsteps in the hall. Probably Mom or Dad checking up on me. I
wasn’t allowed to be on the phone, either.
“Got to go. Bye, Margo,” I whispered. I hung up the phone.
Mom knocked on my bedroom door. I recognized her knock. “Amy, want to
talk?” she called in.
“Not really,” I replied glumly.
“As soon as you tell the truth, you can come out,” Mom said.
“I know,” I muttered.
“Why don’t you just tell the truth now? It’s such a beautiful day,” Mom
called in. “Don’t waste the whole day in your room.”
“I—I don’t feel like talking now,” I told her.
She didn’t say anything else. But I could hear her standing out there. Finally
I heard her footsteps padding back down the hall.
I grabbed my pillow and buried my face in it.
I wanted to shut out the world. And think.
Think. Think. Think.
I wasn’t going to confess to a crime I didn’t do. No way.
I was going to find a way to prove to them that Slappy was the culprit. And
I was going to prove to them that I wasn’t crazy.
I had to show them that Slappy wasn’t an ordinary dummy.
He was alive. And he was evil.
But how could I prove it?
I climbed to my feet and began pacing back and forth. I stopped at the
window and gazed out at the front yard.
It was a beautiful spring day. Bright yellow tulips bobbed in the flower
patch in front of my window. The sky was a solid blue. The twin maple trees in
the center of the yard were starting to unfurl fresh leaves.
I took a deep breath. The air smelled so fresh and sweet.
I saw Jed and a couple of his friends. They were Rollerblading down the
sidewalk. Laughing. Having a good time.
And I was a prisoner. A prisoner in my room.
All because of Slappy.
I spun away from the window and stared at the closet door. I had shoved
Slappy into the back of the closet and shut the door tightly.
I’m going to catch you in the act, Slappy, I decided.
That’s how I’m going to prove I’m not crazy.
I’m going to stay up all night. I’m going to stay up every night. And the
first time you creep out of that closet, I’ll be awake. And I’ll follow you.
And I’ll make sure that everyone sees what you are doing.
I’ll make sure that everyone sees that you are the evil one in this house.
I felt so upset. I knew I wasn’t really thinking clearly.
But having a plan made me feel a little better.
Taking one last glance at the closet door, I crossed the room to my desk and
started to do my homework.
* * *
Mom and Dad let me come out for dinner.
Dad had grilled hamburgers in the backyard, the first barbecue of spring. I
loved grilled hamburgers, especially when they’re charred real black. But I could
barely taste my food.
I guess I felt too excited and nervous about trapping Slappy.
No one talked much.
Mom kept chattering to Dad about the vegetable garden and what she
wanted to plant. Sara talked a little about the mural she had started to paint in her
room. Jed kept complaining about how he wrecked his knee Rollerblading.
No one spoke to me. They kept glancing over the table at me. Studying me
like I was some kind of zoo animal.
I asked to be excused before dessert.
I usually stay up till ten. But a little after nine, I decided to go to bed.
I was wide awake. Eager to trap Slappy.
I turned out the light and tucked myself in. Then I lay staring up at the
shifting shadows on the bedroom ceiling, waiting, waiting…
Waiting for Slappy to come creeping out of the closet.
I must have fallen asleep.
I tried not to. But I must have drifted off anyway.
I was startled awake by sounds in the room.
I raised my head, instantly alert. And listened.
The scrape of feet on my carpet. A soft rustling.
A shiver of fear ran down my back. I felt goose-bumps up and down my
arms.
Another low sound. So near my bed.
I reached forward quickly. Clicked on the bed table lamp.
And cried out.
16
“Jed—what are you doing in here?” I shrieked.
He stood blinking at me in the center of the room. One leg of his blue
pajama pants had rolled up. His red hair was matted against one side of his head.
“What are you doing in my room?” I demanded breathlessly.
He squinted at me. “Huh? Why are you yelling at me? You called me,
Amy.”
“I—I what?” I sputtered.
“You called me. I heard you.” He rubbed his eyes with his fingers and
yawned. “I was asleep. You woke me up.”
I lowered my feet to the floor and stood up. My legs felt shaky and weak.
Jed had really scared me.
“I was asleep, too,” I told him. “I didn’t call you.”
“Yes, you did,” he insisted. “You told me to come to your room.” He bent to
pull down the pajama leg.
“Jed, you just woke me up,” I replied. “So how could I call you?”
He scratched his hair. He yawned again. “You mean I dreamed it?”
I studied his face. “Jed—did you sneak into my room to play some kind of
prank?” I demanded sternly.
He wrinkled his face up, tried to appear innocent.
“Did you?” I demanded. “Were you going into the closet to do something
with Slappy?”
“No way!” he protested. He started to back out of the room. “I’m telling the
truth, Amy. I thought you called me. That’s all.”
I squinted hard at him, trying to decide if he was telling the truth. I let my
eyes wander around the room. Everything seemed okay. Dennis lay in the
armchair, his head in his lap.
The closet door remained closed.
“It was a dream, that’s all,” Jed repeated. “Good night, Amy.”
I said good night. “Sorry I got upset, Jed. It’s been a bad day.”
I listened to him pad back to his room.
The cat poked his head into my room, his eyes gleaming like gold. “Go to
sleep, George,” I whispered. “You go to sleep, too, okay?” He obediently turned
and disappeared.
I clicked off the bed table lamp and settled back into bed.
Jed was telling the truth, I decided. He seemed as confused as I was.
My eyes suddenly felt heavy. As if there were hundred-pound weights over
them. I let out a loud yawn.
I felt so sleepy. And the pillow felt so soft and warm.
But I couldn’t let myself fall back to sleep.
I had to stay awake. Had to wait for Slappy to make his move.
Did I drift back to sleep? I’m not sure.
A loud click made my eyes shoot open wide.
I raised my head in time to see the closet door start to open.
The room lay in darkness. No light washed in from the window. The door
was a black shadow, sliding slowly, slowly.
My heart began to pound. My mouth suddenly felt dry as cotton.
The closet door slid slowly, silently.
A low creak.
And then a shadow stepped out from behind the dark door.
I squinted hard at it. Not moving a muscle.
Another creak of the door.
The figure took another silent step. Out of the closet. Another step. Another.
Making its way past my bed, to the bedroom door.
Slappy.
Yes!
Even in the night blackness I could see his large, rounded head. I watched
his skinny arms dangle at his sides, the wooden hands bobbing as he moved.
The heavy leather shoes slid over my carpet. The thin, boneless legs nearly
collapsed with each shuffling step.
Like a scarecrow, I thought, gripped with horror.
He walks like a scarecrow. Because he has no bones. No bones at all.
Up and down, his whole body bobbed as he crept away.
I waited until he slithered and scraped out the door and into the hall. Then I
jumped to my feet.
I took a deep breath and held it.
Then I tiptoed through the darkness after him.
Here we go! I told myself. Here we go!
17
I stopped at the bedroom door and poked my head into the hall. Mom keeps a
small night-light on all night just outside her bedroom door. It cast dim yellow
light over the other end of the hall.
Peering into the light, I watched Slappy pull himself silently toward Sara’s
room. The big shoes shuffled along the carpet. Slappy’s body bobbed and bent.
The big, wooden hands nearly dragged along the floor.
When my chest started to ache, I realized I hadn’t taken a breath. As
silently as I could, I let out a long whoosh of air. Then I took another deep breath
and started to follow Slappy down the hall.
I had a sudden impulse to shout: “Mom! Dad!”
They would burst out of their room and see Slappy standing there in the
middle of the hall.
But, no.
I didn’t want to shout for them now. I wanted to see where Slappy was
heading. I wanted to see what he planned to do.
I took a step. The floorboard creaked under my bare foot.
Did he hear me?
I pressed my back against the wall, tried to squeeze myself flat in the deep
shadows.
I peered through the dim yellow light at him. He kept bobbing silently
along. His shoulders rode up and down with each shuffling step.
He was just outside Sara’s room when he turned around.
My heart stopped.
I ducked low. Dropped back into the bathroom.
Had he seen me?
Had he turned around because he knew I was there?
I shut my eyes. Waited. Listened.
Listened for him to come scraping back. Listened for him to turn around
and come back to get me.
Silence.
I swallowed hard. My mouth felt so dry. My legs were trembling. I grabbed
the tile wall to steady myself.
Still silent out there.
I gathered up my courage and slowly, slowly poked my head out into the
hall.
Empty.
I squinted toward Sara’s room in the yellow light.
No one there.
He’s in Sara’s room, I told myself. He’s doing something terrible in Sara’s
room. Something I’ll be blamed for.
Not this time, Slappy! I silently vowed.
This time you’re going to be caught.
Pressing against the wall, I crept down the hall.
I stopped in Sara’s doorway.
The night-light was plugged in across from Sara’s room. The light was
brighter here.
I squinted into her bedroom. I could see the mural she had started to paint.
A beach scene. The ocean. A broad, yellow beach. Kites flying over the beach.
Kids building a sand castle in one corner. The mural was tacked up, nearly
covering the entire wall.
Where was Slappy?
I took a step into the room—and saw him.
Standing at her paint table.
I saw his big wooden hand fumble over the table of supplies. Then he
grabbed a paintbrush in one hand.
He raised and lowered the brush, as if pretending to paint the air.
Then I saw him dip the paintbrush in a jar of paint.
Slappy took a step toward the mural. Then another step.
He stood for a moment, admiring the mural.
He raised the paintbrush high.
That’s when I burst into the room.
I dove toward the dummy just as he raised the paintbrush to the mural.
I grabbed the paintbrush with one hand. Wrapped my other hand around his
waist. And tugged him back.
The dummy kicked both legs and tried to punch me with his fists.
“Hey—!” a startled voice shouted.
The light clicked on.
Slappy went limp on my arm. His head dropped. His arms and legs dangled
to the floor.
Sitting up in bed, Sara gaped at me in horror.
I saw her eyes stop at the paintbrush in my hand.
“Amy—what are you doing?” she cried.
And, then, without waiting for an answer, Sara began to shout: “Mom! Dad!
Hurry! She’s in here again!”
18
Dad came rumbling in first, adjusting his pajama pants. “What’s going on?
What’s the problem?”
Mom followed right behind him, blinking and yawning.
“I—I took this from Slappy,” I stammered, holding up the paintbrush. “He
—he was going to ruin the mural.”
They stared at the paintbrush in my hand.
“I heard Slappy sneak out of the closet,” I explained breathlessly. “I
followed him into Sara’s room. I grabbed him just before—before he did
something terrible.”
I turned to Sara. “You saw Slappy—right? You saw him?”
“Yeah,” Sara said, still in bed, her arms crossed over her chest. “I see
Slappy. You’re carrying him on your arm.”
The dummy hung over my arm, its head nearly hitting the floor.
“No!” I cried to Sara. “You saw him sneak into your room—right? That’s
why you turned on the light?”
Sara rolled her eyes. “I saw you come into my room,” she replied. “You’re
carrying the dummy, Amy. You’re holding the dummy—and the brush.”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered.
My eyes darted from face to face. They all stared back at me as if I had just
landed on Earth in a flying saucer.
No one in my family was going to believe me. No one.
The next morning, Mom hung up the phone as I came down for breakfast.
“You’re wearing shorts to school?” she asked, eyeing my outfit—olive-green
shorts and a red, sleeveless T-shirt.
“The radio said it’s going to be hot,” I replied.
Jed and Sara were already at the table. They glanced up from their cereal
bowls, but didn’t say anything.
I poured myself a glass of grape juice. I’m the only one in my family who
doesn’t like orange juice. I guess I am totally weird.
“Who were you talking to on the phone?” I asked Mom. I took a long drink.
“Uh… Dr. Palmer’s secretary,” she replied hesitantly. “You have purple
above your lip,” she told me, pointing.
I wiped the grape juice off with a napkin. “Dr. Palmer? Isn’t she a shrink?”
I asked.
Mom nodded. “I tried to get an appointment for today. But she can’t see
you until Wednesday.”
“But, Mom—!” I protested.
Mom placed a finger over her mouth. “Sssshhh. No discussion.”
“But, Mom—!” I repeated.
“Ssshhh. Just talk to her once, Amy. You might enjoy it. You might think
it’s helpful.”
“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered.
I turned to Sara and Jed. They stared down at their cereal bowls.
I sighed and set the juice glass down in the sink.
I knew what this meant. It meant that I had until Wednesday to prove to my
family that I wasn’t a total wack job.
In the lunchroom at school, Margo begged me to tell her what was going on with
me. “Why were you locked up in your room all day yesterday?” she demanded.
“Come on, Amy—spill.”
“It’s no big deal,” I lied.
No way I was going to tell her.
I didn’t need the story going around school that Amy Kramer believes her
ventriloquist dummy is alive.
I didn’t need everyone whispering about me and staring at me the way
everyone in my family did.
“Dad wants to know if you’ll change your mind about the birthday party,”
Margo said. “If you want to perform with Slappy, you can—”
“No. Forget it!” I interrupted. “I put Slappy in the closet, and he’s staying
there. Forever.”
Margo’s eyes went wide. “Okay. Okay. Wow. You don’t have to bite my
head off.”
“Sorry,” I said quickly. “I’m a little stressed out these days. Here. Want
this?” I handed her the brownie Mom had packed.
“Thanks,” Margo replied, surprised.
“Later,” I said. I crinkled up my lunch bag, tossed it in the trash, and
hurried away.
In my room that night, I couldn’t concentrate on my homework. I kept staring at
the calendar.
Monday night. I had only two nights to prove that I wasn’t crazy, that
Slappy really was doing these horrible things.
I slammed my history book shut. No way I could read about the firing on
Fort Sumter tonight.
I paced back and forth for a while. Thinking. Thinking hard. But getting
nowhere.
What could I do?
What?
After a while, my head felt about to split open. I reached up both hands and
tugged at my hair.
“Aaaaagh!” I let out a furious cry. Of anger. Of frustration.
Maybe I’ll just get rid of Slappy, I decided.
Maybe I’ll take him outside and toss him in the trash.
And that will end the whole problem.
The idea made me feel a little better.
I turned and took two steps toward the closet.
But I stopped with a gasp when I saw the doorknob slowly turn.
As I stared in shock, the closet door swung open.
Slappy stepped out.
He slumped forward and stopped a few feet in front of me.
His blue eyes glared up at me. His grin grew wider.
“Amy,” he rasped, “it’s time you and I had a little talk.”
19
“Amy, now you are my slave,” Slappy said. His threat came out in a harsh, cold
rasp. The eerie voice made me shiver.
I stared back at him. I couldn’t reply.
I gaped into those glassy blue eyes, that red-lipped smirk.
“You read the ancient words that bring me to life,” the dummy whispered.
“And now you will serve me. You will do everything I ask.”
“No!” I finally managed to choke out. “No! Please—!”
“Yes!” he cried. The grinning wooden head bobbed up and down, nodding.
“Yes, Amy! You are my slave now! My slave forever!”
“I w-won’t!” I stammered. “You can’t make me—” My voice caught in my
throat. My legs wobbled like rubber. My knees buckled, and I nearly fell.
Slappy raised one hand and grabbed my wrist. I felt the cold, wooden
fingers tighten around me.
“You will do as I tell you—from now on,” the dummy whispered. “Or
else…”
“Let go of me!” I cried. I struggled to tug my arm free. But his grasp was
too tight. “Or else what?” I cried.
“Or else I will destroy your sister’s mural,” Slappy replied. His painted grin
grew wider. The cold eyes glared into mine.
“Big deal,” I muttered. “Do you really think I’ll be your slave because you
wreck her painting? You’ve already wrecked Sara’s room—haven’t you? That
doesn’t mean I’ll be your slave!”
“I’ll keep on destroying things,” Slappy replied, tightening his grip on my
wrist, tugging me down toward him. “Maybe I’ll start wrecking your brother’s
things, too. And you will be blamed, Amy. You will be blamed for it all.”
“Stop—” I cried, trying to twist free.
“Your parents are already worried about you—aren’t they, Amy?” the
dummy rasped in that harsh, cold whispery voice. “Your parents already think
you’re crazy!”
“Stop! Please—!” I pleaded.
“What do you think they’ll do when you start wrecking everything in the
house?” Slappy demanded. “What do you think they’ll do to you, Amy?”
“Listen to me!” I shrieked. “You can’t—”
He jerked my arm hard. “They’ll send you away!” he rasped, his eyes
flashing wildly. “That’s what your parents will do. They’ll send you away. And
you’ll never see them again—except on visiting days!”
He tilted back his wooden head and uttered a shrill laugh.
A low moan escaped my throat. My entire body shuddered with terror.
Slappy tugged me closer. “You will be an excellent slave,” he whispered in
my ear. “You and I will have many good years together. You will devote your
life to me.”
“No!” I cried. “No, I won’t!”
I sucked in a deep breath. Then I swung my arm hard, as hard as I could.
I caught the dummy by surprise.
Before he could let go of my wrist, I pulled him off balance.
He let out a startled grunt as I lifted him off the floor.
He’s just a dummy, I told myself. Just a dummy. I can handle him. I can
beat him.
His hand fell off my wrist.
I ducked low. Grabbed his boneless arm with both hands. Swung my
shoulder. Flipped him over my back.
He landed hard on his stomach. His head made a loud clonk as it hit the
floor.
Breathing hard, my heart thudding wildly, I dove.
I can handle him. I can beat him.
I tried to pin him to the floor with my knees.
But he spun away and scrambled up, faster than I could believe.
I cried out as he swung his wooden fist.
I tried to dodge away. But he was too fast.
The heavy fist hit me square in the forehead.
My face felt as if it had exploded. Pain shot down my body.
Everything went bright red.
And, holding both sides of my head, I crumpled to the floor.
20
I can handle him. I can beat him.
The words repeated in my mind.
I blinked my eyes. Raised my head.
I refused to give up.
Through the haze of red, I reached up with both hands.
I grabbed Slappy by the waist and pulled him down.
Ignoring my throbbing forehead, I wrestled him to the ground. He kicked
both feet and thrashed his arms wildly. He swung at me, trying to land another
blow.
But I dug my knee into his middle. Then I wrapped my hands around his
thrashing arms and pinned them to the floor.
“Let go, slave!” he squealed. “I command you—let go!” He struggled and
squirmed.
But I held tight.
His eyes darted frantically from side to side.
His wooden jaw clicked open and shut, open and shut, as he strained to
squirm free.
“I command you to let go, slave! You have no choice! You must obey me!”
I ignored his shrill cries and swung his arms behind his back. Holding them
tightly in place, I climbed to my feet.
He tried to kick me with both shoes. But I let go of the arms and grabbed
his legs.
I swung him upside down. Once again, his head hit the floor with a clonk.
It didn’t seem to hurt him a bit.
“Let go! Let go, slave! You will pay! You will pay dearly for this!” He
screamed and protested, squirming and swinging his arms.
Breathing hard, I dragged him across the rug—and swung him into the open
closet.
He dove quickly, trying to escape.
But I slammed the door in his face. And turned the lock.
With a sigh, I leaned my back against the closet door and struggled to catch
my breath.
“Let me out! You can’t keep me in here!” Slappy raged.
He began pounding on the door. Then he kicked the door.
“I’ll break it down! I really will!” he threatened. He pounded even harder.
The big wooden hands thudded against the wooden door.
I turned and saw the door start to give.
He’s going to break it open! I realized.
What can I do? What can I do now? I tried to fight back my panic,
struggled to think clearly.
Slappy furiously kicked at the door.
I need help, I decided.
I bolted into the hall. Mom and Dad had their bedroom door closed, I saw.
Should I wake them up?
No. They wouldn’t believe me.
I’d drag them into my room. Slappy would be slumped lifelessly on the
closet floor. Mom and Dad would be even more upset about me.
Sara, I thought. Maybe I can convince Sara. Maybe Sara will listen to me.
Her door was open. I burst into her bedroom.
She stood at the mural, brush in hand, dabbing yellow paint on the beach.
She turned as I ran in, and her face tightened in anger. “Amy—what do you
want?” she demanded.
“You—you’ve got to believe me!” I sputtered. “I need your help! It wasn’t
me who did those horrible things. It really wasn’t, Sara. It was Slappy. Please—
believe me! It was Slappy!”
“Yes. I know,” Sara replied calmly.
21
“Huh?” My mouth dropped open. I stared at her in surprise. “What did you say?”
Sara set down the paintbrush. She wiped her hands on her gray smock.
“Amy—I know it’s Slappy,” she repeated in a whisper.
“I—I—” I was so stunned, I couldn’t speak. “But, Sara—you—”
“I’m sorry. I’m so sorry!” she cried with emotion. She rushed forward and
threw her arms around me. She hugged me tightly.
I still didn’t believe what she had said. My head was spinning.
I gently pushed her away. “You knew all this time? You knew it was Slappy
and not me?”
Sara nodded. “The other night, I woke up. I heard someone in my room. I
pretended to be asleep. But I had my eyes open partway.”
“And—?” I demanded.
“I saw Slappy,” Sara confessed, lowering her eyes. “I saw him carrying a
red paintbrush. I saw him painting AMY AMY AMY AMY all over my walls.”
“But you didn’t tell Mom and Dad?” I cried. “You made them think it was
me? And the whole time, you knew the truth?”
Sara kept her eyes on the floor. Her black hair fell over her face. She
brushed it back with a quick, nervous sweep of one hand.
“I—I didn’t want to believe it,” she confessed. “I didn’t want to believe that
a dummy could walk on its own, that it could be… alive.”
I glared at her. “And, so—?”
“So I accused you,” Sara said with a sob. “I guess the truth was just too
scary. I was too frightened, Amy. I wanted to believe it was you doing those
horrible things. I wanted to pretend it wasn’t the dummy.”
“You wanted to get me in trouble,” I accused. “That’s why you did it, Sara.
That’s why you lied to Mom and Dad. You wanted to get me in trouble.”
She finally raised her face to me. I saw two tears trailing down her cheeks.
“Yeah, I guess,” she murmured.
She wiped the tears off with her hands. Her green eyes locked on mine. “I
—I guess I’m a little jealous of you,” she said.
“Huh?” My sister had stunned me again. I squinted at her, trying to make
sense of her words. “You?” I cried. “You’re jealous of me?”
She nodded. “Yeah. I guess. Everything is easy for you. You’re so relaxed.
Everyone likes your sense of humor. It’s not like that for me,” Sara explained. “I
have to paint to impress people.”
I opened my mouth, but no sound came out.
This had to be the biggest surprise of all. Sara jealous of me?
Didn’t she know how jealous I was of her?
I suddenly had a funny feeling in my chest. My eyes brimmed with tears.
Strong emotion swept over me like an ocean wave.
I rushed forward and hugged Sara.
For some reason, we both started laughing. I can’t explain it. We stood there
in the middle of her room, laughing like lunatics.
I guess we were just so glad that the truth was out.
Then Slappy’s painted face flashed back into my mind. And I remembered
with a chill why I had burst into my sister’s room.
“You have to help me,” I told her. “Right now.”
Sara’s smile vanished. “Help you do what?” she demanded.
“We have to get rid of Slappy,” I told her. “We have to get rid of him for
good.”
I tugged her hand. She followed me down the hall.
“But—how?” she asked.
Stepping into my room, we both cried out at once.
We heard a final kick—and the closet door swung open.
Slappy burst out, his eyes wild with rage.
“Guess what, slaves?” he rasped. “Slappy wins!”
22
“Grab him!” I cried to my sister.
I reached out both arms and made a frantic dive for the dummy. But he
scampered to the side and slipped away from my tackle.
His blue eyes flashed excitedly. His red lips twisted in an ugly grin.
“Give up, slaves!” he rasped. “You cannot win!”
Sara held back, hands against the door frame. I could see the fear in her
eyes.
I made another grab for Slappy. Missed again.
“Sara—help me!” I pleaded.
Sara took a step into the room.
I leaped at Slappy, grabbed one boneless ankle.
With a grunt, he pulled out of my grasp. He darted toward the door—and
ran right into Sara.
The collision stunned them both.
Sara staggered back.
Slappy teetered off balance.
I threw myself at him, caught his arms, and pulled them behind his back.
He squirmed and twisted. He kicked out furiously.
But Sara grabbed both of his big leather shoes. “Tie him in a knot!” she
cried breathlessly.
He kicked and thrashed.
But we held tight.
I twisted his arms behind him. Twisted them around each other. Twisted.
Twisted. Then tied them in as tight a knot as I could.
Slappy squirmed and bucked, grunting loudly, his wooden jaws clicking.
When I glanced up from my work on the arms, I saw that Sara had wrapped
his legs in a knot, too.
Slappy tilted back his head and uttered a roar of rage. His eyes slid up into
his head so that only the whites showed. “Put me down, slaves! Put me down at
once!”
With one hand, I grabbed a wad of tissues from my bed table and jammed it
into Slappy’s mouth.
He uttered a grunt of protest, then went silent.
“Now what?” Sara cried breathlessly. “Where should we put him?”
My eyes shot around the room. No, I decided. I don’t want him in my room.
I don’t want him in the house.
“Outside,” I instructed my sister, holding on to the knotted arms with both
of my hands. “Let’s get him outside.”
Struggling to hold on to the bucking legs, Sara glanced at the clock. “It’s
after eleven. What if Mom and Dad hear us?”
“I don’t care!” I cried. “Hurry! I want him out of here! I never want to see
him again!”
We dragged Slappy out into the hall. Mom and Dad’s door remained closed.
Good, I thought. They hadn’t heard our struggle.
Sara carried him by the knotted legs. I held on to the arms.
Slappy had stopped struggling and squirming. I think he was waiting to see
what we were going to do with him. The wad of tissues had silenced his cries.
I didn’t know where to take him. I only knew I wanted him out of the
house.
We carried him through the darkened living room and out the front door.
We stepped into a hot, sticky night, more like summer than spring. A pale sliver
of a moon hovered low in a blue-black sky.
There was no breeze. No sounds of any kind. Nothing moved.
Sara and I carried the dummy to the driveway. “Should we take him
somewhere on our bikes?” she suggested.
“How will we balance him?” I asked. “Besides, it’s too dark. Too
dangerous. Let’s just carry him a few blocks and dump him somewhere.”
“You mean in a trash can or something?” Sara asked.
I nodded. “That’s where he belongs. In the trash.”
Luckily, the dummy didn’t weigh much at all. We made our way to the
sidewalk, then carried him to the end of the block.
Slappy remained limp, his eyes rolled up in his head.
At the corner, I spotted two circles of white light approaching. Car
headlights. “Quick—!” I whispered to Sara.
We slipped behind a hedge just in time. The car rolled by without slowing.
We waited for the glow of red taillights to disappear in the darkness. Then
we continued down the next block, carrying the dummy between us.
“Hey—how about those?” Sara asked, pointing with her free hand.
I squinted to see what she had spotted. A row of metal trash cans lined up at
the curb in front of a dark house across the street.
“Looks good,” I said. “Let’s shove him in and clamp down the lid. Maybe
the trash guys will haul him away tomorrow.”
I led the way across the street—and then stopped. “Sara—wait,” I
whispered. “I have a better idea.”
I dragged the dummy toward the corner. I motioned to the metal drain down
at the curb.
“The sewer?” Sara whispered.
I nodded. “It’s perfect.” Through the narrow opening at the curb, I could
hear running water far down below. “Come on. Shove him in.”
Slappy still didn’t move or protest in any way.
I lowered his head to the drain opening. Then Sara and I pushed him in
headfirst.
I heard a splash and a hard thud as he hit the sewer floor.
We both listened. Silence. Then the soft trickle of water.
Sara and I grinned at each other.
We hurried home. I was so happy, I skipped most of the way.
The next morning, Sara and I came to the kitchen for breakfast together. Mom
turned from the counter, where she was pouring herself a cup of coffee.
Jed was already at the table, eating his Frosted Flakes. “What’s he doing
down here?” Jed asked.
He pointed across the table.
At Slappy. Sitting in the chair.
23
Sara and I both gasped.
“Yes. Why is that dummy down here?” Mom asked me. “I found him sitting
there when I came in this morning. And why is he so dirty? Where has he been,
Amy?”
I could barely choke out a word. “I… uh… I guess he fell or something,” I
finally mumbled.
“Well, take him back upstairs,” Mom ordered. “He’s supposed to be kept in
the closet—remember?”
“Uh… yeah. I remember,” I said, sighing.
“You’ll have to clean him up later,” Mom said, stirring her coffee. “He
looks as if he’s been wallowing in the mud.”
“Okay,” I replied weakly.
I hoisted Slappy up and slung him over my shoulder. Then I started to my
room.
“I—I’ll come with you,” Sara stammered.
“What for?” Mom demanded. “Sit down, Sara, and eat your breakfast.
You’re both going to be late.”
Sara obediently sat down across from Jed. I made my way down the hall.
I was halfway to my room when Slappy raised his head and whispered in
my ear, “Good morning, slave. Did you sleep well?”
I tossed him into the closet and locked the door. I could hear him laughing
inside the closet. The evil laugh made me shake all over.
What am I going to do now? I asked myself. What can I do to get rid of this
creature?
The day dragged by. I don’t think I heard a word my teacher said.
I couldn’t get Slappy’s evil, grinning face out of my mind. His raspy voice
rattled in my ears.
I won’t be your slave! I silently vowed. I’ll get you out of my house—out of
my life—if it’s the last thing I do!
That night, I lay wide awake in my bed. How could I sleep, knowing that evil
dummy sat in the closet a few feet away?
The night was hot and steamy. I had pushed the window open all the way,
but there was no breeze. A fly buzzed by my head, the first fly of spring.
Staring up at the twisting shadows on the ceiling, I brushed the fly away
with one hand. As soon as the buzzing vanished, another sound took its place.
A click. A low squeak.
The sound of the closet door opening.
I raised myself up off the pillow. Squinting into the darkness, I saw Slappy
creep out of the closet.
He took a few shuffling steps, his big shoes sliding silently over my carpet.
He turned.
Was he coming toward my bed?
No.
His head and shoulders bobbed as he pulled himself to the door. Then out
into the hall.
He’s going to Sara’s room, I knew.
But what was he going to do there? Did he plan to pay us back for what we
did to him last night?
What new horror was he going to create?
I lowered my feet to the floor, climbed out of bed, and followed him out
into the hall.
24
My eyes adjusted quickly to the dim yellow light from the night-light at the other
end of the hall. I watched Slappy slither toward my sister’s room. He moved as
silently as a shadow.
I held my breath and kept my back against the wall as I followed behind
him. When he turned into Sara’s room, I stepped away from the wall and started
to run.
I reached the bedroom doorway in time to see Slappy pick up a wide
paintbrush from Sara’s supply table. He took a step toward the mural on the wall.
One step.
And then another small figure leaped out of the darkness.
The lights flashed on.
“Dennis!” I cried.
“Stand back!” Dennis ordered in a high, shrill voice. He lowered his
wooden head and charged at Slappy.
Sara sat up in her bed and uttered a frightened cry.
I could see the stunned expression on Slappy’s face.
Dennis flew at Slappy. He slammed his head into Slappy’s middle.
Slappy let out a loud “Oooof!” He staggered back. Fell.
A loud thud rang through the room as the back of Slappy’s head hit Sara’s
iron bedpost.
I raised both hands to my cheeks and gasped as Slappy’s head cracked
open.
The wooden head split down the middle.
I watched the evil face crack apart. The wide, shocked eyes slid in different
directions. The red lips cracked and fell away.
The head dropped to the floor in two pieces. And then the body collapsed in
a heap beside them.
My hands still pressed against my face, my heart pounding, I took a few
steps into the room.
Dennis ran past me, out to the hall.
But my eyes were locked on the two pieces of Slappy’s head. I stared in
horror as an enormous white worm crawled out of one of the pieces. The fat
worm slithered and curled to the wall—and vanished into a crack in the molding.
Sara climbed out of bed, breathing hard, her face bright red from the
excitement.
The closet door swung open. Mom and Dad came bursting out.
“Girls—are you okay?” Dad cried.
We nodded.
“We saw the whole thing!” Mom exclaimed. She threw her arms around
me. “Amy, I’m so sorry. I’m so sorry. We should have believed you. I’m so sorry
we didn’t believe you.”
“We believe you now!” Dad declared, staring down at Slappy’s broken
head, his crumpled body. “We saw everything!”
It was all planned. Sara and I had worked it out before dinner.
Sara convinced Mom and Dad to hide in the closet. Mom and Dad were
really creeped out by the way I was acting. They were willing to do anything.
So Sara pretended to go to sleep. Mom and Dad hid in the closet.
I left the closet door unlocked to make it easier for Slappy to get out.
I knew Slappy would creep into Sara’s room. I knew Mom and Dad would
finally see that I’m not crazy.
And then Jed burst out dressed as Dennis, with Dennis’ head propped up on
top of his turtleneck sweater.
We knew that would shock Slappy. We knew it would give us a chance to
grab him.
We didn’t know what a great job Jed would do. We didn’t know that Jed
would actually destroy the evil dummy. We didn’t know that Slappy’s head
would crack apart. That was just good luck.
“Hey—where is Jed?” I asked, my eyes searching the room.
“Jed? Jed?” Mom called. “Where are you? You did a great job!”
No reply.
No sign of my brother.
“Weird,” Sara muttered, shaking her head.
We all trooped down the hall into Jed’s room.
We found him in bed, sound asleep. He groggily raised his head from the
pillow and squinted at us. “What time is it?” he asked sleepily.
“It’s nearly eleven,” Dad replied.
“Oh, no!” Jed cried, sitting up. “I’m sorry! I forgot to wake up! I forgot I
was supposed to dress up like Dennis!”
I felt a shiver run down my back. I turned to my parents. “Then who fought
Slappy?” I asked. “Who fought Slappy?”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

THE BARKING GHOST
Goosebumps - 32
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
For the zillionth time that night, I threw the covers off my legs and bolted up
from the bed.
I definitely heard something that time.
And it wasn’t the wind, either. I’m always hearing things. But no matter
what I hear, Mom says, “It’s just the wind, Cooper. Just the wind.”
But the wind doesn’t sound like heavy footsteps crunching through the
leaves. And that’s what I heard this time. Definitely.
I stood next to my bedroom window. Then I leaned over and peered out. It
sure was spooky out there.
I squinted to see better in the dark. Don’t lean over too far, I thought. Don’t
let whoever or whatever is out there see you.
My eyes searched the backyard. I lifted my head—and spotted them. A few
feet away. Huge, black, gnarly arms. Reaching out toward the window.
Ready to grab me.
No. It was only the branches of the old oak tree.
Well, give me a break. I said it was dark out!
My eyes swept over the yard again. The sound. There it was!
I ducked. My legs trembled as I crouched beneath the window. I broke out
into a cold sweat.
Crunch. Crunch.
Even louder than before.
I swallowed hard and took another peek. Something moved in the shadows.
Under the oak tree. I held my breath.
Crunch. Crunch, crunch.
A gust of wind blew the tree branches furiously.
Crunch, crunch, crunch.
The frightening sounds grew louder. Closer to the house.
As I peered out, two eyes suddenly flashed in the dark. My throat went dry.
I couldn’t cry out.
The eyes flashed again. They were even closer to the house this time. Right
outside my window.
Staring at me.
Moving toward me.
The creature’s dark shape began to take form. It was a—
—bunny rabbit??
I let out a long sigh.
The first night in my new house—and I was already shaking in terror.
I shuffled into the bathroom for a towel. As I mopped the sweat from my
forehead, I stared at my reflection in the medicine chest mirror.
Whenever I’m scared, my freckles really stand out. There they were.
Millions of them.
I ran my fingers through my hair. I wear it long. To help cover my big,
droopy ears.
I’ve had these huge ears my whole life. Mom keeps telling me not to worry.
She says I’ll grow into them. But I’m twelve now, and nothing has changed. My
ears are still huge. Huge and droopy.
I wear a cap most of the time to help hide them. It’s my favorite cap from
my favorite baseball team—the Red Sox. So I don’t mind wearing it.
A bunny rabbit, I mumbled as I stared at myself in the mirror. Scared by a
bunny rabbit.
I’d made it through the entire day without being scared once. That’s pretty
good for me.
Back where I used to live—in Boston, Massachusetts—my best friends,
Gary and Todd, always made fun of me.
“Cooper,” they’d say, “you probably scare yourself on Halloween!”
They were right. I get scared a lot. Some people just scare easier than
others. I’m an easy scarer.
Take last summer at camp. I got lost in the woods on my way to the
bathroom cabin. What did I do?
Nothing. I just stood there.
When the kids from my bunk finally found me, I was shaking all over.
Practically in tears. Turns out I was standing a few feet from the dining hall the
whole time.
So, okay. I admit it. When it comes to bravery, I’m not exactly Indiana
Jones!
When my parents announced we were moving from the city into a house in
the woods, I was a little tense.
Maybe even scared.
Scared to leave the apartment I’d lived in my entire life.
Scared of a house in the woods.
And then I learned that our new house was deep in the woods, somewhere
in Maine. Miles from the nearest town.
The only two scary books I’d ever read took place in Maine. In the woods.
But I had no choice. We were moving. Mom’s new job landed us in Maine,
and there was nothing I could do about it.
I left the bathroom and crept back to my bed. The floorboards creaked and
cracked with each step. It was going to be hard getting used to that.
It was also going to be hard getting used to all the other strange noises this
old house made. The rattling pipes. The scraping shutters. And some weird noise
that thumped really loudly every hour.
At dinner, Mom said that the thumping noise was only the house “settling”.
Whatever that means.
At least she didn’t say, “It’s just the wind, Cooper.”
I jumped into bed and pulled the covers up to my chin. Then I fluffed my
pillows two or three times, trying hard to get comfortable. I felt a little safer in
bed.
I love my bed. Mom wanted to trash it when we moved. She said I needed a
new one. But I said no way. It had taken me years to break this bed in. The
mattress had just the right amount of lumps, and they were in all the right spots.
In the dark, I glanced around my new room. It was so weird seeing all my
things in this strange place. When the movers carried my stuff in here this
morning, I had them put the furniture exactly the way it was in my old room.
Across from my bed, my dad built a really cool bookcase for all my snow
domes. It has a light in it and everything.
I can’t wait to unpack my snow domes. I have seventy-seven of them from
all over the world—even Australia and Hong Kong. I guess you could call me a
snow dome collector.
Anyway, I was finally beginning to relax, thinking about my snow domes—
when I heard another noise.
Not a bunch of little crunches like before—but one long, drawn-out crunch.
I shot straight up in bed. This time I was sure. One hundred percent sure.
Someone—or something—was creeping around out there. Right outside my
window!
I threw off the covers. Then I dropped to the floor on my hands and knees.
Moving slowly, I crawled to the window. Then I carefully pulled myself up and
peered outside.
What was it?
A snake?
I flung open the window. I grabbed a softball from the floor and tossed it at
the snake. Then I fell back down to my knees and listened.
Silence. No crunching. No slithering.
A direct hit. Great!
I stood and leaned carefully out the window. I was feeling pretty proud of
myself. After all, I had just saved my family from a deadly—
—garden hose!
I let out a disappointed sigh and shook my head. Get a grip, Cooper.
If Gary and Todd were here, they would never let me hear the end of this.
They’d be laughing their heads off.
“Nice going, Coop!” Gary would say. “Saved your family from a poisonous
garden hose!”
“Yeah. Super Cooper strikes again!” Todd would say. Back in bed again, I
fluffed up my pillows one more time. Then I closed my eyes as tightly as I
could.
That’s it, I said to myself. I am not getting up again. I don’t care what I hear
next.
I will not get up from this bed again. No matter what.
And then I heard another noise. A different kind of noise. A sound that
made my heart pound right through my chest.
Breathing.
Deep, heavy breathing.
In my room.
Under my bed!
2
I didn’t move.
I couldn’t move.
I stared at the ceiling. Listening. Listening to the raspy breathing under my
bed.
Okay, Cooper, I told myself. Calm down. It’s probably your imagination.
Playing tricks on you again.
The breathing grew louder. Raspier.
I covered my ears and shut my eyes tight.
It’s nothing. It’s nothing. It’s nothing.
It’s an old house, I thought, still covering my ears. Old houses have to
breathe—don’t they?
Or, what was it that Mom said? Settling? Yeah, that’s what it must be. The
house settling.
Or maybe it’s the pipes. We had pipes in our apartment in Boston, and they
made crazy noises all the time. I’ll bet that’s what it is—the pipes.
I lowered my hands.
Silence now. No settling. No pipes. No breathing.
I must be losing my mind.
If I told Gary and Todd about this one, they’d really laugh their heads off.
And then the breathing started again. Raspy and wet. Hoarse breathing.
Like a sick animal.
I couldn’t just lie there. I had to see what it was.
I swung my legs out of bed. I took a deep breath. Then I lowered myself to
the floor.
Carefully, I lifted the blanket from the bottom of the bed. Then carefully,
carefully, I lowered my head and peeked under the bed.
That’s when the hands darted out—and grabbed me. Two strong, cold
hands. Slowly tightening their grip around my throat.
3
I screamed.
So loudly, I surprised myself.
My attacker must have been surprised, too. He quickly let go of my neck. I
clutched my throat and sputtered for air.
“Cooper, will you keep it down?” a voice whispered. “You’ll wake Mom
and Dad!”
Huh?
Oh, man.
It was Mickey. My totally obnoxious older brother.
“Mickey! You jerk!” I cried. “You scared me to death!”
Mickey slid out from under the bed and wiped some dust off his pajamas.
“No big challenge,” he muttered.
“Shut up,” I snapped, rubbing my sore neck. In the mirror I could see where
Mickey’s hands had grabbed my throat. Dark red blotches circled my neck.
“Look what you did!” I cried. “You know I bruise easily!”
“Oh, don’t be such a baby! I got you, man!” Mickey cried, grinning.
I stared furiously at my idiot brother. I wished I could wipe that grin off his
face. And not get in trouble for it.
“You’re a jerk!” was all I could think to say.
“Grow up!” Mickey shot back. He headed for the door, then turned around.
“Would Cooper like a little night-light next to his bed?” he asked in a tiny baby
voice.
That’s when I lost it.
I leaped on to his back and pounded his head with my fists.
“Hey!” he screamed, trying to shake me off. “What do you think you’re
doing? Get off me!”
Mickey’s legs buckled under him, and he fell to the floor. I clung to his
back. I kept pounding him with my fists.
Mickey is three years older than me, and he’s a lot bigger. But I had him in
the right position, and landed a few good punches.
Then he shifted to the right.
And started pounding me back. Luckily, he got in only one really good
wallop before Mom and Dad ran in to break it up.
“Cooper! Mickey! What’s going on in here?”
“He started it!” I called out, trying to duck Mickey’s fists.
My father reached down and pulled Mickey off me. “I don’t care who
started it!” he said angrily. “This is no way to act on the first night in your new
house. Mickey, get back to your room!”
“But, Dad, he—”
“Never mind who started it. This behavior had better stop—now! Because
if there is a next time, you’ll both start off the new school year grounded!”
Grumbling, Mickey stomped out of the room. But not before sticking his
tongue out at me. Mickey was the baby. Not me.
“Really, Dad, Mickey started it,” I said when he was gone.
“And you’re totally innocent, right?” my father asked, rolling his eyes.
“Yes!” I insisted.
Dad just shook his head. “Go to sleep, Cooper.”
When my parents left the room, I paced back and forth, rubbing my neck.
I was so steamed!
It wasn’t the first time Mickey’s pulled something like this. For as long as I
can remember, Mickey has played tricks on me, trying to terrify me.
He usually succeeds, too.
Once, when Mom and Dad went away for a weekend, he hid a tape recorder
in my room. It played horrifying screams all night long.
And another time, he didn’t come to get me after Little League practice. He
left me standing there, all alone on the playground, while he hid out and watched
me panic.
But hiding under my bed tonight was the worst. He has to be one of the
biggest jerks alive.
I climbed back into bed and stared up at the ceiling. I had to think of a way
to get Mickey back.
What could I do? Hide outside his window and scream?
Jump out from behind the shower curtain when he’s brushing his teeth?
No. Too dumb. It would have to be something totally excellent. Something
so creepy it would scare me. Even though I was the one doing it.
I watched the spooky shadows move along my walls and ceiling. And
listened to the frightening noises of my new house—noises I would have to hear
for the rest of my life.
The pipes rattling. The dogs barking.
Wait a minute.
Dogs?
I sat up. We don’t have a dog. And there isn’t another house around here for
miles.
But I definitely heard a barking dog.
I listened closely. The dog barked again. Then started to howl.
I sighed and pulled off the covers again. I started to climb out of bed. Then
it hit me.
Mickey!
This had to be another one of my brother’s stupid tricks. He was an
excellent dog-barker. He practiced it all the time.
Smiling, I settled back on my pillow. I wouldn’t get up. I wouldn’t go to the
window.
He wasn’t going to get me this time. No way.
I lay there listening to Mickey make a fool of himself. Howling and barking
like a big old dog.
What a jerk.
Then, suddenly, I sat up again. Whoa. I heard two dogs howling now.
Even Mickey couldn’t pull that off.
The howling turned to piercing cries. So close. Right under my window.
As I said, I made it through a whole day without being scared. But, boy,
was I making up for it tonight!
For the zillionth and third time, I slowly crept to the window. I could hear
them clearly. Two dogs. Wailing and howling.
For the zillionth and third time, I gazed out the window.
But for the first time, I couldn’t believe what I saw.
4
I didn’t see anything.
Nothing at all. No dogs. Not one.
I squinted into the yard. Empty.
How could they have vanished so quickly?
I stood at the window for a few more seconds, but no dogs appeared.
I shivered. I’ll never sleep again, I thought. Not as long as I have to live
here.
I crept back to bed. I pulled the covers up to my chin. And counted the
green and blue squigglies on the wallpaper by my head.
I guess I finally fell asleep. When I opened my eyes, light streamed in
through my window.
Yawning, I glanced at the clock. Six-thirty. I’m usually an early bird. I like
to start my day as soon as possible.
I leaped out of bed and checked the yard. It didn’t seem half as scary in the
morning light.
I smiled when I noticed the jungle gym in the far corner. The last owners of
the house built it. It had a slide and really high monkey bars. Yesterday, Dad
hung a rope and tire from one of its beams, so now it had a swing, too.
Behind the jungle gym, the woods stretched all around. Woods thick with
all different kinds of trees and shrubs and weeds. The woods surrounded our
house on three sides. It seemed to go on forever.
I changed quickly, pulling a clean Red Sox T-shirt over my jeans. Grabbing
my baseball cap, I flew through the house and ran outside.
A great summer day! Sunny and warm. If I were back home in Boston, I
would hop on my bike and ride over to Gary’s or Todd’s house. Then we would
spend the day outdoors, playing softball at the playground. Or just messing
around.
But I’m not in Boston anymore. Better get used to that, I told myself.
I hoped some cool kids lived in this neighborhood. When we drove up to
our house yesterday, I didn’t see any other houses around. I guessed I’d have to
spend the next few days alone—until school started next week.
I wandered over to the jungle gym. I swung on the tire swing for a little
while. Back and forth. Back and forth. Staring at my bedroom window from the
outside. Back and forth. Back and forth. Remembering last night.
Remembering just how brave Super Cooper had been. Yuck!
Back and forth. Back and forth.
Remembering the dogs.
Hey. That’s weird, I thought. Those dogs I heard should have left paw prints
all over the yard. But I couldn’t see a single one.
I hopped off the swing and searched the ground all around the house. No
sign of any dogs.
That’s funny. I knew there were dogs out here last night.
I glanced up at the edge of the woods. Maybe those dogs were lost, I
thought. Maybe they came to the house last night searching for help.
Maybe I should go track them down.
I bit my lower lip. A kid could lose his way—forever—in those woods, I
thought nervously.
Well, I’m going in, I decided. Today is the first day of the new me. Super
Cooper—for real. I wanted to find those dogs. To prove to myself that I wasn’t
going crazy.
Who knows? If I find the dogs, maybe Dad will let me keep one, I decided.
It might be fun to have a dog.
I’d always wanted a puppy. But Mom said the fur made her sneeze. Maybe
she’d change her mind.
I took one long, deep breath. Then I stepped into the woods. I saw some
amazing trees. I saw beautiful old birch trees with smooth, white trunks. And I
saw sassafras and maple trees. Their trunks were gnarled and thick.
They could be over a hundred years old, I thought. Awesome.
Maybe Dad can build a tree house back here, I told myself excitedly. That
would be so cool. Then when Gary and Todd came to visit, we could hang out in
it.
I kept my eyes on the ground as I walked, searching for any sign of dogs.
Nothing. No prints. No broken branches.
How weird. I definitely heard dogs last night.
Or maybe I just thought I’d heard those dogs. It was kind of late, and I was
pretty sleepy. Maybe it was my imagination.
Or maybe it was Mickey after all.
Maybe he tape-recorded another dog and barked along with it.
He would do something like that.
He’s that sneaky.
I really had to pay him back. Something way creepy. Maybe I could do
something out here in the woods.
I made my way through the thick trees and tall weeds, the whole time
thinking of how to scare Mickey.
I suddenly realized I hadn’t been paying attention to where I was going.
I spun around and peered through the thick trunks.
My house! I couldn’t see it!
Okay, Cooper, keep cool. You can’t be that far away, I told myself.
But my palms began to sweat.
I swallowed hard, then tried to remember which way I’d come.
Definitely the left.
No, wait. Maybe right.
I hung my head and moaned. It’s no use, I thought.
I’m lost. Hopelessly lost.
5
I really didn’t want to cry.
Who needed Mickey seeing me with wet, red eyes?
I’d never hear the end of it.
Besides, today was the first day of the new me. The new Super Cooper.
I took a really deep breath and tried to calm down.
I decided to walk a little to my right. If I didn’t see my house, I’d turn and
double back to the left.
It was worth a try.
What did I have to lose? I was lost anyway.
I turned to the right. I tried to take the straightest path possible.
The snapping of branches behind me made me spin around.
No one there.
It’s just a harmless squirrel or something, I told myself. Just keep going.
I returned to my straight path again. But with my first step, I heard leaves
rustling behind me.
I didn’t turn around. I quickened my pace.
And I heard it again.
Twigs snapping. Leaves rustling.
My throat suddenly felt dry. Don’t panic. Don’t panic. “Wh-who’s there?” I
croaked.
No answer.
I turned back.
Whoa! Which way had I been walking? My head began to spin. I suddenly
felt dizzy. Too dizzy to remember where I had been.
Snap. Snap. Crack. Crunch.
“Who is there?” I called out again. My voice didn’t sound all that steady for
Super Cooper.
“Mickey, is that you? This isn’t funny! Mickey?”
Then I felt something horrible scrape my cheek. Something cold. And
sharp.
I couldn’t help it. I started to scream.
6
A leaf. A dumb leaf.
Come on, Cooper! Get a grip!
I sat down on the ground for a second. I checked my watch. It was almost
eight.
Dad would be out in the yard soon. He planned to set up the new barbecue
grill first thing this morning. I figured I could just wait for the hammering to
start, then walk in the direction of the noise.
I’d just sit here. And wait. Wait for the hammering. Good idea, I thought.
I heard something rustle behind me.
Just the leaves, I told myself. The dumb leaves.
I stole a glance up at the trees. I tilted my head way back—and someone
grabbed my arm.
I jerked away. Sprang up. Started to run.
And tripped over my own feet.
Scrambling up, I gasped in surprise.
A girl.
She was about my age and had really long, red hair. It was frizzy, and it
stuck out in a million directions. She had big green eyes. She wore a bright red
T-shirt and red shorts. She reminded me of a rag doll Todd’s little sister used to
carry around.
“You okay?” she asked, her hands on her waist.
“Yeah, sure. Fine,” I muttered.
“Didn’t mean to scare you,” she said.
“I wasn’t scared,” I lied.
“Really,” she said. “I would have been scared, too, if someone grabbed me
like that. I really didn’t mean to.”
“I told you,” I said sharply, “I wasn’t scared.”
“Okay. Sorry.”
“What are you sorry about?” I asked. This had to be the weirdest girl I’d
ever met.
“I don’t know,” she replied, shrugging. “I’m just sorry.”
“Well, you can stop apologizing,” I told her. I brushed the dirt off my
clothes and picked up my baseball cap. I quickly set it back on my head. To
cover my ears.
The girl stared at me. She stood there and stared. Without saying a word.
Was she staring at my ears?
“Who are you?” I finally asked.
“Margaret Ferguson,” she replied. “But people call me Fergie. Like the
duchess.”
I didn’t know what duchess she was talking about. But I pretended I did.
“I live through the woods that way,” she said, pointing behind her.
“I thought no one lived around here for miles,” I said.
“Yeah. There are some houses around here, Cooper,” she replied. “They’re
pretty spread out.”
“Hey! How did you know my name?” I asked suspiciously.
Margaret, or Fergie, or whatever her name was, turned beet-red.
“I, uh, watched you move in yesterday,” she confessed.
“I didn’t see you,” I replied.
“That’s because I hid in the woods,” she said. “I heard your father call you
Cooper. And I know your last name, too. It’s Holmes. I saw it written on all the
boxes in the moving van. And I know you have a brother, Mickey,” she added.
“He’s a jerk.”
I laughed. “You got that right!” I exclaimed. “So how long have you lived
around here?”
She didn’t answer. She kept her eyes on the ground.
“I said, how long have—”
Suddenly, her head jerked up and she gazed into my eyes.
“Wh-what’s wrong?” I asked when I saw her frightened face.
Her face tightened, as if she were in pain. Her lips trembled.
“Margaret!” I cried. “What? What is it?”
She opened her mouth, but no words came out. She breathed deeply,
gulping air. Finally, she clutched my shoulders and shoved her face right up
close to mine.
“Dogs,” she whispered. Then she let go of me and darted away.
I froze for a moment. Then I chased after her.
She made it to a big tree stump before I caught up. I grabbed hold of the
back of her T-shirt and spun her around.
“Margaret, what do you mean ‘dogs’?” I asked.
“No! No!” she cried. “Just let me go! Let me go!”
I held her tightly.
“Let me go! Let me go!” she cried again.
“Margaret, what did you mean back there?” I repeated. “This is important.
Why did you say ‘dogs’?”
“Dogs?” Her eyes grew wide. “I don’t remember saying that.”
My jaw fell open. “You did!” I insisted. “You looked straight at me and
said, ‘dogs’! I heard you!”
She shook her head. “No, I don’t remember that,” she replied thoughtfully.
Now I’ve met weird kids in my life, but Margaret here takes the cake. She
almost makes Mickey seem normal.
Almost.
“Okay,” I said, trying to sound calm, “here’s what happened. You freaked
out. Then you grabbed me. Then you said, ‘Dogs’. Then you freaked out again.”
“Don’t remember,” she replied softly, shaking her head from side to side.
“Why would I say that?”
“I don’t know!” I screamed, starting to lose it. “I’m not the one who said
it!”
She gazed around in all directions, then focused those green, crazy eyes on
me.
“Listen to me, Cooper,” she whispered mysteriously. “Get away from here.”
“Huh?”
“I’m warning you, Cooper! Tell your parents they must leave at once!” She
glanced nervously behind her, then turned back to me.
“Please—listen to me. Get away from here! As fast as you can!”
7
Fergie let go of my shoulders and ran.
For a few seconds, I stared after her, too shocked to move. Then I decided
I’d better not let her get away.
“Fergie!” I called out. “Wait up!”
For a girl, Fergie ran pretty fast. Actually, most girls I know are fast
runners.
Whoever said they were slower than boys in the first place? It isn’t true.
Lots of girls in my class last year could beat any guy in a race.
Anyway, I happen to be a very fast runner. When you’re afraid of
everything, you learn to run—fast!
“Fergie!” I called again. “Please! Tell me what’s going on!” But I couldn’t
catch up.
Then, to my surprise, she stopped and turned back to me. “Listen, Cooper,”
she said, calmer than before. “The woods are haunted. Your house is probably
haunted, too. Go home. Go home and tell your parents to move back to wherever
you came from.”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered.
“It’s too dangerous here,” Fergie warned. “Get away, Cooper. As fast as you
can!”
With that, she turned and walked away in the direction of her house.
I didn’t follow her this time.
I should have. I totally forgot that I was lost.
I turned around. My house is probably in the opposite direction, I decided.
She disappeared through the trees. Fine with me, I thought angrily. It would
be fine with me if I never saw her again.
Why did she tell me all that?
Why did she say the woods were haunted?
Because it was true?
Leave it to my parents to buy a haunted house in haunted woods!
I continued on, unable to shake the creepy feeling I had. I felt as if a
hundred eyes were stalking me through the trees.
I wished Fergie had kept her mouth shut.
The longer I walked, the more frightened I became. Now I was positive that
the woods were haunted. Haunted by ghosts tracking every step I made.
Then, in the distance, I heard a faint banging. It startled me at first. When I
realized it was Dad working on the grill, I shrieked with joy.
“All right! I’m almost home!” My plan had worked.
I followed the hammering sounds.
Something rustled the branches above my head and made me jump.
I gazed up.
Just a bird.
Staring up at the trees, I nearly fell headfirst into a stream.
The water lapped quietly against the grassy shore. It reflected the pale blue
morning sky above it.
Funny, I hadn’t seen this stream here before.
I bent down to touch the water. Cold.
This is awesome! I thought. A real stream, practically in my own backyard.
Then I remembered that it wouldn’t be my backyard for long. As soon as I
told my parents what Fergie had said, we’d pack up and move back to Boston.
As I dried my hand on my shirt, I had that creepy feeling again. The feeling
of eyes watching me. My head jerked up, and I gasped.
There were eyes watching me.
Four dark eyes glared at me from across the stream.
The eyes of two enormous black Labradors.
One dog panted loudly, its tongue hanging out. The other dog flashed its
teeth at me. Ugly, yellow teeth.
They both uttered low, menacing growls.
Not friendly. Not friendly at all.
Run! I urged myself. Run!
But my legs wouldn’t budge.
Growling, the dogs eyed me hungrily.
Then they attacked.
8
Their heavy paws thudded the ground as they came bounding toward me. Their
eyes glowed with excitement. Their large heads bobbed up and down.
With a terrified cry, I turned and ran.
If only I could fly!
“Helllllp!” Was that me letting out that frightened wail?
Yes. I think it was.
Suddenly, I caught a glimpse of light through the trees. Sunlight glistening
off the jungle gym slide!
Yes!
Almost home.
The two black Labs ran at my heels. I could feel their hot breath on the
backs of my legs. I felt a pair of sharp teeth scrape my ankle.
With one last gasp of speed, I burst through the trees and out of the woods.
“Dad!” I yelled, racing toward my father.
“Help me!” I shrieked. “The dogs! The dogs!” I threw my arms around his
waist and held on.
“Cooper, calm down! What’s gotten into you?” my father asked, grabbing
me by the shoulders.
“The dogs!” I wailed, refusing to let go of him.
“Cooper, what dogs?” Dad demanded.
I blinked at him in confusion. Didn’t he hear them? Couldn’t he see them?
I let go of him and pointed toward the woods.
“Wild dogs. Big, black Labs, I think. They chased me, and—”
I scanned the yard frantically. Dad and I were alone.
No barking.
No snarling.
The sunlight glistened off the slide.
The tire swung lazily from its rope.
The dogs had vanished.
9
“Cooper, this is a joke—right?” Dad asked, shaking his head.
“Huh? No way!” I cried. “They were right behind me. One almost bit me,
and—”
“And then they disappeared into thin air!” Dad declared.
“Come into the woods with me,” I pleaded. “They’ve got to be there.” I ran
to the edge of the woods, desperately searching for some sign of the dogs. Dad
followed right behind.
But there was nothing to see.
I turned and slunk back to the house.
Dad didn’t say anything until we were back in the yard. He sat down on the
jungle gym slide. His eyes studied me.
“Cooper, tell me what’s wrong,” Dad said in a low voice. I could tell he
thought I had made all this up.
“I told you, Dad. Two dogs chased me through the woods. They were
inches from me! One tried to tear my leg off!”
Dad continued to stare up at me, his expression thoughtful.
“Dad, listen,” I pleaded. “We have to move. We can’t live here!”
He climbed to his feet. “What are you talking about, Cooper?”
“We have to move back to Boston,” I insisted. “We can’t stay here!”
“Why not?” Dad asked.
“It’s this house!” I shouted, my voice cracking. “It’s haunted!”
“Now, Cooper—”
“Dad! Listen to me,” I begged. “The woods… this house… they’re all
haunted. Everybody around here knows it already! We never should have moved
here!”
“Cooper, you’re not making any sense,” Dad replied, keeping his voice low
and calm. “You know, walking in the woods by yourself can be scary. Why don’t
you come inside and calm down? Mom made a big breakfast. Have some French
toast. You’ll feel better.” He put his arm around my shoulders.
Now I really felt upset. My own father didn’t believe me.
“But, Dad, it’s true!” I insisted. “The woods are haunted, and this weird girl
I met warned me to move out! She—”
“Cooper, I know you’re unhappy about the move,” Dad said. “But these
wild stories aren’t going to change anything. This is where we live now.”
“But—”
“When school starts, you’ll make some new friends and everything will be
fine. So come on in and have breakfast. You’ll feel better. You’ll see.”
He led me back to the house.
As Dad held the door open for me, I glanced back and took one last look at
the woods.
Two big black dogs stared at me from the trees.
10
When I blinked, the dogs vanished.
Shaking my head, I made my way into the kitchen.
Mickey had already finished half his breakfast when Dad and I entered the
room. He leaned over his cereal bowl, snickering about something. I ignored
him.
“Cooper, have some French toast,” Mom said. “It’s on your plate, waiting
for you.”
I sat across from Mickey, trying hard not to look at his dumb face. I was
still really steamed at him.
“Mom, do you know who our neighbors are?” I asked, pouring maple syrup
over the toast.
“Why, sure,” Mom answered. “Your father and I met some of them a few
weeks ago when we came to see the house.”
“Did you meet the Fergusons?” I asked.
Mom squinted her eyes, thinking. Then she shook her head. “No, I don’t
think we met them. We met the Martells. Joel and Shirley. Very nice people.”
Then she asked, “Who are the Fergusons?”
I didn’t answer. I pressed on. “Did the Martells tell you our house was
haunted?”
Mom laughed. “No, Cooper, they didn’t. It must have slipped their minds,”
she joked.
“Ha-ha. It’s nothing to laugh about,” I insisted. “Our house is haunted. And
so are the woods!”
“Cooper, what are you talking about?” my mother demanded.
“Enough, Cooper,” my father warned. “Eat your breakfast.”
“Yeah,” Mickey said with a snort. “Eat your breakfast, Drooper.”
I could feel my face turn red. I hated when Mickey called me Drooper. He
called me that because of my big droopy ears.
“Shut up, Sickey,” I replied.
“Cut it out, you two,” Dad snapped.
I dug my fork into the French toast. How could they not believe me? Did
they really think I made this story up?
I lifted a chunk of toast to my mouth and stuffed it in.
“Aghhhh!”
Choking and coughing, I spit the food out on my plate.
“Gross!” Mickey cried, grinning. “Gross! A guy could lose his appetite
around here.”
My eyes teared, and I coughed a few more times.
“You okay, Cooper?” Mom asked.
“Somebody dumped salt on my French toast!” I exclaimed angrily.
Mickey started to laugh.
That creep.
My father climbed up from the table. Without saying a word, he stomped
out of the room.
That’s how my Dad acts when he’s angry. He gets all quiet, then just walks
away. Punishments come later.
I gulped down a glass of milk, trying to wash the salt out of my mouth.
Mom returned to the stove to make another batch of French toast for me.
“Mickey,” she said, sighing, “you know that wasn’t funny. Now apologize
to your brother.”
“Apologize? But it was just a joke!” Mickey complained.
“We’re all cracking up,” I muttered bitterly, gulping down a second glass of
milk. “You’re a real riot.”
“Apologize!” my mother insisted again.
Mickey hung his head and stared at the floor.
I folded my arms across my chest. “I’m waiting!” I sang happily.
Mickey made an ugly face at me. When Mom turned around, he changed
his expression to an innocent smile.
“I’m so sorry, Cooper,” Mickey oozed. “It won’t happen again.” He blinked
innocently.
Satisfied, Mom turned back to the stove.
As soon as she did, Mickey pulled on his ears, trying to stretch them as big
as mine.
I’d had it with Mickey. I pushed my chair away from the table and hurried
out of the room. I didn’t want to get into another fight with my stupid brother
now.
I had more important things to do. I had to talk to Dad about the dogs. I had
to make him believe me.
Dad sat in his favorite chair, which just didn’t look right in our new living
room. Even he seemed to notice. He kept shifting uncomfortably.
“Maybe it’s time for a new chair,” he muttered.
“Dad, can I talk to you for a second?” I asked.
“What is it, Cooper?” he asked as he moved Great-grandma’s lamp closer
to the chair.
“It’s about the dogs,” I said.
Dad sighed. “Really, Cooper. Aren’t you making too big a deal about this?
So what if you saw dogs in the woods? They could belong to anybody!”
“But they chased me!” I replied, getting all worked up again. “And then
they disappeared into thin air! And after that girl told me the woods were
haunted—”
“What girl?” my dad demanded.
“She said her name was Margaret Ferguson,” I told him. “She said her
family lived next door.”
Dad rubbed his chin. “That’s strange,” he said. “The real estate broker
never mentioned the Fergusons.”
“Well, I met her this morning, and she told me everyone around here knows
that our house is haunted!”
“Maybe that’s why we got such a good deal on the house,” Dad muttered,
chuckling.
I didn’t see what was so funny.
He stopped laughing and stared at me seriously. “Forget about the dogs for
now, Cooper. We’ll deal with it if you see them again. In the meantime, I’ll ask
around in town if anyone knows who owns them. Okay?”
“But what about the house?” I asked. “Margaret said we should move as
fast as we can.”
“French toast is ready!” Mom called out, interrupting me. “Come on,
Cooper. Before it gets cold.”
“Go eat,” my father urged. “And please. Not another word about dogs or
the house being haunted.”
With a sigh, I headed back to the kitchen. As I stepped through the door,
Mickey jumped in my face and let out a roar.
Naturally, it scared me to death.
“Mom!” I cried.
“Mickey, enough!” my mother screamed. “Stop teasing Cooper. He’s
having a hard time adjusting to the new house.”
“No, I’m not!” I yelled at her. Why wasn’t anybody taking me seriously?
“This house is haunted. You’ll be sorry you didn’t listen to me. You’ll be sorry!”
Then I stormed out and stomped off to my room. I collapsed on my bed and
gazed around. Same old stuff, but the room didn’t feel like my own.
I stayed in there all day. I didn’t want to see Mickey. I didn’t want to see
Mom and Dad. And I really didn’t want to see those dogs again.
By dinnertime, I’d unpacked most of my things. The room felt a little better.
More like my old bedroom back in Boston.
After dinner, I lugged all seventy-seven snow domes into the bathroom and
washed them, one by one. People don’t realize that you have to take care of
snow domes and keep them clean and filled with water or they’ll dry out.
When they were all sparkling clean, I arranged them carefully on my new
bookcase.
They looked awesome!
I tried to organize them in some sort of size order, but that didn’t work.
Instead, I alphabetized them—from Annapolis to Washington, D.C. Of course, I
placed my absolute favorite dome—a Boston Red Sox snow dome—on the
middle shelf, front and center.
I finished at eleven, then got ready for bed. All that unpacking had tired me
out.
I had closed my eyes and was just drifting off to sleep when I heard it.
Loud and clear.
Barking.
And growling.
Outside my window.
I bolted straight up in bed.
I waited for my parents and Mickey to come running in. This time, they
must have heard the dogs, too.
I waited. And waited.
The barking grew louder.
No one else in the house stirred.
I lowered one foot to the floor, then the other. I stood up, listening hard.
Listening to the two dogs barking.
And to my horror, I realized that this time the barking wasn’t outside my
window.
This time it was coming from inside my house!
11
Frantically, I searched for a weapon. Something to protect me from the barking
dogs.
I found my aluminum baseball bat in the closet. I gripped it tightly and
crept across the room to my bedroom door.
I pushed it open. And listened.
Yes.
The barking was definitely coming from inside the house. From the living
room, I decided.
I took a deep breath and slipped into the hallway. Where were my parents?
Their bedroom is directly over the living room on the second floor. They had to
hear this.
Why hadn’t they come running out?
Mickey’s room was on the first floor down the hall from mine. I peered
down the hall and saw that his bedroom door was closed.
What’s his problem? I wondered. Where is everyone?
I crept quietly down the hall, inching my way to the living room. I could
hear the dogs racing around in there.
I gasped when I heard a loud crash.
Something clattered to the floor. Great-grandma’s lamp, I guessed.
I stared up at the ceiling—to my parents’ bedroom. Were they deaf or
something?
Holding the bat in front of me, I jumped into the living room and snapped
on the ceiling light.
The dogs were…
The dogs were…
NOT THERE!
The room stood empty.
“Huh?” I blinked a few times from the sudden brightness of the light, then
stared around the room.
No dogs.
No growling. No barking.
But, wait! Great-grandma’s lamp lay on its side on the floor.
I took a step over to the sofa. Something crunched under my bare feet.
Potato chips?
Yes. Potato chips. Scattered across the room.
I spotted the potato chip bag—ripped to shreds on the floor.
My heart thumped so hard, I thought it might burst out of my chest.
As I bent to pick up the torn bag, a shadow fell over me.
I heard heavy breathing.
And I felt a gust of hot, smelly breath shoot across my neck.
12
“Drooper, what are you doing?”
I straightened up and spun around.
“Mickey!”
“That’s my name. Don’t wear it out,” he replied.
“Mickey! Did you hear them? Did you?”
Mickey glanced around the room. “Hear who?” he asked. Then, before I
could answer, he snapped, “Cooper, you jerk, why did you throw potato chips
around the living room?”
“The dogs!” I cried. “The dogs did it! Did you hear them?”
Mickey shook his head. “No way. I didn’t hear anything.”
I was stunned. “You didn’t hear wild dogs running around the room a few
minutes ago?”
Mickey rolled his eyes and whistled. “You’re losing it, Cooper. Hearing
invisible dogs is one thing. But feeding them potato chips? You’re really messed
up, man.”
“I didn’t do this!” I said angrily. “I told you. The dogs did.”
Mickey shook his head. “Just promise me one thing,” he said seriously.
“What?” I asked.
“Promise me when school starts next week, you won’t tell anybody you’re
related to me.”
I wanted to throw something at him. I wished I had Great-grandma’s lamp
in my hand, but I didn’t. So I threw what I did have—the empty potato chip bag.
It flew about three inches, then dropped at my feet.
“You’re pathetic!” Mickey laughed. “I know why you’re doing this, too.
You’re trying to make Mom and Dad think the house is haunted. So then they’ll
move back to Boston, and you can see your dweeby little friends Gary and Todd
again.”
He made a face at me. “Dumb, Drooper. Really dumb.”
He shuffled away, shaking his head.
Just you wait, Mickey, I thought. I’m going to get even with you. Just you
wait.
And I’m going to make everyone believe me about the dogs. I’m going to
make everyone believe that I’m telling the truth.
But how? I wondered, gazing around the empty, silent living room.
How?
13
Sunday morning I woke up early as usual. I had only a few more things to
unpack, and I knew I could finish before breakfast.
I unrolled my Red Sox poster and tacked it to the wall, over my bed. Same
place I’d hung it in Boston.
Then I rummaged through a box, searching for my lucky pair of red socks.
As I was slipping them on my feet, I heard the doorbell ring.
“Cooper!” my mother called to me a few seconds later. “There’s someone
here to see you!”
Who could it be? I didn’t know anybody here.
Then I had a thought. Maybe Gary asked his dad to drive him and Todd up
to Maine to surprise me!
Wow! What a great surprise!
I closed the box and charged out of my room, down the hall, and to the
front door. I was so excited!
But no Gary and Todd.
Fergie stared at me from the front doorway. I could see at first glance that
she was kind of nervous. She kept shifting her weight from one foot to the other.
And she twirled a lock of her bright red hair between her fingers.
“Oh. Hi,” I mumbled, unable to hide my disappointment.
“I need to talk to you,” she said. “Right away.”
“Okay, sure,” I replied.
“Not here,” she said, nudging her head toward the den where my mom and
dad were reading the newspaper.
I sighed. “Okay, wait a sec.” I ran back to my room and pulled on a pair of
sneakers.
“Let’s go out back,” I suggested. She nodded solemnly and followed me
outside.
I swung on the tire and listened to Fergie. “It was all your brother’s idea!”
she blurted out.
“Excuse me?” I cried.
“I don’t know why I agreed to do it, but it was really all his idea. Every bit
of it.”
“What was?” I asked.
“Everything I told you yesterday. About your house. And the woods.”
“You mean they’re not haunted?” I asked, confused.
Fergie shook her head. “Of course not.”
“But why did you tell me they were?” I asked.
“I told you, it was all Mickey’s idea. I met Mickey the day you moved in,”
Fergie explained. “He told me it would be funny if I played this trick on you.”
“He what?” I cried.
“He told me the two of you always played all kinds of tricks on each other,”
Fergie replied. “He said you would think it was a riot.”
“A joke?” I asked. “It was all one of Mickey’s jokes?” I couldn’t believe it.
Fergie bit her bottom lip and nodded. “Mickey said to tell you the woods
were haunted. He said to tell you the house was haunted, too.” Fergie sighed.
“So I did it. But when I saw how scared you were, I felt really bad about it. I
wished I hadn’t listened to your brother.”
Mickey. That jerk.
“But how did you know about the dogs?” I asked.
Fergie stared blankly at me. “Dogs? What dogs?”
“That’s the word you whispered to me,” I explained. “Dogs.”
Fergie twisted her face, thinking hard. “No, I don’t remember saying that.
Are you sure I said ‘dogs’?”
I nodded. “Definitely. That was all you said. Dogs. And, then, after you ran
off, two mean-looking black Labradors chased me through the woods.”
“Really?”
I nodded. “They chased me all the way home. Then they just vanished.”
“Weird,” Fergie mumbled.
“Tell me about it,” I replied, rolling my eyes.
“Where did you first see the dogs?” Fergie asked me.
I pointed into the woods. “Back there. Near a stream.”
“That’s the stream that leads to the Martells’ house,” Fergie said. “They’re
friends of my parents. They don’t own any dogs, Cooper.”
I shrugged, then batted a fly that buzzed in my ear. “Well, someone around
here must have dogs,” I told her.
“I’m scared of dogs,” Fergie admitted. “I’m glad I didn’t see them
yesterday.”
“They weren’t nice dogs,” I muttered. “You wouldn’t like them.”
“Hey, did you see a big rock in the shape of an arrowhead when you were
near the stream?” she asked.
I shook my head. “No, I didn’t.”
“It’s really cool,” she gushed. “You should check it out. I go there all the
time. It’s a great rock for climbing.”
“Let’s check it out now,” I suggested. I still thought the woods were scary
—haunted or not. But I didn’t feel like hanging around the house.
I hopped off the tire and followed Fergie into the woods. I spotted a long,
thick stick and picked it up. “In case the dogs come back,” I told Fergie.
We walked a little while until we reached the stream. Fergie searched
around for her rock.
“I know it’s here somewhere,” she said, turning to me. “I can never—”
She stopped short when her eyes met mine.
“Cooper!” she whispered. “What is it?”
I stumbled backwards. My hand trembled as I pointed to the trees directly
behind Fergie.
“Mar—Margaret!” I whispered in terror. “The dogs! Look out! They’re
coming! They’re coming right at us!”
14
Fergie spun around. She let out a frightened cry.
“Here they come!” I shrieked.
Fergie froze in terror. “Oh, no! Help me, Cooper! I told you! I’m afraid of
dogs!”
“Run!” I shouted at her. “Run!”
In a flash, Fergie dashed past me. I’ve never seen anyone run so fast.
She ran about ten steps. Then her hands flew up as she tripped over a rock.
She uttered a shrill cry of panic and went sprawling on the ground.
I had to laugh. “Got you back!” I cried gleefully.
“Huh?” Fergie lifted her head.
“I got you back,” I repeated. “For playing that mean trick on me. For
helping Mickey.”
I watched as the color slowly returned to Fergie’s face. “You scared me to
death,” she muttered. “How could you play such a horrible joke?”
“Easy,” I replied, still grinning.
Fergie growled at me. “I told you, it wasn’t totally my fault. Your brother
said you played tricks on each other all the time.” Then she stood up and shook
her head. “That was mean, Cooper. Really mean.”
I shrugged. “Yeah. I know. But now we’re even.”
Fergie brushed some dirt off her jeans and examined a scrape on her elbow.
“You know, we should both get back at Mickey,” she said.
“I’ve been thinking about that all morning,” I told her. “And yesterday, too.
Mickey’s been playing really mean tricks on me since we moved here. And I
have to get back at him. But it has to be something totally awesome.”
We walked along the stream a while longer, trying to figure out how to get
back at Mickey. Then Fergie found the arrowhead rock.
She climbed up first, and I followed. It was a big, craggy rock, great for
climbing.
We hung out on the rock, thinking up ways to get Mickey back. Fergie
wanted to drag him deep into the woods blindfolded and leave him stranded. But
I didn’t think that would scare Mickey one bit.
I jumped off the rock and began circling it. Sometimes I think better on my
feet.
On my third trip around, I got my foot caught in a thick, leafy plant. I
glanced down—and cried out. “Oh, perfect! I’m standing in poison ivy!”
Fergie laughed. “It only looks like poison ivy,” she assured me. “My
science teacher checked it out last year. She told us it’s a harmless weed.”
I smiled a really evil smile.
“I think I have a great idea. What if we pulled out a bunch of this stuff?
What if it somehow ended up in Mickey’s bed? Would he freak—or what?”
“He might,” Fergie agreed, grinning down at me.
We gathered a bunch of the weeds. They grew all along the stream. So we
picked some more as we walked slowly back to my house.
Just past the stream, Fergie showed me a clearing in the trees I hadn’t
noticed before. A small clearing filled with wildflowers.
I knew right away Mom would flip out if she saw them. She always bought
flowers at the Faneuil Hall market back in Boston. I started to pick some for her.
I reached down for a few pretty violet and yellow flowers when something
moving through the trees caught my eye. I glanced up just in time to see Mickey
stagger into the clearing.
Fergie and I both cried out when we spotted him.
Mickey’s clothes were ripped and shredded.
Dark scratches covered his face and arms. And bright red blood trickled
down his neck.
“Cooper,” he croaked weakly, barely able to talk. “Cooper—the dogs—”
Those were the last words he spoke before he crumpled to the ground.
15
“Mickey!” I screamed in horror.
I dropped the wildflowers and weeds and ran to his side.
Fergie and I knelt down beside him. “Is he okay?” she asked, her voice
barely above a whisper.
I leaned over him and, with both hands, tugged on his tattered shirt. But I
couldn’t pull him up. With each try, his limp body slumped back to the ground.
“Mickey! Mickey!” I cried his name again and again. “Are you all right?
The dogs! Did they—?”
As I leaned in closer, Mickey’s arms shot up and clamped around my neck.
He yanked me to the ground. Then he jumped up and sat on top of me.
He was giggling like an idiot.
“Oh, Mickey! Mickey!” he shrieked in a high voice. “Mickey! Are you all
right?”
I started to sputter, but no words came out.
“What a wimp!” he teased. “Do you have to fall for the fake blood every
single time?” He let out another long, high-pitched giggle.
I shut my eyes and prayed that I’d disappear. I couldn’t believe my brother
had tricked me again. In front of Fergie.
My face grew hot. “I’ll pound you for this!” I shouted, struggling to push
him off me.
“Ooooh! I’m shaking!” Mickey snorted.
“Don’t you have anything better to do than to try and scare me?” I yelled.
“I don’t even have to try,” Mickey replied, grinning.
Fergie stood over us, her arms crossed in front of her.
“Were you in on this little joke, too?” I demanded angrily.
“No! No way!” Fergie insisted.
Mickey pinned my arms to the ground. “Say ‘Uncle’, wimp.”
I’d never been so embarrassed in my life.
Never.
And that includes the time Mickey locked me out of the house in my
underwear.
“You’re dead meat!” I shouted in his face.
“What are you going to do, Drooper? Knock me out with your bouquet of
violets?”
He threw his head back and laughed at his stupid joke. Lucky for me, it
gave me a chance to bite his arm.
“Ow! You mutant! Look what you did! I’m bleeding!”
He jumped up and examined the bite mark on his arm. Then he growled at
me, turned, and trotted away.
I wanted to chase after him. But Margaret held me back.
“Let him go,” she said, clutching my shirt. “He’s a creep. Really.”
Grumbling to myself, I brushed off my clothes. Then I picked up the
flowers for Mom. I couldn’t face Fergie.
“Are you going home?” she asked.
“Uh-huh,” I grunted.
“Will I see you in school tomorrow?”
I shrugged. I wished she would leave me alone. I wanted to be by myself.
I grunted again. I think she got the message.
“Well, guess I’ll head home now. Don’t worry, Cooper,” she said, starting in
the direction of her house. “We’ll come up with a plan to get him back. I
promise.”
I didn’t answer.
“See you tomorrow!” she called out, waving.
I didn’t bother to wave back. I watched her leave. Then I made my way
over to the stream to take a drink of cold water. The sight of Mickey all bloody
had made my throat dry. And it was from screaming.
I leaned over the sparkling, cool water and lowered my hand. I scooped
some water up to my mouth and drank.
But when I saw my reflection in the stream, I choked.
It wasn’t me.
The face staring back at me in the water was the face of a black dog!
I jerked my head up.
No dogs on the shore.
No dogs anywhere in sight.
“Whoa!” I cried aloud.
I leaned over the stream again and peered into the water.
The dog stared up at me from beneath the surface.
I raised my head again. No dog on the shore.
So how could I see a dog’s reflection in the water?
Once again, I squinted into the clear stream. The dog appeared to ripple
with the water.
And as I gaped at the eerie reflection in horror, it pulled back its thin lips
and bared its ugly yellow teeth in a silent growl.
16
I raced home without glancing back.
I crashed through the front door and charged straight for the bathroom. I
had to check myself out in the mirror.
I don’t know what I thought I’d see.
A dog face staring back at me?
Even I know how stupid that sounds.
But I couldn’t explain the dog reflection in the water. I should have seen my
face in that stream—not the growling face of a black Lab.
Stepping into the bathroom, I approached the mirror slowly. I peeked in.
And I saw—my own freckled face.
Did it make me feel better?
Not much.
I didn’t speak to anyone in my family for the rest of the afternoon. And at
dinnertime, I nibbled a few bites, then asked to be excused.
“Are you feeling okay, Cooper?” Mom asked, frowning. “Liver and onions
is your favorite. I’ve never seen you leave liver and onions on your plate.”
She walked over and felt my forehead. That’s what she always does
whenever I act a little strange. Feels my forehead.
“I’m fine, Mom,” I replied. “I’m just not very hungry. That’s all.”
“Cooper is probably a little nervous about tomorrow. His first day in a new
school,” Dad said to Mom. He turned to me. “Am I right?”
“Yeah, that’s it,” I agreed. No sense in bringing up the dogs again. No one
would believe me, anyway.
“Aw. Poor little Drooper. Scared of his new school,” Mickey teased.
Mom and Dad shot Mickey a warning glance. “Mickey—not tonight,” Dad
muttered.
I ignored my dumb brother. I climbed up from my chair and headed for my
room.
I couldn’t fall asleep that night. Every time I closed my eyes, I saw the face of
the angry black dog, rippling in the stream.
I finally dozed off after midnight.
I awoke to Mom’s impatient cries. “Cooper. Cooper. You’ve overslept.
Time to get up!”
I couldn’t believe it. I’m always up early. I never oversleep.
I’m going to be late for my first day of school! I thought unhappily. And it’s
all because of those creepy dogs.
I threw my T-shirt and jeans on and rushed down the hall to the kitchen. No
time for a big breakfast. I gulped down a glass of milk. Then I opened the fridge
and reached for the peanut butter and jelly to make a sandwich for lunch.
As I spread the peanut butter on the bread, I heard whimpering behind me.
“Cut it out, Mickey,” I said without turning around.
The whimpering grew louder.
“Mickey! Quit it! Stop being such a—”
They sprang out of nowhere. The dogs.
They were in the kitchen!
17
Their jaws hung loose. They drooled hungrily. Thick yellow drool.
My knees buckled. I clutched for the counter to steady myself.
Their dark, furry bodies shimmered under the bright kitchen lights.
Growling, their teeth bared, they stepped side by side away from the wall.
I moved back slowly. One small step.
Their dark eyes tracked my move.
One more step back. Slowly. Then another.
Their steady gaze followed me.
The back door stood inches away. If I reached back, I could touch the
doorknob now.
I reached back. Slowly. Very slowly.
My hand fumbled. Then I found it. The small round knob…
Too late!
They jumped.
I screamed as their dark bodies hurtled toward me.
I shut my eyes.
I heard the sound of snapping jaws.
I opened my eyes in time to see one of the dogs snatch my lunch from the
counter.
Then they disappeared.
Through the kitchen door. They dove right through the wooden door.
Breathing hard, I sank into a kitchen chair.
I held my head tightly. I shut my eyes and tried to calm myself.
I had just seen two dogs run right through a door. How could that be?
Mom raced into the room. Dad followed.
“Cooper, what’s wrong?” Mom cried. “What was that horrible scream we
heard?”
I had to tell them what happened. I had to. This was too weird. Too scary
and too weird.
So I told them the whole story.
“Two black dogs—they jumped through the wall. Into the kitchen. One of
them grabbed my lunch. Then they dove through the door.”
Big mistake.
Mom and Dad gave me a lecture about the stress of moving. I think I heard
them mention the word psychiatrist.
They didn’t believe a word of it.
I didn’t have the strength to argue. I shuffled out the door and headed for
school.
No way I could stop thinking about those dogs. Dogs that only I could see. Dogs
that stole lunches. Dogs that could walk through doors.
I didn’t see them again that week. But every morning I’d hear them barking
somewhere around the house. Nobody else heard them.
On Friday, I met Fergie after school and we walked home together. She
talked nonstop about our math teacher, but I wasn’t really paying attention. I
couldn’t stop thinking about the dogs.
“What?” I asked Fergie. She’d just asked me something about math
homework.
“I said,” she repeated impatiently, “that we can do our math homework
together this weekend.”
I shrugged. “Yeah, whatever.”
Fergie was going to stay at our house Saturday night. Her parents had to go
to Vermont for the weekend.
We had become pretty good friends this past week. So had our parents.
Mom and Dad invited the Fergusons over for dinner on Tuesday, and the
Fergusons had us over on Wednesday.
Maybe having Fergie sleep over will be fun, I thought. If I can shut those
dogs out of my mind.
“We still have to come up with a trick to play on Mickey,” Fergie pointed
out. “I’ve been thinking—”
“Listen, Fergie,” I said, interrupting her. “There’s something I’ve been
meaning to tell you all week.”
She waited for me to begin.
I took a deep breath, then blurted out the whole story. About the dog
reflection in the stream. And the dogs in the kitchen.
“I’ve been hearing them all week,” I confessed. “Sometimes outside the
house, sometimes inside. It’s been a nightmare.”
Fergie’s jaw dropped open. “How come you didn’t tell me before?” she
asked.
I sighed. “Because no one in my family believes me,” I said. “I thought you
wouldn’t, either.”
“I believe you, Cooper,” she replied solemnly.
I smiled. “Thanks, Fergie. That means a lot.”
Fergie’s expression turned thoughtful. “Well, maybe we’ll both hear them
on Saturday night. Your parents will have to believe both of us.”
I nodded. Fergie was right. Mom and Dad couldn’t think the two of us
needed to see a doctor. I started to feel a little more cheerful.
“Now about the get-back-at-Mickey plan,” Fergie said. “I have another
idea.”
I tried to listen to Fergie’s plan—it had something to do with rats and a rope
—but I couldn’t concentrate on what she was saying. I could only think about
the dogs.
Would they turn up again this weekend?
18
I watched each minute tick away on the alarm clock near my bed. Finally—
midnight. Time to get moving.
I tiptoed down the hall to the guest room where Fergie slept. I knocked on
the door.
“Fergie,” I whispered. “Fergie, get up!”
She appeared at the door in an instant, fully dressed. “The dogs? Are the
dogs here?” she asked, eyes wide with fright.
She seemed really spooked. And she had awful pillow-hair static.
“No, dope.” I whispered. “It’s time to scare Mickey.”
Fergie rubbed her eyes. “Oh, yeah, right.”
Without saying another word, she slid under the bed and came out with a
shoe box and some string.
“Let me see it again,” I said eagerly.
Fergie smiled, then opened the box. Inside sat a huge, hairy, totally gross,
disgusting black rat.
A fake, of course. But it looked so real! Real enough to fool another rat. A
rat like Mickey.
I lifted the rat from the box and shook it in Fergie’s face.
She backed away and let out a yelp, even though she knew it was made of
rubber or something.
I tied the string around the rat’s neck and waved at Fergie to follow me. We
crept silently into the hall and headed for Mickey’s room.
This was going to be totally awesome! I couldn’t wait to see the look on
Mickey’s face when our hairy rat slithered across his bed!
We stopped in the hall outside Mickey’s room. His door stood slightly open.
I poked my head in and checked out his bedroom.
By the dim light in the hallway, I could see Mickey in bed, all covered up,
fast asleep. Mickey never sleeps with a pillow. He always tosses it on the floor
when he climbs into bed. There it was, next to his shoes.
I stepped back from the door and pulled Fergie aside.
“Okay, here’s the plan,” I whispered. “When we’re inside the room, go to
the left. That’s where the closet is. I’ll tiptoe over to the bed and put the rat on
Mickey. Then I’ll meet you in the closet.”
“Check,” Fergie whispered solemnly.
“And, remember,” I warned her, “be quiet!”
“Check,” Fergie said again.
With the rat in one hand, I carefully made my way into Mickey’s room. I
glimpsed Fergie heading left to the closet. I headed right.
I had nearly reached Mickey’s bed when I heard a loud crack.
My heart jumped to my throat. I spun around and stared at Fergie in horror.
I saw instantly what had happened. She had stepped on Mickey’s
skateboard.
We both turned to the bed.
Mickey didn’t move a muscle.
He hadn’t heard the noise.
I let out a quiet sigh of relief, then shot Fergie a warning glance.
She nodded nervously.
I watched as she opened the closet door and ducked inside.
I held the rat out in front of me and edged closer to Mickey’s bed. My hand
shook, but I gripped the hairy creature tightly.
I stared down at Mickey under the covers. He slept soundly.
I crept closer.
Bundled under the blankets, it was impossible to tell where Mickey’s body
started. I set the rat down gently, near his stomach, I think.
Then I tiptoed to the closet. Inside, I knelt next to Fergie and gave her a
thumbs-up sign.
Operation “Scare Mickey” was in effect.
And I couldn’t be more excited.
It served him right.
I quietly pulled the closet door toward me, leaving it open just a crack. I
held tightly onto the end of the string.
“Ready?” I whispered.
“Ready,” she whispered back.
“Okay,” I said. “On three. One… two… uh, Fergie, stop kicking me.”
“I’m not touching you,” she whispered sharply.
“You are, too. Stop it, okay?”
“No way. My feet are all the way over here,” Fergie protested.
“Ow! You kicked me again!” I whispered.
She raised her voice. “I did not!”
I clamped my hand over her mouth.
We both froze.
I heard breathing.
Heavy breathing.
Not my breathing. Not Fergie’s breathing.
I swallowed hard.
“F-Fergie,” I stammered. “We’re not alone in here!”
19
A low, steady growl proved me right.
Someone—or something—was hiding in the closet with us.
We listened to the low growls for another second or two.
Then we both flew out of the closet, screaming in horror.
I only made it a few feet. I tripped over Mickey’s skateboard. Went
sprawling headfirst. Landed flat on my face.
As I struggled to my feet, I saw a dark figure step out of the closet.
“You!” I screamed in a hoarse, frightened voice.
Mickey grinned back at Fergie and me. “Oooohhh! Ooooooohhh! Look at
me!” he cried. “I’m a killer poodle!”
Fergie and I stared at him in disbelief. He had been in the closet the entire
time.
I dove to the bed and pulled down the blanket.
“Oh, wow!” I cried out when I saw a bunch of rolled up sheets and towels.
“But how did you know?” Fergie asked him. “How did you know we were
coming?”
Mickey flashed us both a smug smirk. “When you showed up this morning
clutching that dumb box and whispering to Cooper, I knew something was up.
I’ve been spying on you two jerks all day.”
“You sneak!” I cried.
“A sneak? Me?” Mickey replied innocently. “What do you call what you’re
doing, prowling around my room and hiding in my closet?”
I was so angry. So disappointed. Our great revenge plan—totally ruined.
I grabbed Fergie by the arm. “Come on. Let’s get out of here.”
“That’s right!” Mickey called gleefully after us. “Running away with your
tails between your legs!” Then he howled and barked some more.
Great guy—huh?
Fergie and I sat in the hall outside my room. We had really wanted to give
Mickey a good scare. So he could see how it felt.
But we had messed up. Totally.
“We’ll get him next time,” Fergie offered. “We’ll come up with an even
better plan. Maybe something with knives and fake blood.”
I shrugged. I didn’t want to wait. I wanted to scare Mickey out of his skin
—tonight!
Not much chance of that.
Fergie and I yawned at the same time. Then we both stood up. “Guess we
should go back to bed. Maybe—”
“Did you hear that?” I asked, cutting Fergie off.
She nodded. “Yeah. I hear it. Barking.”
“That’s not my brother,” I whispered. “It’s definitely the dogs!”
20
“I don’t get it!” Fergie cried in a trembling voice. “Where are your parents?
Where’s Mickey?”
I led her down the hall, in the direction of the barking.
“I told you,” I whispered. “They can’t hear the dogs. I don’t know why. No
one can hear them but us!”
We turned into the living room and gasped.
Two sets of red eyes glowed in the dark.
I reached for Great-grandma’s lamp, but knocked it over. It crashed loudly
to the floor.
The dogs barked.
Fergie clutched my shoulder. Her hand trembled. “Turn on the lights!
Please!” she pleaded.
But before I could reach the switch, the lights snapped on.
We spun around. And there stood Mom on the stairway, glaring down at us.
“Cooper! Margaret! What on earth are you two doing?”
“It’s the dogs, Mom!” I cried. “See? They’re—”
“What dogs?” Mom called. I spun around.
No glaring red eyes. No dogs. Except for Fergie and me, the room stood
empty.
“Wow, your mom sure was upset,” Fergie whispered as we trudged back down
the hall to our rooms.
“But now you believe me, right, Fergie?” I asked. “You heard the dogs
yourself!”
Fergie nodded. “For sure. There were definitely dogs here.”
“Go to sleep!” Mom called sternly. “Immediately!”
“Okay, Mom!” I called back. I turned to Fergie. “We’ll check out the woods
in the morning,” I told her. “Those dogs have to be somewhere!”
“Good idea,” Fergie agreed. “See you in the morning.”
Back in my room, I couldn’t fall asleep. I sat on my bed and tossed a
baseball into the air. I watched the numbers slowly click by on my alarm clock.
I thought about the dogs. They were definitely here tonight. Fergie had
heard them, too.
But how do they get in and out of my house? I wondered.
And how do they vanish into thin air like that?
And why do they keep bothering me? Why?
I tossed down the baseball and crept into the hall.
I knocked softly on Fergie’s door. “It’s me. Can I come in?”
“What’s wrong?” she whispered, opening the door.
“Listen,” I said. “I don’t think I can wait until tomorrow. Let’s search for
those dogs now.”
Fergie narrowed her eyes thoughtfully. “It—it might be dangerous,” she
stammered.
“I don’t care,” I told her. “Let’s go.”
21
A few minutes later, Fergie and I skulked around the backyard with our
flashlights.
No moon tonight. No stars. A chilly mist hung in the air.
We both shivered.
I pointed my flashlight at the ground and searched for paw prints.
None. As usual.
“How come they never leave prints?” I muttered under my breath.
Fergie shrugged, but didn’t answer. I could tell she was as scared as I was.
She stuck close by my side.
The beam of my flashlight fell on the jungle gym. As I stared down at the
ground ahead of me, something suddenly grabbed my ankle.
“Hey!” I yelled, tumbling in the dirt.
I twisted and squirmed, trying to break free. “Help!”
Fergie rushed over to help. Why was she laughing?
“What a klutz! You’re all tangled up in the lawn sprinkler!” she exclaimed.
“It’s not funny,” I insisted. I was glad she couldn’t see me blush in the
darkness. “I could have broken my leg or something!”
Fergie bent down to help free me. Then she stopped. “Did you hear that?”
she asked.
“Hear what?”
“Listen.”
We waited silently in the dark. Hardly breathing.
Then I heard it, too. A soft creaking coming from the house. It sounded like
an old door swinging open and shut.
We carefully made our way toward the sound. To my surprise, we found a
small window low to the ground. I’d never noticed it before.
The window was open, swinging back and forth, making the creaking noise.
“It leads to the basement,” I said, poking my head in. “Do you think this is
how the dogs get into the house?”
Fergie didn’t answer me.
“Fergie?” I called.
No reply.
A chill of fear shot down my back.
I spun around.
In time to see a dark form come charging at me.
Startled, I stumbled. The back of my head hit the house with a hard thwack.
The dark creature leaped on top of me.
Pinned me to the ground.
A sour smell filled my nostrils as I struggled to get up.
But I couldn’t move.
The creature panted. Its jaws opened wide. Hot saliva dripped on to my
face.
The big dog held me prisoner.
What did it plan to do next?
22
“Get off me!” I choked out.
I reached up both hands—and shoved with all my might.
To my surprise, the big dog toppled off.
I jumped to my feet, my heart pounding. Spinning around, I saw Fergie.
Trapped. Backed up against the house by the other dog.
“Go home!” she cried meekly to the dog. “Go home!”
The dog didn’t budge.
I picked up a stick. I waved it furiously in front of me to keep the dogs a
good distance away.
As I approached the animals, Fergie shook her arms wildly at them.
They lowered their heads and growled softly.
Then, one of them came running at me. The stick didn’t seem to bother him
at all.
I lost my balance and crashed into Fergie.
Both dogs curled their lips into fierce, ugly snarls.
My legs were shaking so hard, I could barely stand.
Growling and snapping their jaws, the dogs backed Fergie and me against
the house.
“Now what?” Fergie cried, grabbing my arm.
“G-good question,” I stammered as the dogs lowered their heads and moved
closer.
23
I shut my eyes.
I had this crazy idea that if I made them disappear, I’d disappear, too.
Guess what? It didn’t work.
I felt a sudden burst of hot, sour dog breath on my face.
Then I felt tugging. On my sweatpants.
I opened my eyes. The dog pulled furiously at my sweats. Not biting.
Tugging.
Fergie appeared as confused as I was. The other dog tugged at the hem of
her T-shirt.
“What do they want?” Fergie whispered.
“I… I… I don’t know,” I answered. “They—they’re not biting or
attacking!”
“Cooper, I think they want us to go with them,” Fergie said.
“That’s crazy!” I cried. The dog tugged harder on my sweatpants. “I saw
this on a Lassie show once!”
“I don’t think it’s crazy, Cooper,” Fergie said. “Watch.” She stepped
forward slowly, and the dog’s tail began to wag. “See? They want us to go with
them!”
I hesitated. It seemed ridiculous.
But when I edged forward, the dog that had been tugging on my pants
began wagging his tail, too.
“See?” Fergie whispered.
Sorry, but I wasn’t buying it. I turned and started to run.
“Cooper, don’t!” Fergie cried.
Too late.
The big creature took off after me. Leaped high. And knocked me to the
ground.
When I climbed to my feet, he started tugging again.
“Come on. Let’s see what they want,” Fergie pleaded with me. “We don’t
have much of a choice, anyway. They’re not going to leave us alone.”
We followed the dogs through the woods. They stayed close by, never
getting too far ahead. And always glancing back.
I pointed my flashlight along the path. The dim light didn’t help very much
at all. I had no idea where we were going. All I knew was that it was very dark
out—and we were headed deeper and deeper into the woods.
“I hope we can find our way back,” I muttered to myself.
Then, without warning, the dogs sped up. Their big paws trod heavily on
the soft ground.
A few seconds later, they began barking and scratching wildly at something
between the trees.
I lifted my flashlight and aimed it in their direction.
In the center of a small clearing stood a broken-down wooden shack. The
dogs clawed at the door. When they had pushed it open, they came back for us.
They began tugging again, pulling us toward the shack.
“Wha—what is this place?” I cried. “Where are we?”
“I don’t know,” Fergie whispered. “I’ve never seen this shack before.”
The dogs tugged—furiously now. They really wanted us to go in there.
“What can be inside?” I whispered to Fergie.
Fergie swallowed hard. “I don’t know,” she whispered back. “But I think
we’re going to find out!”
24
“Fergie, I don’t like this,” I whispered. “Let’s get away from here—fast!”
I felt the dog clamp its jaw tighter on my ankle.
Had he understood what I’d said?
“They’re not going to let us get away,” Fergie said softly.
Snarling and growling, the dogs backed us up against the door to the shack.
“Whoa!” I cried out as the dogs leaped at the side of the shack.
“I don’t believe it!” Fergie screamed.
The dogs jumped right through the wooden wall. They disappeared inside.
“That’s impossible!” Fergie cried.
“Tell that to the dogs,” I murmured.
I had seen them do it before—in my own kitchen.
“They’re ghosts or something!” Fergie cried.
I grabbed her arm. “Let’s get out of here! Whatever happens… we can’t go
in that shack!”
We’d taken only a few steps when the dogs came tearing out through the
shack wall.
They edged in close, pressing us up against the shack again. Before we
could struggle or try to get away, the dogs rose up on their hind legs.
Standing up, they were taller than us! Fergie and I exchanged terrified
glances.
The dogs staggered forward. Pressed their front paws against our chests.
And shoved us backwards into the shack.
We screamed as we started to fall.
The shack had no floor.
We fell, hurtling down. Tumbling as we fell.
Down, down, down.
Into a deep, black hole.
A deep, black hole that didn’t seem to end.
25
I landed softly on my feet. I didn’t even feel it.
Had we fallen into some kind of well? Or a tunnel dug deep under the
shack?
I couldn’t tell.
I took a deep breath and gazed around the heavy blackness. “Fergie—are
you okay?” I called. My voice came out tiny and shrill.
“I—I guess,” she replied after a few seconds. “Cooper—look!”
I started to reply that it was too dark to see anything. But then I glimpsed
the two pairs of red eyes, glaring at us through the darkness.
I gasped.
“Don’t move!” instructed a dry whisper of a voice.
“Who are you?” I managed to choke out. “What do you want?”
“Why did you dogs bring us here?” Fergie demanded.
“We are not dogs,” the voice growled. “We are people.”
“But—but—” I sputtered.
“Silence!” the voice commanded. “Silence while you are in the Changing
Room.”
“The what?” I cried.
The red eyes flared.
“Centuries ago, my friend and I had an evil spell cast upon us,” the voice
continued, ignoring my question. “The spell forced us to roam these woods as
dogs. Ghost dogs.”
“Too bad,” I muttered. “But what do you want us for?”
The dogs snickered. It sounded more like dry coughing than laughter.
“You are in the Changing Room,” the voice told us. “For nearly a hundred
years, we have tried to get two people in here. And now we have succeeded.”
“And—?” I demanded.
“We’re going to change places with you,” the voice said casually.
“Excuse me?” Fergie cried. “You’re going to what?”
“We will take your places,” the voice repeated. “And you shall take ours.
You will be the ghost dogs. You will roam these woods as we did—forever!”
“No way!” I cried. I wanted to run.
But where?
I was surrounded by heavy blackness on all sides.
“Fergie—” I started.
But I heard her gasp. And then I began to feel warm. As if someone had
covered me with a heavy blanket.
The warmth swept over my body.
Simmering heat. As if I were in an oven.
Warmer. Warmer. Until sweat dripped down my face, and I was panting in
the heat.
I can’t stand it anymore! I thought. I’m going to melt!
I opened my mouth to scream. But the sounds that escaped my throat
weren’t mine.
In fact, they didn’t sound human at all.
26
I opened my eyes to bright sunshine.
The woods around me appeared fuzzy. I struggled to focus.
I yawned. Then I stretched my entire body and shook myself awake.
Yes! That stretch felt good.
I sniffed the air and shook myself again. Wow! Something smelled
delicious.
My stomach growled. I suddenly realized I must be starving.
Still trying to focus, I took two steps and fell on my face.
I stood again, feeling unsteady. What’s wrong? I wondered.
I gazed around the woods. Why were the trees suddenly all black and
white? Why was the sky gray? The grass gray?
What had happened to all the color?
Was this a dream?
I heard a gruff sound behind me. Someone clearing his throat.
I turned—and saw a black Labrador.
I started to cry out—but hoarse barks escaped my throat.
Startled, I glanced down at my own body. My own fur-covered body.
“Ohhhh.” I dug my front paws into the dirt. I shook myself hard, trying to shake
the dog body off. Trying to shake it away so I could see my real body. Cooper’s
body.
And as I shook, I jerked my head back. And saw a long, black tail!
My tail!
I let out a startled yip. I’m a dog, too, I realized.
The ghosts in the Changing Room weren’t kidding around. They changed
places with us. Fergie and I are dogs.
Fergie whimpered.
Trembling, we both began to trot, our tails hanging between our legs.
Fergie’s whimpers turned into mournful howls.
What was that? Strange! I thought Fergie said something.
“I did say something,” she insisted. “Well, actually, I thought something. I
think we can read each other’s thoughts, Cooper.”
Okay, Fergie, then what am I thinking now?
“You’re thinking of that leftover fried liver from last night that your mom
put in the fridge,” Fergie thought.
That’s right!
We could read each other’s mind! Cool!
I licked my lips a few times, thinking about the liver. I loved liver so much,
Mom made it for me once a week. Man, did I want that liver now!
Then I remembered I had other things to worry about.
“Fergie, what are we going to do? We’re dogs!”
“I can see that, Cooper,” she replied, swatting a fly from behind her floppy,
black ear.
“Well, we’ve got to do something!” I cried. “We can’t trot around like this
forever. Those ghost dogs stole our bodies! They’re probably fooling my parents
this very minute!”
Fergie didn’t reply. Instead, she ran around in circles, chasing her tail.
“Hey! This is fun!”
“Fergie! Quit messing around! We’re in major trouble!”
“Okay, okay! I’m sorry! I’m upset about this, too, you know!”
Fergie dropped to the dirt. She buried her snout in her front paws. Deep in
thought. “You know what, Cooper?”
“What?” I asked as I paced back and forth, trying to think of a way to get us
out of this mess.
“Your droopy ears look pretty good—now that you’re a dog.”
“Fergie! Get serious!” I growled.
Then it hit me.
“I know!” I cried. “I know what we can do. We have to drag those ghosts
back to the shack and trade places with them again!”
“Oh, sure, Cooper. No problem,” Fergie barked. “And how do you suppose
we do that? Walk up to them and say, ‘Uh, excuse me, but can you come back to
the shack with us? It’ll only be for a second.’”
I stared at Fergie. She had become a dog. But her personality hadn’t
changed one bit!
“I heard that,” she mumbled.
I sighed. “Well, do you have a better plan?” I asked, scratching furiously at
my neck.
“I’m thinking, I’m thinking,” Fergie answered with a yawn. “I’m really so
tired. Maybe after a nap—”
“No! No naps! We have to do something—now! Listen to me. We’ll get my
parents to help. All we have to do is convince them that we’re the real Cooper
and Margaret, and that those kids in the house are imposters.”
“And how are we going to do that?” Fergie asked.
Good question. Real good question.
27
Fergie and I trotted through the woods. I sniffed the ground. Sniffed the weeds.
So many great smells!
We stopped at the edge of the woods behind my house. I heard laughing,
shouting voices. Then I saw my parents. In the backyard. Throwing a Frisbee
around with Fergie and Cooper!
Those fakes!
I growled with anger.
I bared my teeth. Prepared to attack.
“Whoa!” Fergie cried. “Cooper, wait! You can’t just barge over there and
attack them!”
Fergie was right. That wouldn’t solve anything.
I watched my dad send the Frisbee flying across the yard.
I had a strong urge to jump up and go for that Frisbee.
But I stopped myself. This was no time for playing.
Then I had an idea. The greatest idea. The idea of a lifetime.
“Come on!” I urged Fergie. I began loping toward the side of my house.
“Cooper, where are you going?” she asked.
I didn’t answer. I stopped outside the wall to Mickey’s room. “This will just
take a second,” I told Fergie.
She read my mind. She knew what I planned to do.
Side by side, we leaped through the wall of the house.
And burst into Mickey’s room.
He was standing in his underwear. Leaning over his dresser, sorting out his
T-shirts. He cried out and spun around as Fergie and I started to growl.
My brother uttered a short, terrified whimper. He started backing up, his
eyes wide with fright.
Fergie and I began barking and jumping up on our hind legs.
“How—how did you—?” Mickey stammered.
Those were the only words he could choke out.
Then he let out another whimper, stumbled past us, and bolted out through
the bedroom door. “Mommy! Daddy! Help!” I heard him scream. “Mommy!
Daddy!”
Fergie and I didn’t want to miss seeing him run through the yard in his
underwear. We trotted through the wall and watched until he disappeared around
the garage.
“Did you see his face?” I yelped happily. “Was that awesome?!”
“Man, that was excellent!” Fergie cheered.
“Hey, you two!” a stern voice called.
I turned around.
Dad!
“How did you dogs get in this yard?” my father demanded sharply. “Come
on. Out! Out!”
“But, wait! Dad! It’s me, Cooper!” I tried to yell. But all that came out was
Woof! Woof! Woof!
“Out! Out!” Dad repeated angrily.
“Dad! Wait! It’s really me! Listen! You’ve got to listen!”
“Woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof!”
My father armed himself with a broom and waved it wildly at Fergie and
me. Out! he cried, shaking the broom at us.
“What’s going on?” Mom called from the doorway.
“Mom! It’s me. Cooper!” I barked furiously.
“Oh, Sam. Please get rid of those animals! You know I’m allergic to dogs!”
“But, Mom!” I cried. “Can’t you tell it’s me?”
Woof, woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof, woof!
“Please, Sam! Call the pound! These dogs look dangerous. They might
have to be put to sleep! Call the pound. They’ll know what to do.”
I watched in horror as my dad picked up the phone and dialed.
28
Fergie and I bolted into the woods as fast as we could. Even as a dog, Fergie ran
faster than I did.
We hid among the trees and watched my parents and the fake Cooper and
Fergie toss the Frisbee around in the backyard.
The guys from the pound never showed up. But things still looked pretty
bad. My parents thought we were stray dogs. And I couldn’t tell them who I was.
All I could do was bark.
Hey. Wait a minute. Maybe I could do more than bark.
“Fergie, I have another idea!” I said, wagging my tail. “Follow me!”
Fergie and I sneaked around the side of the house and stepped through the
wall into the living room. I sniffed around, searching for a pen and some paper.
“I’ll write them a note,” I explained to Fergie. “Mom will definitely
recognize my handwriting.”
I found a pen lying on the coffee table, next to some notepaper.
I tried to lift the pen.
It slipped out from under my paw. I couldn’t wrap my paw around it.
Fergie tried to help me. She nosed the pen in my direction, but I still
couldn’t pick it up.
Impossible. Dogs can’t hold pens.
I felt so disappointed. I pushed the pen away, then ripped the paper to
shreds. That’s when my dad burst in.
“Hey! I thought I told you two dogs to beat it!” my father yelled.
My mother and the two phonies came running into the room.
I started barking, trying to communicate with Dad. But that seemed to
annoy him even more.
“Stand up on your hind legs!” I instructed Fergie. “Maybe he’ll think we’re
trying to tell him something!”
I hopped up, trying to balance on my back legs. But I wasn’t very good at it.
I mean, give me a break. I’d only been a dog for a few hours.
I toppled over onto my stomach.
I must have looked pretty stupid, because everyone started laughing.
“Weird dogs,” the Cooper imposter said.
Fergie and I hopped up again and again. But nobody understood what we
were doing. And after a while, they grew bored with our little act. Dad picked up
the broom again.
I probably could have yanked that stupid broom right out of his hands and
pinned him to the ground. But what would that prove?
Dad chased Fergie and me out the back door and into the woods.
“You’re right,” I told her when we were safely hidden by the trees. “We’re
going to be dogs for the rest of our lives. And not even real dogs. Ghost dogs.”
“Don’t worry, Cooper,” Fergie replied, reading my mind. “We’ll convince
them. There’s got to be a way to show them who we are.”
I sighed, then rolled on to my back.
If only Gary and Todd were here. They’d know what to do.
I rolled back again. And, suddenly, I felt hot. Burning hot. I sprang up on all
fours.
“What is it?” Fergie cried out. “What’s wrong?”
I shook violently from head to tail. Out of control. I couldn’t stop shaking.
Something had taken over my body.
29
“Fleas!” I shrieked.
There must have been thousands of them! Clinging all over my body! And I
couldn’t reach them.
“My back!” I cried helplessly. “My back!”
Fergie lifted her front paws and scratched the part of my back I couldn’t
reach.
“Higher,” I pleaded. “Higher. Aaaaahhhhh, that’s it!”
My ears drooped low, and I sighed with relief.
Fergie found us a nice spot under a tall birch tree. I stretched out my body
and rested my face on my paws. Fergie curled up into a tight ball. It was time to
think up another plan.
And time to nap. I couldn’t believe how tired I’d suddenly become.
The day passed slowly. I think we both dozed off once or twice.
Around lunchtime, we ran to the stream in the woods for water. Some fleas
still nipped at my skin. And I thought a cool dip in the stream might help.
We returned to our spot under the shady birch. Now we were both starving.
“Maybe we can find some scraps of food at my house—in the garbage,” I
suggested.
“Yuck! I’m not eating garbage,” Fergie wailed. “No way.” But she knew we
had no choice.
We returned to my house and quietly made our way to the side door, where
Dad stored the garbage pails.
As we sniffed around for some food, Mickey and my parents opened the
back door and stepped out into the yard.
“I’m telling you, Mom!” Mickey cried. “They’re ghost dogs! They walked
right through my bedroom wall! They’re not normal!”
“Save your jokes for Cooper,” my father snapped.
“Hey, Fergie, maybe Mickey can help us,” I suggested, watching my
brother. “He’s the only one who believes we’re not normal dogs. Maybe we can
find a way to tell him who we are.”
Fergie sighed. “For sure,” she said sarcastically. “Then what? Can you see
your parents’ faces when Mickey tells them the two dogs hanging around their
house are really Cooper and Margaret Ferguson?”
I hung my head. Fergie was right. They’d never believe Mickey, either.
“Well, we have to do something!” I said, scratching behind my ear. “These
fleas are driving me crazy! I can’t live like this!”
“Maybe we can get you a flea collar,” Fergie suggested.
“Oh, right. I’ll just trot into the Main Street drugstore, put five dollars on
the counter, and ask for a flea collar. Nobody will think that’s weird.” I rolled my
eyes.
Fergie snapped at me. “Well, excuse me, Cooper. I was only trying to help!”
Fergie and I spent the rest of the day snapping at each other, getting on each
other’s nerves.
When dinnertime rolled around, my stomach rumbled loudly. Then I
smelled the most wonderful smell.
I raised my nose high in the air and sniffed excitedly.
I’d know that aroma anywhere.
Liver! The leftover liver from last night!
“Come on!” I barked to Fergie. “I’ve got to get some of that liver!”
We trotted over to the back door and peered inside. My whole family had
gathered around the table, ready to eat.
“You’re drooling,” Fergie said to me in disgust. “Gross.”
Like I cared.
I couldn’t take my eyes off the plate of liver Mom carried to the table. I
watched hungrily as she placed a big slab on my father’s plate.
Then she served some to Mickey. Mickey seemed edgy, nervous. I hoped he
was still upset from my little trick this morning.
Then Mom placed a piece of liver on the phony Cooper’s plate. He jumped
from his seat. “Yuck!” he cried out in disgust. “I hate liver!”
Mom’s jaw dropped. “Cooper! What are you saying? You love liver!”
The phony Cooper began to stutter.
“Oh, uh, did I say I hated it? Oh, no. I’m, uh, just joking, Mom. I love liver.
Everyone knows that!”
Mom stared at him suspiciously. “Really, Cooper. You haven’t been
yourself all day!”
My eyes widened.
This was my chance!
Now was the perfect time to show Mom he wasn’t himself! He was a total
phony!
“I’m going in!” I told Fergie.
I burst through the kitchen door and headed straight for the plate of liver.
I’ll show Mom who the real Cooper is, I thought happily. The Cooper who loves
liver. She’ll know it’s me instantly!
This has got to work.
It’s our last chance, I knew. Our only chance.
30
Panting excitedly, I charged into the kitchen and leaped up at the table.
Mom screamed and dropped the plate of liver on the floor.
In a flash, I bent down and began lapping it up. Delicious!
“See, Mom? Look, it’s me! Your son, Cooper!” I yelped in between bites.
“Sam! Do something! That animal is eating our dinner!”
Huh? Animal? “No, Mom! It’s me! Your son! Look, I love liver!”
But it was no use.
All Mom heard was, “Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof,
woof, woof!”
Dad shoved his chair away from the table and grabbed a newspaper from
the counter. He rolled it up, then swatted my nose.
“Ow!”
That hurt!
“I’ll see if the line to the pound is still busy,” Mom said, picking up the
phone. “Try to chase the dogs into the pantry and lock the door. We’ll hold them
in there until the pound can come get them.”
The fake Cooper and Margaret helped Dad back us toward the pantry. “Bad
dogs! Bad!” the phony Margaret shouted.
“Dad, do you think the pound will use a tranquilizer gun on them?” the
phony Cooper asked.
“Maybe,” Dad replied.
I glanced over at Fergie.
Tranquilizer guns? No thank you!
I never ran so fast in all my life. I even ran faster than Fergie.
“Got any other bright ideas, fleabag?” she asked when we were safely in the
woods.
I growled at her and turned away. The sun was setting over the trees. The
air felt cool. It would be dark soon.
“And thanks for saving some of that liver for me,” Fergie snapped. “I’m
hungry, too, you know!”
I ignored her.
I gazed longingly through the trees. Through the window of my house as
Mom and Dad washed the dishes.
I couldn’t help myself. I felt so bad. I started whimpering.
If only I could be inside my warm, comfortable house right now. In a short
while, it would be dark. I didn’t want to spend a night in the woods.
Think, Cooper! Think! I urged myself. There must be a way to get our
human bodies back.
“Whoa! Wait a minute!” I cried. “I just thought of something!”
Fergie awoke from a nap. “What?” she asked lazily.
“We’re dogs, right?”
“Right.”
“So we should act like dogs!”
Fergie narrowed her eyes. “Cooper, what are you talking about?”
I took a deep breath. “Okay, listen,” I explained. “Remember how those
ghost dogs got us out to the shack?”
Fergie nodded.
“That’s what we should do! We should pull those kids back there, the way
they pulled us! That’s what dogs would do!”
Fergie raised her head. Her ears perked up. “Not bad! Not bad at all!”
“We’re dogs,” I continued. “We have sharp teeth, right? Very sharp teeth.
We’ll drag them into the woods and into the Changing Room—and before you
know it, we’ll be Cooper and Fergie again!”
Fergie bounced up and began panting happily and wagging her tail.
“Excellent!” she cried.
“Okay, here’s the plan.” With my paw, I drew a diagram in the dirt. “The
phonies are here, in the den. We’ll walk through the wall and haul them out
through the kitchen door. It’s okay if Mom and Dad follow. We can outrun
them.”
“I’m ready. Let’s do it!” Fergie exclaimed.
We trotted to the house and pushed through the wall, as planned.
Inside, the fake Cooper and Fergie were watching MTV on the den TV. We
burst through the den wall and surprised them.
“Mom!” the fake Cooper screamed at the top of his lungs. “Dad! Help! It’s
the dogs!”
Fergie and I moved in on them, snarling as ferociously as we knew how.
I clamped on to the fake Cooper’s ankle just as my parents and Mickey
burst into the room. I motioned to Fergie to get on with it. In a flash, she leaped
on to the phony Fergie and clamped her jaws around her wrist.
Then we tugged.
“Mom! Dad! Help!” the phony Cooper yelled.
“Mr. Holmes!” the phony Fergie cried. “Do something! They’re attacking
us!”
Mom ran for the broom. But before Dad could swing into action, Fergie and
I had dragged the imposters through the kitchen.
I caught a glimpse of Mickey as I tugged. He was hiding in the corner,
shaking all over.
Too bad I didn’t have time to enjoy that picture.
We were out the door now. Everything was working perfectly. Fergie and I
would be back to normal in no time.
The phonies knew where we were taking them. But there was nothing they
could do about it. Fergie and I were too strong, too ferocious.
“Dad! Help!” the fake Cooper cried again.
“Don’t worry!” Dad called out to him. “The dogs don’t seem to want to hurt
you! I think they want us to follow them!”
Way to go, Dad!
A short while later, I spotted the clearing where the old shack stood. It
won’t be long now, I thought happily. In a few minutes, Fergie and I will walk
home with my parents. On two legs. No more fleas. No more food from garbage
pails. I couldn’t wait!
We panted wildly as the struggling imposters attempted to break free. But
Fergie and I held on to them for dear life, tugging them, tugging with all our
canine strength.
And, then, finally, we were there. The old shack. We pushed the phonies up
against the door.
I released the fake Cooper from my grip for a second. I had no choice. I had
to scratch a flea.
The phony tried to make a run for it.
“Cooper! He’s getting away!” Fergie barked.
“No way!” I barked back. I bounded off after him and clamped my jaws
down on the hem of his shirt. Then I dragged him back to the shack.
The fake Fergie screamed with all her might. “No! No! Not in there again!”
I glared up at her.
“Hold on, Margaret,” I heard Mom call. “Don’t be afraid. Let’s see what the
dogs are trying to show us.”
It was time. Time to make the switch.
“Now!” I yelped.
Fergie and I jumped on the imposters and sent them tumbling into the
shack. Then we leaped in after them.
All four of us fell down, down, down. Down into the solid blackness.
Once again, I felt dizzy and warm.
Warmer. Warmer. As if the warm blanket were being pulled over me.
I could feel myself changing. Changing in the darkness, in the sweltering
heat.
I gazed above my head. A glowing shadow hovered over me. A shadow
with tiny red eyes.
My body shuddered. I began to shake.
And all at once I knew. Something wasn’t right.
“Fergie!” I cried out in a harsh whisper. “It’s not working! Something is
wrong! Something is very wrong!”
31
“Cooper!” my mom cried happily, running toward the shack with outstretched
arms. “Are you okay?”
“Margaret, what happened in there?” Dad called. “What happened to the
dogs?”
“We’re okay,” Margaret muttered. “It’s just an empty shack. That’s all.”
“I’m going to call the pound again as soon as we get home,” Mom
announced. “Those dogs shouldn’t be allowed to roam free. They’re dangerous!”
“Let’s just get out of here, okay, Dad?” Cooper said.
Fergie nodded in agreement. “We’re okay, Let’s go home.”
“What an adventure!” Mom sighed.
“At least it isn’t boring up here in our new home,” Dad added.
“For sure,” Cooper agreed.
* * *
“What happened?” I asked, rubbing my eyes.
I watched my parents walking away from the shack, their arms around two
kids.
“Hey! Those kids!” I cried. “They’re not us!”
The door to the shack opened, and two black Labs stumbled out in a daze.
Their eyes met, then they bolted away, barking frantically.
What’s their problem? I wondered.
I watched the dogs disappear into the trees.
What’s going on? I asked myself, totally confused.
I’m not a kid—and I’m not a dog, either!
“Hey, Fergie? Fergie?”
Where was she?
When she popped up next to me, we both gasped.
“Oh, no! Please—no! No! No! Noooo!” she wailed.
Her head cocked to one side, and her little brown nose twitched furiously.
“Tell me we’re not!” I begged her. “Please, Fergie—tell me we’re not…”
“We are!” Fergie squeaked. “We… we’re chipmunks!”
We both squeaked and chittered our surprise.
Fergie gazed down at her furry little body. “How did this happen, Cooper?
How did this happen?”
“The woods are filled with chipmunks,” I sighed. “Two of them must have
wandered into the Changing Room. And we—”
“We switched with the chipmunks—not the kids!” Fergie cried. Her bushy
tail thumped furiously on the ground.
I examined my tiny black paws. I moved my teeny little fingers. I twitched
my button nose.
Cute. I was so cute!
“Now what?” Fergie wailed. “What do we do now?”
“Uh… hunt for acorns?” I suggested.
Fergie’s beady little eyes squinted into mine. “Excuse me?”
“Let’s hunt for acorns!” I said. “I’m starving!”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

THE HORROR AT
CAMP JELLYJAM
Goosebumps - 33
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
Mom pointed excitedly out the car window. “Look! A cow!”
My brother, Elliot, and I both groaned. We had been driving through
farmland for four hours, and Mom had pointed out every single cow and horse.
“Look out your side, Wendy!” Mom cried from the front seat. “Sheep!”
I stared out the window and saw about a dozen gray sheep—fat, woolly
ones—grazing on a grassy green hill. “Nice sheep, Mom,” I said, rolling my
eyes.
“There’s a cow!” Elliot exclaimed.
Now he was doing it!
I reached across the backseat and gave him a hard shove. “Mom, is it
possible to explode from boredom?” I moaned.
“BOOOOOOM!” Elliot shouted. The kid is a riot, isn’t he?
“I told you,” Dad muttered to Mom. “A twelve-year-old is too old to go on
a long car trip.”
“So is an eleven-year-old!” Elliot protested.
I’m twelve. Elliot is eleven.
“How can you two be bored?” Mom asked. “Look—horses!”
Dad sped up to pass a huge yellow truck. The road curved through high,
sloping hills. In the far distance, I could see gray mountains, rising up in a heavy
mist.
“There’s so much beautiful scenery to admire,” Mom gushed.
“After a while, it all looks like some boring old calendar,” I complained.
Elliot pointed out of his window. “Look! No horses!”
He doubled over, laughing. He thought that was the funniest thing anyone
had ever said. Elliot really cracks himself up.
Mom turned in the front seat. She narrowed her eyes at my brother. “Are
you making fun of me?” she demanded.
“Yes!” Elliot replied.
“Of course not,” I chimed in. “Who would ever make fun of you, Mom?”
“When do you ever stop?” Mom complained.
“We’re leaving Idaho,” Dad announced. “That’s Wyoming up ahead. We’ll
be up in those mountains soon.”
“Maybe we’ll see Mountain Cows!” I exclaimed sarcastically.
Elliot laughed.
Mom sighed. “Go ahead. Ruin our first family vacation in three years.”
We hit a bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us. Dad had hooked one of
those big, old-fashioned trailers to the back of our car. We had dragged it all over
the West.
The trailer was actually kind of fun. It had four narrow beds built into the
sides. And it had a table we could sit around to eat or play cards. It even had a
small kitchen.
At night, we’d pull into a trailer camp. Dad would hook the trailer up to
water and electricity. And we spent the night inside, in our own private little
house.
We hit another bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us again. The car
lurched forward as we started to climb into the mountains.
“Mom, how do I know if I’m getting carsick or not?” Elliot asked.
Mom turned back to us, frowning. “Elliot, you never get carsick,” she said
in a low voice. “Did you forget?”
“Oh. Right,” Elliot replied. “I just thought it might be something to do.”
“Elliot!” Mom screamed. “If you’re so bored, take a nap!”
“That’s boring,” my brother muttered.
I could see Mom’s face turning an angry red. Mom doesn’t look like Dad,
Elliot, and me. She is blond and has blue eyes and very fair skin, which turns red
very easily. And she’s kind of plump.
My dad, brother, and I are skinny and sort of dark. The three of us have
brown hair and brown eyes.
“You kids don’t know how lucky you are,” Dad said. “You’re getting to see
some amazing sights.”
“Bobby Harrison got to go to baseball camp,” Elliot grumbled. “And Jay
Thurman went to sleepaway camp for eight weeks!”
“I wanted to go to sleepaway camp, too!” I protested.
“You’ll go to camp next summer,” Mom replied sharply. “This is the chance
of a lifetime!”
“But the chance of a lifetime is so boring!” Elliot complained.
“Wendy, entertain your brother,” Dad ordered.
“Excuse me?” I cried. “How am I supposed to entertain him?”
“Play Car Geography,” Mom suggested.
“Oh, no! Not again!” Elliot wailed.
“Go ahead. I’ll start,” Mom said. “Atlanta.”
Atlanta ends with an A. So I had to think of a city that starts with an A.
“Albany,” I said. “Your turn, Elliot.”
“Hmmmmm. A city that starts with a Y…” My brother thought for a
moment. Then he twisted up his face. “I quit!”
My brother is such a bad sport. He takes games too seriously, and he really
hates to lose. Sometimes he gets so intense when he’s playing soccer or softball,
I really worry about him.
Sometimes when he thinks he can’t win, he just quits. Like now.
“What about Youngstown?” Mom asked.
“What about it?” Elliot grumbled.
“I have an idea!” I said. “How about letting Elliot and me ride in the trailer
for a while?”
“Yeah! Cool!” Elliot cried.
“I don’t think so,” Mom replied. She turned to Dad. “It’s against the law to
ride in a trailer, isn’t it?”
“I don’t know,” Dad said, slowing the car. We were climbing through thick
pine woods now. The air smelled so fresh and sweet.
“Let us!” Elliot pleaded. “Come on—let us!”
“I don’t see any harm in letting them ride back there for a while,” Dad told
Mom. “As long as they’re careful.”
“We’ll be careful!” Elliot promised.
“Are you sure it’s safe?” Mom asked Dad.
Dad nodded. “What could happen?”
He pulled the car to the side of the highway. Elliot and I slid out. We ran to
the trailer, pulled open the door, and hurried inside.
A few seconds later, the car pulled back onto the highway. We bounced
along behind it in the big trailer.
“This is so cool!” Elliot declared, making his way to the back window.
“Do I have good ideas or what?” I asked, following him. He slapped me a
high five.
We stared out the back window. The highway seemed to tilt down as we
headed up to the mountains.
The trailer bounced and swayed as the car tugged it.
The road tilted up steeper. And steeper.
And that’s when all our troubles began.
2
“I win!” Elliot cried. He jumped up and raised both fists in triumph.
“Three out of five!” I demanded, rubbing my wrist. “Come on—three out of
five. Unless you’re chicken.”
I knew that would get him. Elliot can’t stand to be called a chicken. He
settled back in the seat.
We leaned over the narrow table and clasped hands. We had been arm
wrestling for about ten minutes. It was kind of fun because the table bounced
every time the trailer rolled over a bump in the road.
I am as strong as Elliot. But he’s more determined. A lot more determined.
You never saw anyone groan and sweat and strain so much in arm wrestling!
To me, a game is just a game. But to Elliot, every game is life or death.
He had won two out of three about five times.
My wrist was sore, and my hand ached. But I really wanted to beat him in
this final match.
I leaned over the table and squeezed his hand harder. I gritted my teeth and
stared menacingly into his dark brown eyes.
“Go!” he cried.
We both strained against each other. I pushed hard. Elliot’s hand started to
bend back.
I pushed harder. I nearly had him. Just a little harder.
He let out a groan and pushed back. He shut his eyes. His face turned beetred. I could see the veins push out at the sides of his neck.
My brother just can’t stand to lose.
SLAM!
The back of my hand hit the table hard.
Elliot had won again.
Actually, I let him win. I didn’t want to see his whole head explode because
of a stupid arm-wrestling match.
He jumped up and pumped his fists, cheering for himself.
“Hey—!” he cried out as the trailer swayed hard, and he went crashing into
the wall.
The trailer lurched again. I grabbed the table to keep from falling off my
seat. “What’s going on?”
“We changed direction. We’re heading down now,” Elliot replied. He edged
his way back toward the table.
But we bumped hard, and he toppled to the floor. “Hey—we’re going
backwards!”
“I’ll bet Mom’s driving,” I said, holding on to the table edge with both
hands.
Mom always drives like a crazy person. When you warn her that she’s
going eighty, she always says, “That can’t be right. It feels as if I’m going thirtyfive!”
The trailer was bouncing and bumping, rolling downhill. Elliot and I were
bouncing and bumping with the trailer.
“What is their problem?” Elliot cried, grabbing on to one of the beds,
struggling to keep his balance. “Are they backing up? Why are we going
backwards?”
The trailer roared downhill. I pushed myself up from the table and stumbled
to the front to see the car. Shoving aside the red plaid curtain, I peered out
through the small window.
“Uh… Elliot…” I choked out. “We’ve got a problem.”
“Huh? A problem?” he replied, bouncing harder as the trailer picked up
speed.
“Mom and Dad aren’t pulling us anymore,” I told him. “The car is gone.”
3
Elliot’s face filled with confusion. He didn’t understand me. Or maybe he didn’t
believe me!
“The trailer has come loose!” I screamed, staring out the bouncing window.
“We’re rolling downhill—on our own!”
“N-n-n-no!” Elliot chattered. He wasn’t stuttering. He was bouncing so
hard, he could barely speak. His sneakers hopped so hard on the trailer floor, he
seemed to be tap dancing.
“OW!” I let out a pained shriek as my head bounced against the ceiling.
Elliot and I stumbled to the back. Gripping the windowsill tightly, I struggled to
see where we were heading.
The road curved steeply downhill, through thick pine woods on both sides.
The trees were a bouncing blur of greens and browns as we hurtled past.
Picking up speed. Bouncing and tumbling.
Faster.
Faster.
The tires roared beneath us. The trailer tilted and dipped.
I fell to the floor. Landed hard on my knees. Reached to pull myself up. But
the trailer swayed, and I went sprawling on my back.
Pulling myself to my knees, I saw Elliot bouncing around on the floor like a
soccer ball. I threw myself at the back of the trailer and peered out the window.
The trailer bumped hard. The road curved sharply—but we didn’t curve
with it!
We shot off the side of the road. Swerved into the trees.
“Elliot!” I shrieked. “We’re going to crash!”
4
The trailer jolted hard. I heard a cracking sound.
It’s going to break in half! I thought.
I pressed both hands against the front and stared out the window. Dark trees
flew past.
A hard bump sent me sprawling to the floor.
I heard Elliot calling my name. “Wendy! Wendy! Wendy!”
I shut my eyes and tensed every muscle. And waited for the crash.
Waited…
Waited…
Silence.
I opened my eyes. It took me a few seconds to realize that we were no
longer moving. I took a deep breath and climbed to my feet.
“Wendy?” I heard Elliot’s weak cry from the back of the trailer.
My legs were trembling as I turned around. My whole body felt weird. As if
we were still bouncing. “Elliot—are you okay?”
He had been thrown into one of the bottom bunks. “Yeah. I guess,” he
replied. He lowered his feet to the floor and shook his head. “I’m kind of dizzy.”
“Me, too,” I confessed. “What a ride!”
“Better than Space Mountain!” Elliot exclaimed. He climbed to his feet.
“Let’s get out of this thing!”
We both started to the door at the front. It was an uphill climb. The trailer
tilted up.
I reached the door first. I grabbed the handle.
A loud knock on the door made me jump back. “Hey… !” I cried.
Three more knocks.
“It’s Mom and Dad!” Elliot cried. “They found us! Open it up! Hurry!”
He didn’t have to tell me to hurry. My heart skipped. I was so glad to see
them!
I turned the handle, pushed open the trailer door—
—and gasped.
5
I stared into the face of a blond-haired man. His blue eyes sparkled in the bright
sunlight.
He was dressed all in white. He wore a crisp white T-shirt tucked into
baggy white shorts. A small round button pinned to his T-shirt read ONLY THE
BEST in bold black letters.
“Uh… hi,” I finally managed to choke out.
He flashed me a gleaming smile. He seemed to have about two thousand
teeth. “Hey, guys—everyone okay in there?” he asked. His blue eyes sparkled
even brighter.
“Yeah. We’re okay,” I told him. “A little shaken up, but—”
“Who are you?” Elliot cried, poking his head out the door.
The guy’s smile didn’t fade. “My name is Buddy.”
“I’m Wendy. He’s Elliot. We thought you were our parents,” I explained. I
hopped down to the ground.
Elliot followed me. “Where are Mom and Dad?” he asked, frowning.
“I haven’t seen anyone, guy,” Buddy told him. He studied the trailer. “What
happened here? You came unhitched?”
I nodded, brushing my dark hair off my face. “Yeah. On the steep hills, I
guess.”
“Dangerous,” Buddy muttered. “You must have been really scared.”
“Not me!” Elliot declared.
What a kid. First, he’s shaking in terror and calling out my name over and
over. Now he’s Mister Macho.
“I’ve never been so scared in all my life!” I admitted.
I took a few steps away from the trailer and searched the woods. The trees
creaked and swayed in a light breeze. The sun beamed down brightly. I shielded
my eyes with one hand as I peered around.
No sign of Mom and Dad. I couldn’t see the highway through the thick
trees.
I could see the tire tracks our trailer had made through the soft dirt.
Somehow we had shot through a clear path between the trees. The trailer had
come to rest at the foot of a sharp, sloping hill.
“Wow. We were lucky,” I muttered.
“You’re very lucky,” Buddy declared cheerfully. He stepped up beside me,
placed his hands on my shoulders, and turned me around. “Check it out. Look
where you guys landed!”
Gazing up the hill, I saw a wide clearing between the trees. And then I saw
a huge, red-and-white banner, stretched high on two poles. I had to squint to read
the words on the banner.
Elliot read them aloud: “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp.”
“The, camp is on the other side of the hill,” Buddy told us, flashing us both
a friendly smile. “Come on! Follow me!”
“But—but—” my brother sputtered. “We have to find our parents!”
“Hey—no problem, guy. You can wait for them at the camp,” Buddy
assured him.
“But how will they know where to find us?” I protested. “Should we leave a
note?”
Buddy flashed me another dazzling smile. “No. I’ll take care of it,” he told
me. “No problem.”
He stepped past the trailer and started up the hill. His white T-shirt and
white shorts gleamed in the sunlight. I saw that his socks and high-tops were
sparkling white, too.
That’s his uniform. He must work at the camp, I decided.
Buddy turned back. “You guys coming?” He motioned with both hands.
“Come on. You’re going to like it!”
Elliot and I hurried to catch up to him. My legs trembled as I ran. I could
still feel the trailer floor bouncing and jolting beneath me. I wondered if I would
ever feel normal again.
As we made our way up the grassy hill, the red-and-white banner came into
clearer view. “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp,” I read the words aloud.
A funny, purple cartoon character had been drawn beside the words on the
banner. He looked like a blob of grape bubble gum. He had a big smile on his
face. He wore a gold crown on his head.
“Who’s that?” I asked Buddy.
Buddy glanced up at the banner. “That’s King Jellyjam,” he replied. “He’s
our little mascot.”
“Weird-looking mascot for a sports camp,” I declared, staring up at the
purple, blobby king.
Buddy didn’t reply.
“Do you work at the camp?” Elliot asked.
Buddy nodded. “It’s a great place to work. I’m the head counselor, guys. So
—welcome!”
“But we can’t go to your camp,” I protested. “We have to find our parents.
We have to…”
Buddy put a hand on my shoulder and a hand on Elliot’s shoulder. He
guided us up the hill. “You guys have had a close call. You might as well stay
and have some fun. Enjoy the camp. Until I can hook up with your parents.”
As we neared the top of the hill, I heard voices. Kids’ voices. Shouting and
laughing.
The clearing narrowed. Tall pine trees, birch trees, and maples clustered
over the hill.
“What kind of sports camp is it?” Elliot asked Buddy.
“We play all kinds of sports,” Buddy replied. “From Ping-Pong to football.
From croquet to soccer. We have swimming. We have tennis. We have archery.
We even have a marbles tournament!”
“Sounds like a cool place!” my brother declared, grinning at me.
“Only the best!” Buddy said, slapping Elliot on the shoulder.
I reached the top of the hill first and peered down through the trees to the
camp. It seemed to stretch for miles!
I could see two long, white, two-story buildings on either side. Between
them, I saw several playing fields, a baseball diamond, a long row of tennis
courts, and two enormous swimming pools.
“Those long, white buildings are the dorms,” Buddy explained, pointing.
“That’s the girls’ dorm, and that’s the boys’. You guys can stay in them while
you’re here.”
“Wow! It looks awesome!” Elliot exclaimed. “Two swimming pools!”
“Olympic size,” Buddy told him. “We have diving competitions, too. Are
you into diving?”
“Only inside the trailer!” I joked.
“Wendy is into swimming,” Elliot told Buddy.
“I think there’s a four-lap swim race this afternoon,” Buddy told me. “I’ll
check the schedule for you.”
The sun beamed on us as we followed the path down the hill. The back of
my neck started to prickle. A cool swim sounded pretty good to me.
“Can anyone sign up for baseball?” Elliot asked Buddy. “I mean, do you
have to be on a team or something?”
“You can play any sport you want,” Buddy told him. “The only rule at King
Jellyjam’s Sports Camp is to try hard.” Buddy tapped the button on his T-shirt.
“Only The Best,” he said.
The breeze blew my hair back over my face. I knew I should have had it cut
before vacation! I decided I’d have to find something to tie it back with as soon
as I got into the dorm.
A soccer match was under way on the nearest field. Whistles blew. Kids
shouted. I saw a long row of archery targets at the far end of the soccer field.
Buddy started jogging toward the field. Elliot stepped up beside me. “Hey
—we wanted to go to camp, right?” he said, grinning. “Well? We made it!”
Before I could reply, he trotted after Buddy.
I brushed back my hair one more time, then followed. But I stopped when I
saw a little girl poke her head out from behind a wide tree trunk.
She appeared to be about six or seven. She had bright red hair and a face
full of freckles. She wore a pale blue T-shirt pulled down over black tights.
“Hey—” she called in a loud whisper. “Hey—!”
I turned toward her, startled.
“Don’t come in!” she called. “Run away! Don’t come in!”
6
Buddy turned back quickly. “What’s the problem, Wendy?” he called.
When I returned my eyes to the tree, the red-haired girl had vanished. I
blinked a couple of times. No trace of her.
What was that girl doing out here? I wondered. Did she hide behind that
tree just to scare people?
“Uh… no problem,” I called to Buddy. I followed Elliot and the counselor
into the camp.
I quickly forgot all about the girl as we made our way around the soccer
field and past a long row of fenced-in tennis courts. The thwack of tennis balls
followed us as we turned on to the main path that led through the camp.
So many sports! So much activity!
We pushed our way through kids of all ages, eagerly hurrying to the
swimming pools, to the baseball diamond, to the bowling lanes!
“Awesome!” Elliot kept repeating. “Totally awesome!”
And for once, he was right.
We passed several other camp counselors. They were all young men and
women, dressed completely in white, all of them good-looking and smiling
cheerfully.
And we passed dozens of little triangular signs showing the purple, blobby
face of King Jellyjam, smiling out from under his shiny gold crown. Under each
face was the camp slogan: Only The Best.
He’s kind of cute, I decided. I realized I was starting to like everything
about this amazing sports camp.
And I have to confess I found myself secretly hoping that Mom and Dad
wouldn’t be able to find Elliot and me for at least a day or two.
Isn’t that terrible?
I felt really guilty about it. But I couldn’t help thinking it. This camp was
just too exciting. Especially after days of riding in the backseat of the car, staring
out at cows!
We dropped my brother off at the boys’ dorm first. Another counselor, a
tall, dark-haired guy named Scooter, greeted Elliot and took my brother off to
find a dorm room.
Then Buddy led me to the girls’ dorm on the other side of the camp. We
passed a gymnastics competition being held in an outdoor arena. Beyond that,
one of the swimming pools was jammed with kids watching a diving contest off
the high board.
Buddy and I chatted as we walked. I told him about my school and about
how my favorite sports are swimming and biking.
We stopped at the white double-door entrance to the dorm. “Where are you
from?” I asked him.
Buddy stared back at me. He had such a confused expression on his face.
For a moment, I thought he didn’t understand the question.
“Do you come from around here?” I asked.
He swallowed hard. He squinted his blue eyes. “Weird…” he muttered
finally.
“What’s weird?” I demanded.
“I… I don’t remember,” he stammered. “I don’t remember where I’m from.
Is that weird or what?” He raised his right hand to his mouth and nibbled his
pointer finger.
“Hey, I forget stuff all the time,” I told him, seeing how upset he was.
I didn’t get a chance to say anything else. A young woman counselor with
very short, straight black hair and bright purple-lipsticked lips came trotting up
to us. “Hello. I’m Holly. Are you ready for some sports?”
“I guess,” I replied uncertainly.
“This is Wendy,” Buddy told her, his expression still troubled. “She needs a
room.”
“No problem!” Holly declared cheerfully. “Only The Best!”
“Only The Best,” Buddy repeated quietly. He flashed me a smile. But I
could see he was still struggling to remember where his home was. Weird, huh?
Holly led the way into the dorm. I followed her down a long, white-tiled
hall. Several girls came running past, on their way to different sports. They were
all shouting and laughing excitedly.
I peeked into some of the open rooms as we passed by them. Wow! I
thought. This place is so modern and luxurious! It’s not exactly your basic, rustic
summer camp.
“We don’t stay in the rooms much at all,” Holly told me. “Everyone is
always outdoors, competing.”
She pushed open a white door and motioned for me to step in. Bright
sunlight flooded the room from a wide window on the opposite wall.
I saw two bright blue bunk beds against each wall. A sleek white dresser
between them. Two white leather armchairs.
The walls were white. They were bare except for a small, framed drawing
of King Jellyjam above the dresser.
“Nice room!” I exclaimed, squinting against the bright sunlight.
Holly smiled. Her bright purple lips made the rest of her features seem to
disappear. “Glad you like it, Wendy. You can take that bottom bunk over there.”
She pointed. She had purple fingernails that matched her lipstick.
“Do I have roommates?” I asked.
Holly nodded. “You’ll meet them soon. They’ll get you started with some
activities. I think they’re playing soccer on the lower field. I’m not sure.”
She started out of the room, but turned at the doorway. “You’ll like Dierdre.
I think she’s about your age.”
“Thanks,” I said, gazing around the room.
“Catch you later,” Holly replied. She vanished into the hall.
I stood in the center of the sunlit room, thinking hard. What am I supposed
to do for clothes? I wondered. What about swimsuits? Sweats?
All I had were the denim short-shorts and pink-and-blue-striped T-shirt I
was wearing.
And why didn’t Holly tell me where to go next? I asked myself. Why did
she just leave me by myself in this empty room?
I didn’t have long to ask myself questions.
I started to cross to the window when I heard voices. Whispered voices
outside the door.
I turned to the door. Were my roommates returning?
I listened to the excited buzz of whispers.
Then I heard a girl loudly instruct the others. “Come on. We’ve got her
trapped in there. Let’s get her!”
7
I gasped and searched frantically for a place to hide.
No time.
Three girls burst into the room, their eyes narrowed, their mouths twisted
into menacing sneers. They formed a line and moved toward me quickly.
“Whoa! Wait!” I cried. I raised both hands as if to shield myself from their
attack.
The tall girl with streaky blond hair was the first to laugh. Then the other
two joined in.
“Gotcha,” the blond girl declared, tossing back her long hair triumphantly.
I glared back at her, my mouth hanging open.
“Did you really think we were going to attack?” one of the others asked.
She was thin and wiry, with very short black hair cut into bangs. She wore gray
sweats and a torn gray T-shirt.
“Well…” I started. I could feel my face growing hot. Their little joke had
really fooled me. I felt like a total jerk.
“Don’t look at me,” the third girl said, shaking her head. She had frizzy
blond hair tumbling out from beneath a blue and red Chicago Cubs cap. “It was
all Dierdre’s idea.” She pointed to the girl with streaky blond hair.
“Don’t feel bad,” Dierdre told me, grinning. Her green eyes flashed.
“You’re the third girl this week.”
The other two snickered.
“And did the others think you were attacking?” I asked.
Dierdre nodded, very pleased with herself. “It’s kind of a mean joke,” she
admitted. “But it’s funny.”
This time I joined in the laughter.
“I have a younger brother. I’m used to dumb jokes,” I told Dierdre.
She swept back her hair again. Rummaged around on the dresser top. Found
a hair scrunchy to hold it back. “This is Jan and this is Ivy,” she said, motioning
to the other girls.
Jan was the one with the short black bangs. She slumped on to a lower
bunk. “I’m whipped,” she sighed. “What a workout. Look at me. I’m sweating
like a pig.”
“Ever hear of deodorant?” Ivy cracked.
Jan stuck out her tongue at Ivy in reply.
“Get changed,” Dierdre instructed them both. “We’ve only got ten
minutes.”
“Ten minutes till what?” Jan demanded, bending down and rubbing her calf
muscles.
“Did you forget the four-lap race?” Dierdre replied.
“Oh, wow!” Jan cried, jumping up. “I did forget.” She hurried to the
dresser. “Where’s my swimsuit?”
Ivy followed her. They began frantically sifting through the drawers.
Dierdre turned to me. “Do you want to enter the race?” she asked.
“I—I don’t have a swimsuit,” I replied.
She shrugged. “No problem. I have about a dozen.” She studied me. “We’re
about the same size. I’m just a little taller.”
“Well, I’d love a swim,” I told her. “Maybe I’ll just go to the pool and
splash around for a while.”
“Huh? Not compete?” Dierdre cried.
All three girls turned to me, stunned expressions on their faces.
“I’ll do some sports later,” I said. “Right now, I just want to dive in and
swim a little. You know. Cool off.”
“But—you can’t!” Jan cried. She gaped at me as if I had suddenly grown a
second head.
“No way,” Ivy said, shaking her head.
“You have to compete,” Dierdre added. “You can’t just swim.”
“Only The Best,” Ivy recited.
“Right. Only The Best,” Jan agreed.
I felt totally confused. “What do you mean?” I demanded. “Why do you
keep saying that?”
Dierdre tossed me a blue swimsuit. “Put it on. We’re going to be late.”
“But… but—” I sputtered.
The three girls hurried to get into their swimsuits.
I saw that I had no choice. I went into the bathroom and started to change.
But my questions repeated in my mind. I really wanted them answered.
Why did I have to compete in the race? Why couldn’t I just have a swim?
And why did everyone keep repeating “Only The Best”?
What did they mean?
8
The enormous blue pool sparkled under the bright sunlight. The sun hovered
high overhead. The concrete burned the soles of my bare feet. I couldn’t wait to
get into the water.
Shielding my eyes with one hand, I searched for Elliot. But I couldn’t find
him in the crowd of kids who were waiting to watch the race.
Elliot has probably already played three sports, I told myself. This had to be
the perfect camp for my brother!
I gazed down the line of girls waiting to compete in the four-lap race. We
all stood on the edge of the deep end of the pool, waiting to jump in.
I silently counted. There were at least two dozen girls in this race. And the
pool was wide enough for all of us to have a lane to swim in.
“Hey, you look terrific in my suit,” Dierdre said. Her green eyes studied me.
“You should have tied your hair back, Wendy. It’s going to slow you down.”
Wow, I thought. Dierdre really cares about winning.
“Are you a good swimmer?” I asked her.
She swatted a fly on the back of her calf. “The best,” she replied, grinning.
“How about you?”
“I’ve never really raced,” I told her.
The pool counselors were all young women. They wore white two-piece
swimsuits. Across the pool, I saw Holly sitting on the edge of the diving board,
talking to another counselor.
A tall, red-haired counselor moved to the edge of the pool and blew her
whistle. “Everyone ready?” she called.
We all shouted back that we were ready. Then the long line of girls grew
silent. We turned to the pool, leaned forward, and prepared to dive in.
The water shimmered beneath me. The sun burned down on my back and
shoulders. I felt about to melt. I couldn’t wait to jump in.
The whistle blew. I sprang forward and hit the water hard.
I gasped from the shock of the cold against my hot skin. My arms churned
hard as I pulled myself forward.
The splash of thrashing arms and kicking feet sounded like the roar of a
waterfall. I dipped my face into the water, feeling the refreshing coldness.
Turning my head, I glimpsed Dierdre a few lengths behind me. She swam
in a steady rhythm, her arms and legs moving smoothly, gracefully.
I’m ahead of everyone, I realized, glancing across the pool. I’m winning the
race!
With a hard kick, I reached the other end of the pool. I made a sharp turn
and pushed off. As I started back to the deep end, the other girls were still
approaching the shallow end wall.
I pulled myself harder. My heart started to pound.
I knew I’d win the first lap easily. Then there were three laps to go.
Three laps…
I suddenly realized how dumb I was. The other girls were pacing
themselves. They weren’t swimming full speed because they knew it was a fourlap race.
If I kept swimming this hard, I wouldn’t survive two laps!
I sucked in a deep breath, then let it out slowly.
Slowly… slowly…
That was the word of the day.
I slowed my kicking. Shot my arms out and pulled them back slowly. Took
long breaths. Long, slow breaths.
As I made my turn and started the second lap, several other swimmers had
moved beside me. I caught Dierdre’s eye as she swam past.
She never broke her steady rhythm. Stroke. Stroke. Breath. Stroke.
On the other side of Dierdre, I saw Jan swimming comfortably, easily. Jan
was so small and light. She seemed to float over the water.
Into the third lap. I kept a few lengths behind Dierdre. I had to concentrate
on keeping a slow, even pace. I pretended I was a robot, programmed to swim
slowly.
Dierdre turned into the fourth lap a few seconds ahead of me. I saw her
expression change as she made her turn. She narrowed her eyes. Her entire face
grew tight and tense.
Dierdre really wants to win, I saw.
I wondered if I could catch her. I wondered if I could beat her.
I made my turn and put on the speed.
I ignored the aching in my arms.
I ignored the cramp in my left foot.
I thrust myself forward, kicking hard from the waist. My hands cut through
the water.
Faster.
I glimpsed Jan fall behind. I saw the disappointment on her face as I passed
by.
Pounding, thrusting arms and legs churned the water to froth. The splashing
became a roar. The roar nearly drowned out the cheers of the kids watching from
around the pool.
My heart thudded so hard, I thought my chest might explode.
My arms ached. They felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds.
Faster…
I pulled up beside Dierdre. Close. So close, I could hear her gasping
breaths.
I glimpsed her face, tight with concentration.
She’s just like Elliot, I decided. She wants to win so badly.
Lots of times I let Elliot win a game. Because he cared about it so much
more than I did. And so did Dierdre.
As we neared the wall at the deep end, I let Dierdre pull ahead.
I saw how much it meant to her. I saw how desperate she was to finish first.
What the heck, I thought. There’s nothing wrong with coming in second.
I heard the cheers ring out as Dierdre won the race.
I touched the wall, then dipped below the surface. I pulled myself up and
grabbed the wall.
My entire body ached and throbbed. I gasped in breath after breath. I shut
my eyes and pulled my hair back with both hands, squeezing the water out of it.
My arms were so tired, I could barely pull myself out of the pool. I was one
of the last swimmers out.
The others had all formed a circle around Dierdre. I pushed my way into the
crowd of girls to see what was happening.
My eyes burned. I brushed water out of them.
I saw the red-haired counselor hand something to Dierdre. Something gold
and shiny.
Everyone cheered. Then the circle broke, and the girls all headed in
different directions.
I made my way up to Dierdre. “Way to go!” I exclaimed. “I came close. But
you’re really fast.”
“I’m on the swim team at school,” she replied. She held up the gold object
the counselor had given her.
I could see it clearly now. A shiny gold coin. It had a smiling King Jellyjam
engraved on it. I couldn’t read the words around the edge of the coin. But I could
guess what they were.
“It’s my fifth King Coin!” Dierdre declared proudly.
Why is she so excited about it? I wondered. It wasn’t a real coin. It
probably wasn’t even real gold!
“What’s a King Coin?” I asked. The coin gleamed in the sunlight.
“If I win one more King Coin, I can walk in the Winners Walk,” Dierdre
explained.
I started to ask what the Winners Walk was. But Jan and Ivy came running
up to congratulate Dierdre. And the three of them all started talking at once.
I suddenly remembered my brother. Where is Elliot? I wondered. What has
he been doing?
I turned away from Dierdre and the other girls and started toward the pool
exit. But I had only taken a few steps when I heard someone calling my name.
I spun around to see Holly jogging toward me. Her purple-lipsticked lips
were knotted in a fretful expression. “Wendy, you’d better come with me,” the
counselor told me.
My heart skipped. “Huh? What’s wrong?” I asked.
“I’m afraid there’s a problem,” Holly said softly.
9
Something happened to Mom and Dad!
That’s the first thought that burst into my head.
“What’s wrong?” I cried. “My parents! Are they okay? Are they—”
“We haven’t found your parents yet,” Holly said. She wrapped a towel
around my trembling shoulders. Then she led me to a bench at the side of the
pool.
“Is it Elliot?” I cried, dropping down beside her. “What is wrong?”
Holly kept one arm around my shoulders. She leaned close. Her brown eyes
stared into mine.
“Wendy, the problem is that you didn’t really try very hard to win the race,”
she said.
I swallowed hard. “Excuse me?”
“I watched you,” Holly continued. “I saw you slow your strokes in the last
lap. I don’t think you tried your best to win.”
“But—but—I—” I sputtered.
Holly continued to stare at me without blinking. “Am I right?” she
demanded softly.
“I—I’m not used to swimming that far,” I stammered. “It was my first race.
I didn’t think—”
“I know you’re new at camp,” Holly said, brushing a fly off my leg. “But
you know the camp slogan, right?”
“For sure,” I replied. “It’s everywhere I look! But what does it mean? ‘Only
The Best!’”
“I guess it’s kind of a warning,” Holly replied thoughtfully. “That’s why I
decided to talk to you now, Wendy.”
“A warning?” I cried. I felt more confused than ever. “A warning about
what?”
Holly didn’t reply. She forced a smile to her face and stood up. “Catch you
later, okay?”
She turned and hurried away.
I wrapped the towel tighter around my shoulders and started back to the dorm to
change. As I walked past the tennis courts, I thought hard about Holly’s warning.
Why was it so important for me to win the race?
So that I could be awarded, one of those gold coins with the blobby purple
king on it?
Why should I care about winning coins? Why couldn’t I just play some
games, make new friends, and have fun?
Why did Holly say she was giving me a warning? A warning about what?
I shook my head, trying to shake away all these puzzling questions. I’d
heard about sports camps from some of my friends back home. Some camps,
they said, were really tough. The kids were all serious jock types who wanted to
win, win, win.
I guessed this was one of those camps.
Oh, well, I thought, sighing. I don’t have to love this camp. Mom and Dad
will be here soon to take Elliot and me away.
I glanced up—and saw Elliot.
Sprawled face down on the ground. His arms and legs spread out
awkwardly. His eyes closed.
Unconscious.
10
“Ooooh!” I let out a frightened wail.
“Elliot! Elliot!” I dropped down beside him.
He sat up and grinned at me. “How many times are you going to fall for
that?” he asked. He started to laugh.
I slugged him in the shoulder as hard as I could. “You creep!”
That made him laugh even harder. It really cracks him up when he makes
me look like a jerk.
Why do I always fall for the stupid joke? Elliot pulls it on me all the time.
And I always believe he’s been knocked out cold.
“I’m never falling for that again. Never!” I cried.
Elliot pulled himself to his feet. “Come watch me play Ping-Pong,” he said,
tugging my hand. “I’m in the tournament. I’m beating this kid Jeff. He thinks
he’s good because he puts a spin on his serve. But he’s pitiful.”
“I can’t,” I replied. I pulled out of his grasp. “I’m dripping wet. I have to
change.”
“Come watch,” he insisted. “It won’t take long. I’ll beat him really fast,
okay?”
“Elliot—” He certainly was excited.
“If I beat Jeff, I win a King Coin,” he announced. “Then I’m going to win
five more. I want to win six so I can walk in the Winners Walk before Mom and
Dad come for us.”
“Good luck,” I mumbled, rubbing my wet hair with the towel.
“Were you in a swim race? Did you win?” Elliot asked, tugging my hand
again.
“No. I came in second,” I told him.
He snickered. “You’re a loser. Come watch me beat this kid.”
I rolled my eyes. “Okay, okay.”
Elliot pulled me to a row of outdoor Ping-Pong tables. They were shielded
from the sun by a broad, white canvas awning.
He hurried up to the table on the end. Jeff was waiting for him there, softly
bouncing a Ping-Pong ball in the air with his paddle.
I had pictured a little shrimpy guy that Elliot could beat easily. But Jeff was
a big, red-faced, blond kid with bulging muscles. He had to be twice the size of
my brother!
I took a seat on a white wooden bench across from the tables. Elliot can’t
beat this big guy, I thought. My poor brother is in for a major defeat.
As they started to play, Buddy came walking over and sat down beside me.
He flashed me a smile. “No word from your parents yet,” he said. “But we’ll
find them.”
We watched the Ping-Pong match. Jeff did his serve with the special spin.
Elliot slammed it back at him.
To my surprise, the match was really even. I think Jeff was surprised, too.
His returns became more and more wild. And a lot of his special serves missed
the table entirely!
They had already played two games, Buddy told me. Jeff had won the first,
Elliot the second. This was the third and deciding match.
The game was a tie at sixteen, then a tie at seventeen and eighteen.
I watched Elliot become more and more intense. He wanted desperately to
win. He leaned stiffly over the table, gripping the paddle so tightly, his hand was
white.
Sweat poured off his forehead. He began ducking and dodging, groaning
with each hit, trying to slam every ball.
The more frantic and wild Elliot became, the calmer Jeff appeared.
The game was a tie at nineteen.
Elliot missed a shot and angrily slammed his paddle against the table.
I could see that he was losing it. I’d seen this happen to my brother many
times before. He could never win if he stayed this intense.
As he held the ball and prepared to serve, I raised two fingers to the sides of
my mouth and blew hard. He lowered the paddle when he heard my loud
whistle.
That was my signal. I’d used it many times before. It meant, “Cool it,
Elliot. Calm down.”
Elliot turned and gave me a quick thumbs-up.
I saw him take a deep breath. Then another.
My whistle signal always helped him.
He raised the ball and served it to Jeff. Jeff sent back a weak return. Elliot
smacked it back into the right corner. Jeff swung off balance and missed.
Jeff served the next one. Elliot backhanded it. Very soft. The ball tipped
over the net and dribbled several times on Jeff’s side.
Elliot had won!
He let out a gleeful cheer and raised his fists in victory.
Jeff angrily heaved his paddle to the ground and stomped away.
“Your brother is good,” Buddy said, climbing to his feet. “I like his style.
He’s intense.”
“For sure,” I muttered.
Buddy hurried over to award Elliot his King Coin. “Hey, guy—you only
need five more,” Buddy said, slapping Elliot a high five, then a low five.
“No problem,” Elliot bragged. He held the coin up so I could see it. King
Jellyjam smiled out at me, engraved on the coin.
Why did the camp pick this silly little blob for a mascot? I wondered again.
He looked like a fat hunk of pudding wearing a crown.
“I’ve got to get changed,” I told Elliot.
He slid the gold coin into the pocket of his shorts. “I’m going to find
another sport!” he declared. “I want to win another King Coin before tonight!”
I waved good-bye, then started toward the dorm.
I had walked only a few steps when I heard a low rumbling.
Then the ground started to shake.
I froze. Every muscle in my body locked as the rumbling grew louder.
“Earthquake!” I cried.
11
The ground shook hard. The awning over the Ping-Pong tables shook. The tables
bounced on the ground.
My knees buckled. I struggled to stay on my feet.
“Earthquake!” I choked out again.
“It’s okay!” Buddy called, running toward me.
He was right. The rumbling sound faded quickly. The ground stopped
shaking.
“That happens sometimes,” Buddy explained. “It’s no problem.”
My heart still thudded in my chest. My legs wobbled as if they were rubber
bands. “No problem?”
“See?” Buddy motioned around the crowded camp. “No one pays any
attention. It lasts only a few seconds.”
I gazed around quickly. Buddy was right again. The kids in the chess
tournament in front of the lodge didn’t glance up from their chessboards. The
kickball game on the field across from the pool continued without a pause.
“It usually happens once or twice a day,” Buddy told me.
“But what causes it?” I demanded.
He shrugged. “Beats me.”
“But—everything shook so hard! Isn’t it dangerous?” I asked.
Buddy didn’t hear me. He was already jogging over to watch the kickball
game.
I turned and started walking to the dorm. I felt kind of shaky. I could still
hear that strange rumbling sound in my ears.
As I pulled open the door to the dorm, I bumped into Jan and Ivy. They
both had changed into white tennis outfits, and they both carried tennis rackets
over their shoulders.
“What sports have you been playing?”
“Did you win a King Coin?”
“Wasn’t that a great swim race?”
“Are you having fun, Wendy?”
“Do you play tennis?”
They both talked at once and shot out half a dozen questions. They seemed
really excited. They didn’t give me a chance to answer.
“We need more girls for the tennis tournament,” Ivy said. “We’re having a
two-day tournament. Come to the courts after lunch, okay?”
“Okay,” I agreed. “I’m not that good, but—”
“See you later!” Jan cried. They both hurried away.
Actually, I am a pretty good tennis player. I have a decent serve. And I do
all right with my two-handed backhand.
But I’m not great.
Back home, my friend Allison and I always play for fun. We don’t try to
kill each other. Sometimes we just keep volleying back and forth. We don’t even
keep score.
I’ll enter the tennis tournament, I decided. And if I lose in the first round,
it’s no big deal.
Besides, I told myself, Mom and Dad will be here any minute. And Elliot
and I will have to leave.
Mom and Dad… their faces flashed into my mind.
They must be frantic, I realized. They must be worried sick. I hoped they
were okay.
I suddenly had an idea.
I’ll call home, I decided. I should have thought of this before. I’ll call home
and leave a message on our answering machine. I’ll tell Mom and Dad on the
machine where Elliot and I are.
No matter where he goes, Dad checks for phone messages every hour. Mom
always makes fun of him for being so nervous about missing a call.
But they’ll both be glad to get this message! I told myself.
What a good idea! I congratulated myself.
Now all I needed was a phone.
There have to be phones in the dorm, I decided. I searched the small front
lobby. But I didn’t see any pay phones.
No one at the front desk. No one I could ask.
I peered down a long hallway. Rooms on both sides. No phones.
I tried the other hallway. No pay phones there, either.
Eager to make my call, I turned and hurried back outside. I let out a long
sigh of relief when I spotted two pay phones beside the long white dorm
building.
My heart pounding, I jogged over to them.
I picked up the phone closest to me. And I started to raise the receiver to
my ear—
—when two strong hands grabbed me from behind.
“Get off the phone!” a voice demanded.
12
“Huh?” I shrieked in surprise and dropped the phone. It spun crazily on its cord.
I turned around. “Dierdre! You scared me to death!” I cried.
Her green eyes flashed excitedly. “Sorry, Wendy. I just had to tell you my
news! Look!”
She held out her hand. I saw a stack of gold King Coins.
“I just won my sixth coin!” Dierdre declared breathlessly. “Isn’t that
awesome?”
“I—I guess,” I replied uncertainly. I still couldn’t figure out why it was
such a big deal.
“I’ll be in the Winners Walk tonight!” Dierdre exclaimed. “I can’t believe I
made it!”
“That’s great,” I told her. “Congratulations.”
“Have you won any King Coins yet?” Dierdre asked, still holding out her
hand.
“Uh… not yet,” I replied.
“Well, get going!” Dierdre urged. “Show them what you’ve got, Wendy.
Only The Best!” She flashed me a thumbs-up with her free hand.
“Right. Only The Best,” I repeated.
“We’ll have a party,” Dierdre continued. “In our room. Right after the
Winners Walk. Okay? We’ll celebrate.”
“Great!” I replied. “Maybe we can get a pizza from the mess hall or
something.”
“Tell Jan and Ivy,” Dierdre instructed. “Or I’ll tell them. Whoever sees
them first! See you later!”
She ran off, holding the six gold coins tightly in her fist.
I realized I was smiling. Dierdre had been so excited, she’d gotten me
excited. So excited, I forgot about my phone call.
I have to give this camp a chance, I decided. I have to get into the spirit of
things and start having some fun. Only The Best! I’m going to win that tennis
tournament!
We all ate dinner at long wooden tables in the huge mess hall inside the main
camp lodge. The long, high-ceilinged room seemed to stretch on forever.
Loud voices and laughter echoed off the walls over the clatter of plates and
silverware. Everyone had a story to tell. Everyone wanted to talk about the
games of the day.
After dinner, the counselors led us all to the running track. I searched for
Elliot. But I couldn’t find him in the crowd.
It was a warm, clear night. A pale sliver of a moon floated low over the
darkening trees. As the sun set, the sky faded from pink to purple to gray.
When darkness fell, I saw two flickering yellow lights at the far end of the
track, moving toward me. As they came near, I could see that they were torches,
carried by two counselors.
A blaring trumpet fanfare made us all grow quiet.
I stepped closer to Jan, who stood at my side. “They sure make a big deal of
this,” I whispered.
“It is a big deal,” Jan replied, her eyes straight ahead as the torches
approached.
“Do we have any food for the party later?” I whispered.
Jan raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhhh.”
Several more torches had been lit. The yellow balls of light glowed like tiny
suns.
I heard a drumroll. Then a loud march blared from the loudspeaker, all
trumpets and pounding drums.
We stood in silence as the parade of torches passed by. And, then, in the
flickering yellow light, I saw faces. The smiling faces of the kids who had won
their sixth King Coin that day.
I counted eight kids. Five boys and three girls.
Their gold coins had been strung as necklaces around their necks. The coins
caught the light of the torches and made the faces of the winners appear to glow
as they marched by.
Dierdre marched second in line. She seemed so happy and excited! Her
coins jangled at her throat. Her smile never faded.
Jan and I waved and called to her, but she marched right past.
A counselor’s voice suddenly boomed over the loudspeaker: “Let’s hear it
for our winners who are taking the Winners Walk tonight!”
A deafening cheer rose up from the kids watching the parade. We all
clapped and shouted and whistled until the winners had marched past and the
final torches had floated out of sight.
“Only The Best!” the voice shouted over the loudspeaker.
“Only The Best!” we all chanted back. “Only The Best!”
That ended the Winners Walk parade. The lights came on. We all scrambled
toward the dorms. The boys ran in one direction, the girls in the other.
“The torches were really cool,” I said to Jan as we followed the crowd of
girls down the path to the dorm.
“I only need two more King Coins,” Jan replied.
“Maybe I can win them tomorrow. Are you playing in the softball
tournament?”
“No. Tennis,” I told her.
“There are too many good tennis players,” Jan replied. “It’ll be too hard to
win a coin. You should play softball, too.”
“Well… maybe,” I replied.
Ivy was already waiting for us in the room. “Where’s Dierdre?” she
demanded as Jan and I entered.
“We didn’t see her,” Jan replied.
“Probably hanging out with the other winners,” I added.
“I found two bags of tortilla chips, but I couldn’t find any salsa,” Ivy
reported, holding up the bags.
“Do we have anything to drink?” I asked.
Ivy held up two cans of diet Coke.
“Wow! Great party!” Jan exclaimed, laughing.
“Maybe we should invite some girls in from other rooms,” I suggested.
“No way! Then we’d have to share the Cokes!” Jan protested.
We all laughed.
The three of us joked and kidded around for about half an hour, waiting for
Dierdre. We sat down on the floor and opened one of the bags of tortilla chips.
Without realizing it, we finished off the whole bag. Then we passed around
one of the cans of soda.
“Where is she?” Jan demanded, glancing at her watch.
“It’s nearly time for lights-out,” Ivy sighed. “We won’t have much time for
a party.”
“Maybe Dierdre forgot we were having a party,” I suggested, crinkling up
the tortilla chip bag and tossing it toward the trash basket.
I missed. Basketball is definitely not my sport.
“But the party was her idea!” Ivy replied. She climbed to her feet and
started pacing back and forth. “Where can she be? Everyone is inside by now.”
“Let’s go find her,” I said. The words just popped out of my mouth. That
happens to me sometimes. I get a bright idea before I know what I’m saying.
“Yes! Let’s go!” Ivy eagerly agreed.
“Whoa. Hold it,” Jan said, stepping in front of us, blocking our way to the
door. “We’re not allowed. You know the rules, Ivy. We’re not allowed outside
after ten.”
“We’ll sneak out, find Dierdre, and sneak back in,” Ivy replied. “Come on,
Jan. What could happen?”
“Right. What could happen?” I chimed in.
Jan was outnumbered. “Okay, okay. But I hope we don’t get caught,” she
muttered. She followed Ivy and me to the door.
“What could happen?” I asked myself, leading the way into the empty hall.
“What could happen?” I repeated as we sneaked out the door, into the night.
“What could happen?”
I didn’t know it. But the answer to the question was: A LOT!
13
The night had grown warmer. And steamier. As I crept out the door, I felt as if I
were stepping into a hot shower.
A mosquito buzzed around my head. I tried to clap it between my hands.
Missed.
Jan, Ivy, and I edged our way around the side of the building. My shoes slid
on the dew-wet grass. Bright spotlights shone down from the trees, lighting the
path.
We crept in the shadows.
“Where should we look first?” Ivy whispered.
“Let’s start at the lodge,” I suggested. “Maybe all of tonight’s winners are
partying there.”
“I don’t hear any partying,” Jan whispered. “It’s so quiet out here!”
She was right. The only sounds I could hear were the steady chirp of
crickets and the whisper of the warm wind through the trees.
Keeping in the shadows, we followed the path toward the lodge. We passed
the swimming pool, empty and silent. The water shimmered like silver under the
bright spotlights.
It was such a hot, wet night, I imagined myself jumping into the pool with
all of my clothes on.
But we were on a mission: To find Dierdre. No time to think about latenight swims.
Staying close together, we passed the row of Ping-Pong tables. They made
me think of Elliot. I wondered what he was doing. Probably tucked into bed.
Like any sensible person.
We were approaching the first row of tennis courts when Ivy suddenly cried
out, “Whoa! Get back!” She grabbed me and shoved me hard against the fence.
I heard soft footsteps on the path. Someone humming.
The three of us held our breath as a counselor walked past. He had curly
black hair and wore dark blue sunglasses even though it was night. He wore the
white T-shirt and white shorts that made up the counselor’s uniform.
We pressed our backs against the tennis court fence. “That’s Billy,” Jan
whispered. “He’s kind of cute. He’s always so happy.”
“He won’t be too happy if he catches us,” Ivy whispered. “We’ll be in
major trouble.”
Humming to himself, snapping his fingers, Billy walked past us. The path
curved around the other side of the tennis courts. I watched him until he
disappeared.
I took a deep breath. I hadn’t been breathing the whole time!
“Where’s he going?” Ivy wondered.
“Maybe he’s going to the party at the lodge,” I suggested.
“Why don’t we ask him?” Jan joked.
“For sure,” I muttered.
We checked out the path in both directions. Then we started walking again.
We made our way past the tennis courts. The spotlights in the trees cast
long shadows across the path. The shadows shifted and moved as the tree limbs
bobbed in the wind. They looked like dark creatures crawling and slithering over
the ground.
Despite the heat of the night, I shivered.
It was kind of creepy walking over these moving shadows. I had the feeling
one of them might reach up, grab me, and pull me down.
Weird thought, huh?
I turned back in time to see the lights in the dorm windows start to go out.
Lights-out.
I tapped Jan on the shoulder. She turned and watched the dorm, too. As the
lights all went out, the building seemed to disappear in front of our eyes. It faded
into the black of the night sky.
“M-maybe this wasn’t such a good idea,” I whispered.
Ivy didn’t reply. She bit her lower lip. Her eyes were darting around the
darkness.
Jan laughed. “Don’t wimp out now,” she scolded. “We’re almost to the
lodge.”
We cut through the soccer field. The main lodge stood on a low, sloping
hill, hidden by wide, old maple and sassafras trees.
We didn’t have to climb very far up the hill to see that the lodge was as dark
as the dorm.
“No party up there,” I whispered.
Ivy sighed, disappointed. “Well, where could Dierdre be?”
“We could try the boys’ dorm!” I joked.
They both laughed.
Our laughter was cut short by a loud fluttering sound, very close by.
“What’s that?” Ivy cried.
“Ohhh!” I let out a low moan as I raised my eyes and saw them.
The sky was thick with bats. Dozens of black bats.
Fluttering over the spotlights in the old trees. And, then—swooping down
to get us!
14
I couldn’t help myself. I let out a scream. Then I shielded my face with both
hands.
I heard Jan and Ivy gasp.
The fluttering grew louder. Closer.
I could feel the bats’ hot breath on the back of my neck. Then I could feel
them clawing at my hair, tearing at my face.
I’ve got a real good imagination when it comes to bats.
“Wendy, it’s okay,” Jan whispered. She tugged my hands from my face. She
pointed. “Look.”
I followed her gaze up to the fluttering black wings. The bats were
swooping low. But they weren’t swooping at us. They were swooping down and
landing on the swimming pool at the bottom of the hill.
In the bright spotlights, I could see them dart into the water—for less than a
second. Then sweep back up to the sky.
“I—I don’t like bats,” I whispered.
“Neither do I,” Ivy confessed. “I know they’re supposed to be good. I know
they eat insects and stuff. But I still think they’re creepy.”
“Well, they won’t bother us,” Jan said. “They’re just taking a drink.” She
gave Ivy and me a push to get us started down the hill.
We were lucky. Nobody had heard me scream. But we had walked only a
few steps when we spotted another counselor coming down the path. I
recognized her. She had straight white-blond hair that tumbled down to her waist
from under a blue baseball cap.
Without making a sound, all three of us dove behind a tall evergreen shrub
and crouched down.
Did she see us?
I held my breath again.
She kept walking.
“Where are these counselors going?” Ivy whispered.
“Let’s follow her,” I suggested.
“Stay far back,” Jan instructed.
We slowly climbed back to our feet. And stepped out from behind the
shrub.
And stopped when we heard the low, rumbling sound.
As the rumbling grew louder, the ground began to shake.
I caught the frightened expressions on my two friends’ faces. Ivy and Jan
were just as scared as I was.
The ground shook harder, so hard that we dropped to our knees. I leaned on
all fours, holding on to the grass. The ground trembled and shook. The rumbling
became a roar.
I shut my eyes.
The sound slowly faded.
The ground gave a final tremble, then remained still.
I opened my eyes and turned to Ivy and Jan. They started to stand. Slowly.
“I hate when that happens!” Jan muttered.
“What is it?” I whispered. I stood up on shaky legs.
“Nobody knows,” Jan replied, brushing grass stains off her knees. “It just
happens. A few times a day.”
“I think we should give up on Dierdre,” Ivy said quietly. “I want to go back.
To the dorm.”
“Yeah. I’m with you,” I replied wearily. “We can have our celebration with
Dierdre tomorrow.”
“She can tell us all about where she was tonight and what she did,” Jan
said.
“This was a crazy idea,” I muttered.
“It was your idea!” Jan exclaimed.
“Most of my ideas are crazy!” I replied.
Hiding in the shadows, we made our way down to the path. I gazed toward
the pool. The bats had disappeared. Maybe the rumbling sound had scared them
back into the woods.
The crickets had stopped chirping. The air remained hot, but silent and still.
The only sound was the scrape of our sneakers on the soft dirt path.
And, then—before we could move or hide—we heard someone else’s
footsteps.
Rapid footsteps. Running hard. Running toward us.
I stopped short when I heard a girl’s desperate cry. “Help me! Please—
somebody! Help me!”
15
A hot gust of wind shook the trees, making their eerie dark shadows dance.
I leaped back, startled by the girl’s terrified cries.
“Help me! Please—!”
She came running around from the side of the tennis courts. She wore tight
blue short-shorts and a magenta midriff top.
Her arms were stretched out in front of her. Her long hair flew wildly
behind her head.
I recognized her as soon as she burst into view.
The little red-haired girl with all the freckles. The one who had hidden in
the woods and warned Elliot and me not to come into the camp.
“Help me!”
She ran right into me, sobbing hard. I threw my arms around her tiny
shoulders and held her. “You’re okay,” I whispered. “You’re okay.”
“No!” she shrieked. She tugged away from me.
“What’s wrong?” Jan demanded. “Why are you out here?”
“Why aren’t you in bed?” Ivy added, stepping up beside me.
The little girl didn’t answer. Her entire body trembled.
She grabbed my hand and pulled me behind the bushes beside the path. Jan
and Ivy followed.
“I’m not okay,” she started, wiping the tears off her freckled cheeks with
both hands. “I’m not. I—I—”
“What’s your name?” Jan asked in a whisper.
“Why are you out here?” Ivy repeated.
I heard the flutter of bat wings again, low overhead. But I stared at the little
girl and forced myself to ignore them.
“My name—it’s Alicia,” the girl replied, sobbing. “We’ve got to go. Fast!”
“Huh?” I cried. “Take a deep breath, Alicia. You’re okay. Really.”
“No!” she cried again, shaking her head.
“You’re safe now. You’re with us,” I insisted.
“We’re not safe,” she cried. “No one. No one here. I tried to warn people. I
tried to tell you…” Her words were cut off once again by her loud sobs.
“What is it?” Ivy demanded.
“What did you try to warn us about?” Jan asked, leaning down to the crying
girl.
“I—I saw something terrible!” Alicia stammered. “I—”
“What did you see?” I asked impatiently.
“I followed them,” Alicia replied. “And I saw it. Something horrible. I—I
can’t talk about it. We just have to run. We have to tell the others. Everyone. We
have to run. We have to get away from here!”
She let out a long breath. Her entire body trembled again.
“But why do we have to run?” I asked, placing my hands gently on her
shoulders.
I felt so bad. I wanted to calm her. I wanted to tell her that everything would
be okay. But I didn’t know how to convince her.
What had she seen? What had frightened her so much?
Had she had a bad dream?
“We have to go now!” she repeated shrilly. Her red hair was matted to her
face by her tears. She grabbed my arm and pulled hard. “Hurry! We’ve got to
run! I saw it!”
“Saw what?” I cried.
Alicia had no time to reply.
A dark-haired counselor stepped up in front of the bushes. “Caught you!”
he cried.
16
I froze. My entire body went cold.
The counselor’s dark eyes flashed in the light of a spotlight. “What are you
doing out here?” he demanded.
I sucked in a deep breath and started to answer.
But another voice replied before I could. “Kind of nosy, aren’t you?” It was
another counselor. A woman with short, black hair.
Breathing hard, trying not to make a sound, I ducked lower behind the
bushes. My two friends dropped to their knees.
“You aren’t following me—are you?” the first counselor teased.
“Why would I follow you? Maybe you’re following me!” the woman teased
back.
They didn’t see us, I realized happily. We were two feet away from them.
But they didn’t see us behind the bushes.
A few seconds later, the two counselors strolled off together. My friends
and I waited a long while, listening hard until we could no longer hear their
voices. Then we climbed slowly to our feet.
“Alicia?” I asked. “Are you okay?”
“Alicia?” Ivy and Jan cried.
The little girl had vanished.
We sneaked back into the dorm through a side door. Luckily, there were no
counselors patrolling the halls. No one in sight.
“Dierdre—are you back?” Jan called as we stepped into our room.
No reply.
I clicked on the light. Dierdre’s bunk remained empty.
“Better turn off the light,” Ivy warned. “It’s after lights-out.”
I clicked the light back off. Then I stumbled toward my bunk, waiting for
my eyes to adjust to the darkness.
“Where is Dierdre?” Ivy asked. “I’m a little worried about her. Maybe we
should tell a counselor that she’s missing.”
“What counselor?” Jan asked, slumping onto her bed. “There’s no one
around. The counselors are all out somewhere.”
“I’m sure she’s partying somewhere and forgot all about us,” I said,
yawning. I bent to pull down the covers on my bed.
“What do you think that little girl saw?” Ivy asked, peering out the window.
“Alicia? I think she had a bad dream,” I replied.
“But she was so frightened!” Jan said, shaking her head. “And what was
she doing outside?”
“And why did she run away from us like that?” Ivy added.
“Weird,” I mumbled.
“Weird is right,” Jan agreed. Weird is the word of the night. She made her
way to the dresser. “I’m getting changed for bed. Big day tomorrow. I’ve got to
win two more King Coins.”
“Me, too,” Ivy said, yawning.
Jan pulled out a dresser drawer. “Oh, no!” she shrieked. “No! I don’t
believe it!”
17
“Jan—what is it?” I cried.
Ivy and I tore across the room to the dresser.
Jan continued to stare down into the open drawer. “It’s so dark,” she said. “I
opened Dierdre’s drawer by mistake. And—and—it’s empty!”
“Huh?” Ivy and I both uttered our surprise.
Squinting through the dim gray light, I studied the dresser drawer. Totally
empty. “Check the closet,” I suggested.
Ivy crossed the room in three or four quick strides. She pulled open the
closet door.
“Dierdre’s stuff—it’s all gone!” Ivy declared.
“Weird,” I muttered. It was still the word of the night.
“Why would she move out and not tell us?” Jan demanded.
“Where did she go?” Ivy added.
Good question, I thought, staring at the empty closet.
Where did Dierdre go?
* * *
Breakfast was the noisiest meal of the day. Spoons clattered against cereal
bowls. Orange juice pitchers banged on the long wooden tables.
Voices rang out as if someone had turned up the volume all the way.
Everyone talked excitedly about the sports they planned to play today, the games
they planned to win.
I had taken the last shower. So Jan and Ivy were already eating breakfast
when I made my way into the mess hall.
As I pushed through the narrow aisle between the tables, I searched for
Dierdre. No sign of her.
I hadn’t slept very well, even though I was really tired. I kept thinking
about Dierdre—and about Alicia. And I kept wondering what was taking Mom
and Dad so long to get in touch with us.
I spotted Elliot at the end of a table filled with boys about his age. He had a
stack of waffles in front of him, and he was pouring dark syrup over them.
“Elliot—what’s up?” I called, squeezing through the aisle to get over to
him.
My brother didn’t bother saying good morning. “I’ve got a one-on-one
tournament this morning,” he reported excitedly. “I could win my third King
Coin!”
“Thrills and chills,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “You haven’t heard anything
about Mom and Dad, have you?”
He stared at me as if he didn’t remember who they were. Then he shook his
head. “Not yet. Isn’t this a great camp? Did we luck out, or what?”
I didn’t reply. My eyes were on the next table. I thought I had spotted
Dierdre. But it was just another girl with streaky blond hair.
“Have you won any coins yet?” Elliot asked. He had a mouth full of waffle.
Syrup dripped down his chin.
“Not yet,” I replied.
He snickered. “They should change the camp slogan for you, Wendy. Only
The Worst!”
Elliot laughed. The other boys at the table laughed, too.
As I said, Elliot really cracks himself up.
I wasn’t in the mood for his lame jokes. My mind was still on Dierdre.
“Catch you later,” I said.
I squeezed past the table and headed toward the girls’ side of the room.
Cheers and laughter rang out at a table near the wall. A scrambled-egg tossing
battle had broken out. Three counselors rushed to stop it.
Jan and Ivy’s table was full. I found an empty space at the next table. I
poured myself a glass of juice and a bowl of cornflakes. But I didn’t feel too
hungry.
“Hey—!” I called out when I saw Buddy walk by. He didn’t hear me over
the noise, so I jumped up and ran after him.
“Hi. What’s up?” He greeted me with a smile.
His blond hair was still wet from the shower. He smelled kind of flowery.
Aftershave, I guessed.
“Do you know where Dierdre went?” I demanded.
He narrowed his eyes in surprise. “Dierdre?”
“A girl in my dorm room,” I explained. “She didn’t come back to the room
last night. Her closet is empty.”
“Dierdre,” he repeated, thinking hard. He raised his clipboard to his face
and ran his finger down it slowly. “Oh, yeah. She’s gone.” His cheeks turned
bright pink.
“Excuse me?” I stared up at him. “Dierdre is gone? Where did she go?
Home?”
He studied the sheet on his clipboard. “I guess. It just says she’s gone.” His
cheeks darkened from pink to red.
“That’s so weird,” I told him. “She didn’t say good-bye or anything.”
Buddy shrugged. A smile spread over his face. “Have a nice day!”
He started toward the counselors’ table at the front of the huge room. But I
ran after him. I grabbed his arm.
“Buddy, one more question,” I said. “Do you know where I can find a little
girl named Alicia?”
Buddy waved to some boys across the room. “Go get ’em, guys! Only The
Best!” he shouted to them. Then he turned back to me. “Alicia?”
“I don’t know her last name. She’s probably six or seven,” I told him. “She
has beautiful, long red hair and a face full of freckles.”
“Alicia…” He chewed his bottom lip. Then he raised the clipboard again.
I watched as he ran his finger down the list of names. When his finger
stopped, his cheeks turned pink again.
“Oh, yeah. Alicia,” he said, lowering the clipboard. He grinned at me. A
strange grin. A chilling grin. “She’s gone, too.”
18
“Jan! Ivy!” I saw them hurrying from the mess hall, and I chased after them.
“We’ve got to talk!” I cried breathlessly.
“We can’t. We’re late.” Jan straightened her bangs with one hand. “If we
don’t get to the volleyball nets in time, we can’t be in the tournament.”
“But it’s important!” I called as they jogged to the doors.
They didn’t seem to hear me. I watched them disappear into the morning
sunlight.
My heart pounded in my chest. I suddenly felt cold all over.
I caught up with my brother, who was playfully boxing a tall, skinny boy
with short blond hair. “Elliot—come here,” I instructed. “Just for a minute.”
“I can’t,” he called. “Remember? My one-on-one contest?”
The tall, skinny boy hurried out the door. I stepped in front of Elliot,
blocking his path.
“Give me a break!” he cried. “I don’t want to be late. I’m going against Jeff.
Remember him? I can beat him. He’s big, but he’s real slow.”
“Elliot, something strange is going on here,” I said, backing him against the
wall. Kids were staring at us as they made their way outside. But I didn’t care.
“You’re the only one who’s strange!” Elliot shot back. “Are you going to let
me go to the basketball court or not?”
He started to push past me. I pinned his shoulders to the wall with both
hands.
“Just give me one second!” I insisted. “There’s something wrong with this
camp, Elliot.” I let go of him.
“You mean the rumbling noises?” he asked, brushing back his dark hair
with one hand. “That’s just gas under the ground or something. A counselor
explained it to me.”
“That’s not what I’m talking about,” I replied. “Kids are disappearing.”
He laughed. “Invisible kids? You mean like a magic trick?”
“Stop making fun of me!” I snapped. “It isn’t funny, Elliot. Kids are
disappearing. Dierdre from my dorm room? She was in the Winners Walk last
night. Then she didn’t come back to the room.”
Elliot’s grin faded.
“This morning, Buddy told me she was gone,” I continued. I snapped my
fingers. “Just like that. And a little girl named Alicia—she disappeared, too.”
Elliot’s brown eyes studied me. “Kids have to go home sometime,” he
insisted. “What’s the big deal?”
“And what about Mom and Dad?” I demanded. “They couldn’t have driven
very far before they realized the trailer had come loose. Why haven’t they found
us? Why hasn’t the camp found them?”
Elliot shrugged. “Beats me,” he replied casually. He dodged past me and
started to the door. “Wendy, you’re just unhappy because you stink at sports. But
I’m having a great time here. Don’t mess it up for me—okay?”
“But—but—Elliot—!” I sputtered.
Shaking his head, he pushed the door open with both hands and escaped
into the sunlight.
I balled both hands into tight fists. I really wanted to pound him. Why
wouldn’t he listen to me? Couldn’t he see how upset and frightened I was?
Elliot is the kind of kid who never worries about anything. Everything
always seems to go his way. So why should he sweat it?
But you’d think he’d be just a little worried about Mom and Dad.
Mom and Dad…
I had a heavy feeling in my stomach as I made my way slowly out the door.
Had they been in a car accident or something? Is that why they hadn’t found
Elliot and me yet?
No. Stop making things worse, I scolded myself. Don’t let your imagination
run away with you, Wendy.
I suddenly remembered my plan to call home. Yes, I decided, I will do that
right now. I will call home and leave a message for Mom and Dad on the
answering machine.
I stopped in the middle of the path and searched for a pay phone. A group
of girls carrying hockey sticks passed by. I heard a long whistle coming from the
pool across from the tennis courts. Then I heard the splash of kids diving into the
water.
Everyone is having fun, I thought—except me.
I decided to make the call, then find a sport to play. Something to take my
mind off all my crazy worries.
I returned to the row of blue and white pay phones at the side of the lodge. I
ran full speed and picked up the nearest phone.
I raised the receiver to my ear and started to punch in our number.
Then I cried out in surprise.
19
“Hi there, Camper!” boomed a cheerful, deep voice. “Have a wonderful day at
camp. This is King Jellyjam greeting you. Work hard. Play hard. And win. And
always remember—Only The Best!”
“Oh, no!” I cried. “A stupid message—!”
“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day—” The tape started to repeat in
my ear.
I slammed the receiver down and picked up the next phone.
“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day at camp.” The same jolly,
booming voice. The same recorded message.
I tried every phone in the row. They all played the same message. None of
the phones were real.
Where are the real phones? I wondered. There have to be phones that
actually work.
I turned away from the lodge and wandered down the dirt path. As I passed
the bushes where Jan, Ivy, and I had hid last night, I felt a chill. And thought
about Alicia.
Bright sunlight washed over the sloping, grassy hill. I shielded my eyes and
watched a black-and-gold monarch butterfly. It fluttered toward a patch of red
and pink geraniums.
I walked aimlessly, searching for a telephone. All around, kids were
shouting, laughing, playing hard. I didn’t really hear them. I was deep into my
own troubled thoughts.
“Hey! Hey! Hey!”
My brother’s voice startled me into stopping. I blinked several times,
struggling to focus.
I saw that I had wandered down to the basketball court. Elliot and Jeff were
having their one-on-one basketball competition.
Jeff dribbled the ball. It thudded loudly on the asphalt court. My brother
waved both arms in Jeff’s face. Made a grab for the ball.
Missed.
Jeff lowered his shoulder. Bumped Elliot out of the way. Dribbled to the
basket—and shot.
“Two points!” he cried, grinning.
Elliot scowled and shook his head. “You fouled me.”
Jeff pretended not to hear. He was twice as big as Elliot. A big hulk. He
could push Elliot all over the court, if he wanted to.
Whatever made Elliot think he could win?
“What’s the score?” Jeff demanded, wiping sweat off his forehead with the
back of one hand.
“Eighteen to ten,” Elliot reported unhappily. I didn’t need twenty guesses to
figure out that my brother was losing.
The basketball court was closed off by a mesh-wire fence. I grabbed the
fence with both hands, pressed my face up against it, and watched.
Elliot dribbled, moving back, back, giving himself some space. Jeff moved
with him, leaning forward, adjusting his basketball shorts with one hand as he
moved.
Suddenly, Elliot burst forward, his eyes on the basket. He started his jump,
raised his right hand to shoot—and Jeff grabbed the ball away.
Elliot jumped and shot nothing but air.
Jeff dribbled twice. Put up a two-handed layup.
Swish. The score was twenty to ten.
Jeff won the game a few seconds later. He let out a cheer and slapped Elliot
a high five.
Elliot frowned and shook his head. “Lucky shots,” he muttered.
“Yeah. For sure,” Jeff replied, using the front of his sleeveless blue T-shirt
to mop his sweating face. “Hey, congratulate me, man. You’re my sixth victim!”
“Huh?” Elliot stared at him, hands pressed against his knees, struggling to
catch his breath. “You mean—?”
“Yeah.” Jeff grinned. “My sixth King Coin. I get to march in the Winners
Walk tonight!”
“Wow. That’s cool,” Elliot replied without enthusiasm. “I still have three
coins to go.”
I had the sudden feeling that I was being watched. I let go of the wire fence
and took a step back.
Buddy had been staring at me from the path. His eyes were narrowed, and
his mouth was set in a stern, unhappy expression.
How long had he been standing there?
Why did he look so unhappy? His grim expression gave me a chill.
As I turned to him, he stepped forward. His blue eyes stared hard into mine.
“I’m sorry, Wendy,” the counselor said softly. “But you have to go.”
20
“Excuse me?” I gaped at him. My mouth dropped open.
What was he saying? Where did I have to go?
Did he mean I had to go—like Dierdre and Alicia?
“You have to go find a sport,” Buddy repeated, still speaking softly. His
solemn expression didn’t change. “You can’t stand around watching other kids
play. King Jellyjam would never approve of that.”
I’d like to step on that ugly little blob! I thought angrily. What a stupid
name. King Jellyjam. Yuck!
Buddy had just scared me to death. Was he trying to frighten me? I
wondered.
No, I quickly decided. Buddy doesn’t know that I’m upset about things.
How could he know?
Buddy hurried on to the basketball court. He slapped Jeff on the back and
handed him a gold King Coin. “Way to go, guy!” he cried, flashing Jeff a
thumbs-up. “I’ll see you in the Winners Walk tonight. Only The Best!”
Buddy said a few words to my brother. Elliot shrugged a few times. Then
he said something that made Buddy laugh. I couldn’t hear their words.
When Elliot trotted off to find his next sport, Buddy strode quickly back to
me. He put an arm around my shoulders and guided me away from the
basketball court.
“I guess you’re just not a self-starter, Wendy,” he said.
“I guess,” I replied. What was I supposed to say?
“Well, I’m going to give you a schedule for today. See if you like it,”
Buddy said. “First, I have a tennis match fined up for you. You play tennis,
right?”
“A little,” I told him. “I’m not that great, but—”
“After tennis, come down to the softball diamond, okay?” Buddy
continued. “We’ll get you on one of the softball teams.”
He flashed me a warm smile. “I think you’ll have a lot more fun if you join
in—don’t you?”
“Yeah. Probably,” I replied. I wanted to sound more enthusiastic. But I just
couldn’t.
Buddy led me onto one of the back tennis courts. An African-American girl
about my age was warming up by hitting a tennis ball against a backboard.
She turned and greeted me as I approached. “How’s it going?”
“Fine,” I replied. We introduced ourselves.
Her name was Rose. She was tall and pretty. She wore a purple tank top
over black shorts. I saw a silver ring dangling from one ear.
Buddy handed me a racket. “Have fun,” he said. “And watch out, Wendy.
Rose already has five King Coins!”
“Are you a good tennis player?” I asked, twirling the racket in my hand.
Rose nodded. “Yeah. Pretty good. How about you?”
“I don’t know,” I told her honestly. “My friend and I always play just for
fun.”
Rose laughed. She had a deep, throaty laugh that I liked. It made me want
to laugh, too. “I never play for fun!” she declared.
She told the truth.
We volleyed back and forth for a while, to get warmed up. Rose leaned
forward, tensed her body, narrowed her dark eyes—then started slamming the
ball back at me as if we were playing the final set of a championship!
She played even harder once we started our match.
I found out very quickly that I was no match for her. I was lucky to return a
few of her serves!
Rose was a good sport about it. I caught her snickering a few times at my
two-handed backhand. But she didn’t make fun of my pitiful game. And she
gave me some really helpful tips as the match continued.
She won in straight sets.
I congratulated her. She seemed really excited about winning her sixth King
Coin.
A woman counselor I hadn’t seen before appeared on the court and
presented the coin to Rose. “See you at the Winners Walk tonight,” she said,
grinning.
Then the counselor turned to me. “The softball diamond is right over that
hill, Wendy.” She pointed.
I thanked her and began walking in that direction. “Don’t walk—run!” she
called. “Let’s see some spirit! Only The Best!”
I let out an unhappy groan. I don’t think she heard me. Then I obediently
started to run.
Why was everyone always rushing me around here? I complained silently.
Why can’t I go lie down by the pool and work on my tan?
As the softball diamond came into view, I started to cheer up a little. I
actually like softball. I’m not much of a fielder. But I’m a pretty good slugger.
The teams, I saw, had boys and girls on them.
I recognized two of the girls from my breakfast table this morning.
One of them tossed me a bat. “Hi. I’m Ronni. You can be on our team,” she
said. “Can you pitch?”
“I guess,” I replied, wrapping my hands around the bat. “Sometimes I pitch
after school on the playground.”
She nodded. “Okay. You can pitch the first couple of innings.”
Ronni called the other kids together and we huddled. We went around the
circle, giving our names. Then the kids who didn’t have fielding positions chose
their spots.
“If we win, do we all get King Coins?” a boy with a fake tattoo of an eagle
on his shoulder asked.
“Yes. All of us,” Ronni told him.
Everyone cheered.
“Don’t start cheering yet. We’ve got to win first!” Ronni exclaimed.
She went around the circle, giving the batting order. Since I was the pitcher,
I batted ninth.
But since I had a bat, I decided to take a few practice swings. I stepped
away from the others, behind the third base line.
Easing my hands up on the bat, I took a soft swing. I like to choke up pretty
high. I’m not very strong, and it gives me a harder swing.
The bat felt pretty good. I took a few more soft swings.
Then I pulled it behind my shoulder—and swung as hard as I could.
I didn’t see Buddy standing there.
The bat smacked him hard in the chest.
It made a sickening thocccck as it crashed into his ribs.
I let the bat fall from my hands. Then I staggered back. Stunned. Horrified.
21
Buddy’s smile faded. He narrowed his blue eyes at me.
He raised a hand and pointed a finger at me.
“I like the way you choke up,” he said. “But maybe we could find you a
lighter bat.”
“Huh?” My mouth hung open. I couldn’t move. I stood there, gaping at
him. “Buddy—?”
He picked up the bat from the ground. “Does it feel comfortable? Let me
see you swing again, Wendy.” He handed the bat to me.
My hands trembled as I took it from him. I kept my eyes on him. Waited for
him to cry out. To grab his chest and collapse in a heap on the ground.
“Some of the aluminum bats are lighter,” he said. He brushed back his
blond hair with one hand. “Go ahead. Swing again.”
I took a few shaky steps away from him. I wanted to make sure I didn’t hit
him again. Then I choked up on the bat and swung.
“How is it?” he asked.
“F-fine,” I stammered.
He flashed me a thumbs-up and went to talk to Ronni.
Whoa! I thought. What is the story here?
I swung that bat into his chest, hard enough to break a few ribs. Or at least
knock his breath out.
But Buddy didn’t even seem to notice!
What is the story here?
I told Jan and Ivy about it at dinner.
Jan snickered. “I guess your swing isn’t as hard as you think.”
“But it made a horrible sound! Like eggs breaking or something!” I
exclaimed. “And he just went on smiling and talking.”
“He probably waited until he was out of sight. Then he screamed his head
off!” Ivy suggested.
I forced myself to laugh along with my two friends. But I didn’t feel like
laughing.
It was all too strange.
I mean, no one could take a blow like that right in the chest and not even
say “Ouch!”
Our team lost by ten points. But after that thocccck, who could think about
the game?
I glanced across the room to the counselors’ table. Buddy sat at one end,
talking and laughing with Holly. He seemed perfectly okay.
I kept glancing at him all through dinner. Again and again, I heard the
sickening thocccck the bat made as it smashed into his chest. I just couldn’t get it
out of my mind.
I kept thinking about it as we trooped out to the track after dinner for the
Winners Walk. It was a windy night. The torches flickered and nearly went out.
The trees around the track shivered and bent. Their branches seemed to
reach down for the ground.
The marching music started, and the winners paraded by. Rose waved to me
as she passed. I saw Jeff walking proudly near the back of the line, his gold coins
jangling around his neck.
After the ceremony, I hurried back to the room and climbed into bed. Too
many troubling thoughts whirred around in my brain. I wanted to go to sleep and
shut them out.
The next morning at breakfast, Rose and Jeff were gone.
22
I searched for Rose and Jeff. And I searched for my brother all morning. I knew
he’d be playing hard at one of the sports. But I walked from the soccer field at
one end of the camp to the driving range at the other end, and I didn’t see him.
Had Elliot disappeared, too?
The frightening thought kept tugging at my mind.
We’ve got to get out of this camp!
I kept repeating those words to myself as I made my way along the
crisscrossing dirt paths.
King Jellyjam, the little purple blob, grinned at me from the signs posted
everywhere. Even his cartoon smile gave me the creeps.
Something was terribly wrong at King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp. And the
more I walked, my eyes searching every face for my brother, the more frightened
I became.
Buddy caught up to me after lunch. He led me back to the Softball
diamond. “Wendy, you can’t leave your team,” he said sternly. “Forget
yesterday. You still have a chance. If you win today, you guys all win King
Coins.”
I didn’t want any King Coins. I wanted to see my parents. I wanted to see
my brother. And I wanted to get out of there!
I didn’t pitch today. I played left field, which gave me plenty of time to
think.
I planned our escape.
It won’t be that hard, I decided. Elliot and I will sneak out after dinner when
everyone is watching the Winners Walk. We’ll make our way down the hill, back
to the highway. Then we’ll walk or hitchhike to the nearest town with a police
station.
I knew the police would find Mom and Dad for us easily.
A simple plan, right? Now all I had to do was find Elliot.
Our team lost the game seven to nine.
I grounded out to end the game. The other kids were disappointed that the
team lost, but I didn’t really care.
I still hadn’t won a single King Coin. As we trotted toward our dorms, I saw
Buddy watching me. He had a fretful expression on his face.
“Wendy—what’s your next sport?” he called to me.
I pretended I didn’t hear him and trotted away.
My next sport is running, I thought unhappily. Running away from this
horrible place.
The ground began to rumble and shake as I passed the main lodge. This
time, I ignored it and kept walking to the dorm.
I didn’t find Elliot until after dinner. I saw him heading out the mess-hall door
with two buddies. They were laughing, talking loudly, and bumping each other
with their chests as they walked.
“Elliot!” I called, chasing after him. “Hey, Elliot—wait up!”
He turned away from his two friends. “Oh. Hi,” he said. “How’s it going?”
“Did you forget you have a sister?” I demanded angrily.
He narrowed his eyes at me. “Excuse me?”
“Where have you been?” I asked.
A grin spread over his face. “Winning these,” he said. He raised the chain
around his neck to show off the gold King Coins he was wearing. “I’ve got five.”
“Awesome,” I said sarcastically. “Elliot—we’ve got to get out of here!”
“Huh? Get out?” He twisted up his face, confused.
“Yes,” I insisted. “We have to get away from this camp—tonight!”
“I can’t,” Elliot replied. “No way.”
Kids pushed past us, on their way to watch the Winners Walk. I followed
Elliot out the mess-hall door. Then I pulled him off the path, onto the grass at the
side of the building.
“You can’t leave? Why not?” I demanded.
“Not till I win my sixth coin,” he said. He jangled the coin necklace in my
face.
“Elliot—this place is dangerous!” I cried. “And Mom and Dad must be—”
“You’re just jealous,” he interrupted. He jangled the coins again. “You
haven’t won any—have you!”
I balled my hands into fists. I wanted to strangle him. I really did.
He was such a competitive jerk. He always had to win everything.
I took a deep breath and tried to speak calmly. “Elliot, aren’t you at all
worried about Mom and Dad?”
He lowered his eyes for a moment. “A little.”
“Well, we have to get out of here and find them!” I declared.
“Tomorrow,” he replied. “After the track meet in the morning. After I win
my sixth coin.”
I opened my mouth to argue with him. But what was the point?
I knew how stubborn my brother can be. If he wanted to win that sixth coin,
he wouldn’t leave till he won it.
I couldn’t argue with him. And I couldn’t drag him away. “Right after the
track meet tomorrow morning,” I told him, “we’re out of here! Whether you win
or lose. Agreed?”
He thought about it. “Okay. Agreed,” he said finally. Then he trotted off to
find his friends.
Four kids marched in the Winners Walk. As I watched from the sidelines, I
thought about the kids I knew who had marched before.
Dierdre. Rose. Jeff…
Had they all gone home? Were they picked up by their parents? Were they
back home now safe and sound?
Maybe I’m frightening myself for no reason, I thought.
Everyone else in camp seems to be having a great time. Why am I the only
worrier?
And then I remembered that I wasn’t the only worrier.
Alicia’s tear-stained face floated into my mind.
What had Alicia seen that had frightened her so much? Why was she
desperately trying to warn us to get away?
I’ll probably never find out, I told myself.
When the Winners Walk ceremony ended, I didn’t feel like going back to
the dorm. I knew I couldn’t get to sleep. Too many thoughts troubled my mind.
As the other kids made their way to their rooms, I ducked into the deep
shadows. Then I sneaked along the path to the sloping hill that led up to the main
lodge.
Hiding behind a wide evergreen shrub, I dropped down onto the grass. It
was a cool, cloudy night. The air felt heavy and damp.
I raised my eyes to the sky. Clouds covered the stars and the moon. Far in
the distance, I could see tiny red lights moving slowly against the blackness. An
airplane. I wondered where it was headed.
Crickets began to chirp. The wind rustled my hair.
I gazed up at the starless sky. Trying to relax. Trying to calm myself down.
After a few minutes, I heard voices. Footsteps.
I pulled myself up to my knees and ducked low behind the shrub.
The voices grew louder. A girl laughed.
Carefully, I peered out from between the piney branches. I saw two
counselors, walking rapidly along the path that led up the hill.
Behind them, I spotted another group of counselors making their way
quickly up the hill. They all seemed to be in a hurry.
I lowered myself behind the shrub and hid in the darkness.
They’re heading to the lodge, I decided. Must be some kind of counselors’
meeting.
Their white shorts and T-shirts were easy to see, even on such a dark night.
Keeping out of sight, I watched them make their way up the path.
But to my surprise, they didn’t go to the lodge. Several yards from the
lodge entrance, they turned off the path and ducked into the woods.
Where were they going?
I saw two more groups of counselors make their way into the trees. There
must be a hundred counselors at this camp, I realized. And they’re all going into
the woods tonight.
I waited until I thought all of the counselors had passed by. Then I slowly
pulled myself to my feet.
I stared into the woods. But I could see only darkness. Shadows upon
shadows.
I ducked back down when I heard two more voices.
Peering through the evergreen branches, I spied Holly and Buddy. They
were taking long strides, walking side by side.
I waited till they passed by. Then I jumped up.
Creeping in the deep shadows, I followed them into the woods.
I didn’t stop to worry about getting caught. I had to know where the
counselors were all going.
Buddy and Holly moved quickly through the woods, pushing tall weeds out
of their way, stepping over fallen tree limbs.
To my surprise, a low, white structure came into view. It appeared to glow
dully in the dim light.
The building was built low to the ground. The top was curved.
I squinted at it through the trees. It looks like an igloo, I thought.
What is this strange building? I wondered. Why is it hidden away in the
trees?
A dark opening had been cut into the side. Holly ducked into the low
entrance. Buddy followed her in.
I waited nearly a minute. Then I stepped up to the opening.
My heart pounded. Such a strange, little building. Round and smooth as ice.
I hesitated. I peered into the entrance, but couldn’t see anything inside. I
didn’t hear any voices.
What should I do? I asked myself.
Should I go in?
Yes.
I took a deep breath and lowered myself into the opening.
23
Three steep steps led down to a dim entryway. A single red light down near the
floor gave off the only light.
I stepped into the dark red glow, then stopped and listened.
I could hear voices speaking softly in the next room.
Trailing my hand along the bare, concrete wall, I moved slowly toward the
voices. An open doorway came up on my right.
I stopped outside it. Then I slowly, carefully peered in.
I stared into a large, square room. Four torches hanging at the front of the
room sent out flickering orange light.
The counselors sat on long wooden benches, facing a low stage. A purple
banner hung over the stage. It proclaimed: ONLY THE BEST.
It’s a little theater, I realized. Some kind of meeting hall.
But why is it hidden away in the woods? And why are the counselors all
meeting here tonight?
I didn’t have to wait long for my answer.
Buddy stepped on to the small stage. He walked quickly into the flickering
orange torchlight. Then he turned to face the audience of counselors.
I crept into the doorway. There were no torches in the back of the hall. It
was pitch-black back there.
Walking on tiptoe, I edged my way along the back wall.
The door to a closet of some kind stood open. I ducked into it.
Buddy raised both hands. The counselors instantly stopped talking. They all
sat up straight and stared forward at him.
“Time to refresh ourselves,” Buddy called out. His voice echoed off the
concrete walls.
The counselors sat stiffly. No one moved. No one made a sound.
Buddy pulled a gold coin from his pocket. A King Coin, I figured. It
dangled on a long gold chain.
“Time to refresh our minds,” Buddy said. “Time to refresh our mission.”
He raised the gold coin high. It glowed in the torchlight as he began to
swing it. Back and forth. Slowly.
“Clear your minds,” he instructed them, speaking softly now. “Clear your
minds, as I have cleared mine.”
The gleaming gold coin swung slowly back and forth. Back and forth.
“Clear… clear… clear your minds,” Buddy chanted.
He is hypnotizing them! I realized.
Buddy is hypnotizing all the counselors. And he’s been hypnotized, too!
I took a step forward. I couldn’t believe what I was seeing and hearing!
“Clear your minds to serve the master!” Buddy declared. “For that is why
we are here. To serve the master in all his glory!”
“To serve the master!” the counselors all chanted back together.
Who is the master? I asked myself.
What are they talking about?
Buddy continued chanting out slogans to the crowd of counselors. His eyes
were wide. He never blinked.
“We do not think!” he shouted. “We do not feel! We give ourselves up to
serve the master!”
And suddenly I had an answer to some of my questions.
Now I knew why Buddy hadn’t cried out, hadn’t collapsed to the ground
when I swung the bat into his chest.
He had hypnotized away all feeling.
He was in some kind of trance. He couldn’t feel the bat. He couldn’t feel
anything.
“Only The Best!” Buddy cried, raising both fists into the air.
“Only The Best!” the counselors all repeated. Their unblinking faces
appeared strange, frozen in the flickering orange light.
“Only The Best! Only The Best!”
They all chanted the slogan over and over. Their voices echoed loudly off
the walls. Only their mouths moved. Like puppets.
“Only The Best can serve the master!” Buddy shouted.
“Only The Best!” the counselors chanted one more time.
Buddy had been swinging the gold coin over his head during the entire
performance. Now he lowered it back into the pocket of his shorts.
The room grew silent.
A heavy silence. An eerie silence.
And then I sneezed.
24
I cupped my hand over my mouth.
Too late.
I sneezed again.
Buddy’s mouth opened wide in surprise. He jabbed a finger in the air,
pointing at me.
Several counselors jumped to their feet and spun around.
I turned to the door. Could I escape through it before one of them caught
me?
No.
No way I could get over there.
My legs were shaking. But I forced myself to move. I backed against the
wall.
Why had I stepped so far into the room? Why hadn’t I stayed in the safety
of the doorway?
“Who’s there?” I heard Buddy call. “It’s so dark. Who is it?”
Good! I thought. He didn’t know it was me.
But in seconds, they’d grab me and drag me into the light.
I took another step back. Another.
Darkness fell over me.
I spun around. “Ohh!” I cried out when I saw that I had nearly toppled
down a steep stairway.
It wasn’t a closet after all.
Black stone steps curved sharply down. Where did they lead?
I couldn’t guess. But I had no choice. The steps were my only chance of
escape.
I leaned against the wall and plunged down the stairs. My shoes slid on the
smooth stones.
I nearly tripped and went sailing head first. But I grabbed the wall and
steadied myself as I started to fall.
The stairs curved down. Down.
The air grew hot and sour. I held my breath. The air smelled like sour milk.
A strange, deep moan rumbled up from down below.
I stopped to catch my breath.
Listened hard.
The low moan rolled up the stairway again. A whiff of sour air invaded my
nostrils.
I turned back. Was I being followed? Had the counselors seen me escape
through the open door?
No. It had been too dark. I didn’t hear anyone on the stairs. They weren’t
following me.
What smelled so bad down below?
I wanted to stop right there. I didn’t want to climb down any farther.
But what choice did I have? I knew they’d be searching for me upstairs.
Leaning a hand against the stone wall, I made my way down.
The stairway led into a long, narrow tunnel. I could see pale light at the end
of it. Another deep moan rumbled in the distance. The floor shook.
I took a long breath and passed quickly through the tunnel. The air grew hot
and damp. My shoes splashed through puddles on the tunnel floor.
Where does this lead? I wondered. Will it take me back outside?
As I neared the end of the tunnel, a whiff of sour air made me choke. I
coughed and struggled to stop my stomach from heaving.
What a disgusting smell!
Like decayed meat and rotten eggs. Like garbage left out in the sun for days
and days.
I pressed both hands over my mouth. The odor was so strong, I could taste
it!
I gagged. Once. Twice.
Don’t think about the smell! I ordered myself. Think about something else.
Think about fresh flowers. Think about sweet-smelling perfume.
Somehow, I calmed my stomach.
Then, pinching two fingers over my nose to keep the odor out, I stumbled to
the end of the tunnel.
I stopped as the tunnel gave way to a huge, brightly lit chamber.
I stopped and stared—at the ugliest, most frightening thing I had ever seen
in my life!
25
Squinting into the bright light, I saw dozens of kids with mops, and buckets, and
water hoses.
At first, I thought they were cleaning off a giant, purple balloon. Bigger
than any balloon in the Thanksgiving Day parade!
But as the water sprayed over it and the mops soaped its sides, the balloon
let out a loud groan.
And I realized I wasn’t staring at a balloon. It was a creature. And the
creature was alive. I was staring at a monster.
I was staring at King Jellyjam.
Not a cute little mascot. But a fat, gross, purple mound of slime, nearly as
big as a house. Wearing a gold crown.
Two enormous, watery yellow eyes rolled around in his head. He smacked
his fat purple lips and groaned again. Hunks of thick, white goo dripped from his
huge, hairy nostrils.
The disgusting odor rolled off his body. Even holding my nose couldn’t
keep out the sour stench.
He smelled like dead fish, rotting garbage, sour milk, and burning rubber—
all at once!
The gold crown bounced on top of his slimy, wet head. His purple stomach
heaved, as if an ocean wave was breaking inside him. And he let out a putrid
burp that shook the walls.
The kids—dozens of them—worked frantically. They circled the ugly
monster. They hosed him down. Scrubbed his body with mops and sponges and
brushes.
And as they worked, little round objects rained down on them. Click. Click.
Click. The little round things clattered to the floor.
Snails!
Snails popping out through King Jellyjam’s skin.
I started to gag again when I realized the hideous creature was sweating
snails!
I staggered back into the tunnel, pressing my hands over my mouth.
How could those kids stand the horrible, sour stench?
Why were they washing him? Why were they working so hard?
I gasped when I recognized some of the kids.
Alicia!
She held a hose with both hands and sprayed King Jellyjam’s bulging,
heaving stomach. Her red hair was soaked and matted to her forehead. She cried
as she worked, bawling loudly.
I saw Jeff. Rubbing a mop up and down on the monster’s side.
I opened my mouth to call to Alicia and Jeff. But my breath caught in my
throat, and no sound came out.
And then someone came running toward me. Stumbling and staggering.
Into the tunnel. Out of the bright light.
Dierdre!
A dripping sponge in one fist. Her streaky blond hair drenched. Her clothes
wrinkled and soaked.
“Dierdre!” I managed to choke out.
“Get away from here!” she cried. “Wendy—run!”
“But—but—” I sputtered. “What is happening? Why are you doing this?”
Dierdre uttered a sob. “Only The Best!” she whispered. “Only The Best get
to be King Jellyjam’s slaves!”
“Huh?” I gaped at her as she trembled in front of me, shivering from the
cold water that had drenched her.
“Don’t you see?” Dierdre cried. “These are all winners. All six-coin
winners. He gets the strongest kids. The best workers.”
“But—why?” I demanded.
Snails popped through the creature’s skin and clicked as they hit the hard
floor. A wave of sour stench blew over us as another rumbling burp escaped his
swollen lips.
“Why are you all washing him?” I asked Dierdre.
“He—he has to be washed all the time!” Dierdre exclaimed with a sob. “He
has to be kept wet. And he can’t stand his own smell. So he gets the strongest
kids down here. And makes us wash him night and day.”
“But, Dierdre—” I started.
“If we stop washing,” she continued. “If we try to take a rest, he—he’ll eat
us!” Her entire body shook. “He—he ate three kids today!”
“No!” I cried, gasping in horror.
“He’s so disgusting!” Dierdre wailed. “Those horrible snails popping out of
his body… that putrid smell.”
She grabbed my arm. Her hand was wet and cold. “The counselors are all
hypnotized,” she whispered. “King Jellyjam has total control over them.”
“I—I know,” I told her.
“Get out of here! Hurry!” Dierdre pleaded, squeezing my arm. “Get help,
Wendy. Please—”
An angry roar made us both jump.
“Oh, no!” Dierdre wailed. “He’s seen us! It’s too late!”
26
The monster let out another roar.
Dierdre loosened her grip on my arm. We both turned toward him, shaking
with fright.
He was bellowing at the ceiling, roaring just to keep everyone terrified. His
watery yellow eyes were shut. He hadn’t seen Dierdre and me—yet.
“Get help!” Dierdre whispered to me. Then she raised the sponge and ran
back to her place at King Jellyjam’s side.
I froze for a moment. Froze in horror. In disbelief.
Another rumbling burp jolted me from my thoughts and sent me scurrying
through the tunnel. At least now I knew why the camp ground shook so often!
The sour stench followed me through the tunnel and back up the curving,
stone steps. I wondered if I could ever get rid of it. I wondered if I could ever
breathe freely again.
How can I help those kids? I asked myself. What can I do?
I was too terrified to think clearly.
As I ran through the darkness, I could picture King Jellyjam smacking his
gross purple lips. I could see him rolling his yellow eyes. And the ugly black
snails squeezing out through his skin.
I felt sick as I reached the top of the stairs. But I knew I didn’t have time to
worry about myself. I had to save the kids who had been forced to be the
monster’s slaves. And I had to save the rest of the kids in camp—before they
became slaves, too.
I poked my head out of the closet door. The four torches still burned at the
front of the small theater. But the room was empty.
Where were the counselors? Out searching for me?
Probably.
Where can I go? I asked myself. I can’t spend the night in this closet. I have
to breathe some fresh air. I have to go somewhere where I can think.
Carefully, I made my way out of the low igloo. Into the starless night.
Hiding behind a wide tree trunk, my eyes searched the woods.
Narrow beams of white light from flashlights darted through the trees, over
the ground.
Yes, I told myself. The counselors are searching for me.
I backed up, away from the crisscrossing lights. Trying not to make a
sound, I crept between the trees and tall weeds, toward the path that led to the
lodge.
Can I get to the dorms and warn everyone? I wondered. Will anyone believe
me? Will there be counselors guarding the dorms? Waiting for me to show up?
I heard voices on the path. I ducked behind a tree and let two counselors
pass. Their flashlights made wide circles over the sloping hill.
As soon as they were out of sight, I darted out from the trees. I ran down
the hill. Keeping in deep shadows, I made my way past the swimming pool. Past
the tennis courts. All dark and silent now.
A clump of tall hedges beside the track would hide me from all sides, I
realized. I ducked behind the hedges, gasping for breath. Dropping to my knees,
I crawled into their shelter.
I settled myself on the prickly pine needles beneath the hedges. And peered
out. Only darkness now.
I took a deep breath. Then another. Such sweet-smelling air.
I’ve got to think, I told myself. Got to think…
Shouting voices startled me awake.
When had I fallen asleep? Where was I?
I blinked several times. Sat up and stretched.
My body felt stiff. My back ached. Every muscle ached.
I gazed around. Discovered I was still hidden inside the hedges. A gray,
cloudy morning. The sun trying to burn through the high clouds.
And the voices?
Cheers?
I raised myself up and peered through the hedges.
The track competition! It had just begun. I saw six boys in shorts and Tshirts, leaning forward as they ran around the track. A crowd of kids and
counselors cheering them on.
And in the lead?
Elliot!
“No!” I cried hoarsely, my voice still choked with sleep.
I stepped out from the hedges. Made my way across the grass toward the
track.
I knew I had to stop him. I couldn’t let him win the race. I couldn’t let him
win his sixth coin. If he did, they’d make Elliot a slave, too!
He ran hard. He pulled far out in front of the other five.
What could I do? What?
In my panic, I remembered our signal.
My two-fingered whistle. My signal for Elliot to take it easy.
He’ll hear the whistle and slow down, I told myself.
I raised two fingers to my mouth. I blew.
No sound came out. My mouth was too dry. My heart thudded in my chest.
I tried again. No. No whistle.
Elliot turned into the last lap. There was no way to stop him from winning
now.
27
No way to stop him—unless I beat him there!
With a desperate cry, I plunged forward and started to run to the track.
My shoes pounded the grass. I kept my eyes on Elliot and the finishing line
as I ran. Faster. Faster.
If only I could fly!
Loud cheers rang out as Elliot neared the finish. The other five boys were
miles behind!
My shoes thudded onto the asphalt track. My chest felt about to burst. It
hurt to breathe. My breath came in loud wheezes.
Faster. Faster.
I heard cries of surprise as I raced over the track. I plunged up behind
Elliot, reached out both hands—and tackled him from behind.
We both toppled in a heap, rolling over the hard track, onto the grass. The
other boys raced past us to the finish line.
“Wendy, you jerk!” Elliot screamed, jumping to his feet.
“I—can’t explain now!” I shouted back, struggling to breathe, struggling to
stop the aching in my chest.
I scrambled to my feet and pulled Elliot up. He angrily tried to jerk free.
“Why’d you do that, Wendy? Why?”
I saw three counselors running toward me.
“Hurry—!” I ordered my brother. I pulled him away. “Just hurry!”
I think he saw the terror in my eyes. I think he realized that tackling him
was a desperate act. I think he saw how serious I was.
Elliot stopped protesting and started to run.
I led him over the grass. Up the sloping hill by the lodge. Into the woods.
“Where are we going?” he called breathlessly. “Tell me what’s happening!”
“You’ll see in a minute!” I called back. “Get ready for a really bad smell!”
“Huh? Wendy—have you totally lost it?”
I didn’t answer. I kept running. I led the way into the woods. To the iglooshaped building.
At the low entrance, I turned back to see if we were being followed. I didn’t
see anyone.
Elliot followed me into the theater. The torches weren’t lit. It was pitchblack inside.
Feeling my way along the back wall, I found the closet door. I pulled it
open and led the way down the curving stairs.
Halfway down, the sour odor floated up to greet us. Elliot cried out and
cupped both hands over his nose and mouth. “It stinks!” His cry was muffled by
his hands.
“It gets worse,” I told him. “Try not to think about it.”
We jogged side by side through the long tunnel. I wished I had time to warn
Elliot. I wished I could tell him what he was about to see.
But I was desperate to save Dierdre, Alicia, and the others.
Gasping from the smell, I burst into King Jellyjam’s brightly lit chamber.
Water from a dozen hoses splashed over the monster’s purple body. Kids
scrubbed furiously as he sighed and groaned.
I saw the startled horror on my brother’s face. But I couldn’t worry about
Elliot now.
“Hit the floor!” I screamed at the top of my lungs, cupping my hands into a
megaphone. “EVERYBODY—HIT THE FLOOR! NOW!”
I had a plan.
Would it work?
28
The monster’s watery yellow eyes grew wide with surprise. His bloated lips
parted. I could see two pink tongues dart and coil inside his mouth.
A few of the kids dropped their hoses and mops and flattened themselves on
the floor. Others turned to stare at me.
“Stop washing him!” I cried. “Put down your hoses and brushes! Stop
working! And hit the floor!”
Beside me, Elliot uttered gasping sounds. I glimpsed him struggling to keep
the sick smell from overpowering him.
King Jellyjam let out a furious roar as the rest of the kids obeyed my
instructions. Thick, white slime dripped from his nose. His two tongues flicked
out between his purple lips.
“Get flat!” I screamed to the kids. “Stay down!”
And then I saw the monster raise a fat purple arm. With a disgusting groan,
he leaned over. His slimy flesh rippled all over his body as he reached out.
Reached out to grab Alicia!
“Help! He’s going to eat me!” Alicia shrieked. She started to get up.
“No!” I shrieked. “Stay down! Stay flat!”
With a terrified cry, Alicia dropped back to the floor.
King Jellyjam swung his fat hand down. Fumbled it over her. Tried to lift
the little girl up. Tried again. Again.
But I had figured right! The monster’s fingers were too big, too clumsy to
pick up anyone who lay flat on the floor.
King Jellyjam tilted his head back and uttered a roar of disgust.
I cupped my hand over my nose as the disgusting odor grew more intense.
Snails pop-pop-popped out of his skin. Rolled down his slimy body. Bounced
noisily onto the floor.
The monster flailed his arms. He leaned down again and struggled to pick
up some other kids.
But they pressed themselves flat on the floor. He couldn’t lift them.
He roared again, weaker this time. His eyes rolled wildly in his enormous
head.
The smell burned my eyes. It swirled around me, surrounded me in its sour
stench.
King Jellyjam grabbed for a hose. Couldn’t pick it up. He slammed his hand
into a bucket. Struggled frantically to splash water on himself.
I stood trembling. Watching every move.
My plan was working. I knew it would work. It had to work!
The stench grew even stronger. I could taste it. I could smell it on my skin.
King Jellyjam flailed both arms. Frantically, he struggled to wash himself.
His roars became groans. His body began to shake.
I gasped as he narrowed his eyes at me. He raised a swollen purple finger
and pointed. Accusing me!
He leaned forward. Reached out.
Swiped out his enormous hand.
I couldn’t move. I was too stunned.
I shuddered.
His hand slid over me. And before I could struggle, he began to tighten his
slimy, stinking fingers around my body.
29
“Ohhh.” I uttered a horrified moan.
The fat, wet fingers tightened. Waves of odor rose up around me.
I held my breath. But the smell was everywhere.
The fingers wrapped themselves tighter.
The monster began to lift me off the ground. Raise me toward his gaping
mouth. The two tongues darted and flicked.
And then the tongues drooped over his purple lips.
The fingers loosened their grip.
I slid free as King Jellyjam groaned and fell forward. Kids rolled quickly
out of the way. King Jellyjam toppled over headfirst.
The gold crown bounced away. The monster’s body made a loud splat as it
spread over the floor.
“Yes!” I choked out happily. I was still shaking, still trying to forget the
slimy feel of his fingers against my skin. “Yes!”
My plan had worked perfectly.
The kids stopped washing—and King Jellyjam suffocated from his own
foul smell!
“Are you okay?” Elliot asked in a trembling voice.
I nodded. “Yes. I think I’m going to be fine.”
Elliot held his nose. “I’ll never complain about Dad’s garden fertilizer
again!” he declared.
Cheering and shouting, the other kids climbed to their feet.
“Thank you!” Alicia cried, wrapping me in a hug. The others rushed
forward to thank me, too.
There were lots of hugs, lots of tears as we made our way up to the theater
and then out into the woods.
“We are out of here!” I cried happily to Elliot.
But we all stopped at the edge of the woods when we saw the counselors.
They all stood in front of us, dozens of them, side by side in their white
shirts and shorts. They had formed a line along the path.
And I could see from the hard expressions set on their faces that they had
not come to welcome everyone back.
As I stared from face to face, Buddy stepped forward. He gave a signal to
the other counselors. “Don’t let them get away!” he cried.
30
The counselors stepped forward, moving in a line. Their expressions remained
hard and threatening. They kept their arms at their sides.
They moved stiffly. Like robots. In a trance.
They took two more steps.
Then a shrill whistle broke the silence.
“Stop right there! Everybody freeze!” a man’s voice boomed.
I heard another shrill whistle.
I turned to see several blue-uniformed police officers running up the hill.
The counselors shook their heads, blinked, uttered soft cries. They made no
attempt to run.
“Where are we?” I heard Holly mutter.
“What’s happening?” another counselor asked.
They all appeared dazed and confused. The police whistles seemed to have
broken the trance that held them.
The other kids and I all cheered happily as the officers swarmed up the hill.
“How did you know we needed help?” I called.
“We didn’t,” an officer replied. “A horrible smell floated into town. We
wanted to find out what was causing it. We followed it here!”
I had to laugh. The same smell that had killed the monster had actually
saved us kids.
“We didn’t know there was a problem at this camp,” an officer announced.
“We’ll contact your parents as soon as we can.”
Elliot and I led the way down the hill. We were so eager to see Mom and
Dad!
The counselors muttered to themselves, gazing around, trying to figure out
what had happened.
I turned to Buddy as Elliot and I walked past him. “Are you feeling better?”
I asked.
He narrowed his blue eyes at me and squinted hard. He didn’t seem to be
able to focus. “Only The Best,” he murmured. “Only The Best.”
Elliot and I were never so glad to be home!
“What took you so long to find us?” Elliot demanded.
Mom and Dad shook their heads. “The police checked everywhere, trying
to find you two,” Dad replied. “They called the camp several times. The
counselor who answered the phone told the police that you weren’t there.”
“We were so worried,” Mom said, biting her bottom lip. “So terribly
worried. When we found the trailer empty, we didn’t know what to think!”
“Well, we’re home safe and sound now,” I replied with a grin.
“Maybe you two would like to go away to a real camp next summer,” Dad
said.
“Uh… no way!” Elliot and I answered together.
Two weeks later, we had a surprise visitor.
I opened the door to find Buddy on the front stoop. His blond hair was
neatly brushed. He wore chinos, a blue-and-white-striped sportshirt, and a dark
blue tie.
“I’m so sorry about what happened at camp,” Buddy said.
I was still too shocked at seeing him to reply. I just held on to the door and
gaped at him.
“Is Elliot home?” Buddy asked.
“Hi.” Elliot stepped up beside me. “Buddy! What’s up?”
“I brought you this,” Buddy replied. He reached into his pants pocket and
pulled out a gold coin.
“It’s a King Coin,” he told Elliot. “You earned it, remember? You actually
won the race.”
Elliot reached out for it. Then stopped. His hand hung in midair.
I knew what my brother was thinking. This would be his sixth King Coin.
Should he take it?
Finally, he grabbed it. “Thanks, Buddy,” Elliot said.
Buddy said good-bye and gave us a wave. Elliot and I watched him get into
a car and drive away. Then we closed the door behind us.
“Are you sure you should’ve taken that?” I asked Elliot.
“Why not?” he replied. “That purple monster is dead—right? What could
happen?”
Five minutes later, we both smelled the horrible odor at the same time.
“Yuck!” Elliot groaned. He swallowed hard. “Wendy, wh-what’s that
smell?” he stammered.
“I—I don’t know,” I replied in a shaky voice.
I heard Mom laugh behind us. We turned to see her standing in the doorway
to the kitchen. “What’s wrong?” she asked. “I have a pot of brussels sprouts
boiling on the stove!”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

REVENGE OF THE
LAWN GNOMES
Goosebumps - 34
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
Clack, Clack, Clack.
The Ping-Pong ball clattered over the basement floor. “Yes!” I cried as I
watched Mindy chase after it.
It was a hot, sticky June afternoon. The first Monday of summer vacation.
And Joe Burton had just made another excellent shot.
That’s me. Joe Burton. I’m twelve. And there is nothing I love better than
slamming the ball in my older sister’s face and making her chase after it.
I’m not a bad sport. I just like to show Mindy that she’s not as great as she
thinks she is.
You might guess that Mindy and I do not always agree on things. The fact
is, I’m really not like anyone else in my family.
Mindy, Mom, and Dad are all blond, skinny, and tall. I have brown hair.
And I’m kind of pudgy and short. Mom says I haven’t had my growth spurt yet.
So I’m a shrimp. And it’s hard for me to see over the Ping-Pong net. But I
can still beat Mindy with one hand tied behind my back.
As much as I love to win, Mindy hates to lose. And she doesn’t play fair at
all. Every time I make a great move, she says it doesn’t count.
“Joe, kicking the ball over the net is not legal,” she whined as she scooped
out the ball from under the couch.
“Give me a break!” I cried. “All the Ping-Pong champions do it. They call it
the Soccer Slam.”
Mindy rolled her huge green eyes. “Oh, puh-lease!” she muttered. “My
serve.”
Mindy is weird. She’s probably the weirdest fourteen-year-old in town.
Why? I’ll tell you why.
Take her room. Mindy arranges all her books in alphabetical order—by
author. Do you believe it?
And she fills out a card for each one. She files them in the top drawer of her
desk. Her own private card catalog.
If she could, she’d probably cut the tops off the books so they’d be all the
same size.
She is so organized. Her closet is organized by color. All the reds come
first. Then the oranges. Then the yellows. Then come the greens, blues, and
purples. She hangs her clothes in the same order as the rainbow.
And at dinner, she eats around her plate clockwise. Really! I’ve watched
her. First her mashed potatoes. Then all her peas. And then her meat loaf. If she
finds one pea in her mashed potatoes, she totally loses it!
Weird. Really weird.
Me? I’m not organized. I’m cool. I’m not serious like my sister. I can be
pretty funny. My friends think I’m a riot. Everyone does. Except Mindy.
“Come on, serve already,” I called out. “Before the end of the century.”
Mindy stood on her side of the table, carefully lining up her shot. She
stands in exactly the same place every time. With her feet exactly the same space
apart. Her footprints are worn into the carpet.
“Ten-eight and serving,” Mindy finally called out. She always calls out the
score before she serves. Then she swung her arm back.
I held the paddle up to my mouth like a microphone. “She pulls her arm
back,” I announced. “The crowd is hushed. It’s a tense moment.”
“Joe, stop acting like a jerk,” she snapped. “I have to concentrate.”
I love pretending I’m a sports announcer. It drives Mindy nuts.
Mindy pulled her arm back again. She tossed the Ping-Pong ball up into the
air. And…
“A spider!” I screamed. “On your shoulder!”
“Yaaaiiii!” Mindy dropped the paddle and began slapping her shoulder
furiously. The ball clattered onto the table.
“Gotcha!” I cried. “My point.”
“No way!” Mindy shouted angrily. “You’re just a cheater, Joe.” She
smoothed the shoulders of her pink T-shirt carefully. She picked up the ball and
swatted it over the net.
“At least I’m a funny cheater!” I replied. I twirled around in a complete
circle and belted the ball. It bounced once on my side before sailing over the net.
“Foul,” Mindy announced. “You’re always fouling.”
I waved my paddle at her. “Get a life,” I said. “It’s a game. It’s supposed to
be fun.”
“I’m beating you,” Mindy replied. “That’s fun.”
I shrugged. “Who cares? Winning isn’t everything.”
“Where did you read that?” she asked. “In a bubble gum comic?” Then she
rolled her eyes again. I think someday her eyes are going to roll right out of her
head!
I rolled my eyes, too—back into my head until only the whites showed.
“Neat trick, huh?”
“Cute, Joe,” Mindy muttered. “Really cute. You’d better watch out. One
day your eyes might not come back down. Which would be an improvement!”
“Lame joke,” I replied. “Very lame.”
Mindy lined up her feet carefully again.
“She’s in her serve position,” I spoke into my paddle. “She’s nervous.
She’s…”
“Joe!” Mindy whined. “Quit it!”
She tossed the Ping-Pong ball into the air. She swung the paddle, and—
“Gross!” I shouted. “What’s that big green glob hanging out of your nose?”
Mindy ignored me this time. She tapped the ball over the net.
I dove forward and whacked it with the tip of my paddle. It spun high over
the net and landed in the corner of the basement. Between the washing machine
and the dryer.
Mindy jogged after the ball on her long, thin legs. “Hey, where’s Buster?”
she called out. “Wasn’t he sleeping next to the dryer?”
Buster is our dog. A giant black Rottweiler with a head the size of a
basketball. He loves snoozing on the old sleeping bag we keep in the corner of
the basement. Especially when we’re down here playing Ping-Pong.
Everyone is afraid of Buster. For about three seconds. Then he starts licking
them with his long, wet tongue. Or rolls onto his back and begs to have his belly
scratched.
“Where is he, Joe?” Mindy bit her lip.
“He’s around here somewhere,” I replied. “Why are you always worrying
about Buster? He weighs over a hundred pounds. He can take care of himself.”
Mindy frowned. “Not if Mr. McCall catches him. Remember what he said
the last time Buster chomped on his tomato plants?”
Mr. McCall is our next-door neighbor. Buster loves the McCalls’ yard. He
likes to nap under their huge, shady elm tree.
And dig little holes all over their lawn. And sometimes big holes.
And snack in their vegetable garden.
Last year, Buster dug up every head of Mr. McCall’s lettuce. And ate his
biggest zucchini plant for dessert.
I guess that’s why Mr. McCall hates Buster. He said the next time he
catches him in his garden, he’s going to turn him into fertilizer.
My dad and Mr. McCall are the two best gardeners in town. They’re nuts
about gardening. Totally nuts.
I think working in a garden is kind of fun, too. But I don’t let that get
around. My friends think gardening is for nerds.
Dad and Mr. McCall are always battling it out at the annual garden show.
Mr. McCall usually takes first place. But last year, Dad and I won the blue
ribbon for our tomatoes.
That drove Mr. McCall crazy. When Dad’s name was announced, Mr.
McCall’s face turned as red as our tomatoes.
So Mr. McCall is desperate to win this year. He started stocking up on plant
food and bug spray months ago.
And he planted something that nobody else in North Bay grows. Strange
orange-green melons called casabas.
Dad says that Mr. McCall has made a big mistake. He says the casabas will
never grow any bigger than tennis balls. The growing season in Minnesota is too
short.
“McCall’s garden loses,” I declared. “Our tomatoes are definitely going to
win again this year. And thanks to my special soil, they’ll grow as big as beach
balls!”
“So will your head,” Mindy shot back.
I stuck out my tongue and crossed my eyes. It seemed like a good reply.
“Whose serve is it?” I asked. Mindy was taking so long, I lost track.
“It’s still my serve,” she replied, carefully placing her feet.
We were interrupted by footsteps. Heavy, booming footsteps on the stairs
behind Mindy.
“Who is that?” Mindy cried.
And then he appeared behind her. And my eyes nearly bulged right out of
my head.
“Oh, no!” I screamed. “It’s… McCall!”
2
“Joe!” he roared. The floor shook as he stomped toward Mindy.
All the color drained from Mindy’s face. Her hand grasped her paddle so
tightly that her knuckles turned white. She tried to swing around to look behind
her, but she couldn’t. Her feet were frozen in her Ping-Pong-ball footprints.
McCall’s hands balled into two huge fists, and he looked really, really
angry.
“I’m going to get you. And this time I’m going to win. Throw me a
paddle.”
“You jerk!” Mindy sputtered. “I-I knew it wasn’t Mr. McCall. I knew it was
Moose.”
Moose is Mr. McCall’s son and my best friend. His real name is Michael,
but everyone calls him Moose. Even his parents.
Moose is the biggest kid in the whole sixth grade. And the strongest. His
legs are as thick as tree trunks. And so is his neck. And he’s very, very loud. Just
like his dad.
Mindy can’t stand Moose. She says he’s a gross slob.
I think he’s cool.
“Yo, Joe!” Moose bellowed. “Where’s my paddle?” His big arm muscles
bulged as he reached out to grab mine.
I pulled my hand back. But his beefy hand slapped my shoulder so hard that
my head nearly rolled off.
“Whoaaa!” I yelped.
Moose let out a deep laugh that shook the basement walls. And then he
ended it with a burp.
“Moose, you’re disgusting,” Mindy groaned.
Moose scratched his dark brown crew cut. “Gee, thanks, Mindy.”
“Thanks for what?” she demanded.
“For this.” He reached out and snatched the paddle right out of her hand.
Moose swung Mindy’s paddle around wildly in the air. He missed a
hanging lamp by an inch. “Ready for a real game, Joe?”
He threw the Ping-Pong ball into the air and drew his powerful arm back.
Wham! The ball rocketed across the room. It bounced off two walls and flew
back over the net toward me.
“Foul!” Mindy cried. “That’s not allowed.”
“Cool!” I exclaimed. I dove for the ball and missed. Moose has an amazing
serve.
Moose slammed the ball again. It shot over the net and whacked me in the
chest.
Thwock!
“Hey!” I cried. I rubbed the stinging spot.
“Good shot, huh?” He grinned.
“Yeah. But you’re supposed to hit the table,” I told him.
Moose pumped his fat fists into the air. “Super Moose!” he bellowed.
“Strong as a superhero!”
My friend Moose is a pretty wild guy. Mindy says he’s a total animal. I
think he’s just got a lot of enthusiasm.
I served while he was still throwing his arms around.
“Hey! No fair!” he declared. Moose charged the table and clobbered the
ball. And flattened it into a tiny white pancake.
I groaned. “That’s ball number fifteen for this month,” I announced.
I grabbed the little pancake and tossed it into a blue plastic milk crate on the
floor. The crate was piled high with dozens of flattened Ping-Pong balls.
“Hey! I think you broke your record!” I declared.
“All right!” Moose exclaimed. He leaped on top of the Ping-Pong table and
began jumping up and down. “Super Moose!” he yelled.
“Stop it, you jerk!” Mindy screamed. “You’re going to break the table.” She
covered her face with her hands.
“Super Moose! Super Moose!” he chanted.
The Ping-Pong table swayed. Then it sagged under his weight. He was even
starting to get on my nerves now. “Moose, get off! Get off!” I wailed.
“Who’s going to make me?” he demanded.
Then we all heard a loud, sharp craaaaack.
“You’re breaking it!” Mindy shrieked. “Get off!”
Moose scrambled off the table. He lurched toward me, holding his hands
straight out like the zombie monster we’d seen in Killer Zombie from Planet
Zero on TV. “Now I’m going to destroy you!”
Then he hurled himself at me.
As he smashed into me, I staggered back and fell onto the dusty cement
floor.
Moose jumped onto my stomach and pinned me down. “Say ‘Moose’s
tomatoes are the best!’ ” he ordered. He bounced up and down on my chest.
“Moo… Moose’s,” I wheezed. “Tomat… I can’t… breathe… really…
help.”
“Say it!” Moose insisted. He placed his powerful hands around my neck.
And squeezed.
“Ugggggh,” I gagged. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move.
My head rolled to the side.
“Moose!” I heard Mindy shriek. “Let him go! Let him go! What have you
done to him?”
3
“M-Miiindy,” I moaned.
Moose pulled his hands from my throat and lifted his powerful body off my
chest.
“What did you do to him—you big monster?” Mindy shrieked. She knelt
down by my side and bent over me. She brushed my hair from my eyes.
“Y-you’re a… a…” I stopped and coughed weakly.
“What, Joe? What is it?” Mindy demanded softly.
“You’re a SUCKER!” I exclaimed. And burst out laughing.
Mindy jerked her head back. “You little weasel!”
“Tricked you! Tricked you!” I cheered.
“Way to go, dude!” Moose grinned.
I scrambled to my feet and slapped Moose a high five. “Suc-ker! Suc-ker!”
we chanted over and over.
Mindy folded her skinny arms in front of her and glared at us. “Not funny,”
she snapped. “I’m never going to believe another word you say! Never!”
“Oh, I’m sooooo scared!” I said. I knocked my knees together. “See? My
knees are trembling.”
“I’m shaking, too,” Moose joined in, wiggling his whole body.
“You guys are totally juvenile,” she announced. “I’m out of here.”
She slid her hands into the pockets of her white shorts and stomped away.
But then she suddenly stopped a few feet from the stairs.
In front of the high basement window.
The window that looked out onto Mr. McCall’s front yard.
She stared up through the window’s sheer white curtain for a second. She
squinted her eyes. Then she cried out, “No! Oh, no!”
“Nice try,” I replied, flicking a dust ball from the carpet in her direction.
“There’s nothing out there. I’m not falling for your lame trick!”
“No! It’s Buster!” Mindy cried. “He’s next door again!”
“Huh?” I sprinted to the window. And jumped onto a chair. I yanked the
filmy curtain aside.
Yes. There sat Buster. In the middle of the vegetable patch that covered Mr.
McCall’s front yard. “Oh, wow. He’s in the garden again,” I murmured.
“My garden! He’d better not be!” Moose declared, stomping up behind me.
He shoved me off the chair to take a look. “If my dad catches Buster in his
vegetables, he’ll turn that big mutt into mulch!”
“Come on! Hurry!” Mindy pleaded, tugging on my arm. “We have to get
Buster out of there. Right away. Before Moose’s dad catches him!”
Moose, Mindy, and I raced upstairs and out the front door. We charged
across our front lawn, toward the McCalls’ house.
At the edge of our lawn, we leaped across the line of yellow and white
petunias that Dad had planted. It separates our yard from the McCalls’ garden.
Mindy squeezed her fingernails deep into my arm. “Buster’s digging!” she
cried. “He’s going to destroy—the melons!”
Buster’s powerful front paws worked hard. He scraped at the dirt and green
plants. Mud and leaves flew everywhere.
“Stop that, Buster!” Mindy pleaded. “Stop that—now!”
Buster kept digging.
Moose glanced at his plastic wristwatch. “You’d better get that dog out of
there fast,” he warned. “It’s almost six o’clock. My dad comes out to water the
garden at six sharp.”
I’m terrified of Mr. McCall. I admit it. He’s so big, he makes Moose look
like a shrimp! And he’s mean.
“Buster, get over here!” I begged. Mindy and I both shouted to the dog.
But Buster ignored our cries.
“Don’t just stand there. Why don’t you pull that dumb mutt out of there?”
Moose demanded.
I shook my head. “We can’t! He’s too big. And stubborn. He won’t budge.”
I reached under my T-shirt and searched for the shiny metal dog whistle I
wear on a cord around my neck. I wear it day and night. Even under my
pajamas. It’s the only thing Buster will obey.
“It’s two minutes to six,” Moose warned, checking his watch. “Dad will be
out here any second!”
“Blow the whistle, Joe!” Mindy cried.
I brought the whistle up to my mouth. And gave a long, hard blow.
Moose snickered. “That whistle’s broken,” he said. “It didn’t make a
sound.”
“It’s a dog whistle,” Mindy replied in a superior tone. “It makes a really
high-pitched sound. Dogs can hear them, but people can’t. See?”
She pointed to Buster. He had lifted his nose out of the dirt and pricked up
his ears.
I blew the whistle again. Buster shook the dirt from his fur.
“Thirty seconds and counting,” Moose told us.
I blew the silent dog whistle one more time.
Yes!
Buster came trotting slowly toward us, wagging his stumpy tail.
“Hurry, Buster!” I pleaded. “Hurry!” I held my arms open wide.
“Buster—run—don’t trot!” Mindy begged.
Too late.
We heard a loud slam.
Moose’s front door flew open.
And Mr. McCall stepped out.
4
“Joe! Come over here. Now!” Moose’s dad barked at me.
He lumbered toward his garden, his big belly bouncing in front of him
under his blue T-shirt. “Get over here, boy—on the double!”
Mr. McCall is retired from the army. He’s used to barking out orders. And
having them obeyed.
I obeyed. Buster trotted by my side.
“Was that dog in my garden again?” Mr. McCall demanded, eyeing me
coldly. His cold stare could make your blood freeze.
“No, s-sir!” I stammered. Buster settled down beside me with a loud yawn.
I usually don’t tell lies. Except to Mindy. But Buster’s life was on the line. I
had to save Buster. Didn’t I?
Mr. McCall bounced up to his vegetable patch. He circled his tomatoes, his
corn, his zucchini, his casaba melons. He examined each stalk and leaf carefully.
Oh, wow, I thought. We’re in major trouble now.
Finally, he gazed up at us. His eyes narrowed. “If that mutt wasn’t in here,
why is the dirt all pawed up?”
“Maybe it was the wind?” I replied softly. It was worth a try. Maybe he’d
believe it.
Moose stood silently next to me. The only time he’s quiet is when his dad is
around.
“Um, Mr. McCall,” Mindy began. “We’ll make sure Buster stays out of
your yard. We promise!” Then she smiled her sweetest smile.
Mr. McCall scowled. “All right. But if I catch him even sniffing at my
melons, I’m calling the police and having that dog hauled off to the pound. And I
mean it.”
I gulped. I knew he meant it. Mr. McCall doesn’t kid around.
“Moose!” Mr. McCall snapped. “Bring the hose out here and water these
casabas! I told you they need to be watered at least five times a day.”
“See you later,” Moose muttered. He ducked his head and ran toward the
back of his house for the hose.
Mr. McCall shot one more dark glance at us. Then he lumbered up his front
steps and slammed the door.
“Maybe it was the wind?” Mindy rolled her eyes again. “Wow, that was fast
thinking, Joe!” She laughed.
“Oh, yeah? Well, at least I had an answer,” I replied. “And remember, it
was my whistle that saved Buster. All you did was smile that phony smile.”
Mindy and I headed toward our house, arguing all the way. But we stopped
when we heard a low moan. A frightening sound. Buster cocked his ears.
“Who’s that?” I whispered.
A second later, we found out. Dad lurched around the side of the house,
carrying a big watering can.
He was wearing his favorite gardening outfit—sneakers with holes in both
toes, baggy plaid shorts, and a red T-shirt that said “I’m All Thumbs in the
Garden.”
And he was moaning and groaning. Which was really weird. Because Dad
is always in an excellent mood when he’s gardening. Whistling. Smiling.
Cracking lame jokes.
But not today.
Today something was wrong. Really wrong.
“Kids… kids,” he moaned, staggering toward us. “I’ve been looking for
you.”
“Dad—what is it? What’s wrong?” Mindy demanded.
Dad clutched his head and swayed from side to side. He took a deep breath.
“I-I have something terrible to tell you.”
5
“What, Dad?” I cried. “Tell us.”
Dad spoke in a hoarse whisper. “I found a… a fruit fly on our tomatoes! On
our biggest tomato. The Red Queen!”
He wiped his sweaty forehead. “How could this happen? I misted. I
sprayed. I pruned. Twice this week alone.”
Dad shook his head in sorrow. “My poor tomatoes. If that fruit fly ruins my
Red Queen, I-I’ll have to pull out of the garden show!”
Mindy and I glanced at each other. I knew we were thinking the same thing.
The adults around here were getting a little weird.
“Dad, it’s only one fruit fly,” I pointed out.
“It only takes one, Joe. Just one fruit fly. And our chances for a blue ribbon
—destroyed. We have to do something. Right away.”
“What about that new bug spray?” I reminded him. “The stuff that came
last week from the Green Thumb catalog.”
Dad’s eyes lit up. He ran a hand through his flat, rumpled hair. “The Bug Be
Gone!” he exclaimed.
He jogged up the driveway to the garage. “Come on, kids!” he sang out.
“Let’s give it a try!” Dad was cheering up.
Mindy and I raced after him.
Dad pulled out three spray cans from a carton in the back of the garage. The
words “Wave Bye-Bye to Bugs with Bug Be Gone!” were printed on the labels.
A drawing showed a tearful bug carrying a suitcase. Waving bye-bye.
Dad handed one can to Mindy and one to me. “Let’s get that fruit fly!” he
cried, as we headed back to our garden.
We ripped the caps off the cans of Bug Be Gone. “One, two, three… spray!”
Dad commanded.
Dad and I showered the two dozen tomato plants tied to wooden stakes in
the middle of the garden.
Mindy hadn’t started yet. She was probably reading the ingredients on the
can.
“What’s all the fuss about?” my mother called, stepping out the back door.
Mom was wearing one of her around-the-house outfits. A pair of Dad’s old
baggy plaid shorts. And an old blue T-shirt he gave her when he came back from
a business trip a few years ago. The T-shirt said “I Mist You!” One of Dad’s
lame garden jokes.
“Hi, honey,” Dad called. “We’re about to destroy a fruit fly. Want to
watch?”
Mom laughed, crinkling up the corners of her green eyes. “Pretty tempting.
But I have to finish a greeting card design.”
Mom is a graphic artist. She has an office on the second floor of our house.
She can draw the most incredible pictures on her computer. Amazing sunsets,
mountains, and flowers.
“Dinner at seven-thirty, everybody. Okay?”
“Sounds good,” Dad called as Mom disappeared into the house. “Okay,
kids. Let’s finish spraying!”
Dad and I showered the tomato plants one more time. We even sprayed the
yellow squash plants nearby. Mindy squinted. Aimed the nozzle of her can
directly at the Red Queen. And let out a single neat drizzle.
One tiny fruit fly flapped its wings weakly and fell to the ground. Mindy
smiled in satisfaction.
“Good work!” Dad exclaimed.
He clapped us both on the back. “I think this calls for a celebration!” he
declared. “I have the perfect idea! A quick visit to Lawn Lovely!”
“Oh, nooooo,” Mindy and I groaned together.
Lawn Lovely is a store two blocks from our house. It’s the place where Dad
buys his lawn ornaments. A lot of lawn ornaments.
Dad is as nuts about lawn ornaments as he is about gardening. We have so
many lawn ornaments in our front yard, it’s impossible to mow the lawn!
What a crowd scene! We have two pink plastic flamingos. A cement angel
with huge white wings. A chrome ball on a silver platform. A whole family of
plaster skunks. A fountain with two kissing swans. A seal that balances a beach
ball on its nose. And a chipped plaster deer.
Weird, huh?
But Dad really loves them. He thinks they’re art or something.
And do you know what he does? He dresses them up on holidays. Pilgrim
hats for the skunks on Thanksgiving. Pirate costumes for the flamingos on
Halloween. Stove-pipe hats and little black beards for the swans on Lincoln’s
birthday.
Of course, neat and tidy Mindy can’t stand the lawn ornaments. Neither can
Mom. Every time Dad brings a new one home, Mom threatens to toss it into the
garbage.
“Dad, these lawn ornaments are totally embarrassing!” Mindy complained.
“People gawk from their cars and take pictures of our front yard. We’re a tourist
attraction!”
“Oh, please,” Dad groaned. “One person took a picture.”
That was last Christmas. When Dad dressed all the ornaments as Santa’s
helpers.
“Yeah. And that picture ended up in the newspaper!” Mindy moaned. “It
was soooo embarrassing.”
“Well, I think the ornaments are cool,” I replied. Someone had to defend
poor Dad.
Mindy just wrinkled her nose in disgust.
I know what really bugs Mindy about the ornaments. It’s the way Dad
sticks them in the yard. Without any order. If Mindy had her way, they would be
lined up like her shoes. In nice neat rows.
“Come on, guys,” Dad urged, starting down the driveway. “Let’s go see if a
new shipment of ornaments has come in.”
We had no choice.
Mindy and I trudged down the sidewalk after Dad. As we followed him, we
thought—no big deal. It’s almost dinnertime. We’ll just glance over the
ornaments at the store. Then we’ll go home.
We had no idea we were about to start the most horrifying adventure of our
lives.
6
“Can’t we drive, Dad?” Mindy complained as the three of us hiked up the steep
Summit Avenue hill toward Lawn Lovely. “It’s too hot to walk.”
“Oh, come on, Mindy. It’s only a couple of blocks. And it’s good exercise,”
Dad replied, taking long, brisk strides.
“But it’s sooooo hot,” Mindy whined. She brushed her bangs away from her
face and blotted her forehead with her hand.
Mindy was right. It was hot. But get serious. It was only a two-block walk.
“I’m hotter than you are,” I teased. Then I leaned into Mindy and shook my
sweaty head at her. “See?”
A few small beads of sweat flew onto Mindy’s T-shirt.
“You are so gross!” she shrieked, drawing back. “Dad! Tell him to stop
being so disgusting.”
“We’re almost there,” Dad replied. His voice sounded as if he were a
million miles away. He was probably dreaming about buying his next lawn
ornament.
Just up the block, I spotted the tall, pointy roof of Lawn Lovely. It jutted
into the sky, towering over all the houses around it.
What a weird place, I thought. Lawn Lovely is in an old, raggedy threestory house, set back from the street. The whole building is painted pink. Bright
pink. The windows are covered with brightly colored shutters. But none of the
colors match.
I think that’s another reason why Mindy hates this place.
The old house is not in good shape. The wooden floorboards on the front
porch are all sagging. And there is a hole in the porch where Mr. McCall fell
through last summer.
As we marched past the flagpole in the front yard, I spotted Mrs. Anderson
in the driveway. She owns Lawn Lovely. She lives there, too. On the second and
third floors.
Mrs. Anderson kneeled over a flock of pink plastic flamingos. She was
ripping off their plastic wrap and setting them in crooked rows on her lawn.
Mrs. Anderson reminds me of a flamingo. She’s real skinny and wears pink
all the time. Even her hair is sort of pink. Like cotton candy.
Lawn ornaments are the only things Mrs. Anderson sells. Plaster squirrels.
Kissing angels. Pink rabbits with wire whiskers. Long green worms wearing
little black hats. A whole flock of white geese. She has hundreds of ornaments.
Scattered all over her yard. Up the front steps to the porch. And right through the
door into the entire first floor of the house.
Mrs. Anderson carefully unwrapped another flamingo and set it down next
to a deer. She studied this arrangement, then moved the deer about an inch to the
left.
“Hello, Lilah!” my dad called out.
Mrs. Anderson didn’t answer. She’s a little hard of hearing.
“Hello, Lilah!” Dad repeated, cupping his hands around his mouth like a
megaphone.
Mrs. Anderson raised her head from the flamingos. And beamed at my dad.
“Jeffrey!” she cried. “How nice to see you.”
Mrs. Anderson is always friendly to Dad. Mom says he’s her best customer.
Maybe her only customer!
“It’s nice to see you, too,” Dad replied. He rubbed his hands together
eagerly and gazed around the lawn.
Mrs. Anderson stuck one last flamingo into the ground. She made her way
over to us, wiping her hands on her pink T-shirt.
“Do you have something special in mind today?” she asked my father.
“Our deer is a little lonesome,” he explained, shouting so that she could
hear him. “I think it needs company.”
“Really, Dad. We don’t need any more lawn ornaments,” Mindy begged.
“Mom will be furious.”
Mrs. Anderson smiled. “Oh, a Lawn Lovely lawn always has room for one
more! Right, Jeffrey?”
“Right!” Dad declared.
Mindy pressed her lips together tightly. She rolled her eyes for the
hundredth time that day.
Dad hurried over to a herd of wide-eyed plaster deer, standing in the corner
of the yard. We followed him.
The deer stood about four feet tall. White spots dotted their reddish-brown
bodies.
Very lifelike. Very boring.
He studied the deer for a few seconds. Then something caught his eye.
Two squat gnomes standing in the middle of the lawn.
“Well, well, what have we here?” Dad murmured, smiling. I could see his
eyes light up. He bent down to examine the gnomes.
Mrs. Anderson clapped her hands together. “Jeffrey, you have a wonderful
eye for lawn ornaments!” she exclaimed. “I knew you’d appreciate the gnomes!
They were carved in Europe. Very fine work.”
I stared at the gnomes. They looked like little old men. They were about
three feet tall and very chubby. With piercing red eyes and large pointy ears.
Their mouths curved up in wide, silly grins. And coarse brown hair
sprouted from their heads.
Each gnome wore a bright green short-sleeved shirt, brown leggings, and a
tall, pointy orange hat. Both wore black belts tied tightly around their chubby
waists.
“They’re terrific!” Dad gushed. “Oh, kids. Aren’t they wonderful?”
“They’re okay, Dad,” I said.
“Okay?” Mindy shouted. “They’re horrible! They’re so gross! They look
so… so evil. I hate them!”
“Hey, you’re right, Mindy,” I said. “They are pretty gross. They look just
like you!”
“Joe, you are the biggest—” Mindy started. But Dad interrupted her.
“We’ll take them!” he cried.
“Dad—no!” Mindy howled. “They’re hideous! Buy a deer. Buy another
flamingo. But not these ugly old gnomes. Look at the awful colors. Look at
those evil grins. They’re too creepy!”
“Oh, Mindy. Don’t be silly. They’re perfect!” Dad exclaimed. “We’ll have
so much fun with them. We’ll dress them as ghosts for Halloween. In Santa suits
at Christmas. They look just like Santa’s elves.”
Dad pulled out his credit card. He and Mrs. Anderson started toward the
pink house to complete the sale. “I’ll be back in a minute,” he called.
“These are the ugliest yet,” Mindy groaned, turning to me. “They’re
completely embarrassing. I’ll never be able to bring any of my friends over
again.”
Then she stomped off toward the sidewalk.
I couldn’t take my eyes away from the gnomes. They were kind of ugly.
And even though they were smiling, there was something unfriendly about their
smiles. Something cold about their glassy red eyes.
“Whoa! Mindy! Look!” I cried. “One of the gnomes just moved!”
Mindy slowly turned to face me.
My wrist was held tightly in the chubby hand. I twisted and squirmed. Tried
to tug free.
“Let go!” I squealed. “Let go of me! Mindy—hurry!”
“I—I’m coming!” she cried.
7
Mindy came racing across the yard.
She leaped over the flamingos and sprinted around the deer.
“Hurry!” I moaned, stretching my left arm out toward her. “He’s hurting
me!”
But as my sister came near, her face twisted in fright, I couldn’t keep a
straight face any longer. I burst out laughing.
“Gotcha! Gotcha!” I shrieked. I danced away from the plaster gnome.
Mindy swung around to slug me. Swung and missed.
“Did you really believe that gnome grabbed me?” I cried. “Are you totally
losing it?”
She didn’t have time to reply. Dad came jogging down the pink porch steps.
“Time to bring our little guys home,” he announced, grinning.
He stopped and stared down happily at the ugly gnomes. “But let’s name
them first.” Dad names all of our lawn ornaments.
Mindy let out a loud groan. Dad ignored her.
He patted one of the gnomes on the head. “Let’s call this one Hap. Because
he looks so happy! I’ll carry Hap. You kids take…”
He stopped and squinted at the other gnome. There was a small chip on the
gnome’s front tooth. “Chip. Yep, we’ll call this one Chip.”
Dad hoisted Hap into his arms. “Whoaaa. He’s an armful!” He made his
way toward the driveway, staggering under the gnome’s weight.
Mindy studied Chip. “You take the feet. I’ll grab the top,” she ordered.
“Come on. One, two, three… lift!”
I stooped down and grabbed the gnome by its legs. Its heavy red boot
scraped my arm. I let out a cry.
“Quit complaining,” Mindy ordered. “At least you don’t have this stupid
pointy hat sticking in your face.”
We struggled down the hill, following Dad.
Mindy and I inched forward, struggling side by side. “Everyone in the
neighborhood is gawking at us,” Mindy moaned.
They were. Two girls from Mindy’s school, wheeling their bikes up the hill,
stopped and stared. Then they burst out laughing.
Mindy’s pale face grew as red as one of Dad’s tomatoes. “I’ll never live this
down,” she grumbled. “Come on, Joe. Walk faster.”
I jiggled Chip’s legs to make Mindy lose her grip. But the only thing she
lost was her temper. “Quit it, Joe,” she snapped. “And hold your end up higher.”
As we neared our house, Mr. McCall spotted us trudging up the block. He
stopped pruning his shrubs to admire our little parade.
“More lawn ornaments, Jeffrey?” he called out to Dad. I could hear him
chuckling.
Mr. McCall is mean to Mindy and me. But he and Dad get along fine.
They’re always kidding each other about their gardens.
Mrs. McCall poked her head out the front door. “Cute!” she called out,
smiling at us from under her white baseball cap. “Come on in, Bill. Your brother
is on the phone.”
Mr. McCall set his pruning sheers down and went inside.
We lugged Chip past the McCall driveway and followed Dad into our front
yard.
“Over here!” Dad instructed as he set Hap down in the far corner of the
yard. Next to Deer-lilah. Deer-lilah is the deer. Dad named her after Lilah from
Lawn Lovely.
With our last bit of strength, we dragged Chip over to Dad. These gnomes
were heavy. They weighed a lot more than our other ornaments.
Mindy and I plopped the gnome down on the grass and collapsed in the dirt
next to him.
Whistling happily, Dad set Chip on one side of the deer. And Hap on the
other.
He stepped back to study them. “What cheerful little guys!” he declared.
“I’ve got to show your mom. She won’t be able to resist them! They’re too cute
to hate!”
He hurried across the lawn and into the house.
“Yo!” I heard a familiar cry from next door. Moose jogged across his
driveway. “I hear you have some ugly new lawn things.”
He charged up to the gnomes and stared. “Way ugly,” he boomed.
Moose leaned down and stuck his tongue out at Hap. “You want to fight,
shrimp?” he asked the little statue. “Take that!” He pretended to punch Hap in
his chubby chest.
“Wreck the runt!” I cried.
Moose grabbed the gnome around his waist and gave him a dozen quick
punches.
I scrambled to my feet. “I’ll wipe that ugly grin off your face!” I yelled at
Chip. I closed my hands around the gnome’s neck and pretended to choke him.
“Watch this!” Moose shot out a thick leg and karate-kicked Hap in his small
pointy hat. The squat figure wobbled.
“Careful! Stop messing around!” Mindy warned. “You’re going to break
them.”
“Okay,” I said. “Let’s tickle them!”
“Tickle, tickle!” Moose squeaked as he tickled Hap under the armpits.
“You’re a riot, Moose,” Mindy declared. “A real—”
Moose and I waited for Mindy to finish insulting us. But instead, she
pointed to the McCalls’ garden and screamed, “Oh, no! Buster!”
Moose and I spun around and spied Buster. In the middle of Mr. McCall’s
garden, pawing away at the green stalks.
“Buster! No!” I screamed.
I grabbed the dog whistle and raised it to my mouth. But before I could
blow, Mr. McCall exploded out of his front door!
“That stupid mutt again!” he shouted, waving his arms wildly. “Get out of
here! Shoo!”
Buster whimpered, turned, and trotted back to our yard, head down, stumpy
tail between his legs.
Uh-oh, I thought, studying Mr. McCall’s angry face. We’re in for trouble
now.
But before Mr. McCall could start lecturing us, Dad pushed the front door
open. “Kids, your mother says that dinner is almost ready.”
“Jeffrey, are you deliberately sending that mutt over to ruin my melons?”
Mr. McCall called.
Dad grinned. “Buster can’t help it,” he replied. “He keeps mistaking your
melons for golf balls!”
“Are those tomatoes you’re growing?” Moose’s dad shot back. “Or are they
olives?”
“Didn’t you see the tomato I rolled into the house yesterday?” Dad replied.
“I had to use a wheelbarrow!”
Buster danced around the yard. I think somehow he knew he had escaped
big trouble.
We started for the house. But I stopped when I heard a heavy thud.
I whirled around to discover Hap lying face down in the grass.
Buster busily licked his face.
“Bad dog,” Dad scolded. I don’t think Dad likes Buster any more than Mr.
McCall does. “Did you knock that gnome over? Get away from there!”
“Buster—come here, boy!” I called. But he ignored me and licked at the
face more furiously than ever.
I brought my dog whistle to my lips and gave one quick short blow. Buster
raised his head, alert to the sound. He forgot about the plaster gnome and trotted
over to me.
“Joe, pick Hap up, will you?” Dad demanded, annoyed.
Mindy held onto Buster. I grabbed the gnome by his shoulders and slowly
heaved him to his feet. Then I checked for damage.
Legs. Arms. Neck. Everything seemed okay.
I raised my eyes to Hap’s face.
And jumped back in surprise.
I blinked a few times. And stared at the gnome again.
“I—I don’t believe it!” I murmured.
8
The gnome’s smile had vanished.
Its mouth stood open wide, as if trying to scream.
“Hey—!” I choked out.
“What’s wrong?” Dad called. “Is it broken?”
“Its smile!” I cried. “Its smile is gone! It looks scared or something!”
Dad jumped down the steps and ran over. Moose and Mr. McCall joined
him.
Mindy walked slowly in my direction, with a suspicious scowl on her face.
She probably thought I was playing another joke.
“See?” I cried as everyone gathered around me. “It’s unbelievable!”
“Ha-ha! Good one, Joe!” Moose burst out. He punched me in the shoulder.
“Pretty funny.”
“Huh?” I lowered my eyes to the little figure.
Hap’s lips were curved up in a grin. The same silly grin he always wore.
The terrified expression had disappeared.
Dad let out a hearty laugh. “Good acting job, Joe,” he said. “You really
fooled us all.”
“Maybe your son should be an actor,” Mr. McCall said, scratching his head.
“He didn’t fool me,” Mindy bragged. “That one was lame. Really lame.”
What had happened? Had I imagined that open mouth?
Mr. McCall turned to Buster. “Listen, Jeffrey,” he started. “I’m serious
about that dog of yours. If he comes into my garden again…”
“If Buster goes over there again, I promise we’ll tie him up,” Dad replied.
“Aw, Dad,” I said. “You know Buster hates to be tied up. He hates it!”
“Sorry, kids,” Dad said, turning to go inside. “That’s it. Buster gets one
more chance.”
I bent down to pet Buster’s head. “Only one more chance, boy,” I
whispered in his ear. “Did you hear that? You only get one more chance.”
I woke up the next morning and squinted at the clock radio on my night table.
Eight A.M. Tuesday. The second day of summer vacation. Excellent!
I threw on my purple-and-white Vikings jersey and my gym shorts and ran
downstairs. Time to mow the lawn.
Dad and I had an agreement. If I mowed the lawn once a week all summer,
Dad would buy me a new bike.
I knew exactly which model I wanted, too. Twenty-one gears and really fat
tires. The coolest mountain bike ever. I’d be able to fly over boulders!
I let myself out the front door and raised my face to the warm morning sun.
It felt pretty good. The grass shimmered, still covered with dew.
“Joe!” I heard a loud bellow.
Mr. McCall’s bellow. “Get over here!”
Mr. McCall leaned over his vegetable patch. An angry red vein throbbed in
his forehead.
Oh, no, I thought as I edged toward him. What now?
“I’ve had it,” he roared. “If you don’t tie that dog up, I’m calling the police!
I mean it!”
Mr. McCall pointed to the ground. One of his casaba melons lay in the dirt,
broken into jagged pieces. Melon seeds were scattered everywhere. And most of
the orange fruit had been eaten away.
I opened my mouth, but no sound came out. I didn’t know what to say.
Lucky for me, Dad showed up just in time. He was on his way to work.
“Is my son giving you some gardening advice, Bill?” he asked.
“No jokes today!” Mr. McCall snapped. He scooped up the broken pieces of
melon and shoved them in my dad’s face. “See what your wild dog has done!
Now I have only four melons left!”
Dad turned to me. His expression grew stern. “I warned you, Joe! I told you
to keep the dog in our yard.”
“But Buster didn’t do this,” I protested. “He doesn’t even like melons!”
Buster skulked around behind the flamingos. His ears drooped flat against
his head. His tail hung low between his legs. He looked really guilty.
“Well, who else could have done it?” Mr. McCall demanded.
Dad shook his head. “Joe, I want you to tie Buster up in the back. Now!”
I saw that I had no choice. No way I could argue.
“Okay, Dad,” I mumbled. I shuffled across the lawn and grabbed Buster’s
collar. I hauled him to the corner of the back yard and sat him next to his red
cedar doghouse. “Stay!” I commanded.
I rummaged through the garage until I found a long piece of rope. Then I
tied Buster to the tall oak tree next to his doghouse.
Buster whimpered. He really hates being tied up.
“I’m sorry, boy,” I whispered. “I know you didn’t eat that melon.”
Buster pricked up his ears as Dad came around back to make sure I had tied
the dog up. “It’s just as well that Buster is tied up today,” he said. “The painters
are starting on the house this afternoon. Buster would only be in their way.”
“Painters?” I asked in surprise. Nobody told me that painters were coming.
I hate the smell of paint!
Dad nodded. “They’re going to paint over that faded yellow,” he said,
pointing to the house. “We’re having the house painted white with black trim.”
“Dad, about Buster…” I started.
Dad held up a hand to silence me. “I have to get to work. Keep him tied up.
We’ll talk later.” I watched him make his way to the garage.
This is all Mr. McCall’s fault, I thought. All of it! After Dad drove away, I
stamped angrily into the garage and grabbed the lawn mower. I pushed the
mower around the side of the house and into the front yard. Mindy sat on the
front steps, reading. I rammed the mower forward.
“I hate Mr. McCall!” I exclaimed. I shoved the mower around a flamingo. I
felt like slicing off its skinny legs. “He is such a jerk. I’d like to smash the other
four stupid melons!” I cried. “I’d love to wreck them all so Mr. McCall will
leave us alone!”
“Joe, get a grip,” Mindy called, peering up from her book.
After I finished mowing, I ran into the house and grabbed a large plastic
bag for the grass clippings. When I came back out, Moose was sprawled on our
lawn. Several brightly colored plastic rings lay scattered on the grass around
him.
“Think fast!” he cried. He hurled a blue plastic ring at me. I dropped the
bag and leaped for it.
“Nice catch!” he said, scrambling to his feet. “How about a game of ring
toss? We’ll use the gnomes’ pointy hats.”
“How about using Mindy’s pointy head?” I replied.
“You are so immature,” Mindy said. She stood and walked to the door. “I’m
going to find some place quiet to read.”
Moose handed me a few rings. He flung a purple one toward Hap. The ring
slid neatly around the gnome’s hat.
“What a throw!” he exclaimed.
I took a ring and spun around like a discus thrower. I tossed two yellow
rings at Chip. They slapped against the gnome’s fat face and slipped to the grass.
Moose chuckled. “You throw like Mindy. Watch me!” He leaned forward
and hurled two rings. They settled neatly around Chip’s pointy hat.
“Yes!” Moose cried. He flexed his bulging muscles. “Super Moose rules
again!”
We tossed the rest of the rings. Moose beat me. But only by two points—
ten to eight.
“Rematch!” I cried. “Let’s play again!”
I dashed over to the gnomes and gathered up the rings. As I pulled a
handful from Chip’s hat, I stared into his face.
And gasped.
What was that?
A seed.
An orange seed about half an inch long.
Stuck between the gnome’s fat lips.
9
“Is that a melon seed?” I asked, my voice trembling.
“A what?” Moose stomped up behind me.
“A melon seed,” I repeated.
Moose shook his head. He clapped a big hand against my shoulder. “You’re
seeing things,” he declared. “Come on, let’s play!”
I pointed to Chip’s mouth. “I’m not seeing things. There! Right there! Don’t
you see it?”
Moose’s gaze followed my finger. “Yeah. I see a seed. So what?”
“It’s a casaba melon seed, Moose. Like the ones scattered on the ground.”
How could a casaba seed find its way into Chip’s mouth?
There had to be an explanation. A simple explanation.
I thought hard. I couldn’t think of one.
I brushed the seed from the gnome’s lips and watched it flutter to the grass.
Then I stared at the gnome’s grinning face. Into those cold, flat eyes.
And the gnome stared back at me. I shivered in the heat.
How did that seed get there? I wondered. How?
I dreamed about melons that night. I dreamed that a casaba melon grew in our
front yard. Grew and grew and grew. Bigger than our house.
Something startled me out of my melon dream. I fumbled for my alarm
clock. One A.M.
Then I heard a howl. A low, mournful howl. Outside the house.
I jumped out of bed and hurried to the window. I peered into the shadowy
front yard. The lawn ornaments stood in silence.
I heard the howl again. Louder. Longer.
It was Buster. My poor dog. Tied up in the back yard.
I crept out of my room and down the dark hall. The house was quiet. I
started down the carpeted stairs.
A step squeaked under my foot. I jumped, startled.
A second later, I heard another creak.
My legs were shaking.
Cool it, Joe, I told myself. It’s only the steps.
I tiptoed through the darkened living room and into the kitchen. I heard a
low, rustling sound behind me. My heart started to pound.
I whirled around.
Nothing there.
You’re hearing things, I told myself.
I stumbled forward in the dark. Closed my hand around the doorknob.
And two powerful hands grabbed me from behind!
10
“Where do you think you’re going?”
Mindy!
I breathed a sigh of relief. And yanked myself away from her grasp.
“I’m going for a midnight snack,” I whispered, rubbing my neck. “I’m
going to eat the rest of Mr. McCall’s stupid melons.”
I pretended to cram my mouth full and chew. “Yum! Casabas. I need more
casabas!”
“Joe! You’d better not!” Mindy whispered in alarm.
“Hey, I’m kidding,” I said. “Buster is howling like crazy. I’m going out to
calm him down.”
Mindy yawned. “If Mom and Dad catch you sneaking out in the middle of
the night…”
“It’ll just take a few minutes.” I stepped outside. The damp night air sent a
small chill down my back. I gazed up at the starless night sky.
Buster’s pitiful howls rose from the back.
“I’m coming,” I called in a loud whisper. “It’s okay, boy.”
Buster’s howls dropped to quiet whimpers.
I took a step forward. Something rustled through the grass. I froze in place.
And squinted into the darkness. Two small figures scampered by the side of the
house. They scraped across the yard and disappeared into the night.
Probably raccoons.
Raccoons?
That’s the answer! The raccoons must have eaten Mr. McCall’s melon. I
wanted to wake up Dad and tell him. But I decided to wait till morning.
I felt much better. That meant that Buster could be set free. I made my way
over to Buster and sat next to him on the dew-wet grass.
“Buster,” I whispered. “I’m here.”
His big brown eyes drooped sadly. I threw my arms around his furry neck.
“You won’t be tied up for long, Buster,” I promised. “You’ll see. I’ll tell Dad
about the raccoons first thing in the morning.”
Buster licked my hand gratefully. “And tomorrow I’ll take you for a long
walk,” I whispered. “How’s that, boy? Now go to sleep.”
I slipped back inside the house and jumped into bed. I felt good. I had
solved the mystery of the melon. Our troubles with Mr. McCall were over, I
thought.
But I thought wrong.
Our troubles were just beginning.
“I don’t believe it! I don’t believe it!” Mr. McCall’s cries cut through the quiet
morning, waking me from my heavy sleep.
I rubbed my eyes and glanced at the clock radio. Six-thirty A.M.
What’s all the screaming about?
I hopped out of bed and hurried downstairs, yawning and stretching. Mom,
Dad, and Mindy were at the front door, still in pajamas and robes.
“What’s happening?” I asked.
“It’s Bill!” Dad cried. “Come on!”
We piled outside and stared into our neighbors’ garden.
Mr. McCall hung over his vegetable patch in a tattered blue-and-whitecheckered robe. He grabbed frantically at his casaba melons, screaming.
Moose and his mother stood behind Mr. McCall in their robes, wide-eyed
and silent. Instead of her usual friendly smile, Moose’s mom wore a grim frown.
Mr. McCall lifted his head from the garden. “Ruined!” he roared. “They’re
totally ruined!”
“Oh, boy,” Dad muttered. “We’d better get over there, Marion.” He started
across our front lawn. Mom, Mindy, and I followed.
“Take it easy, Bill,” my dad said calmly as he stepped into the McCalls’
front yard. “Nothing is worth getting so upset about.”
“Easy? Take it easy?” Mr. McCall shrieked. The vein in his forehead
throbbed.
The raccoons, I thought. They attacked the casabas again. I’ve got to tell
Dad. Now. Before Buster gets blamed for this, too.
Mr. McCall cradled his four casaba melons in his hands. They were still
attached to the vine.
“I came out to water my casabas and I found this… this…” He was too
upset to finish. He held the melons out to us.
“Whoa!” I cried in amazement.
No raccoon could have done this.
No way.
Someone had taken a black marker and drawn big, sloppy smiley faces on
each melon!
My sister shoved me aside to get a good look.
“Joe!” she shrieked. “That’s horrible. How could you!”
11
“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall demanded.
“Yes, Mindy, what are you talking about?” Mom asked.
“I caught Joe sneaking outside last night,” Mindy replied. “In the middle of
the night. He told me he wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.”
Everyone turned to stare at me in horror. Even Moose, my best friend. Mr.
McCall’s face was as red as a tomato again. I saw him clenching and
unclenching his fists.
Everyone stared at me in shocked silence. The smiley faces on the melons
stared at me, too.
“But—but—but—” I sputtered.
Before I could explain, Dad exploded. “Joe, I think you owe us an
explanation. What were you doing outside in the middle of the night?”
I felt my face grow red-hot with anger. “I went out to calm Buster down,” I
insisted. “He was howling. I didn’t touch the melons. I would never do anything
like that. I was only joking when I told Mindy I wanted to wreck them!”
“Well, this is no joke!” Dad exclaimed angrily. “You are grounded for the
week!”
“But, Dad—!” I pleaded. “I didn’t draw on those melons!”
“Make that two weeks!” he snapped. “And I think you should mow Mr.
McCall’s grass and water his garden all month. As an apology.”
“Whoa, Jeffrey,” Mr. McCall interrupted. “I don’t want your son—or your
dog—in my garden again. Ever.”
He rubbed the casaba melons with his huge fingers, trying to erase the ugly
black stains. “I hope this comes off,” he muttered. “Because if it doesn’t, Jeffrey,
I’ll sue. Believe me, I will!”
Two hours after the melon disaster, I sprawled on the floor of my room.
Grounded. With nothing to do.
I couldn’t play with Buster in the yard. Because the painters were outside.
So I stayed in my room and reread all of my Super Gamma Man comic
books.
I ordered a glob of rubber vomit from the Joker’s Wild catalog for five
dollars. That’s most of my weekly allowance. Then I sneaked into Mindy’s room
and mixed up all the clothes in her closet. No more colors in rainbow order.
When I had finished, it still wasn’t even noon.
What a totally boring day, I thought, as I wandered downstairs.
“Hand me the yellow, please,” Mindy’s voice rang out from the den.
I crept toward the door and peeked in. Mindy and her best friend, Heidi, sat
cross-legged on the floor. They were decorating T-shirts with fabric paint.
Heidi is almost as annoying as Mindy. Something is always bothering her.
She’s too cold. Or too hot. Or her stomach hurts. Or her shoelaces are too tight.
I watched silently as the two girls worked. Heidi drew a silver collar on a
large purple cat.
Mindy hunched over in concentration and slowly outlined a large yellow
flower.
I leaped into the den. “Boo!” I screamed.
“Yaii!” Heidi shrieked.
Mindy jumped up, smearing a big yellow blotch on her red shorts. “You
jerk!” she cried. “See what you made me do!”
She scraped at the paint with her fingernails. “Beat it, Joe,” she ordered.
“We’re busy.”
“Well, I’m not,” I replied. “Thanks to you, Miss Snitch.”
“It was your bright idea to draw faces on those melons,” she snarled. “Not
mine.”
“But I didn’t do it!” I insisted.
Mindy counted off the evidence on her fingers.
“You were up in the middle of the night. You went out in the yard. And you
told me you wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.”
“I was joking!” I exclaimed. “Don’t you know what a joke is? You should
try making one sometime.”
Heidi stretched out her arms. “I’m hot,” she said. “Why don’t we go to the
pool? We can finish our shirts later.”
Mindy fixed her eyes on me. “Joe, do you want to go with us?” she asked in
a sweet voice. “Whoops. I forgot. You’re grounded.” Then she burst out
laughing.
I turned and left the two girls in the den. I have to get out of this house, I
thought.
I headed for the kitchen. Mom and the painter huddled together at the
counter, checking paint swatches.
“We want the onyx black for the trim. Not the pitch black,” she instructed,
tapping the swatches. “I think you brought the wrong paint.”
I tugged on her sleeve. “Mom. Buster’s really bored. Can I take him for a
walk?”
“Of course not,” she replied quickly. “You’re grounded.”
“Please,” I begged. “Buster needs a walk. And that paint smell is making
me sick.” I held my stomach and made gagging sounds.
The painter shifted impatiently from foot to foot. “Okay, okay,” Mom said.
“Take the dog.”
“Excellent! Thanks, Mom!” I cried. I darted through the kitchen and into
the back yard. “Good news, Buster,” I exclaimed. “We’re free!”
Buster wagged his stumpy tail. I untied the long rope and clipped a short
leash to his collar.
We walked about two miles. All the way down to Buttermilk Pond. That’s
our favorite stick-chasing spot.
I tossed a fat stick into the water. Buster plunged into the cold pond and
fetched it. We did that over and over until it was three o’clock. Time to go home.
On the way back to the house, we stopped at the Creamy Cow. They have
the best ice cream in town.
I used the last bit of my allowance to treat us both to double-dip chocolatechip cookie dough cones. Buster liked the cookie dough, but he left all the
chocolate chips on the ground.
After we finished our ice cream, we continued home. Buster pulled at his
leash excitedly as we strolled up the driveway. He seemed really happy to be
back.
He dragged me into the front yard and sniffed everything. The evergreen
bushes. The flamingos. The deer. The gnomes.
The gnomes.
Was something different about the gnomes?
I dropped Buster’s leash and bent down for a closer look.
I studied their fat little hands. What were those dark smudges on their
fingertips. Dirt?
I rubbed their chubby fingers. But the smudges remained.
No. Not dirt.
I leaned in closer.
Paint. Black paint.
12
Black paint. The same color as the smiley faces on Mr. McCall’s casabas!
I swallowed hard. What’s going on here? I wondered. How could the
gnomes’ hands be covered in paint?
I’ve got to show someone, I decided.
Mom! She’s in the house. She’ll help me figure this out.
As I reached our front door, I heard a scraping sound coming from the
McCalls’ yard.
“Buster! No!” I shouted.
Buster circled Mr. McCall’s vegetable patch, his leash dragging behind him.
I quickly shoved my hand under my T-shirt and yanked out my dog whistle.
I blew it hard.
Buster trotted right back to me.
“Good boy!” I cried in relief. I shook my finger in his face. I tried to be
stern. “Buster, if you don’t want to be tied up, you have to stay out of that
garden!”
Buster licked my finger with his long, sticky tongue. Then he turned to lick
the gnomes.
I watched Buster slobber all over them.
“Oh, no!” I cried. “Not again!”
Chip’s and Hap’s mouths gaped wide open. In the same terrified
expressions I had seen before. As if they were trying to scream.
I slammed my eyes shut. I opened one slowly.
The terrified expressions remained.
What was going on here? Were the gnomes afraid of Buster? Was I going
crazy?
My hands trembled as I quickly tied Buster to the tree. Then I ran into the
house to search for Mom.
“Mom! Mom!” I panted breathlessly. I found her upstairs, working in her
office. “You’ve got to come outside! Now!”
Mom whirled around from her computer. “What’s wrong?” she demanded.
“It’s the gnomes!” I cried. “There’s black paint on their hands. And they’re
not grinning anymore. Come out. You’ll see!”
Mom slowly shoved her chair away from the computer. “Joe, if this is
another joke…”
“Please, Mom. It will just take a second. It’s not a joke. Really!”
Mom led the way downstairs. She gazed at the gnomes from the front door.
“See?” I cried, standing behind her. “I told you! Look at their faces. They
look like they’re screaming!”
Mom narrowed her eyes. “Joe, give me a break. Why did you get me away
from my work? They have the same dumb grins they always have.”
“What?” I gasped. I ran outside. I stared at the gnomes.
They stared back at me. Grinning.
“Joe, I really wish you’d stop the dumb gnome jokes,” Mom said sharply.
“They’re not funny. Not funny at all.”
“But look at the paint on their fingers!”
“That’s just dirt,” she said impatiently. “Please, go read a book. Or clean
your room. Find something to do. You’re driving me crazy!”
I sat down on the grass. Alone. To think.
I thought about the casaba seed on one of the gnome’s lips. I remembered
the first time their mouths had twisted in horror. That was the first time Buster
had licked them.
And now they had paint on their fingers.
It all added up.
The gnomes are alive, I decided.
And they’re doing horrible things in the McCalls’ garden.
The gnomes? Doing horrible things? I must be losing my mind!
Suddenly, I didn’t feel too well. Nothing made any sense.
I stood up to go inside.
And heard whispers.
Gruff whispers. Down at my feet.
“Not funny, Joe,” Hap whispered.
“Not funny at all,” Chip rasped.
13
Should I tell Mom and Dad what I heard? I wondered as we ate dinner that
night.
“How was everyone’s day?” Dad asked cheerfully. He spooned some peas
onto his dinner plate.
They’ll never believe me.
“Heidi and I rode our bikes to the pool,” Mindy piped up. She arranged a
mound of tuna casserole on her plate into a neat square. Then she flicked a stray
pea away. “But she got a cramp in her leg, so we mostly sunbathed.”
I have to tell.
“I heard something really weird this afternoon,” I burst out. “Really, really
weird.”
“You interrupted me!” Mindy said sharply. She blotted her mouth carefully
with her napkin.
“But this is important!” I exclaimed. I started shredding my napkin
nervously. “I was in the front yard. All alone. And I heard whispers.”
I made my voice low and gruff. “The voices said, ‘Not funny, Joe. Not
funny.’ I don’t know who it was. Nobody was there. I… uh… think it was the
gnomes.”
Mom banged her glass of lemonade down on the table. “Enough with these
gnome jokes!” she declared. “No one thinks they’re funny, Joe.”
“But it’s true!” I cried, crushing my shredded napkin into a ball. “I heard
the voices!”
Mindy uttered a scornful laugh. “You are so lame,” she said. “Please pass
the bread, Dad.”
“Sure, honey,” Dad replied, handing her the wooden tray of dinner rolls.
And that was the end of that.
After dinner, Dad suggested that we water the tomatoes.
“Okay,” I replied with a shrug. Anything to get out of the house.
“Want me to get the Bug Be Gone?” I asked as we stepped outside.
“No! No!” he gasped. His face turned ghostly pale.
“What’s wrong, Dad? What is it?”
He pointed silently at the tomato patch.
“Ohhh,” I moaned. “Oh, no!”
Our beautiful red tomatoes had been crushed, mangled, and maimed—seeds
and pulpy red tomato flesh everywhere.
Dad stared openmouthed, his hands balled into fists. “Who would do such a
terrible thing?” he sighed.
My heart began to throb. My pulse raced.
I knew the truth. And now everyone would have to believe me.
“The gnomes did it, Dad!” I grabbed the sleeve of his shirt and began
tugging him to the front yard. “You’ll see. I’ll prove it!”
“Joe, let go of me. This is no time for jokes. Don’t you realize that we’re
out of the garden show? We’ve lost our chance for a blue ribbon! Or any ribbon,
for that matter.”
“You have to believe me, Dad. Come on.” I held tightly onto Dad’s sleeve.
And I wouldn’t let go.
As I dragged him out front, I wondered what we would find.
Blood-red tomato juice smeared all over their ugly faces?
Squishy pulp hanging from their tiny fat fingers?
Hundreds of seeds stuck to their creepy little feet?
We approached the gnomes.
My eyes narrowed on the hideous creatures.
And finally we stood right before them.
And I couldn’t believe what we found.
14
Nothing.
No juice.
No pulp.
Not a single seed. Not one.
I searched their bodies. Frantically. From their ugly, grinning faces to their
creepy, stubby toes.
No clues. Nothing.
How could I have been wrong? My stomach lurched as I turned to face my
dad.
“Dad…” I started in a shaky voice.
Dad cut me off with an angry wave of his hand. “There’s nothing to see
here, Joe,” he muttered. “I don’t want to hear another word about the gnomes.
Understand? Not one!”
His brown eyes flashed with fury. “I know who’s responsible for this!” he
said bitterly. “And he’s not going to get away with it!”
He whirled around and trotted into the back yard. He scooped up a handful
of smashed tomato.
The juice oozed between his fingers as he circled the house and charged
next door.
I watched Dad march up the McCalls’ steps and jab at the doorbell. He
began howling before anyone answered the ring. “Bill! Come out here. Now!”
I crouched behind Dad. I’d never seen him this angry before.
I heard the lock turn. The door swung open. And there stood Mr. McCall. In
a white jogging outfit. Holding a half-eaten pork chop in one hand.
“Jeffrey, what are you yelling about? It’s difficult to digest with all this
noise.” He chuckled.
“Well, digest this!” Dad screamed. Then he brought his hand up and hurled
the smashed tomatoes.
They splattered against Mr. McCall’s white T-shirt and dribbled down his
white sweatpants. Some of the mushy pulp landed on his clean white sneakers.
Mr. McCall stared down at his clothes in total disbelief. “Are you nuts?” he
bellowed.
“No. You are!” my father shrieked. “How could you do this? For a stupid
blue ribbon!”
“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall shouted.
“Oh, I see. Now you’re going to play innocent. You’re going to pretend you
don’t know anything. Well, you’re not going to get away with this.”
Mr. McCall stomped down the steps and planted himself about an inch
away from my dad. He puffed out his broad chest and hung over my father
menacingly.
“I didn’t touch your lousy tomatoes!” he roared. “You wimp! You probably
bought your blue-ribbon tomatoes last year.”
Dad shook an angry fist in Mr. McCall’s glaring face. “My tomatoes were
the best at the show! Yours looked like raisins next to mine! And whoever heard
of growing casabas in Minnesota, anyway? You’re going to be the joke of the
garden show!”
My whole body shuddered. They’re going to get into a fist fight, I realized.
And Mr. McCall will squash my dad.
“Joke?” Mr. McCall growled. “You’re the joke. You and your sour
tomatoes. And those stupid lawn ornaments! Now leave before I really lose
control!”
Mr. McCall stomped up to his front door. Then he spun around and said, “I
don’t want my son hanging around with Joe anymore! Your son probably
wrecked your tomatoes. Just as he wrecked my melons!”
He disappeared into the house, slamming the door so hard, the porch shook.
That night I tossed and turned in bed for hours. Faces painted on melons.
Crushed tomatoes.
Whispering lawn gnomes. I couldn’t think of anything else.
It was way after midnight, but I couldn’t sleep. The gnomes with their
leering smiles danced before my closed eyes.
Those grinning faces. Laughing. Laughing at me.
Suddenly the room felt hot and stuffy. I kicked off the thin sheet that
covered my legs. Still too hot.
I jumped out of bed and headed for my window. I threw it wide open.
Warm, wet air rushed in.
I rested my arms on the windowsill and peered out into the darkness. It was
a foggy night. A thick gray mist swirled over the front yard. Despite the heat, I
felt a chill down my back. I had never seen it this foggy before.
The fog shifted slightly. The angel slowly came into view as the fog moved
away. Then the seal. The skunks. The swans. A flash of pink—the flamingos.
And there stood the deer.
Alone.
All alone.
The gnomes were gone.
15
“Mom! Dad!” I cried. Racing to their bedroom. “Wake up! Wake up! The
gnomes are gone!”
Mom bolted straight up. “What? What’s wrong?”
Dad didn’t budge.
“It’s the gnomes!” I shouted, shaking Dad’s shoulder. “Wake up!”
My father opened one eye and squinted up at me. “What time is it?” he
mumbled.
“Get up, Dad!” I pleaded.
Mom groaned as she snapped on the light next to her bed. “Joe. It’s so late.
Why did you wake us up?”
“They’re—they’re gone!” I stammered. “They disappeared. I’m not
kidding. I’m really not.”
My parents glanced at each other. Then they glared at me. “Enough!” Mom
cried. “We’re tired of your jokes. And it’s the middle of the night! Get to bed!”
“Right now!” Dad added sternly. “We’ve had just about enough of this
nonsense. We’re going to have a serious talk about this. In the morning.”
“But—but—but—” I stammered.
“Go!” Dad shouted.
I backed out of the room slowly, stumbling over someone’s slipper.
I should have realized that they wouldn’t believe me. But someone had to
believe me. Someone had to.
I raced down the dark hall to Mindy’s room. As I neared her bed, I could
hear the whistling sounds she always makes when she lies on her back. She was
fast asleep.
I stared down at her for a moment. Should I wake her? Would she believe
me?
I patted her on the cheek. “Mindy. Wake up,” I whispered.
Nothing.
I called her name again. A little louder.
Her eyes fluttered open. “Joe?” she asked drowsily.
“Get up. Quick!” I whispered. “You have to see this!”
“Have to see what?” she groaned.
“The gnomes. The gnomes have disappeared!” I exclaimed. “I think they
ran away! Please, get up. Please.”
“The gnomes?” she mumbled.
“Come on, Mindy. Get up,” I pleaded. “It’s an emergency!”
Mindy’s eyes shot wide open. “Emergency? What? What emergency?”
“It’s the gnomes. They’ve really disappeared. You have to come outside
with me.”
“That’s the emergency?” she screeched. “Are you crazy? I’m not going
anywhere with you. You’ve totally lost it, Joe. Totally.”
“But, Mindy—”
“Quit bugging me. I’m going back to sleep.”
Then she closed her eyes and pulled the sheet over her head.
I stood in her dark, silent room.
No one would believe me. No one would come with me. What should I do
now? What?
I imagined the gnomes ripping up every last vegetable in our garden.
Yanking out the yams and smashing the squash. And for dessert, chomping on
the rest of Mr. McCall’s casabas!
I knew I had to do something. Fast!
I ran from Mindy’s room and raced down the stairs. I jerked the front door
open and sprinted outside.
Outside into the murky fog.
Swallowed up inside the thick blanket of mist.
So dark and foggy. I could barely see. I felt as if I were moving through a
dark dream. A nightmare of grays and blacks. All shadows. Nothing but
shadows.
I inched forward slowly, moving as if I were underwater. The grass felt so
wet against my bare feet. But I couldn’t even see my own feet through the thick
carpet of fog.
Like a dream. Like a heavy, dark dream. So many shifting shadows. So
silent. Eerily silent.
I pushed on into the haze. I had lost all sense of direction. Was I heading
toward the street?
“Ohhh!” I cried out when something grabbed my ankle.
Frantically, I shook my leg. Tried to break free.
But it held on.
And pulled me down.
Down into the whirling darkness.
A snake.
No. Not a snake. The garden hose. The garden hose that I had forgotten to
roll up after watering the lawn that night.
Get a grip, Joe. I told myself. You have to calm down.
I pulled myself up and staggered forward. Squinting hard. Trying to see my
way. Shadowy figures seemed to reach for me, bend toward me.
I wanted to turn back. And go inside. And climb into my nice, dry bed.
Yes. That’s what I should do, I decided.
I turned slowly.
And heard a shuffling sound. The soft thud of footsteps. Nearby.
I listened closely.
And heard the sounds again. Footsteps as light as the mist.
I was breathing hard now. My heart pounding. My bare feet chilled and wet.
The dampness creeping up my legs. My entire body shuddered.
I heard a raspy cackle. A gnome?
I tried to turn. Tried to see it in the billowing blackness.
But it grabbed me from behind. Hard around the waist.
And with a dry, evil laugh, it threw me to the ground!
16
As I hit the wet ground, I heard the low, evil laugh again.
And recognized it.
“Moose?”
“Scared you big time!” he muttered. He helped me to my feet. Even in the
fog, I could see the big grin on his face.
“Moose—what are you doing out here?” I managed to cry.
“I couldn’t sleep. I kept hearing weird sounds. I was staring out into the fog
—and I saw you. What are you doing out here, Joe? Causing more trouble?”
I wiped wet blades of grass from my hands. “I haven’t been causing the
trouble,” I told him. “You’ve got to believe me. Look—the two lawn gnomes—
they’re gone.”
I pointed to the deer. Moose could see that the gnomes weren’t standing in
their spots.
He stared for a long time. “This is a trick—right?”
“No. It’s for real. I’ve got to find them.”
Moose frowned at me. “What did you do, hide the ugly little creeps? Where
are they? Come on, tell me!”
“I didn’t hide them,” I insisted.
“Tell me,” he repeated, leaning over me, bringing his face an inch from
mine. “Or suffer the Ten Tortures!”
Moose shoved his huge hands hard against my chest. I fell back and landed
in the wet grass again. He thumped down on my stomach and pinned my arms to
the ground.
“Tell me!” Moose insisted. “Tell me where they are!” Then he bounced up
and down on top of me.
“Stop!” I gasped. “Stop!”
He stopped because lights flashed on in both of our houses.
“Oh, wow,” I whispered. “We’re in major trouble now.”
I heard my front door bang open. A second later, Moose’s door opened, too.
We froze. “Keep quiet,” I whispered. “Maybe they won’t see us.”
“Who’s out here?” my father called.
“What’s going on, Jeffrey?” I heard Mr. McCall shout. “What’s all the noise
out here?”
“I don’t know,” my dad replied. “I thought maybe Joe…” His voice trailed
off.
We’re safe, I thought. We’re hidden by the fog.
Then I heard a low click. The long, thin beam of a flashlight swept across
the yard. It settled on Moose and me.
“Joe!” Dad screamed. “What are you doing out there? Why didn’t you
answer me?”
“Moose!” Mr. McCall shouted in a deep, angry voice. “Get in here. Move
it!”
Moose climbed up and raced into his house.
I hoisted myself up from the grass for the second time that night and slowly
made my way inside.
Dad crossed his arms tightly across his chest. “You woke us up twice
tonight! And you’re outside in the middle of the night again! What’s wrong with
you?”
“Listen, Dad, I only went outside because the gnomes are missing! Check,”
I begged. “You’ll see!”
My father glared at me with narrowed eyes. “These gnome stories are
getting out of hand!” he snapped. “I’ve had it! Now go upstairs. Before I ground
you for the entire summer!”
“Dad, I’m begging you. I’ve never been so serious in my life. Please look,”
I pleaded. “Please. Please. Please!” And then I added, “I’ll never ask you for
anything else again.”
I guess that’s what convinced him.
“Okay,” he said, sighing wearily. “But if this is another joke…”
My father stepped over to the living room window and peered out into the
swirling fog.
“Please let the gnomes still be gone!” I prayed silently. “Please let Dad see
that I’m telling the truth. Please…”
17
“Joe, you’re right!” my father declared. “The gnomes aren’t out there.”
He believed me! Finally! I jumped up and shot a fist into the air. “Yes!” I
cheered.
Dad wiped at the moist glass pane with his pajama sleeve and squinted out
the window again.
“See, Dad! See!” I cried happily. “I was telling the truth. I wasn’t joking.”
“Hmmm. Deer-lilah’s not there, either,” he said softly.
“What?” I gasped, feeling my stomach churn. “No. The deer is there! I saw
it!”
“Hold on a minute,” Dad murmured. “Ahhh. There she is. She was hidden
in the fog. And the gnomes! There they are! They’re right there, too. They were
hidden in the fog. See?”
I stared out the window. Two pointy hats broke through the mist. The two
gnomes stood dark and still, in their places beside the deer.
“Noooooo!” I moaned. “I know they weren’t there. I’m not playing tricks,
Dad. I’m not!”
“Fog can do funny things,” Dad said. “One time I was driving through a
real pea soup of a fog. I spotted something strange through the windshield. It
was shiny and round and it sort of hovered in the air. Oh, boy, I thought. A UFO!
A flying saucer! I couldn’t believe it!”
Dad patted me on the back. “Well, my UFO turned out to be a silver balloon
tied to a parking meter. Now, Joe. Back to this gnome problem.” Dad’s face
turned stern. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy stories. They’re only lawn
ornaments. Nothing more. Okay? Not another word. Promise?”
What choice did I have? “Promise,” I muttered.
Then I dragged myself up the stairs to bed.
What a horrible day—and night. My father thinks I’m a liar. Our tomatoes
are ruined. And Moose isn’t allowed to hang out with me anymore.
What else could possibly go wrong?
I woke up the following morning with a heavy feeling in my stomach. As if I
had swallowed a bowl of cement.
All I could think about were the gnomes.
Those horrible gnomes. They were destroying my summer. They were
destroying my life!
Forget about them, Joe, I told myself. Just forget about them.
Anyway, today had to be better than yesterday. It sure couldn’t be worse.
I peered out my bedroom window. All traces of the fog had been burned
away by a bright yellow sun. Buster slept peacefully in the grass, his long white
rope snaking through the garden.
I glanced over at the McCalls’ house. Maybe Moose is outside helping his
dad in the garden, I thought.
I leaned farther out the window to get a better look.
“Oh, noooo!” I moaned. “No!”
18
Globs of white paint splattered over Mr. McCall’s red Jeep!
The roof. The hood. The windows. The whole Jeep covered in paint.
This meant major trouble, I knew.
I pulled on a pair of jeans and yesterday’s T-shirt and hurried outside. I
found Moose in his driveway, his jaw clenched, shaking his head as he circled
the Jeep.
“Unbelievable, huh?” he said, turning to me. “When my dad saw this, he
had a cow!”
“Why didn’t he park in the garage?” I asked. Mr. McCall always parks the
Jeep in their two-car garage.
Moose shrugged. “Mom’s been cleaning out the basement and attic for a
yard sale. She stuck about a million boxes of junk in the garage. So Dad had to
park in the driveway last night.”
Moose patted the roof of the Jeep. “The paint is still sticky. Touch it.”
I touched it. Sticky.
“My dad is steaming!” Moose declared. “At first he thought your dad did it.
You know. Because of the tomatoes. But Mom told him that that was ridiculous.
So he called the police. He said he won’t rest until whoever did it is thrown in
jail!”
“He said that?” I asked. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. “Moose,
once the police start to check things out, they’re going to blame you and me!”
“Blame us? Are you nuts? Why would they blame us?” he demanded.
“Because we were both outside last night!” I said. “And everybody knows
it.”
Moose’s dark brown eyes flickered with fear. “You’re right,” he said. “What
are we going to do?”
“I don’t know,” I replied sadly. I paced back and forth in the McCalls’
driveway, thinking hard. The asphalt felt warm and sticky on my bare feet.
I moved to the grass. And noticed a line of small white paint spots.
“Hey, what’s this?” I cried.
I followed the paint trail across the grass.
Over the petunias.
To the corner of my yard.
The paint drips ended where the gnomes stood, grinning at me.
“I knew it! I knew it!” I cried out. “Moose, come look at this trail. The
gnomes splashed your car! And did all the other bad things around here.”
“Lawn gnomes?” Moose sputtered. “Joe, give up. No one will believe that.
Why don’t you give it a rest?”
“Check out the evidence!” I demanded. “The melon seed on the gnome’s
lips. This trail of white paint. I even found black paint on their fingers. Right
after your dad found the smiley faces on his casabas!”
“Weird,” Moose muttered. “Very weird. But lawn gnomes are lawn gnomes,
Joe. They don’t run around doing mischief.”
“What if we prove they’re guilty?” I suggested.
“Excuse me? How would we do that?”
“Catch them in the act,” I replied.
“Huh? This is nuts, Joe.”
“Come on, Moose. We’ll do it tonight. We’ll sneak out, hide around the side
of the house, and watch them.”
Moose shook his head. “No way,” he answered. “I’m in big trouble after
last night.”
“And after the police finish, what kind of trouble will you be in then?”
“Okay. Okay. I’ll do it,” he muttered. “But I think this whole thing is a big
waste of time.”
“We’re going to trap these gnomes, Moose,” I told him. “If it’s the last thing
we do.”
Ahhh!
My alarm clock! It didn’t go off!
And now it was nearly midnight. And I was late. I’d promised to meet
Moose outside at eleven-thirty.
I leaped out of bed, still dressed in my jeans and T-shirt. I grabbed my
sneakers and ran outside.
No moon. No stars. The front lawn lay blanketed in darkness.
The yard was silent. Too silent.
I glanced around for Moose. No sign of him. He probably went back inside
when I didn’t show.
What should I do now? Stay out by myself? Or go back to bed?
Something rustled in the bushes. I gasped.
“Joe. Joe. Over here,” Moose whispered loudly.
He popped his head out from behind the evergreen shrubs in front of my
house. And waved me over.
I slid down next to him.
Moose punched me hard on the arm. “I thought you chickened out.”
“No way!” I whispered back. “This was my idea!”
“Yeah, your crazy idea,” Moose replied. “I can’t believe I’m hiding behind
a bush. In the middle of the night. Spying on lawn ornaments.”
“I know it sounds crazy, but—”
“Shhh. Did you hear something?” Moose interrupted.
I heard it. A scraping sound.
I reached into the shrub and parted the thick green branches. The needles
clawed at my hands and arms. I jerked my arms out quickly. Too quickly. Blood
dripped from my fingers where two needles had pierced right through my skin.
The scraping sound came closer.
My heart pounded in my chest.
Closer.
Moose and I sat there. We exchanged frightened glances.
I had to look. I had to see what was making those sounds.
I parted the needles once again. And stared through the mass of needled
branches. Two small, glowing eyes met mine!
“Get it, Moose! Get it!” I cried.
Moose jumped up from behind the bush. Just in time—to see it scamper
away.
“A raccoon! It was only a raccoon!”
I let out a long sigh. “Sorry, Moose.”
We sat there a while longer. We parted the branches every few minutes to
check on the gnomes. My arms were scratched raw from the rough needles.
But the gnomes hadn’t budged. They stood grinning into the night in their
silly suits and caps.
I groaned. My legs felt stiff and cramped.
Moose checked his watch. “We’ve been out here for over two hours,” he
whispered. “Those gnomes aren’t going anywhere. I’m going home.”
“Wait a little longer,” I begged him. “We’ll catch them. I know we will.”
“You’re a pretty good guy,” Moose said as he parted the bushes for the
millionth time. “So I hate to tell you this, Joe. But you’re as crazy as—”
He didn’t finish his sentence. His mouth dropped open, and his eyes nearly
popped out of his pudgy head.
I peered into the shrubs—in time to see the gnomes come to life. They
stretched their arms over their heads. And stroked their chins.
They shook out their legs. And smoothed out their shirts.
“They—they’re moving!” Moose cried.
Too loudly.
And then I lost my balance and fell. Right into the bush.
They’ve seen us, I realized.
Now what?
19
“No. Oh, man. No!” Moose whispered. He tugged me to my feet. “They’re
moving. They’re really moving!”
Squinting through the branches, we both stared in horror at Hap and Chip.
The gnomes bent their knees, limbering up. Then they each took one stiff
step. Then another.
I was right. They are alive, I thought. Very alive.
And they’re coming for Moose and me.
We have to run, I told myself. We have to get out of here.
But neither of us could take our eyes off the living lawn gnomes!
The full moon suddenly appeared low over the trees. The front lawn lit as if
someone had turned on a spotlight. The stocky figures swung their short, fat
arms and began to run. Their pointed hats cut through the air like sharks’ fins.
They scrambled toward us on their stumpy legs.
Moose and I dropped to our knees and tried to hide. My whole body was
trembling so hard, I was making the bush shake!
The gnomes ran closer. So close that I could see the dark red of their evil
eyes and the white gleam of their grins.
I clenched my fists so tightly, my hands ached.
What were they going to do to us?
I shut my eyes—and heard them run past. I heard thudding footsteps.
Whistling breaths.
I opened my eyes to see them racing across the cement walk and around the
side of the house.
“Moose—they didn’t see us!” I whispered happily.
We helped each other to our feet. I felt dizzy. The dark ground tilted. My
legs felt soft and rubbery like Jell-O.
Moose wiped his sweaty brow. “Where are they going?” he whispered.
I shook my head. “I don’t know. But we have to follow them. Come on.”
We gave each other a quick thumbs-up and stepped out from our hiding
place. I led the way. We moved across the cement walk and past the front porch.
Toward the side of the house.
I stopped when I heard their raspy voices, talking low. Just up ahead.
Moose grabbed my shoulder, his eyes wide open in alarm. “I’m getting out
of here. Now!”
I turned around. “No!” I pleaded. “You’ve got to stay and help me catch
them. We have to show our parents what’s been going on here.”
He heaved a long sigh. It made me feel a little better to know that a big,
tough guy like Moose was as frightened as I was. Finally, he nodded. “Okay.
Let’s go get them.”
Keeping in the dark shadow of the house, we made our way around to the
back. I saw Buster, sound asleep beside his dog house in the center of the yard.
And then I saw the two lawn gnomes. They were bent over the pile of paint
and brushes and drop cloths the painters had left beside the garage.
Moose and I hung back as Hap and Chip picked up two cans of black paint.
They pried the cans open with their thick fingers.
Giggling, the two gnomes swung back the open cans, then hurled the black
paint at the side of my house. The black paint spattered the fresh white paint,
then dripped down in long, thick streaks.
I clapped a hand over my mouth to keep from screaming.
I knew it. I’d know it all along. But no one would believe me. The gnomes
were behind all the trouble around here.
The gnomes returned to the pile for more paint. “We’ve got to stop them,” I
whispered to Moose. “But how?”
“Let’s just tackle them,” Moose suggested. “Tackle them from behind and
pin them down.”
It sounded simple enough. They were little, after all. Smaller than us.
“Okay,” I whispered, my stomach fluttering. “Then we’ll drag them into the
house and show my parents.”
I took a deep breath and held it. Moose and I started to inch forward.
Closer. Closer.
If only my legs weren’t wobbling like rubber bands!
Closer.
And then I saw Moose go down.
He toppled forward—and hit the ground hard, letting out a loud “Oooof!”
It took me a second to see that he had tripped over Buster’s rope.
He struggled to get to his feet. But the rope had tangled around his ankle.
He reached down with both hands. Gave it a hard tug.
And woke up Buster!
“Rrrrrrowwwwwf! Rrrrrrowwwwwf!” Buster must have seen the gnomes
because he started barking his head off.
The gnomes spun around.
And fixed their eyes on us. In the bright moonlight, their faces turned hard
and angry.
“Get them!” Chip growled. “Don’t let them escape!”
20
“Run!” I screamed.
Moose and I bolted toward the front of the house.
Buster was still barking his head off.
And over the barking, I heard shrill giggles. The gnomes giggled as they
chased after us.
Their feet slapped sharply on the grass. I glanced back, saw their stubby
legs moving fast, a blur of motion.
I pumped my legs, gasping for breath, and rounded the side of the house.
I could hear the high-pitched giggles of the two gnomes close behind us.
“Help!” Moose cried. “Somebody—help us!”
My mouth hung open. I struggled to breathe. They were gaining on us.
I knew I had to run faster. But my legs suddenly felt as heavy as bricks.
“Hellllp!” Moose called.
I glanced at the house. Why wasn’t anyone waking up in there?
We ran around the house and kept running.
Why were Hap and Chip giggling like that?
Because they knew they were going to catch us?
I felt a stab of pain in my side. “Oh, no!” A cramp.
I felt Moose tugging me. “Don’t slow down, Joe. Keep going!”
The pain sharpened, like a knife in my side. “Can’t run…” I choked out.
“Joe—keep going! Don’t stop!” Moose cried, frantically pulling my arm.
But I doubled over, holding my side.
It’s all over, I thought. They’ve got me.
And then the front door swung open. The porch light flashed on.
“What’s going on out here?” a familiar voice called.
Mindy!
She stepped out, pulling at the belt of her pink bathrobe. I saw her squint
into the darkness.
“Mindy!” I called. “Mindy—watch out!”
Too late.
The gnomes grabbed her.
Giggling loudly, they pinned her arms back. Dragged her down the porch
steps. Carried her to the street.
21
Mindy thrashed her arms and kicked her legs. But the giggling gnomes had
surprising strength.
“Help me!” Mindy called back to Moose and me. “Don’t just stand there—
help me!”
I swallowed hard. The pain in my side faded.
Moose and I didn’t say a word. We just started chasing after them.
They had already carried Mindy to the street. Their feet slapped on the
pavement. In the light from the street lamp, I saw Mindy struggling to free
herself.
Moose and I hurtled down the driveway. “Put her down!” I shouted
breathlessly. “Put my sister down—now!”
More giggles. They scurried past the McCalls’ house. Past the next two
houses.
Moose and I ran after them, shouting, begging them to stop.
And then—to our shock—they did stop.
In the shadow of a tall hedge, they set Mindy down. And turned to us. “We
mean you no harm,” Chip said.
The gnomes’ expressions were serious now. Their eyes peered at us through
the darkness.
“I don’t believe this!” Mindy cried, straightening her robe. “This is crazy!
Crazy!”
“Tell me about it,” I muttered.
“Please listen to us,” Hap rasped.
“We mean you no harm,” Chip repeated.
“No harm!” Mindy shrieked. “No harm! You just dragged me from my
home! You—you—”
“We only wanted to get your attention,” Hap said softly.
“Well, you’ve got it!” Mindy exclaimed.
“We mean you no harm,” Chip said once again. “Please believe us.”
“How can we believe you?” I demanded, finally finding my voice. “Look at
all the trouble you’ve caused. You’ve ruined the gardens! You splashed paint
everywhere! You—”
“We can’t help it,” Hap interrupted.
“We really can’t,” Chip echoed. “You see, we’re Mischief Elves.”
“You’re what?” Mindy cried.
“We’re Mischief Elves. We do mischief. That’s our mission in life,” Hap
explained.
“Wherever there is mischief in the world, we’re there,” Chip added.
“Mischief is our job. We can’t help ourselves.”
He bent down and broke off a chunk of the concrete curb. Then he pulled
open the mailbox across from us and shoved the piece of concrete inside.
“See? I can’t help myself. I have to do mischief wherever I go.”
Hap giggled. “Without us, the world would be a pretty dull place—
wouldn’t it?”
“It would be a much better place,” Mindy insisted, crossing her arms in
front of her.
Moose still hadn’t said a word. He just stood and stared at the two talking
lawn gnomes.
Hap and Chip made pouty faces. “Please don’t hurt our feelings,” Chip
rasped. “Our life isn’t easy.”
“We need your help,” Hap added.
“You want us to help you do mischief?” I cried. “No way! You’ve already
gotten me into major trouble.”
“No. We need you to help get us our freedom,” Chip said solemnly. “Please
—listen and believe.”
“Listen and believe,” Hap echoed.
“We lived in a land far from here,” Chip began. “In a forest deep and green.
We guarded the mines and protected the trees. We performed our mischief
innocently. But we also did a lot of good.”
“We were hard-working people,” Hap told us, scratching his head. “And we
were happy in our forest home.”
“But then the mines were closed and the forests were cut down,” Chip
continued. “We were captured. Kidnapped. And taken far from home. We were
shipped to your country and forced to work as lawn ornaments.”
“Slaves,” Hap said, shaking his head sadly. “Forced to stand all day and
night.”
“That’s impossible!” Mindy cried. “Don’t you get bored? How do you stand
so still?”
“We go into a trance,” Chip explained. “Time passes without our realizing
it. We come out of the trance at night and go about doing our job.”
“You mean mischief!” I declared.
They both nodded.
“But we want to be free,” Hap continued. “To go where we want. To live
where we choose. We want to find another forest where we can live in freedom.”
Two tiny gnome tears rolled down his fat cheeks.
Chip sighed and raised his eyes to me. “Will you help us?”
“Help you do what?” I demanded.
“Help our friends and us escape?” Chip replied.
“There are six others,” Hap explained. “They’re locked in the basement. At
the store where you bought us. We need your help to set them free.”
“We can climb into the basement window,” his friend continued. “But we
are too short to climb back out. And too short to reach the doorknob to let
ourselves out through the door.”
“Will you help us escape?” Hap pleaded, tugging the bottom of my T-shirt.
“You just have to climb down into the basement. Then help our six friends out
the basement door.”
“Please help us,” Chip begged, tears in his eyes. “Then we’ll be gone. To a
deep forest. And we will never cause you any more mischief.”
“That sounds good to me!” Mindy exclaimed.
“So you’ll do it?” Hap squealed.
They both began tugging at us, chirping, “Please? Please? Please? Please?
Please?”
Moose, Mindy, and I exchanged troubled glances.
What should we do?
22
“Please? Please? Please? Please?”
“Let’s help them,” Moose said, finally finding his voice.
I turned to Mindy. I didn’t usually ask her advice. But she was the oldest.
“What do you think?”
Mindy bit her lower lip. “Well, look how much Buster hates to be tied up,”
she said. “He only wants to be free. I guess everything deserves to be free. Even
lawn gnomes.”
I turned back to the gnomes. “We’ll do it!” I declared. “We’ll help you.”
“Thank you! Thank you!” Chip cried happily. He threw his arms around
Hap. “You don’t know what this means to us!”
“Thank you! Thank you! Thank you!” Hap squealed. He leaped into the air
and clicked the heels of his boots together. “Hurry! Let’s go!”
“Now?” Mindy cried. “It’s the middle of the night! Can’t we wait until
tomorrow?”
“No. Please. Now,” Hap insisted.
“In the darkness,” Chip added. “While the store is closed. Please. Let’s
hurry.”
“I’m not dressed,” Mindy replied. “I really don’t think we can go now. I
think—”
“If we stay here longer, we’ll have to do more mischief,” Chip said with a
wink.
I sure didn’t want that to happen. “Let’s do it now!” I agreed.
And so the five of us crept along the dark street and up the steep hill toward
Lawn Lovely. Wow, did I feel weird! Here we were, walking around in the
middle of the night with a couple of lawn ornaments! About to break into the
store and set six more lawn ornaments free!
The old pink house was a strange enough place during the day. But at night,
it was totally creepy. All those lawn animals—deer and seals and flamingos—
stared at us through the darkness, with blank, lifeless eyes.
Were they alive, too? I wondered.
Hap seemed to read my mind. “They’re only for decoration,” he sneered.
“Nothing more.”
The two excited gnomes made their way quickly across the wide lawn and
around the side of Mrs. Anderson’s house. Moose, Mindy, and I followed
behind.
Mindy clutched my arm with an ice-cold hand. My legs still felt wobbly.
But my heart was pounding with excitement—not fear.
Hap and Chip pointed to the long, low window that led down to the
basement. I knelt down and peered inside. Total darkness.
“You’re sure the other gnomes are down there?” I asked.
“Oh, yes,” Chip declared eagerly. “All six. They’re waiting for you to
rescue them.”
“Please hurry,” Hap pleaded, shoving me gently to the window. “Before the
old woman hears us and wakes up.”
I lowered myself to the edge of the open window. And turned back to my
sister and Moose.
“We’re coming right behind you,” Moose whispered.
“Let’s rescue them and get out of here,” Mindy urged.
“Here goes,” I said softly.
I crossed my fingers and slid down into the darkness.
23
I bumped over the window frame and landed on my feet. A few seconds later, I
heard Moose and Mindy slide in after me.
I squinted into the blackness that surrounded us. I couldn’t see a thing. I
licked my dry lips and sniffed the air. A sharp smell, like vinegar, filled the hot,
damp basement. Sweat, I thought. Gnome sweat.
I heard a low giggle from outside. Chip and Hap hurtled over the window
ledge and thudded to the floor.
“Hey, guys—” I whispered.
But they scampered off into the darkness.
“What’s going on here?” Moose demanded.
“We’ve got to find the light switch,” Mindy whispered.
But before we could move, the ceiling lights all flashed on. I blinked in the
sudden blaze of brightness.
And then gasped as I stared across the vast basement—at a sea of lawn
gnomes!
Not six! Six hundred! Row after row of them, jammed against each other,
staring at the three of us.
“Whoa!” Moose cried. “It’s a mob!”
“Hap and Chip lied to us!” I cried.
Their shirts were different colors. But the lawn gnomes all looked exactly
alike. They all wore pointed caps and black belts. They all had staring red eyes,
wide noses, grinning lips, and large pointy ears.
I was so startled to see so many of the ugly creatures, it took me a while to
spot Hap and Chip. Finally, I saw them at the side of the room.
Hap clapped his hands three times.
And three more times. Short, sharp claps that echoed off the basement
walls.
And then the crowd of gnomes came to life, stretching and bending,
grinning and giggling, chattering in shrill, excited voices.
Mindy grabbed my arm. “We’ve got to get out of here.”
I could barely hear her over the chattering, giggling mob of gnomes. I
glanced up at the basement window. It suddenly seemed so high, so far away.
When I turned back, Hap and Chip had moved in front of us. They clapped
their hands for attention.
The hundreds of gnomes instantly fell silent.
“We have brought the young humans!” Hap announced, grinning happily.
“We have kept our promise!” Chip declared.
Giggles and cheering.
And then, to my horror, the gnomes began moving forward. Their eyes
flashed excitedly. They reached out their stubby arms toward us. The pointed
hats bobbed and slid forward, like sharks on the attack.
Mindy, Moose, and I backed up. Backed up to the wall.
The gnomes crowded up against us. Their little hands plucked at my
clothes, slapped my face, pulled my hair.
“Stop!” I shrieked. “Get back! Get back!”
“We came to help you!” I heard Mindy scream. “Please—we came to help
you escape!”
Loud giggling.
“But we don’t want to escape!” a grinning gnome declared. “Now that
you’re here, it’s going to be so much fun!”
24
Fun?
What did he mean by fun?
Hap and Chip pushed their way back to the front and stepped up beside us.
They clapped their hands together to silence the giggling, chattering crowd.
The basement instantly turned silent.
“You tricked us!” Mindy screamed at the two gnomes. “You lied to us!”
They giggled in reply and slapped each other’s shoulders gleefully.
“I can’t believe you fell for our sad story,” Hap said, shaking his head.
“We told you we’re Mischief Gnomes,” Chip sneered. “You should have
known we were playing mischief!”
“Great joke, guys,” I said, forcing a hoarse laugh. “You fooled us. Way to
go. So now let us go home, okay?”
“Yeah. Let us go home!” Moose insisted.
The whole room erupted in laughter.
Hap shook his head. “But the mischief has just begun!” he declared.
Cheers and giggles.
Chip turned to the crowd of excited gnomes. “So what shall we do with our
lovely prisoners? Any ideas?”
“Let’s see if they bounce!” a gnome called from near the back of the room.
“Yeah! Dribble them!”
“A dribbling contest!”
“No—bounce them against the wall. Bounce and catch!”
More cheers.
“No! Fold them into tiny squares! I love it when we fold humans into
squares!”
“Yes! A folding contest!” another gnome cried.
“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” several gnomes began to chant.
“Tickle them!” a gnome in front suggested.
“Tickle them for hours!”
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!”
The room rang out with their excited chants.
“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!”
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!”
“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!”
I turned to Moose. He stared out at the crowd of chanting gnomes, dazed
and frightened. His eyes bulged and his chin quivered.
Mindy had her back pressed up against the basement wall. Her blond hair
was matted to her forehead. Her hands were jammed into the pockets of her
bathrobe.
“What are we going to do?” she asked me, shouting over the excited chants.
Suddenly I had an idea.
I raised my arms high over my head. “Quiet!” I screamed.
The room instantly grew silent. Hundreds of red eyes glared at me.
“Let us go!” I demanded. “Or the three of us will scream at the top of our
lungs. We will wake up Mrs. Anderson. And she will be down here in a second
to rescue us!”
Silence.
Had I frightened them?
No. The gnomes burst into loud, scornful laughter. They slapped each
other’s shoulders, hooted, and giggled.
“You’ll have to do better than that!” Hap grinned up at me. “We all know
that Mrs. Anderson can’t hear a thing.”
“Go ahead and shout,” Chip urged. “Shout all you want. We like it when
humans shout.” He turned to Hap, and the two of them slapped each other’s
shoulders and fell on the floor, giggling gleefully, kicking their feet in the air.
Over the vast basement, the chants started up again.
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!”
“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!”
“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!”
With a long sigh, I turned to my frightened sister and friend. “We’re
doomed,” I muttered. “We don’t have a chance.”
25
“Tug of War! Tug of War!”
A new chant started in the back of the room and swept up toward the front.
“Yes!” Hap and Chip declared happily.
“Excellent mischief!” Hap cried.
“A Tug of War! We’ll tug them till they stretch!” Chip shouted.
“Stretch them! Stretch them!”
“Tug of War! Tug of War!”
“Joe—what are we going to do?” I heard Mindy’s frightened voice over the
enthusiastic chants.
Think, Joe, I urged myself. Think! There has to be a way out of this
basement.
But I felt so dazed. The chants rang in my ears. The grinning faces leered
up at us. My thoughts were a jumbled mess.
“Stretch them! Stretch them!”
“Fold them! Fold them!”
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!”
Suddenly, over the shrill gnome voices, I heard a familiar sound.
A dog’s bark.
Buster’s bark.
“Buster!” Mindy cried. “I hear him!”
“I—I did too!” I exclaimed, turning and raising my eyes to the window
above our heads. “He followed us! He must be right outside!”
I desperately wished Buster could talk. Could run home and tell Mom and
Dad that we were in terrible trouble.
But he could only bark. Or… could he do more?
I suddenly remembered how frightened Hap and Chip appeared whenever
Buster came around. The terrified expressions on their faces.
My heart fluttered with hope. Maybe the gnomes are afraid of dogs. Maybe
Buster can scare them into letting us go. Maybe he can even frighten them back
into their trance.
I edged closer to my sister, my back pressed against the wall. “Mindy, I
think the gnomes are afraid of Buster. If we get him down here, I think he can
save us.”
We didn’t hesitate. All three of us started shouting up to the window.
“Buster! Buster! Come here, boy!”
Could he hear us over the chanting gnomes?
Yes!
His big head peered down at us through the window.
“Good boy!” I cried. “Now, come here. Come down here, Buster!”
Buster’s mouth opened. His pink tongue drooped from his mouth, and he
started to pant.
“Good doggie!” I crooned. “Good doggie—come down here. Fast! Come,
boy! Come, Buster!”
Buster poked his head into the window. And yawned.
“Down, Buster!” Mindy ordered. “Come down here, boy!”
He pulled his head out of the window. And settled down on the ground
outside. I could see his head resting on his paws.
“No, Buster!” I shrieked, shouting over the chants. “Come, boy! Don’t lie
down! Come! Buster, come!”
“Rowf?” He pushed his head back into the window. Farther. Farther.
“That a boy! Come on!” I pleaded. “A little more… a little more. If you
come down here, I’ll feed you doggie treats five times a day.”
Buster cocked his head to the side and sniffed at the damp, sweaty air of the
basement.
I held my arms out to the dog. “Please, Buster. You’re our last chance.
Please—hurry! Come down here.”
To my dismay, Buster pulled his head out of the window.
Turned.
And trotted away.
26
Mindy and Moose let out long, disappointed sighs. “Buster deserted us,” Mindy
said softly. Her shoulders sagged. Moose dropped to his knees on the floor,
shaking his head.
“Trampoline! Trampoline!”
The chant had changed.
Hap grinned up at us. “Maybe we’ll use you for trampolines! That would be
fun!”
“It’s almost time for a vote!” Chip added, rubbing his hands together
eagerly.
“Trampoline! Trampoline!”
“Tug of War! Tug of War!”
I held my hands over my ears, trying to block out the sound of their shrill
voices.
Silence. Please let me have silence, I thought.
Silence.
The word gave me an idea.
Silence. Buster’s dog whistle was silent!
Suddenly, I knew how to bring Buster back!
“Mindy!” I cried “The dog whistle! Buster always comes when I blow the
dog whistle!”
Mindy raised her head and brightened. “That’s right!” she cried. “Hurry,
Joe!”
I grabbed for the shiny metal whistle under my T-shirt. It felt slippery with
sweat. This has to work, I thought to myself. It has to bring Buster back.
I pulled the whistle out.
“The whistle!” several gnomes shrieked.
The room instantly grew silent.
I raised the whistle to my lips.
“Quick—blow it!” Mindy screeched.
To my surprise, Hap and Chip both dove at me.
They leaped up and slapped at the whistle.
The whistle spun out of my hands.
“Noooo!” I cried in despair.
I grabbed frantically for it.
But it rolled and tumbled away, sliding across the basement floor.
27
Mindy, Moose, and I all dove for it.
But the gnomes were quicker.
A gnome in a bright blue shirt raised the whistle, clutched tightly in his
little fist. “I’ve got it!”
“No, you don’t!” Moose cried. He leaped at the gnome. Tackled him around
the knees.
The gnome let out a yelp as he went toppling to the floor.
The dog whistle fell from his hand.
And bounced across the hard floor toward me.
I scooped it up. Started to raise it to my lips.
Three gnomes leaped onto my shoulders, giggling and grunting.
“Noooo!” I uttered a cry as they batted the whistle from my hand. I dropped
to the floor, three gnomes on top of me.
I finally shook them off and jumped to my feet. My eyes searched for the
whistle.
I saw a bunch of gnomes diving for the floor, scrambling for it. A few feet
away, Moose struggled against four or five gnomes who had formed a line to
block him. Mindy was battling another group of gnomes, who held her back,
their tiny hands around her legs and waist.
And then I saw Hap raise the whistle high.
The gnomes stepped back, clearing a circle around him.
Hap set the whistle in front of him on the floor. Then he raised his foot
high.
He was about to crush it!
“Noooooo!” Another long cry escaped my throat. I scrambled over the
floor, half-crawling, half-flying.
As Hap’s heavy plaster foot came down, I stretched out my hand.
Fumbled for the whistle.
Grabbed it.
Rolled away as the gnome’s foot tromped down heavily. It thudded inches
from my head.
I sat up. Raised the whistle to my lips.
And blew as hard as I could.
Now what?
Would the whistle work?
Would Buster come running to rescue us?
28
I blew the silent whistle again.
And turned to the window. Buster, where are you?
The gnomes must have been asking the same question. Because they froze
in place, too. The excited chattering, giggling, and chanting stopped.
The only sound I could hear was my own shallow breathing.
I stared up at the window. A rectangle of blackness. No sign of Buster.
“Hey—!” Moose’s cry made me turn around.
“Look at them!” Moose’s voice echoed through the silence.
“Look—they all froze!” Mindy declared. She placed both hands on the red
cap of a gnome—and pushed the gnome over.
It clattered to the floor. And didn’t move. A hunk of plaster.
“I don’t get it!” Moose scratched his crew cut.
Still gripping the dog whistle tightly, I moved around the room, examining
the frozen gnomes, pushing them over. Enjoying the silence.
“Back in their trance state,” Mindy murmured.
“But how?” Moose demanded. “Buster never showed up. If they weren’t
terrified of the dog, why did they all freeze up again?”
I suddenly knew the answer. I raised the whistle and blew it again. “It was
the whistle,” I explained. “It wasn’t Buster. I had it wrong. They were afraid of
the whistle. Not the dog.”
“Let’s get out of here,” Mindy said softly. “I never want to see another lawn
gnome as long as I live.”
“Wait till I tell my parents about this!” Moose declared.
“Whoa!” I cried, grabbing his shoulder. “We can’t tell anyone about this.
No way!”
“Why not?” he demanded.
“Because no one will believe it,” I replied.
Moose stared at me for a long moment. “You’re right,” he agreed finally.
“You’re definitely right.”
Mindy moved to the wall and stared up at the window. “How do we get out
of here?”
“I know how,” I told her. I picked up Hap and Chip and stood them beneath
the window. Then I climbed onto their caps, lifted my hands to the window, and
pulled myself up. “Thanks for the boost, guys!” I called down.
They didn’t reply.
I hoped they were frozen for good.
Mindy and Moose followed me out. Of course, Buster was waiting for us in
the yard. His stubby tail began to wag as soon as I appeared. He came running
over and licked my face till I was sopping wet and sticky.
“Sorry, fella. You’re a little late,” I told him. “You weren’t much help—
were you!”
He licked me some more. Then he greeted Mindy and Moose.
“Yaaaay! We’re out! We’re out!” Moose cried. He slapped me so hard on
the back, I thought my teeth were going to fly out!
I turned to my sister. “Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” I chanted.
“Give me a break!” Mindy cried, rolling her eyes for the thousandth time
that day.
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” I made tickling motions with my hands and started
to chase her down the street.
“Joe—stop it! Don’t tickle me! I’m warning you!”
“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!”
I knew I’d never forget those high-pitched chants. I knew I’d hear them in
my dreams for a long, long time.
The next evening, Mindy and I were watching MTV in the den when Dad came
home. “Be nice to your dad,” Mom had warned us earlier. “He’s very upset that
somebody stole his two lawn gnomes.”
Yes, the two gnomes were missing when he woke up.
Big surprise.
Mindy and I were so happy, we didn’t have a single argument all day.
And now we were happy to see Dad—except that he had a strange
expression on his face. “Uh… I’ve brought home a little surprise,” he
announced, glancing guiltily at Mom.
“Now what?” she demanded.
“Come and see.” Dad led us out to the front lawn.
The sun was disappearing behind the trees, and the sky was gray. But I
could still see clearly what Dad had purchased at Lawn Lovely this time.
An enormous, brown plaster gorilla!
At least eight feet tall, with gigantic black eyes and a bright purple chest.
The gorilla had paws the size of baseball mitts and a head as big as a basketball.
“It’s the ugliest thing I ever saw!” Mom cried, both hands pressed to her
face. “You’re not really going to put that horrible monster on our front lawn—
are you, dear?”
Anything is better than those lawn gnomes, I thought. Anything is better
than lawn gnomes who come alive and do terrible mischief.
I glanced at Mindy. I had a feeling she was thinking the same thing.
“I think it’s a beauty, Dad,” I said. “It’s the best-looking lawn gorilla I ever
saw!”
“It’s great, Dad,” Mindy agreed.
Dad smiled.
Mom turned and hurried back to the house, shaking her head.
I glanced up at the gorilla’s enormous purple-and-brown painted face. “Be a
good gorilla,” I murmured. “Don’t be like those awful gnomes.”
Then, as I started to turn away, the gorilla winked at me.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

A SHOCKER ON
SHOCK STREET
Goosebumps - 35
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“This is creepy, Erin.” My friend Marty grabbed my sleeve.
“Let go!” I whispered. “You’re hurting me!”
Marty didn’t seem to hear. He stared straight ahead into the darkness,
gripping my arm.
“Marty, please—” I whispered. I shook my arm free. I was scared, too. But
I didn’t want to admit it.
It was darker than the darkest night. I squinted hard, trying to see. And then
a gray light glowed dimly in front of us.
Marty ducked low. Even in the foggy light, I could see the fear in his eyes.
He grabbed my arm again. His mouth dropped open. I could hear him
breathing hard and fast.
Even though I was frightened, a smile crossed my face. I liked seeing Marty
scared.
I really enjoyed it.
I know, I know. That’s terrible. I admit it. Erin Wright is a bad person. What
kind of a friend am I?
But Marty always brags that he is braver than me. And he is usually right.
He usually is the brave one, and I’m the wimp.
But not today.
That’s why seeing Marty gasp in fright and grab my arm made me smile.
The gray light ahead of us slowly grew brighter. I heard crunching sounds
on both sides of us. Close behind me, someone coughed. But Marty and I didn’t
turn around. We kept our eyes straight ahead.
Waiting. Watching….
As I squinted into the gray light, a fence came into view. A long wooden
fence, its paint faded and peeling. A hand-lettered sign appeared on the fence:
DANGER. KEEP OUT. THIS MEANS YOU.
Marty and I both gasped when we heard the scraping sounds. Soft at first.
Then louder. Like giant claws scraping against the other side of the fence.
I tried to swallow, but my mouth suddenly felt dry. I had the urge to run.
Just turn and run as fast as I could.
But I couldn’t leave Marty there all alone. And besides, if I ran away now,
he would never let me forget it. He’d tease me about it forever.
So I stayed beside him, listening as the scraping, clawing sounds turned into
banging. Loud crashes.
Was someone trying to break through the fence?
We moved quickly along the fence. Faster, faster—until the tall, peeling
fence pickets became a gray blur.
But the sound followed us. Heavy footsteps on the other side of the fence.
We stared straight ahead. We were on an empty street. A familiar street.
Yes, we had been here before.
The pavement was puddled with rainwater. The puddles glowed in the pale
light from the streetlamps.
I took a deep breath. Marty gripped my arm harder. Our mouths gaped
open.
To our horror, the fence began to shake. The whole street shook. The rain
puddles splashed against the curb.
The footsteps thundered closer.
“Marty—!” I gasped in a choked whisper.
Before I could say another word, the fence crumbled to the ground, and the
monster came bursting out.
It had a head like a wolf—snapping jaws of gleaming white teeth—and a
body like a giant crab. It swung four huge claws in front of it, clicking them at us
as its snout pulled open in a throaty growl.
“NOOOOOOO!” Marty and I both let out howls of terror.
We jumped to our feet.
But there was nowhere to run.
2
We stood and stared as the wolf-crab crawled toward us.
“Please sit down, kids,” a voice called out behind us. “I can’t see the
screen.”
“Ssshhhh!” someone else whispered.
Marty and I glanced at each other. I guess we both felt like jerks. I know I
did. We dropped back into our seats.
And watched the wolf-crab scamper across the street, chasing after a little
boy on a tricycle.
“What’s your problem, Erin?” Marty whispered, shaking his head. “It’s
only a movie. Why did you scream like that?”
“You screamed too!” I replied sharply.
“I only screamed because you screamed!” he insisted.
“Sssshhh!” someone pleaded. I sank low in the seat. I heard crunching
sounds all around me. People eating popcorn. Someone behind me coughed.
On the screen, the wolf-crab reached out his big, red claws and grabbed the
kid on the trike. SNAP. SNAP. Good-bye, kid.
Some people in the theater laughed. It was pretty funny.
That’s the great thing about the Shocker on Shock Street movies. They make
you scream and laugh at the same time.
Marty and I sat back and enjoyed the rest of the movie. We love scary
movies, but the Shock Street films are our favorites.
In the end, the police caught the wolf-crab. They boiled him in a big pot of
water. Then they served steamed crab to the whole town. Everyone sat around
dipping him in butter sauce. They all said he was delicious.
It was the perfect ending. Marty and I clapped and cheered. Marty put two
fingers in his mouth and whistled through his teeth the way he always does.
We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI, and it was definitely the best
one of the series.
The theater lights came on. We turned up the aisle and started to make our
way through the crowd.
“Great special effects,” a man told his friend.
“Special effects?” the friend replied. “I thought it was all real!”
They both laughed.
Marty bumped me hard from behind. He thinks it’s funny to try and knock
me over. “Pretty good movie,” he said.
I turned back to him. “Huh? Pretty good?”
“Well, it wasn’t scary enough,” he replied. “Actually, it was kind of
babyish. Shocker V was a lot scarier.”
I rolled my eyes. “Marty, you screamed your head off—remember? You
jumped out of your seat. You grabbed my arm and—”
“I only did that because I saw how scared you were,” he said, grinning.
What a liar! Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared?
He stuck his sneaker out and tried to trip me.
I dodged to the left, stumbled—and bumped hard into a young woman.
“Hey—look out!” she cried. “You twins should be more careful.”
“We’re not twins!” Marty and I cried in unison.
We’re not even brother and sister. We’re not related in any way. But people
always think that Marty and I are twins.
I guess we do look a lot alike. We’re both twelve years old. And we’re both
pretty short and kind of chubby. We both have round faces, short black hair, and
blue eyes. And we both have little noses that sort of turn up.
But we’re not twins! We’re only friends.
I apologized to the woman. When I turned back to Marty, he stuck out his
shoe and tried to trip me again.
I stumbled, but quickly caught my balance. Then I stuck out my shoe—and
tripped him.
We kept tripping each other through the long lobby. People were staring at
us, but we didn’t care. We were laughing too hard.
“Do you know the coolest thing about this movie?” I asked.
“No. What?”
“That we’re the first kids in the world to see it!” I exclaimed.
“Yeah!” Marty and I slapped each other a high five.
We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI at a special sneak preview. My
dad works with a lot of movie people, and he got us tickets for it. The others in
the theater were all adults. Marty and I were the only kids.
“Know what else was really cool?” I asked. “The monsters. All of them.
They looked so incredibly real. It didn’t look like special effects at all.”
Marty frowned. “Well, I thought the Electric Eel Woman was pretty phony-
looking. She didn’t look like an eel—she looked like a big worm!”
I laughed. “Then why did you jump out of your seat when she shot a bolt of
electricity and fried that gang of teenagers?”
“I didn’t jump,” Marty insisted. “You did!”
“Did not! You jumped because it looked so real,” I insisted. “And I heard
you choke when the Toxic Creep leaped out of the nuclear waste pit.”
“I choked on a Milk Dud, that’s all.”
“You were scared, Marty, because it was so real.”
“Hey—what if they are real?!” Marty exclaimed. “What if it isn’t special
effects? What if they’re all real monsters?”
“Don’t be dumb,” I said.
We turned the corner into another hall.
The wolf-crab stood waiting for me there.
I didn’t even have time to scream.
He opened his toothy jaws in a long wolf howl—and wrapped two giant red
claws around my waist.
3
I opened my mouth to scream, but only a squeak came out.
I heard people laughing.
The big claws slid off my waist. Plastic claws.
I saw two dark eyes staring out at me from behind the wolf mask. I should
have known that it was a man in a costume. But I didn’t expect him to be
standing there.
I was surprised, that’s all.
I blinked at a white flash of light. A man had just taken a picture of the
creature. I saw a big red and yellow sign against the wall: SEE THE MOVIE—
THEN PLAY THE GAME ON CD-ROM.
“Sorry if I scared you,” the man inside the wolf-crab costume said softly.
“She scares easily!” Marty declared.
I gave Marty a hard shove, and we hurried away. I turned back to see the
creature waving a claw at me. “We’ve got to go upstairs and see my dad,” I told
Marty.
“Tell me something I don’t know.”
He thinks he’s so funny.
Dad’s office is upstairs from the theater, on the twenty-ninth floor. We
jogged to the elevators at the end of the hall and took one up.
Dad has a really cool job. He builds theme parks. And he designs all kinds
of rides.
Dad was one of the designers of Prehistoric Park. That’s the big theme park
where you go back to prehistoric times. It has all kinds of neat rides and shows
—and dozens of huge dinosaur robots wandering around.
And Dad worked on the Fantasy Films Studio Tour. Everyone who comes
to Hollywood goes on that tour.
Dad’s idea was the part where you walk through a huge movie screen and
find yourself in a world of movie characters. You can star in any kind of movie
you want to be in!
I know it sounds as if I’m bragging, but Dad is really smart, and he’s an
engineering genius! I think he is the world expert on robots. He can build robots
that will do anything! And he uses them in all his parks and studio tours.
Marty and I stepped off the elevator on the twenty-ninth floor. We waved to
the woman at the front desk. Then we hurried to Dad’s office at the end of the
hall.
It looks more like a playroom than an office. It’s a big room. Huge, really.
Filled with toys, and stuffed cartoon characters, movie posters, and models of
monsters.
Marty and I love to roam around the office, staring at all the neat stuff. On
the walls, Dad has great posters from a dozen different movies. On a long table,
he has a model of The Tumbler, the upside-down roller coaster he designed. The
model has little cars that really screech around the tracks.
And he has a lot of cool stuff from Shock Street—like one of the original
furry paws that Wolf Girl wore in Nightmare on Shock Street. He keeps it in a
glass case on the windowsill.
He has models of tramcars and little trains and planes and rockets. Even a
big, silver plastic blimp. It’s radio-controlled, and he can make it float round and
around his office.
What a great place! I always think of Dad’s office as the happiest place in
the world.
But today, as Marty and I stepped inside, Dad didn’t look too happy. He
hunched over his desk with the telephone to his ear. His head was lowered, his
eyes down. He kept a hand pressed against his forehead as he mumbled into the
phone.
Dad and I don’t look at all alike. I’m short and dark. He’s tall and thin. And
he has blond hair, although there’s not much left of it. He’s pretty bald.
He has the kind of skin that turns red easily.
His cheeks get real pink when he talks. And he wears big, round glasses
with dark frames that hide his brown eyes.
Marty and I stopped at the doorway. I don’t think Dad saw us. He stared
down at the desk. He had his tie pulled down and his shirt collar open.
He muttered for a short while longer. Marty and I crept into the office.
Finally, Dad set down the phone. He raised his eyes and saw us. “Oh, hi,
you two,” he said softly. His cheeks turned bright pink.
“Dad—what’s wrong?” I asked.
He sighed. Then he pulled off his glasses and pinched the bridge of his
nose. “I have very bad news, Erin. Very bad news.”
4
“Dad—what is it? What?” I cried.
Then I saw the grin slowly spread across his face. I knew I’d been tricked
again.
“Gotcha!” he declared. His brown eyes flashed gleefully. His cheeks were
bright pink. “Gotcha again. You fall for that gag every time.”
“Dad—!” I let out an angry cry. Then I rushed up to the desk, wrapped my
hands around his neck, and pretended to strangle him.
We both collapsed against each other, laughing. Marty still stood in the
doorway, shaking his head. “Mr. Wright, that is so lame,” he muttered.
Dad struggled to slip his glasses back on. “I’m sorry. You kids are just too
easy to fool. I couldn’t resist.” He smiled at me. “Actually, I’ve got good news.”
“Good news? Is this another joke?” I demanded suspiciously.
He shook his head. He picked up something from his desk. “Check this out,
guys. Do you know what this is?” He held it in his palm.
Marty and I came closer to examine it. It was a little, white plastic vehicle
with four wheels. “Some kind of train car?” I guessed.
“It’s a tramcar,” Dad explained. “See? People sit on long benches inside it.
Here. It’s motor-driven.” He pointed to the front of the model to show where the
engine went. “But do you know where this tramcar will be used?”
“Dad, we give up. Just tell us,” I insisted impatiently. “Stop keeping us in
suspense.”
“Okay, okay.” His cheeks reddened. His smile grew wider. “This is a model
of the tram that will be used at the Shocker Studio Tour.”
My mouth dropped open. “Do you mean the tour is finally going to open?”
I knew that Dad had been working on it for years.
Dad nodded. “Yes. We’re finally about to open it to the public. But before
we do, I want you two to test it out.”
“Huh? You mean it?” I shrieked. I was so excited, I felt as if I’d burst out of
my skin!
I turned to Marty. He was leaping up and down, shooting both fists into the
air. “Yes! Yes! Yes!”
“I built this whole tour,” Dad said, “and I want you two to be the first kids
in the world to go on it. I want to know your opinion. What you like and what
you don’t like.”
“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty kept leaping into the air. I thought I might have to
tie a rope around his waist and hold onto it to keep him from floating away!
“Dad—the Shock Street movies are the best!” I cried. “This is awesome!”
And then I added, “Is the tour very scary?”
Dad rested a hand on my shoulder. “I hope so,” he replied. “I tried to make
it as scary and real as I could. You get on the tram and you ride through the
whole movie studio. You get to meet all of the characters from the horror
movies. And then the tram takes you on a slow ride down Shock Street.”
“The real Shock Street?” Marty cried. “Do you mean it? You get to ride
down the real street where they make the movies?”
Dad nodded. “Yes. The real Shock Street.”
“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty started pumping his fists in the air again, shouting
like a maniac.
“Awesome!” I cried. “Totally awesome!” I was as excited as Marty.
Suddenly Marty stopped leaping. His expression turned serious. “Maybe
Erin shouldn’t go,” he told my dad. “She gets too scared.”
“Huh?” I cried.
“She was so scared during the movie sneak preview, I had to hold her
hand,” Marty told Dad.
What a liar!
“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. “If anyone was a scaredy-cat wimp, it
was you, Marty!”
Dad raised both hands to signal halt. “Calm down, guys,” he said softly.
“No arguing. You have to keep together. You know, you two will be the only
ones on the tour tomorrow. The only ones.”
“Yes!” Marty cheered happily. “Yes! Yes!”
“Wow! That’s great!” I cried. “It’s totally great. It’s going to be the best!”
Then I had an idea. “Can Mom come too? I bet she would really enjoy it.”
“Excuse me?” Dad squinted at me through his glasses. His whole face
turned bright red. “What did you say?”
“I asked if Mom could come too,” I repeated.
Dad kept staring at me for a long time, studying me. “Are you feeling okay,
Erin?” he asked finally.
“Yes. Fine,” I replied meekly.
I suddenly felt very confused and upset. What had I done wrong?
Was something wrong with Mom?
Why was Dad staring at me like that?
5
Dad came around the desk and put an arm around my shoulder. “I think you and
Marty will have a better time if you go by yourselves,” he said softly. “Don’t you
agree?”
I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.”
I still wondered why he was staring at me so suspiciously. But I decided not
to ask him. I didn’t want him to get angry or something and change his mind
about us going on the tour.
“Do you mean you’re not coming with us?” Marty asked Dad. “We’re
really going by ourselves?”
“I want you to go by yourselves,” Dad replied. “I think that will make it
more exciting for you.”
Marty grinned at me. “I hope it’s really scary!” he declared.
“Don’t worry,” Dad replied. A strange smile spread over his face. “You
won’t be disappointed.”
The next afternoon, a gray haze hung in the air as Dad drove Marty and me
to Shocker Studios.
I sat up front with Dad, peering out the car window at the smog. “It’s so
gloomy out,” I murmured.
“Perfect for a horror movie tour,” Marty chimed in from the backseat. He
was so excited, he could barely sit still. He kept bouncing his legs up and down
and tapping his hands on the leather seat.
I had never seen Marty so crazed. If he didn’t have his seat belt to hold him
down, he’d probably bounce right out of the car!
The car climbed up the Hollywood hills. The narrow road curved past
redwood houses and tree-filled yards cut into the sides of the hills.
As we climbed, the sky turned even darker. We’re driving up into a cloud of
fog, I thought. Far in the distance, I could see the HOLLYWOOD sign,
stretching in the haze across a dark peak.
“Hope it doesn’t rain,” I muttered, watching the fog roll over the sign.
Dad chuckled. “You know it never rains in Los Angeles!”
“Which monsters are we going to see?” Marty asked, bouncing in the
backseat. “Is Shockro on the tour? Do we really get to walk on Shock Street?”
Dad squinted hard through his glasses, turning the wheel as the road curved
and twisted. “I’m not telling,” he replied. “I don’t want to spoil it for you. I want
it all to be a surprise.”
“I just wanted to know so I could warn Erin,” Marty said. “I don’t want her
to get too scared. She might faint or something.” He laughed.
I let out an angry growl. Then I turned around and tried to punch him. But I
couldn’t reach.
Marty leaned forward and messed up my hair with both hands. “Get off
me!” I screamed. “I’m warning you—!”
“Take it easy, guys,” Dad said softly. “We’re here.”
I turned and stared out the windshield. The road had flattened out. Up
ahead, an enormous sign proclaimed SHOCKER STUDIOS in scary, blood-red
letters.
We drove slowly up to the huge iron gates in the front. The gates were
closed. A guard in a small black booth sat reading a newspaper. I glimpsed gold
script letters above the gate. They spelled out one word: BEWARE.
Dad pulled right up to the gate, and the guard peered up. He gave Dad a big
smile. Then he pressed a button, and the gates slowly swung open. Dad drove
the car into the tall white parking garage beside the studio. He parked in the first
space next to the entrance. The garage seemed to stretch on forever. But I could
see only three or four other cars inside.
“When we open next week, this garage will be jammed!” Dad said. “There
will be thousands of people here. I hope.”
“And today, we’re the only ones!” Marty cried excitedly, jumping out of the
car.
“We’re so lucky!” I agreed.
A few minutes later, we were standing on the platform outside the main
building, facing a wide street, waiting for the tram to take us on the tour. The
street led to dozens of white studio buildings, spread out all the way down the
hill.
Dad pointed to two enormous buildings as big as airplane hangars. “Those
are the soundstages,” he explained. “They film a lot of movie scenes inside those
buildings.”
“Does the tour go inside them?” Marty demanded. “Where is Shock Street?
Where are the monsters? Are they making a movie now? Can we watch them
making it?”
“Whoa!” Dad cried. He placed his hands on Marty’s shoulders as if to keep
him from flying off the ground. I had never seen Marty so totally wired! “Take it
easy, fella,” Dad warned. “You’ll blow a fuse! You won’t survive the tour!”
I shook my head. “Maybe we should put him on a leash,” I told Dad.
“Arf, arf!” Marty barked. Then he snapped his teeth at me, trying to bite
me.
I shivered. The fog rolled in from the hills. The air felt damp and cold. The
sky darkened.
Two men in business suits came zooming along the street in a golf cart.
They were both talking at once. One of them waved to Dad.
“Can we ride in one of those carts?” Marty asked. “Can Erin and I each
have our own cart?”
“No way,” Dad told him. “You have to take the automated tram. And
remember—stay in the tramcar. No matter what.”
“You mean we can’t walk on Shock Street?” Marty whined.
Dad shook his head. “Not allowed. You have to stay on the tram.”
He turned to me. “I’ll be waiting for you here on the platform when you get
back. I want a full report. I want to know what you like and what you don’t like.
And don’t worry if things don’t work exactly right. There are still a few bugs to
work out.”
“Hey—here comes the tram!” Marty cried, hopping up and down and
pointing.
The tram came rolling silently around the corner. I counted six tramcars in
all. They were shaped like roller-coaster cars, open on top—only much longer
and wider. The cars were black. A grinning white skull was painted on the front
of the first car.
A young, red-haired woman wearing a black uniform was seated on the first
bench in the front car. She waved to us as the tram rolled up to the platform. She
was the only passenger.
She hopped out as the tram stopped. “Hi, I’m Linda. I’m your tour guide.”
She smiled at my dad. Her red hair fluttered in the wind.
“Hello, Linda,” Dad said, smiling back at her. He gently shoved Marty and
me forward. “Here are your first two victims.”
Linda laughed and asked us our names. We told her.
“Can we ride in front?” Marty asked eagerly.
“Yes, of course,” Linda replied. “You can sit anywhere you want. This
whole ride is just for you.”
“All right!” Marty cried. He slapped me a high five.
Dad laughed. “I think Marty is ready to begin,” he told Linda.
Linda pushed her red hair out of her face. “You can start right away, guys.
But first, there’s something I have to do.”
She leaned over the tramcar and tugged out a black canvas bag. “This will
only take a second, guys.” She pulled a red plastic gun from the bag. “This is a
Shocker Stun Ray Blaster.”
She gripped the plastic pistol tightly. It looked like something in a Star Trek
movie. Her smile faded. Her green eyes narrowed. “Be careful with these
blasters, guys. They can freeze a monster in its tracks from twenty feet.”
She handed the blaster to me. Then she reached into her bag to get one for
Marty. “Don’t fire them unless you have to.” She swallowed hard and bit her
lower lip. “I sure hope you don’t have to.”
I laughed. “You’re kidding—right? These are just toys—right?”
She didn’t answer. She pulled another blaster from her bag and started to
bring it to Marty.
But she stumbled over a cord on the platform. “Ohh!” She let out a startled
cry as the blaster went off in her hand.
A loud buzz. A bright ray of yellow light.
And Linda stood frozen on the platform.
6
“Linda! Linda!” I screamed.
Marty’s mouth dropped open. He let out a choked gurgle.
I turned to Dad. To my surprise, he was laughing.
“Dad—she’s—she’s frozen!” I cried. But when I turned back to Linda, she
had a big smile on her face, too.
It took us both a while, but we soon realized the whole thing was a joke.
“That’s the first shock on the Shocker tour,” Linda announced, lowering the
red blaster. She put a hand on Marty’s shoulder. “I think I really shocked you,
Marty!”
“No way!” Marty insisted. “I knew it was a joke. I just played along.”
“Come on, Marty!” I cried, rolling my eyes. “You nearly dropped your
teeth!”
“Erin, I wasn’t scared,” Marty insisted sharply. “Really. I just went along
with the joke. Do you really think I’d fall for a dumb plastic blaster gun?”
Marty is such a jerk. Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared?
“Climb in, you two,” Dad urged. “Let’s get this show on the road.”
Marty and I climbed into the front seat of the tram. I looked for a seat belt
or a safety bar, but there wasn’t one. “Are you coming with us?” I asked Linda.
She shook her head. “No. You’re on your own. The tram moves
automatically.” She handed Marty his Stun Blaster. “Hope you don’t need it.”
“Yeah. Sure,” Marty muttered, rolling his eyes. “This gun is so babyish.”
“Remember—I’ll meet you back here at the end of the ride,” Dad said. He
waved. “Enjoy it. I want a full report.”
“Don’t get out of the tram,” Linda reminded us. “Keep your head and arms
inside. And don’t stand up while the tram is moving.”
She stepped on a blue button on the platform. The tram started up with a
jolt. Marty and I were thrown back against the seat. Then the tram rolled
smoothly forward.
“First stop is The Haunted House of Horror!” Linda called after us. “Good
luck!”
I turned back to see her waving to us, her long red hair fluttering in the
wind. A strong breeze blew against us as the tram made its way down the hill.
The sky was nearly as dark as night. Some of the white studio buildings were
hidden by the fog.
“Stupid gun,” Marty muttered, rolling it around in his hands. “Why do we
need this plastic gun? I hope the whole tour isn’t this babyish.”
“I hope you don’t complain all afternoon,” I told him, frowning. “Do you
realize how awesome this is? We’re going to see all the great creatures from the
Shocker movies.”
“Think we’ll see Shockro?” he asked. Shockro is his favorite. I guess
because he’s so totally gross.
“Probably,” I replied, my eyes on the low buildings we were passing. They
all stood dark and empty.
“I want to see Wolf Boy and Wolf Girl,” Marty said, counting the monsters
off on his fingers. “And… the Piranha People, and Captain Sick, The Great
Gopher Mutant, and—”
“Wow! Look!” I cried, pounding his shoulder and pointing.
As the tram turned a sharp corner, The Haunted House of Horror loomed
darkly in front of us. The roof and its tall stone turrets were hidden by the fog.
The rest of the mansion stood gray against the dusky sky.
The tram took us nearer. Tall weeds choked the front lawn. The weeds bent
and swayed in the wind. The gray shingles on the house were chipped and
peeling. Pale green light, dim, eerie light, floated out from the tall window in
front.
As we rode closer, I could see a rusty iron porch swing—swinging by itself!
—on a broken, rotting porch.
“Cool!” I exclaimed.
“It looks a lot smaller than in the movie,” Marty grumbled.
“It’s exactly the same house!” I cried.
“Then why does it look so much smaller?” he demanded.
What a complainer.
I turned away from him and studied The Haunted House. An iron fence
surrounded the place. As we moved around to the side, the rusty gate swung
open, squeaking and creaking.
“Look!” I pointed to the dark windows on the second floor. The shutters all
flew open at once, then banged shut again.
Lights came on in the windows. Through the window shades, I could see
the silhouettes of skeletons hanging, swinging slowly back and forth.
“That’s kind of cool,” Marty said. “But not too scary.” He raised his plastic
gun and pretended to shoot at the skeletons.
We circled The Haunted House of Horrors once. We could hear screams of
terror from inside. The shutters banged again and again. The porch swing
continued to creak back and forth, back and forth, as if taken by a ghost.
“Are we going inside or not?” Marty demanded impatiently.
“Sit back and stop complaining,” I said sharply. “The ride just started.
Don’t spoil it for me, okay?”
He stuck his tongue out at me. But he settled back against the seat. We
heard a long howl, and then a shrill scream of horror.
The tram made its way silently to the back of the house. A gate swung open
and we rolled through it. We moved quickly through the overgrown, weedchoked backyard.
The tram picked up speed. We bounced over the lawn. Up to the back door.
A wooden sign above the door read: ABANDON ALL HOPE.
We’re going to crash right into the door! I thought. I ducked and raised my
hands to shield myself.
But the door creaked open, and we burst inside.
The tram slowed. I lowered my hands and sat up. We were in a dark, dustcovered kitchen. An invisible ghost cackled, an evil laugh. Battered pots and
pans covered the wall. As we passed, they clattered to the floor.
The oven door opened and closed by itself. The teapot on the stove started
to whistle. Dishes on the shelves rattled. The cackling grew louder.
“This is pretty creepy,” I whispered.
“Ooh. Thrills and chills!” Marty replied sarcastically. He crossed his arms
in front of him. “Bor-ring!”
“Marty—give me a break.” I shoved him away. “You can be a bad sport if
you want. But don’t ruin it for me.”
That seemed to get to him. He muttered, “Sorry,” and scooted back next to
me.
The tram moved out of the dark kitchen, into an even darker hallway.
Paintings of goblins and ugly creatures hung on the hallway walls.
As we approached a closet door, it sprang open—and a shrieking skeleton
popped out in front of us, its jaws open, its arms jutting out to grab us.
I screamed. Marty laughed.
The skeleton snapped back into the closet. The tram turned a corner. I saw
flickering light up ahead.
We rode into a large, round room. “It’s the living room,” I whispered to
Marty. I raised my eyes to the flickering light and saw a chandelier above our
heads, with a dozen burning candles.
The tram stopped beneath it. The chandelier began to shake. Then, with a
hiss, the candles all flickered out at once.
The room plunged into darkness.
Then a deep laugh echoed all around us.
I gasped.
“Welcome to my humble home!” a deep voice suddenly boomed.
“Who is that?” I whispered to Marty. “Where is it coming from?” No reply.
“Hey—Marty?” I turned to him. “Marty—?” He was gone.
7
“Marty?”
My breath caught in my throat. I froze, staring into the darkness.
Where did he go? I asked myself. He knows we aren’t supposed to leave the
tramcar. Did he climb out?
No.
If he had, I would have heard him.
“Marty?”
Someone grabbed my arm.
I heard a soft laugh. Marty’s laugh.
“Hey—where are you? I can’t see you!” I cried.
“I can’t see you, either,” he replied. “But I didn’t move. I’m still sitting
right next to you.”
“Huh?” I reached out and felt the sleeve of his shirt.
“This is cool!” Marty declared. “I’m waving my arms, but I can’t see a
thing. You really can’t see me?”
“No,” I replied. “I thought—”
“It’s some kind of trick with the lights,” he said. “Black light or something.
Some kind of neat movie special effect.”
“Well, it creeped me out,” I confessed. “I really thought you disappeared.”
“Sucker,” he sneered.
And then we both jumped.
A fire suddenly blazed in the big brick fireplace. Bright orange light filled
the room. A big black armchair spun around to reveal a grinning skeleton.
The skeleton raised its bony yellowed head. The jaws moved. “I hope you
like my house,” its voice boomed. “Because you will never leave!”
It tossed back its head and let out an evil cackle.
The tram jolted to a start. We rumbled out of the living room. Into a long,
dark hallway. The skeleton’s laugh followed us into the hall.
I fell back against the seat as we picked up speed.
We whirred around a corner. Down another long hall, so dark I couldn’t see
the walls.
Faster. Faster.
We whipped around another corner. Made another sharp turn.
We were climbing now. And then we took a sharp dip that made both of us
throw up our hands and scream.
Around another sharp turn. Up, up, up. And then we came crashing down.
A wild roller-coaster ride in total darkness.
It was awesome. Even better because we didn’t expect it. Marty and I
screamed our heads off. We bumped hard against each other as the tram whirled
around in the black halls of The Haunted House of Horrors. Up, up, again—then
we tilted sharply down.
I hung on to the front of the car for dear life. I gripped it so hard, both hands
ached. There was no seat belt, no safety bar.
What if we tumbled out? I wondered.
The car tilted sharply sideways, as if reading my frightened thoughts. I let
out a shriek and lost my grip. I slid against the side of the car. Marty fell on top
of me.
I frantically reached out for something to hold on to.
The car tilted back rightside up. I took a deep breath, slid back into place on
the long seat.
“Whoa! That was excellent!” Marty cried, laughing. “Excellent!”
Gripping the front of the car, I took another deep breath and held it. I was
trying to slow my racing heart.
A door swung open in front of us, and we burst through it.
The car bounced hard. I saw trees. The gray-fogged sky.
We were back outside. Racing through the backyard. Both of us were tossed
from side to side as we roared over the weeds, zigzagging through the dark trees.
“Whoa! Stop!” I choked out. I couldn’t catch my breath. The wind blew
hard against my face. The tram clattered and squealed as we bumped over the
rough ground.
We were out of control. Something had definitely gone wrong with the
tram.
Bouncing hard on the plastic seat, holding on tightly, I searched for
someone who could help us.
No one in sight.
We bumped onto the road. The tram started to slow. I turned to Marty. His
hair was blown over his face. His mouth hung open. His eyes rolled around in
his head. He was totally dazed.
The tram slowed, slowed, slowed, until we were creeping smoothly along.
“That was great!” Marty declared. He smoothed back his hair with both
hands and grinned at me. I knew he had been scared, too. But he was pretending
that he enjoyed the crazy, wild ride.
“Yeah. Great.” I tried to pretend, too. But my voice came out weak and
shaky.
“I’m going to tell your dad that the roller-coaster ride through the halls was
the best!” Marty declared.
“It was kind of fun,” I agreed. “And kind of scary.”
Marty turned away from me. “Hey. Where are we?”
The tram had come to a stop. I pulled myself up and peered around. We had
parked between two rows of tall evergreen bushes. The bushes were slender,
shaped like spears reaching up to the sky.
Above us, the afternoon sun was trying to break through the fog. Rays of
pale light beamed down from the gray sky. The tall, thin shadows of the bushes
fell over our tramcar.
Marty stood up and turned to the back of the tram. “There’s nothing around
here,” he said. “We’re in the middle of nowhere. Why did we stop?”
“Do you think—?” I started. But I stopped talking when I saw the bush
move.
It wiggled. Then the bush next to it wiggled, too.
“Marty—” I whispered, tugging his sleeve. I saw two glowing red circles
behind the bush. Two glowing red eyes!
“Marty—there’s someone there.”
Another pair of eyes. And then another pair of eyes. Staring out at us from
behind the evergreen bushes.
And then two dark claws.
And then rustling sounds. The bush tilted as a dark figure leaped out.
Followed by another.
Snarling, growling.
I gasped. Too late to run.
We were surrounded by the ugly creatures. Snuffling, wheezing creatures,
who staggered out from the bushes. Reaching out, reaching out for us, they
began to climb into the tram.
8
Marty and I jumped to our feet.
“Ohhhhhh.” I heard Marty let out a frightened moan.
I started to back away. I thought maybe I could scramble out the other side
of the car.
But the snarling, growling monsters came at us from both sides.
“L-leave us alone!” I stammered.
A monster covered in tangled brown fur opened his jaws to reveal long,
jagged rows of yellow teeth. His hot breath exploded in my face. He stepped
closer. Then he swiped at me with a fat paw and uttered a menacing roar. “Would
you like an autograph?” he growled.
I gaped at him, my mouth hanging down to my knees. “Huh?”
“Autographed photo?” he asked. He raised his furry paw again. He held a
black-and-white snapshot in it.
“Hey—you’re Ape Face!” Marty cried, pointing.
The hairy creature nodded his head. He raised the photo to Marty. “Want a
photo? This is the autographing part of the tour.”
“Yeah! Okay,” Marty replied.
The big ape pulled a marker from behind his ear and bent to sign the photo
for Marty.
Now that my heartbeat was returning to normal, I began to recognize some
of the other creatures. The guy covered in purple slime was The Toxic Wild
Man. And I recognized Sweet Sue, the walking-talking baby doll with real hair
you can brush. Sweet Sue was really a mutant murderer from Mars.
The frog-faced guy covered from head to toe with purple and brown warts
was The Fabulous Frog, also known as The Toadinator. He starred in Pond Scum
and Pond Scum II, two of the scariest movies ever made.
“Frog—can I have your autograph?” I asked.
“Grrrbbit. Grrbit.” He croaked and slipped a pen into his wart-covered
hand. I leaned forward eagerly and watched him sign his photo. It was hard for
him to write. The pen kept slipping in his slimy frog hands.
Marty and I collected a bunch of autographs. Then the creatures went
snarling and wheezing back into the bushes.
When they were gone, we both burst out laughing. “That was so dumb!” I
cried. “When I saw them creeping out from behind the bushes, I thought I’d have
a cow!” I glanced down at the photos. “But it’s kind of cool to get their
autographs.”
Marty made a disgusted face. “It’s just a bunch of actors in costumes,” he
sneered. “It’s for babies.”
“But—but—they looked so real,” I stammered. “It didn’t look as if they
were wearing costumes—did it? I mean, The Toadinator’s hands were really
slimy. And Ape Face’s fur was so real. The masks were awesome. I couldn’t tell
they were masks.”
I brushed the hair out of my eyes. “How do they get into those costumes? I
didn’t see any buttons or zippers, or anything!”
“That’s because they’re movie costumes,” Marty explained. “They’re better
than regular costumes.”
Mr. Know-It-All.
The tram started to back out. I settled down into the seat. I watched the two
rows of evergreen bushes fade into the distance.
Down the long, sloping hill, I could see the white studio buildings. I
wondered if they were making a movie on one of the soundstages. I wondered if
the tram would take us to watch them shoot.
I could see two golf carts moving along the road.
They were carrying people down to the sound-stage buildings.
The sun still struggled to shine through the fog. The tram bounced over the
grass, up the hill.
“Whoa!” I cried out as we turned sharply and headed back toward the trees.
“Please remain in the car at all times.” A woman’s voice burst from a
speaker in the tram car. “Your next stop will be The Cave of The Living Creeps.”
“The Cave of The Living Creeps? Wow! That sounds scary!” Marty
exclaimed.
“Sure does!” I agreed.
We had no idea just how scary it would turn out to be.
9
The tram zigzagged its way through the trees. Their shadows rolled over us like
dark ghosts.
We moved so silently. I tried to imagine what the ride would be like if the
tram was packed with excited kids and adults. I decided it would be a lot less
scary with a crowd.
But I wasn’t complaining. Marty and I were really lucky to be the first kids
ever to try out this ride.
“Wow!” Marty grabbed my arm as The Cave of The Living Creeps loomed
in front of us. The mouth of the cave was a huge dark hole, cut into the side of
the hill. I could see pale, silvery light flickering past the entrance.
The tram slowed down as we approached the dark opening. A sign above
the entrance had one word carved roughly into it: FAREWELL.
The tramcar lurched forward. “Hey—!” I cried out and ducked my head.
What a tight squeeze!
Into the dim, flickering light.
The air instantly grew colder. And damp. A sour, earthy smell rose to my
nostrils, making me gasp.
“Bats!” Marty whispered. “What do you think, Erin? Think there are bats in
here?” He leaned close and let out an evil laugh in my ear.
Marty knows that I hate bats!
I know, I know. Bats aren’t really evil creatures. And they aren’t dangerous.
Bats eat mosquitoes and other insects. And they don’t attack people or get
tangled in your hair or try to suck your blood. That’s only in movies.
I know all that. But I don’t care.
Bats are ugly and creepy and disgusting. And I hate them.
One day, I told Marty how much I hate bats. And so he’s been teasing me
about them ever since.
The tram moved deeper into the cave. The air grew colder. The sour aroma
nearly choked me.
“Look—over there!” Marty screamed. “A vampire bat!”
“Huh? Where?” I couldn’t help myself. I cried out in alarm.
Of course it was one of Marty’s dumb jokes. He laughed like a maniac.
I growled at him and punched him hard on the shoulder. “You’re not funny.
You’re just dumb.”
That made him giggle even harder. “I’ll bet there are bats in this cave,” he
insisted. “You can’t go into a deep, dark cave like this one without seeing bats.”
I turned away from his grinning face and listened hard. I was listening for
fluttering bat wings. I didn’t hear any.
The cave narrowed. The walls seemed to close in on us. The side of the car
scraped against the dirt wall. I could feel that we were heading down.
In the dim, silvery light, I saw a long row of pointy icicle-type things
hanging down from the cave ceiling. I know they have a name, but I can never
remember which one it is—stalagmites or stalactites.
I ducked my head again as the tram shot under them. Up close, they looked
like pointed elephant tusks.
“We’re getting closer to the bats!” Marty teased.
I ignored him. I kept my eyes straight ahead. The cave grew wide again.
Dark shadows shifted and danced over the walls as we rolled past.
“Ohhh.” I uttered a groan as I felt something cold and slimy drop onto the
back of my neck.
I jerked away and turned sharply to Marty. “Cut it out!” I snapped. “Get
your cold hands off me!”
“Who—me?”
He wasn’t touching me. Both of his hands gripped the front of the car.
Then what was on the back of my neck? So cold and wet. Icy wet. I
shuddered. My whole body shook.
“M-Marty!” I stammered. “H-help!”
Marty stared at me, confused. “Erin—what’s your problem?”
“The back of my neck—” I choked out.
I could feel the cold, wet thing start to move. I decided not to wait for
Marty to help me.
I reached back and pulled it off. It felt sticky and cold between my fingers.
It slithered and wriggled, and I dropped it on the seat.
A worm!
A huge, long white worm. So cold, so wet and cold.
“Weird!” Marty exclaimed. He leaned close to examine it. “I’ve never seen
a worm that big! And it’s white.”
“It—it dropped from the ceiling,” I said, watching it wiggle next to me.
“It’s ice-cold.”
“Huh? Let me touch it,” Marty said. He raised his hand and slowly lowered
his pointer finger to the worm.
His finger poked the worm in its middle.
And then Marty opened his mouth in a scream of horror that echoed
through the cave.
10
“What is it? Marty—what’s wrong?” I shrieked.
“I—I—I—” He couldn’t speak. He could only utter, “I—I—I—!” His eyes
bulged. His tongue flopped out.
He reached up and pulled a white worm off the top of his head. “I—I—I got
one too!”
“Yuck!” I cried. His worm was nearly as long as a shoelace!
We both tossed our worms out of the tram.
But then I felt a soft, damp plop on my shoulder. And then a cold plop on
top of my head. Another on my forehead, like a cold slap.
“Ohhh—help!” I moaned. I started thrashing my arms, grabbing at the
worms, struggling to pull them off me.
“Marty—please!” I turned to him for help.
But he was battling them, too. Twisting and ducking. Trying to dodge, as
more and more white worms fell from the ceiling.
I saw one fall on his shoulder. I saw another one begin to wrap itself around
his ear.
As fast as I could, I pulled the sticky, wet creatures off me and tossed them
over the side of the slow-rolling tram.
Where are they coming from? I wondered.
I glanced up—and a fat, wet one fell over my eyes.
“Yeowwww!” I let out a shriek, grabbed it, flung it away.
The tram turned sharply, sending us both sliding over the seat. The cave
narrowed again as we entered a different tunnel. The silvery light glowed dimly
around us as we bounced forward.
Two white worms, each at least a foot long, wriggled across my lap. I
tugged them off and heaved them over the tram.
Breathing hard, I searched for more. My whole body itched. The back of
my neck tingled. I couldn’t stop shaking.
“They stopped falling,” Marty announced in a shaky voice.
Then why did I still itch?
I rubbed the back of my neck. Stood up and searched the seat, then the
floor. I found one last worm, climbing over my shoe. I kicked it away, then
dropped back onto the seat with a loud sigh.
“That was totally gross!” I wailed.
Marty scratched his chest, then rubbed his face with both hands. “I guess
that’s why they call it The Cave of The Living Creeps,” he said. He swept a hand
back through his black hair.
I shivered. I couldn’t stop itching. I knew the worms were gone, but I could
still feel them. “Those disgusting white worms—do you think they were alive?”
Marty shook his head. “Of course not. They were fakes.” He snickered. “I
guess they fooled you, huh?”
“They sure felt real,” I replied. “And the way they wriggled around—”
“They were robots or something,” Marty said, scratching his knees.
“Everything here is fake. It has to be.”
“I’m not so sure,” I said, my whole body still itchy and tingling.
“Well, just ask your father,” Marty replied grumpily.
I had to laugh. I knew why Marty was suddenly so grouchy. Whether the
worms were real or fake, they had scared him. And he knew that I knew that he
had been frightened.
“I don’t think little kids will like the worms,” Marty said. “I think they’ll
get too scared. I’m going to tell that to your dad.”
I started to reply—and felt something drop over me. Something scratchy
and dry.
It covered my face, my shoulders—my entire body.
I shot both hands up and tried to push it away. It’s some kind of a net, I
thought.
I grabbed at it, desperate to get it off my face. As I struggled, I turned and
saw Marty squirming and batting his arms, caught under the same net.
The tram bounced through the dim cave tunnel. The sticky net felt like
cotton candy on my skin.
Marty let out a yelp. “It—it’s a big spider-web!” he stammered.
I tugged and grabbed and pulled. But the sticky threads clung to my face,
my arms, and my clothes. “Yuck! This is so gross!” I choked out.
And then I saw the black dots scurrying through the net. It took me a few
seconds to realize what they were. Spiders! Hundreds of them!
“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat.
I batted the spiderweb with both hands. I rubbed my cheeks frantically,
trying to scrape away the sticky threads. I pulled a spider off my forehead.
Another one off the shoulder of my T-shirt.
“The spiders—they’re in my hair!” Marty wailed.
He suddenly forgot about acting cool. He began raking his hair with both
hands, slapping himself in the head, pinching and swiping at the spiders.
As the tram rolled silently on, we both twisted and squirmed, struggling to
flick away the black spiders. I pulled three of them out of my hair. Then I felt
one climb into my nose!
I opened my mouth in a horrified scream—and sneezed it out.
Marty plucked a spider off my neck and sent it soaring through the air. The
last spider. I couldn’t see—or feel—any more.
We both dropped down in the seat, breathing hard. My heart pounded in my
chest. “Still think everything is a fake?” I asked Marty, my voice weak and
small.
“I—I don’t know,” he replied softly. “The spiders could be puppets maybe.
You know. Radio-controlled.”
“They were real!” I cried sharply. “Face it, Marty—they were real! This is
The Cave of The Living Creeps—and they were living!”
Marty’s eyes grew wide. “You really think so?”
I nodded. “They had to be real spiders.”
A smile spread over Marty’s face. “That’s so cool!” he declared. “Real
spiders! That is totally cool!”
I let out a long sigh and slumped lower in the seat. I didn’t think it was cool
at all. I thought it was creepy and disgusting.
These rides are supposed to be fake. That’s what makes them fun. I decided
to tell my dad that the worms and spiders were too scary. He should get rid of
them before the studio tour opens to the public.
I crossed my arms in front of me and kept my eyes straight ahead. I
wondered what we would run into next. I hoped there weren’t any other
disgusting insects waiting to fall on us and climb all over our faces and bodies.
“I think I hear the bats!” Marty teased. He leaned close to me, grinning.
“Hear those fluttering sounds? Giant vampire bats!”
I shoved him back to his side of the seat. I wasn’t in any mood for his
joking around.
“When do we get out of this cave?” I asked impatiently. “This isn’t any
fun.”
“I think it’s cool,” Marty repeated. “I like exploring caves.”
The narrow tunnel opened into a wide cavern. The ceiling appeared to be a
mile high. There were giant rocks scattered over the cavern floor. Rocks piled on
rocks. Rocks everywhere.
Somewhere ahead of us, I heard water dripping. Plunk plunk plunk.
Eerie green light glowed from the cave walls. The tram pulled up to the
back wall—and then stopped.
“Now what?” I whispered.
Marty and I turned in our seat, letting our eyes explore the huge cavern. All
I could see were rocks. Smooth rocks, some round, some square.
Plunk plunk plunk. Water dripped somewhere to our right. The air felt cold
and damp.
“This is kind of boring,” Marty murmured. “When do we get going?”
I shrugged. “I don’t know. Why did we stop here? It’s just a big empty
cave.”
We waited for the tram to back up and take us out of there.
And waited.
A minute went by. Then another few minutes.
We both turned around and got up on our knees, peering to the back of the
tram. Nothing moved. We listened to the steady drip of water, echoing off the
high stone walls. No other sound.
Leaning forward against the seatback, I cupped my hands around my mouth
and shouted. “Hey—can anybody hear us?”
I waited, listening. No reply.
“Can anybody hear us?” I tried again. “I think we’re stuck here!”
No reply. Just the steady drip drip drip.
I waited, squinting hard into the glow of green light.
Why wouldn’t the tram get moving? Had it broken down? Were we really
stuck here?
I turned to Marty. “What’s up with this tram? Do you think we’re—HEY!”
I gasped as I stared at the empty seat beside me.
I reached both hands out. I grabbed for Marty.
Another lighting trick? Another optical illusion?
“Marty? Hey—Marty?” I croaked.
A cold shiver rolled down my back.
This time Marty was really gone.
11
“Marty—?”
A scraping sound beside the tram made me jump.
I spun around and saw Marty grinning at me from the cave floor. “Gotcha.”
“You creep!” I shouted. I swung my fist, but he dodged away, laughing.
“You’re The Living Creep!” I cried. “You deliberately tried to scare me.”
“It isn’t too hard a job!” he shot back. His smile faded. “I climbed down to
check things out.”
“But the tram might start up any second!” I told him. “You know what that
tour guide told us. She said we should never leave the tram.”
Marty squatted down and studied the tires. “I think the tram is stuck or
something. Maybe it came off its tracks.” He raised his eyes to me and shook his
head fretfully. “But there aren’t any tracks.”
“Marty—get back in,” I pleaded. “If it starts up and leaves you standing
there—”
He grabbed the side of the car with both hands and shook it. The tramcar
bounced on its tires. But it didn’t move.
“I think it broke down,” Marty said softly. “Your father said that some
things might not work.”
I felt a stab of fear in my chest. “You mean we’re stranded here? All by
ourselves in this creepy cave?”
He stepped to the front of the car and squeezed between the tram and the
cave wall. Then he tried to push the tram back, shoving with both hands as hard
as he could.
It wouldn’t budge.
“Oh, wow,” I muttered, shaking my head. “This is horrible. This isn’t any
fun at all.”
I got back up on my knees on the seat and tried shouting again, as loud as I
could: “Is anybody in here? Does anybody work here? The tram is stuck!”
Plunk plunk plunk. The dripping water was my only reply.
“Can somebody help us?” I shouted. “Please—can somebody help?”
No answer.
“Now what?” I cried.
Marty was still shoving with all his might against the front of the tram. He
gave one last hard push, then gave up with a sigh. “You’d better climb down,” he
said. “We have to walk.”
“Huh? Walk? In this creepy dark cave? No way, Marty!”
He came around to my side of the car. “You’re not afraid—are you, Erin?”
“Yes, I am,” I confessed. “A little.” I glanced around the huge cavern. “I
don’t see any exits. We’d have to walk back through those tunnels. With all the
spiders and worms and everything.”
“We can find a way out,” Marty insisted. “There’s got to be a door
somewhere. They always build emergency exits in these theme park rides.”
“I think we should stay in the tram,” I said uncertainly. “If we stay here and
wait, someone will come and find us.”
“It could take days,” Marty declared. “Come on, Erin. I’m going to walk.
Are you coming with me?”
I shook my head, my arms crossed tightly in front of me. “No way,” I
insisted. “I’m staying here.”
I knew he wouldn’t go off by himself. I knew he wouldn’t go unless I
joined him.
“Well. ’Bye then,” he said. He turned and started walking quickly across the
cave floor.
“Hey, Marty—?”
“’Bye. I’m not waiting here all day. See you later.”
He was really leaving. Leaving me alone in the stalled tram, in the scary
cave. “But, Marty—wait!”
He turned back to me. “Are you coming or not, Erin?” he called back
impatiently.
“Okay, okay,” I murmured. I saw that I had no choice. I climbed over the
side of the tram and dropped to the cave floor.
The dirt was smooth and damp. I started walking slowly toward Marty.
“Hurry it up,” he called. “Let’s get out of here.” He was walking backward
now, motioning for me to catch up to him.
But I stopped and my mouth dropped open in horror.
“Don’t look at me like that!” he shouted. “Don’t stare at me as if I’m doing
something wrong!”
But I wasn’t staring at Marty.
I was staring at the thing creeping up behind Marty.
12
“Uh… uh… uh…” I struggled to warn Marty, but only frightened grunts escaped
my throat.
He kept backing up, backing right into the enormous creature.
“Erin, get a move on. What’s your problem?” he demanded.
“Uh… uh… uh…” I finally managed to point.
“Huh?” Marty spun around—and saw it, too. “Whoa!” he screamed. His
sneakers slid on the soft cave floor as he came running back to me. “What is that
thing?”
At first, I thought it was some kind of machine. It looked like one of those
tall steel cranes you see on construction sites. All silvery and metallic.
But as it rose up on its wire-thin back legs, I saw that it was alive!
It had round black eyes the size of billiard balls. They spun wildly in its
skinny silver skull. Two slender antennae bobbed at the top of the head. Its
mouth appeared soft, mushy. A gray tongue darted out between long, bristly
whiskers.
Its long body stretched back like a folded-up leaf. As it stood, it waved its
front legs, short white sticks.
The whole creature looked like some kind of gross stick figure. Its long
back legs bent and sprang forward, bent then sprang forward. The thick tongue
swung from side to side. The black eyes stopped whirling and focused on me.
“Is it—is it a grasshopper?” I choked out.
Marty and I had both backed up to the tram.
Waving its stick arms, the creature sprang closer, its antennae circling
slowly on top of its head.
Marty and I pressed our backs against the cold cave wall. We couldn’t move
back any farther.
“I think it’s a praying mantis,” Marty replied, staring up at it. The insect had
to be at least three times as tall as us. As it moved forward, its head nearly
scraped the cave ceiling.
The tongue licked its soft, mushy mouth. The mouth puckered and made
loud sucking sounds. My stomach lurched. The sound was so sick!
The round black eyes stared down at Marty and me. The giant praying
mantis, its body shining like aluminum, took another hopping step toward us. It
started to lower its head.
“Wh-what’s it going to do?” I stammered, pressing my back hard against
the cave wall.
To my surprise, Marty suddenly started to laugh.
I turned to him and grabbed his shoulder. Was he totally losing it?
“Marty—are you okay?”
“Of course!” he replied. He pulled away from me and took a step toward
the towering insect. “Why should we be scared, Erin? It’s a big robot. It’s
programmed to walk up to the tram.”
“Huh? But, Marty—”
“It’s all on a computer,” he continued, staring up as the big head bobbed
lower on its stick body. “It isn’t real. It’s part of the ride.”
I stared up at the creature. Big drops of saliva rolled off its fat tongue and
hit the cave floor with a splat.
“It’s… uh… really lifelike,” I murmured.
“Your dad is a genius at this stuff!” Marty declared. “We’ll have to tell him
what a good job he did on the praying mantis.” He laughed. “Your dad said there
were still some bugs, remember? This must be one of them!”
The insect rubbed its front legs together. It made a shrill whistling sound.
I covered my ears. The high-pitched note made my ears ache!
I was still holding my ears as a second giant praying mantis hopped out
from behind a tall rock.
“Look—another one!” Marty cried, pointing. He tugged my arm. “Wow.
They move so smoothly. You can’t even tell that they’re machines.”
The two silvery insects chittered at each other, a sharp shrill, metallic
sound. Their black eyes twirled. Their antennae rotated rapidly, excitedly.
Gobs of saliva rolled off their tongues and splattered to the floor. The
second one flashed silvery wings on its back, then quickly closed them up again.
“Great-looking robots!” Marty declared. He turned to me. “We’d better get
back in the tram. It’ll probably start up again now that we’ve seen these giant
bugs.”
The two insects chittered to each other. They hopped closer, their sticklike
legs springing hard, bouncing off the smooth cave floor.
“I hope you’re right,” I told Marty. “Those insects are too real. I want to get
out of here!”
I started to follow him to the tramcar.
The first mantis leaped forward quickly. It hopped between us and the tram,
blocking our path.
“Hey—!” I cried.
We tried to step around it. But it took a big hop to stay in front of us.
“It—it won’t let us pass!” I stammered.
“Ohhh!” I cried out as the big creature suddenly swung down and slammed
its head against my chest. The powerful head-butt sent me sprawling backward.
“Hey—stop that!” I heard Marty shout. “That machine must be broken!”
Its black eyes glowing, the mantis lowered its head again—and gave me
another hard push toward the center of the cave.
Its partner moved quickly to trap Marty. It lowered its body and prepared to
head-butt Marty. But Marty quickly backed away, raising his hands in front of
him like a shield. He hurried to join me.
I heard scraping sounds. Shrill chirps and chittering.
I spun around to discover two more huge, ugly mantises climbing out from
behind rocks. Then two more, their antennae twisting excitedly. Their fat gray
tongues rolling around their open mouths.
Marty and I huddled together in the middle of the cavern as the creatures
hopped and scraped around us. Then they rose up high on their hind legs, their
black eyes gleaming, their short stick arms waving.
“We—we’re surrounded!” I cried.
13
The giant insects all began chittering at once. They scraped their front legs
together excitedly. The shrill whistle rose through the cave, echoing off the stone
walls.
They formed a circle around us, leaning back on their spindly hind legs.
Moving closer. Tightening the circle. Their tongues whipped back and forth.
Thick gobs of mantis saliva hit the floor.
“They’re out of control!” Marty shrieked.
“What are they going to do to us?” I cried, covering my ears against their
excited chirps and the deafening whistle.
“Maybe they are voice-controlled,” Marty shouted. He tilted back his head
and shouted up at them: “Stop! Stop!”
They didn’t stop.
One of them tilted its silvery head, opened its ugly mouth wide, and spit out
a black gob. It splattered onto Marty’s sneaker.
He jumped back. His sneaker stuck to the floor.
He struggled to tug it free. “Yuck! Watch out! That black stuff—it’s like
glue!” he cried.
THOOOM.
Another mantis opened its mouth wide and spit out a big black gob of
sticky goo. It splotched the shoulder of my T-shirt.
“Oww!” I wailed. It was so hot—it burned me right through my shirt.
The others chittered shrilly and scraped their hairy stick arms. Their
tongues darting back and forth, they began to lower their heads to us.
“The stun guns!” I cried, grabbing Marty’s arm. “Maybe the guns will work
against these bugs!”
“Those guns are only toys!” he wailed.
THUPPP.
Another black gob missed Marty’s foot by inches.
“Besides, the guns are in the tram,” Marty continued, staring up at the ugly
creatures. “No way they’ll let us get to the tram.”
“Then what are we going to do?” I cried.
As I asked the question, an idea flashed into my mind.
“Marty—” I whispered. “How do you normally get rid of bugs?”
“Huh? Erin—what are you talking about?”
“You step on them—right? Don’t you usually step on them?”
“But, Erin—” he protested. “These bugs are big enough to step on us!”
“It’s worth a try!” I cried.
I raised my sneaker—and tromped as hard as I could on the foot of the
nearest mantis.
The giant insect let out a shrill hiss and hopped backward.
Beside me, Marty stomped on another insect, bringing the heel of his
sneaker down hard on its spindly foot. That creature fell back, too, raising its
head in a shrill hiss of pain. Its eyes spun wildly. Its antennae shot straight up.
I stomped down hard again. With a hoarse choking sound, the big mantis
fell onto its side. All four stick legs thrashed the air.
“Let’s go!” I shouted.
I turned and burst through the circle of insects. I didn’t know where to run. I
only knew I had to get away.
The cave erupted in hisses and shrill whistles, angry cluttering and croaks. I
glimpsed Marty lurching after me.
I ignored the echoing, ringing sounds and ran.
Ran to the tram.
Leaned over the side and grabbed both plastic stun guns into my arms.
Then I pushed away from the tram and hurtled along the stone cave wall.
Where could I go?
How could I escape?
The cluttering and hissing grew louder, more frantic. The tall shadows of
the giant insects danced on the wall as I ran. I had the feeling that the shadows
could reach out and grab me.
I glanced back.
Marty came running behind me at full speed.
The mantises were hopping, scrabbling, limping across the dirt floor after
us.
Where to run? Where?
And then I saw the narrow opening in the cave wall. Just a crack, really.
But I dove for it. Slipped into it. Squeezed myself into the dark hole
between the stone.
And burst out the other side. Into the misty daylight.
Outside!
I could see trees tilting down the hill. The road that led down to the studio
buildings.
Yes! Outside! I made it!
I felt so happy. So safe.
But I didn’t have long to enjoy the feeling.
As I started to catch my breath, I heard Marty’s terrified cry: “Erin—help!
Help! They got me! They’re eating me!”
14
With a gasp, I spun around.
How could I help Marty? How could I get him out of the cave?
To my surprise, he was leaning against the cave wall, one elbow against the
rock, his legs crossed. A big grin on his round face.
“April Fools,” he said.
“YAAAIIIII!” I let out an angry scream. Then I dropped the two plastic
pistols and rushed at him, ready to pound him with my fists. “You jerk! You
scared me to death!”
He laughed and dodged to the side as I came at him. I swung my fist and hit
air.
“Don’t play any more dumb jokes like that!” I cried breathlessly. “This
place is too scary! Those big insects—”
“Yeah. They were scary,” he agreed, his smile fading. “They were so real!
How do you think they made them spit like that?”
I shook my head. “I don’t know,” I muttered.
I had a heavy feeling in my stomach. I knew it was a crazy idea. But I was
beginning to think these creatures we were seeing were real.
Maybe I’ve seen too many scary movies. But the big praying mantises and
the white worms and all the other creatures and monsters really seemed to be
alive.
They didn’t move like mechanical creatures. They appeared to breathe. And
their eyes focused on Marty and me as if they could really see us.
I wanted to tell Marty what I was thinking. But I knew he would only laugh
at me.
He was so sure that they were all robots and that we were seeing some
awesome movie special effects. Of course, that made sense. We were on a movie
studio tour, after all.
I hoped Marty was right. I hoped it was all tricks. Movie magic.
My dad was a genius when it came to designing mechanical creatures and
building theme park rides. And maybe that’s all we were seeing. Maybe Dad had
really outdone himself this time.
But the heavy feeling in my stomach wouldn’t go away. I had the feeling
that we were in danger. Real danger.
I had the feeling that something had gone wrong here. That something was
out of control.
I suddenly wished we weren’t the first two kids to try out the tour. I knew it
was supposed to be a thrill to be the only ones here. But it was too quiet. Too
empty. Too scary. It would be so much more fun if hundreds of other people
were along with us.
I wanted to tell Marty all this. But how could I?
He was so eager to prove that he was braver than me. So eager to prove that
he wasn’t afraid of anything.
I couldn’t tell him what I was really thinking.
I picked up the two plastic stun guns and handed him one. I didn’t want to
carry them both.
He tucked the barrel of his gun into his jeans pocket. “Hey, Erin—look
where we are!” he cried. He jogged past me, his eyes straight ahead. “Check it
out!”
He started running across the grass. I turned and started to follow him. I
didn’t want him to get too far ahead.
The sky had darkened. The sun had disappeared behind a heavy blanket of
clouds. Wisps of gray fog hung low in the cool air. It was nearly evening.
We crossed the road and stepped into a town. I mean, it was a movie set of a
town. A small town with low, one- and two-story buildings, small shops, a
country-looking general store. Big, old houses in the block beyond the stores.
“Do you think this is a set they really use in the movies?” I asked, hurrying
to catch up to Marty.
He turned to me, his dark eyes flashing with excitement. “Don’t you
recognize it? Don’t you know where you are?”
And then my eyes fell on the crumbling, old mansion half-hidden by the
twisted trees. And across from it, I saw the crooked picket fence that ran around
the old cemetery.
And I knew we were on Shock Street.
“Wow!” I exclaimed, spinning around, trying to take it all in at once. “This
really is Shock Street. This is where they filmed all of the movies!”
“It doesn’t look the way I imagined it,” Marty said. “It looks even scarier!”
He was right. As the sky darkened to evening, long shadows fell over the
empty buildings. The wind made a moaning sound as it swept around the corner.
Marty and I made our way down the street, trying to see everything. We
kept crossing from side to side, peering into a dark, dust-covered shop window
—then running to examine the front yard of a rundown, old mansion.
“Check out that empty lot,” I said, pointing. “That’s where The Mad
Mangler hung out. Remember? In Shocker III? Remember—he mangled
everyone who walked by?”
“Of course I remember,” Marty snapped. He stepped into the empty lot. Tall
weeds bent low, blown by the moaning wind. Shadows moved against the fence
at the back.
I stayed on the sidewalk and squinted hard, trying to see what cast the
shadows.
Did The Mad Mangler still lurk back there?
The lot was totally empty. So how could there be tall, shifting shadows on
the fence?
“Marty—come back,” I pleaded. “It’s getting dark.”
He turned back. “Scared, Erin?”
“It’s just an empty lot,” I told him. “Let’s keep walking.”
“People always thought it was just an empty lot,” Marty replied in a low,
scary voice. “Until The Mad Mangler jumped out and mangled them!” He let out
a long, evil laugh.
“Marty—you’re losing it,” I murmured, shaking my head.
He came trotting out of the lot, and we crossed the street. “I wish I had a
camera,” he said. “I’d really like a picture of me standing in The Mangler’s lot.”
His eyes lit up. “Or even better—!”
He didn’t finish his sentence. Instead, he took off, running full speed.
“Hey—wait up!” I cried.
A few seconds later, I saw where he was headed. The old cemetery.
He ran up to the cracked and peeling wooden gate and turned back to me.
“Even better, I’d like a photo of me standing in the cemetery. The actual set
where they filmed Cemetery on Shock Street.”
“We don’t have a camera,” I called from the street. “Get away from there.”
He ignored me and started to open the gate. The bottom was stuck in the
grass. Marty tugged hard. Finally, the gate started to pull open, creaking and
groaning as it moved.
“Marty—let’s go,” I insisted. “It’s getting late. Dad is probably waiting for
us, wondering what happened to us.”
“But this is part of the tour!” he insisted. He tugged the heavy gate open
just wide enough to squeeze inside the cemetery.
“Marty—please! Don’t go in!” I begged. I ran up beside him.
“Erin, it’s just a movie set,” he replied. “You didn’t used to be such a total
wimp!”
“I—I just have a bad feeling about this cemetery,” I stammered. “A very
bad feeling.”
“It’s part of the tour,” he repeated.
“But this gate was closed!” I cried. “It was closed so that people don’t go
in.” I raised my eyes to the cemetery. I saw the old graves tilting up from the
ground like crooked teeth. “I have such a bad feeling…”
Marty ignored me. He tugged the gate open a little wider and slipped into
the cemetery.
“Marty—please—!” I gripped the low fence tightly with both hands and
watched him.
He took three steps toward the old graves. Then his hands shot straight up
in the air—and he dropped out of sight.
15
I stared into the darkness, blinking hard.
I swallowed. Once. Twice.
I couldn’t believe that he was gone, that he had vanished so quickly.
The wind moaned between the jagged, tilting gravestones.
“Marty—?” My voice came out in a choked whisper. “Marty?”
I gripped the picket fence so hard, my hands ached. I knew I had no choice.
I had to go in there and see what had happened to him.
I took a deep breath and pushed myself through the opening. The ground
was soft. My sneakers sank into the tall grass.
I took one step.
Then another.
I stopped when I heard Marty’s voice. “Hey—be careful.”
“Huh?” I gazed around. “Where are you?”
“Down here.”
I peered down—into a deep, dark hole. An open grave. Marty stared up at
me. He had dirt on his cheeks and down the front of his T-shirt. He raised both
hands. “Help me out. I fell!”
I had to laugh. He looked ridiculous, standing in that hole, covered in dirt.
“It’s not funny. Help me out,” he repeated impatiently.
“I warned you,” I said. “I had a bad feeling.”
“It smells down here,” Marty complained.
I leaned down. “What does it smell like?”
“Like dirt. Get me out!”
“Okay, okay.” I grabbed his hands and tugged. He kicked his feet, digging
his toes of his sneakers into the soft dirt.
A few seconds later, he was back on the ground, frantically brushing
himself off. “That was cool!” he declared. “Now I can tell people I was in a
grave in The Shock Street Cemetery.”
A chill ran down my back as the wind picked up. “Let’s get out of here,” I
pleaded.
Something gray floated silently between two old gravestones. A wisp of
fog? A gray cat?
“Check out these graves,” Marty said, still brushing dirt off his jeans.
“They’re all cracked and faded. I can barely read the names. That’s so cool. And
look how they sprayed cobwebs over that row of stones. Creepy, huh?”
“Marty—can we go?” I begged again. “Dad is probably worried by now.
Maybe the tram started up again. Maybe we can find it.”
He ignored me. I watched him lean over a tombstone to read the words cut
into it. “Jim Socks,” he read. “Eighteen forty to eighteen eighty-seven.” He
laughed. “Jim Socks. Get it? And look at the ones next to it. Ben Dover. Sid
Upp. These are all funny!”
I laughed. Ben Dover and Sid Upp were pretty funny.
My laugh was cut short when I heard a soft cry from the back of the
graveyard. I saw another gray wisp dart behind a tombstone.
I held my breath and listened hard. The wind whistled through the tall
grass.
Rising above the wind came another shrill cry.
A cat? I wondered. Is the cemetery filled with cats? Or is it a child?
Marty heard it, too. He moved down the row of stones until he stood beside
me. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “This is so cool. Did you hear the sound
effects? There must be a speaker hidden in the ground.”
Another shrill cry.
Definitely human. A girl?
I shivered. “Marty, I really think we should try to get back to my dad.
We’ve been here all afternoon. And—”
“But what about the rest of the tour?” he argued. “We have to see
everything!”
I heard another cry. Louder. Closer. A cry of terror.
I tried to ignore it. Marty was probably right. The cries had to be coming
from a loudspeaker somewhere.
“How can we finish the tour?” I demanded. “We were supposed to stay on
the tram—remember? But the tram—OHH!”
I cried out as a hand shot up from the ground in front of us. A green hand.
Its long fingers unfolded, as if reaching for us.
“Whoa!” Marty cried, stumbling back.
Another green hand shot up from the dirt. Then two more.
Hands reaching up from graves.
I let out a frightened gasp. Hands were bursting up through the grass. Hands
all around us. Their fingers twisting and arching, reaching out.
Marty started to laugh. “This is totally awesome! Just like in the movie!”
He stopped laughing as a hand poked up beside him and grabbed his ankle.
“Erin—help!” he cried.
But I couldn’t help.
Two green hands had wrapped around my ankles and were pulling me
down, down into the grave.
16
“Come dowwwwwnnnnn,” a soft voice moaned. “Come dowwwwwnnnn with
us.”
“Nooo!” I shrieked.
My arms thrashed the air. I tried to kick, but the hands gripped me so
tightly, so firmly.
My whole body frantically jerked and tilted back and forth, as I struggled
not to fall. If I fell, I knew they would grab my hands, too. And pull me
facedown into the earth.
“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us.”
This isn’t a joke, I thought. These hands are real. They are really trying to
pull me underground.
“Help! Oh, help!” I heard Marty’s cry. Then I saw him fall. He toppled to
the grass, onto his knees.
Two hands gripped his ankles. Two more green hands poked up from the
dirt to grab his wrists.
“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the sad
voice moaned.
“Noooo!” I shrieked, tugging wildly, desperately.
To my surprise, I pulled free.
One foot sank into the soft grass. I glanced down. My sneaker had slid off.
The hand still gripped the sneaker—but my foot was free.
With a happy cry, I bent down. Pulled off the other sneaker.
I was free now. Free!
Breathing hard, I bent and quickly pulled off my socks. I knew it would be
easier to run barefoot. I tossed the socks away. Then I hurried over to Marty.
He was flat on his stomach. Six hands held him down, tugging at him,
tugging hard. His whole body twisted and shook.
He raised his head when he saw me. “Erin—help me!” he gasped.
I dropped to my knees. Reached for his sneakers. Tugged them off.
The green hands gripped the sneakers tightly. Marty kicked his feet free and
tried to climb to his knees.
I grabbed a green hand and pulled if off his wrist. The hand slapped at me.
A cold, hard slap that made my hand ring with pain.
Ignoring it, I grabbed for another green hand.
Marty rolled over. Rolled free. Jumped to his feet, gasping, trembling, his
mouth hanging open, his dark eyes bulging.
“Your socks—” I cried breathlessly. “Pull them off! Hurry!”
He clumsily tore them off his feet.
The hands grabbed wildly for us. Dozens of hands stretching up from the
dirt. Hundreds of hands reaching up for us from the tall graveyard grass.
“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the voice
moaned.
“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn,” a dozen other soft
voices called from beneath the ground.
Marty and I froze. The soft, sad voices seemed to hypnotize me. My legs
suddenly felt as if they were made of stone.
“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn.”
And then I saw a green head pop up from the dirt. And then another head.
Another. Bald green heads with empty eye sockets and open, toothless mouths.
I saw shoulders, then arms. More heads poking up. Bright-green bodies
pulling up from beneath the ground.
“M-Marty—” I choked out. “They’re coming up after us!”
17
The cemetery rang out with grunts and groans as the ugly green figures pulled
themselves up from the ground.
I took one last glance at their tattered, shredded clothing, at their blackened
eye sockets, their toothless, grinning mouths.
And then I started to run.
Marty and I both ran without saying a word. Side by side, we darted across
the tall grass between the rows of crooked tombstones.
My heart thudded in my chest. My head throbbed. My bare feet sank into
the cold dirt, slipped on the tall, damp grass.
Marty reached the wooden gate first. He was running so hard, he banged
into the fence. He let out a cry—then slipped through the gate onto Shock Street.
I could hear moans and groans and eerie calls of the disgusting green
people behind me. But I didn’t look back. I dove for the gate. Squeezed through.
Then I shoved it shut behind me.
Running into the street, I stopped to catch my breath. I bent over and
pressed my hands against my knees. My side ached. I sucked in breath after
breath.
“Don’t stop!” Marty cried frantically. “Erin—keep going!”
I took a deep breath and followed him down the street. Our bare feet
slapped the pavement.
I could still hear the moans and calls behind us. But I was too scared to
glance back.
“Marty—where is everybody?” I called breathlessly.
Shock Street was empty, the houses and shops all dark.
Shouldn’t there be people around? I wondered. This is a big movie studio.
Where are the people who work for Shocker Studios? Where are the people who
work on the studio tour?
Why isn’t anyone around to help us?
“Something is wrong!” Marty choked out, running at full speed. We passed
The Horror Hardware Store and Shock City Electronics. “The robots are out of
control or something!”
At last! Marty agreed with me. He finally agreed that something was
terribly wrong.
“We’ve got to find your dad,” Marty said, running across the street to the
next block of dark houses. “We’ve got to tell him there’s a problem.”
“We have to find the tram,” I called, struggling to keep up with him. “Ow!”
My bare foot came down on something hard. A rock or something. Pain
shot up my leg. But I hobbled on.
“If we can get back on the tram, it will take us back to Dad,” I called.
“There has to be a way out of Shock Street,” Marty said. “It’s only a movie
set.”
We ran past a tall mansion with two turrets. It looked like an evil castle. I
didn’t remember it from any of the Shocker movies.
Beyond the mansion stretched a big, empty dirt lot. At the back of the lot
stood a low brick wall, just a foot or two taller than Marty and me.
“Cut through here!” I told Marty. “If we can climb up on that wall, we can
probably see the studio road.”
I was just guessing. But it was worth a try.
We both turned into the empty lot.
My bare feet thudded over the soft dirt.
The dirt felt cold and wet. As we crossed the field, our feet tossed up big
clumps of mud.
I pumped my legs harder as the mud grew softer. My bare feet were sinking
into it. As I ran, the cold mud rose up over my ankles.
Marty and I were nearly to the brick wall when we ran into the sinkhole.
“Yaaaaaiiii!” We both uttered hoarse cries as the ground gave way beneath
us.
The mud made a sick splussssh as we sank.
I tossed up both hands. Tried to grab onto something.
But there was nothing to grab.
The mud oozed around me. Over my ankles. My legs. Up over my knees.
It’s sucking me down, I thought. I tried to cry out again—but panic choked
my throat.
I glimpsed Marty beside me. His arms were waving wildly. His whole body
twisted and squirmed as he sank. The mud was up over his waist—and he was
still sinking fast.
I kicked hard. Tried to raise my knees.
But I was trapped. Trapped and dropping down, down into the dark, wet
ooze.
My mud-covered arms slapped against the surface.
I couldn’t stop myself.
The mud bubbled up over my neck. And I was sinking fast.
18
I held my breath. The mud rose up to my chin.
In a second, it will be over my head, I thought.
A sob escaped my throat.
The mud crept higher, up over my chin. I started to spit as it reached my
mouth.
And then I felt something grab my arm. Strong hands slipped under my
arms. I felt the hands slide in the mud.
They gripped me harder.
I felt myself being tugged up, tugged by someone very strong.
The mud made a loud plop as I rose up. I felt the mud roll down my chest,
my legs, my knees.
And then I was standing on the surface, still held by the two powerful
hands.
“Marty—!” I called, tasting the sour mud on my lips. “Are you—?”
“I’m up!” I heard his hoarse reply. “Erin, I’m okay!”
The strong hands finally let go. My legs trembled. I wobbled but remained
standing.
I turned to see who had rescued me.
And stared into the glowing red eyes of a wolf.
A human with the face of a wolf. Clawed hands covered in black fur. A
long, brown snout curved in an open, toothy grin. Sharp, pointed ears above a
thick tuft of black wolf fur.
A female. She wore a silvery catsuit. Sleek and tight-fitting. As I stared in
shock, she opened her mouth in a throaty growl.
I recognized her at once. Wolf Girl!
I turned to see her companion—Wolf Boy. He had pulled Marty out of the
mud hole. Marty’s whole body was caked in mud. He tried to wipe his face, but
only managed to smear more mud over his cheeks.
“You—saved us! Thank you!” I cried, finally finding my voice.
The two werewolves uttered low growls in reply.
“We—we lost the tram,” I explained to Wolf Girl. “We need to get back.
You know. Back to where the ride began.”
She let out a sharp growl. Then she snapped her toothy jaw hard.
“Please—” I begged. “Can you help us get back to the tram? Or can you
take us to the main building? My dad is waiting for me there.”
Wolf Girl’s red eyes flashed. She growled again.
“We know you’re just actors!” Marty blurted out shrilly. “But we don’t
want to be scared anymore. We’ve had enough scares for today. Okay?”
The two werewolves growled. A long white string of saliva drooled over
Wolf Boy’s black lips.
Something inside me snapped. I totally lost it. “Stop it!” I screamed. “Just
stop it! Marty is right! We don’t want to be scared now. So stop the werewolf act
—and help us!”
The werewolves growled again. Wolf Girl snapped her jaws. A long pink
tongue slid out, and she licked her jagged teeth hungrily.
“That’s enough!” I shrieked. “Stop the act! Stop it! Stop it!”
I was so angry, so furious—I reached up with both hands. I grabbed the fur
on the sides of Wolf Girl’s mask.
And I tugged the mask with all my strength.
Tugged. Tugged with both hands as hard as I could.
And felt real fur. And warm skin.
It wasn’t a mask.
19
“Ohh.” I let out a gasp, and jerked my hands away.
The werewolf’s red eyes glowed. Her black lips parted. Once again, her
tongue flicked hungrily over her yellow, pointed teeth.
My whole body trembled as I backed up against the brick wall. “M-Marty
—” I stammered. “It’s not an act.”
“Huh?” Marty stood stiffly in front of Wolf Boy, his dark eyes wide in his
mud-caked face.
“They’re not actors,” I whispered. “Something is wrong here. Something is
terribly wrong.”
Marty’s mouth dropped open. He took a step back.
Both werewolves uttered low growls. They lowered their heads as if
preparing to attack.
“Do you believe me?” I cried. “Do you finally believe me?”
Marty nodded. He didn’t say a word. I think he was too terrified to talk.
Saliva poured from the werewolves’ mouths. Their eyes glowed like fire in
the darkness. Their furry chests began to heave in and out. Their breaths came
loud and hoarse.
I jumped back against the wall as both werewolves raised their heads and
let out long, frightening howls.
What were they going to do to us?
I grabbed Marty and tugged him to the wall. “Up!” I cried. “Get up! Maybe
they can’t reach us up there!”
Marty leaped high, stretching up his arms. His hands slapped the top of the
wall, then slid back down. He tried again. He bent his knees. Jumped. Grabbed
for the top of the wall. Slipped back down.
“I can’t!” he wailed. “It’s too high.”
“We’ve got to!” I shrieked.
I turned back and saw the two werewolves lean back on their hind legs and
then spring up. They were snarling and growling now, thick gobs of saliva
running over their snapping teeth.
“Up!” I cried.
As Marty leaped for the wall again, I reached down and grabbed his muddy
foot. “Up!” I gave him a hard boost.
His hands thrashed the air. Caught the top of the brick wall. Held on.
His bare feet kicked the air. But he held on and tugged himself up.
On his knees on top of the wall, he turned and grabbed my hands. He pulled
and I jumped. I struggled to scramble up beside him.
But I couldn’t get my knees up. Couldn’t get them onto the wall.
My bare feet thrashed wildly. My knees scraped against the wall as Marty
tugged.
“I can’t do it! I can’t!” I gasped.
The werewolves howled again.
“Keep trying!” Marty choked out. He tugged my arms. Tugged with all his
strength.
I was still struggling as the two werewolves leaped.
20
I heard the snap of jaws.
I felt hot breath on the bottom of my foot.
The two werewolves thudded against the wall.
With a desperate cry, I sprang to the top. Gasping for air, I pressed myself
flat against the bricks.
I raised my head in time to see the two snarling werewolves leap again.
Jaws snapped in front of my face. Red eyes gleamed hungrily at me.
“No!” With a cry, I scrambled to my feet.
The werewolves raised their heads in angry howls and prepared to attack
again.
Marty and I stood pressed close together, staring down at them.
They jumped.
Their claws scraped against the bricks. The shrill screech sent chills down
my back. Their teeth snapped.
They dropped down. Prepared another leap, snarling excitedly.
“We can’t stay up here forever!” Marty cried. “What do we do?”
I squinted into the darkness. Was that the studio road on the other side of
the wall?
Too dark to tell.
The werewolves leaped again. Jagged teeth scraped against my ankle.
I jumped back. Nearly toppled off the wall.
Marty and I bumped into each other, our eyes on the two growling creatures
preparing another leap.
The gun! The plastic stun gun!
Mine had fallen from my hand. It was probably buried in that mud hole. But
my eyes fell on Marty’s gun. Its handle poked out from his jeans pocket.
Without saying a word, I grabbed the handle and tugged the plastic pistol
from Marty’s jeans.
“Hey—!” he cried. “Erin—what are you doing?”
“They gave us the guns for a reason,” I explained, shouting over the
frightening howls of the two werewolves. “Maybe this will stop them.”
“It—it’s only a toy!” Marty stammered.
I didn’t care. It was worth a try.
Maybe it would frighten them. Maybe it would hurt them. Maybe it would
chase them away.
I raised the plastic gun. Aimed it as the two werewolves made another leap
of attack. “One—two—three—FIRE!” I squeezed the trigger. Again. Again.
Again!
21
The gun made a loud buzzing sound. It shot out a beam of yellow light.
Yes! I thought. Yes! I prayed.
The light will stop them.
It’s a stun gun—right? The buzzing sound and the bright light will stun
them. It will freeze them in place so Marty and I can make our escape.
I squeezed the trigger hard. Again. Again.
It didn’t stop the werewolves. It didn’t even seem to surprise them.
They leaped higher. I felt sharp claws scrape my leg. I cried out in pain.
And the plastic gun flew out of my hand.
It clattered against the top of the wall, then slid to the ground.
Just a toy. Marty was right. It wasn’t a real weapon. It was just a stupid toy.
“Look out!” Marty opened his mouth in a shrill shriek as the snarling
creatures made another high leap at the wall.
Claws scraped the brick—and held on. Red eyes glared up at me. Hot wolf
breath tingled my skin.
“Ohhh.” My arms flew up as I lost my balance. I struggled to stay up. But
my knees bent. My feet slipped.
I grabbed for Marty. Missed.
And toppled off. Landed hard on my back on the other side of the wall.
Gazing up in horror, I saw Marty leap down beside me.
The two werewolves were on the top of the wall now. They glared down at
us, red eyes glowing, tongues out, breathing hard.
Preparing to pounce.
Marty dragged me to my feet. “Run!” he cried hoarsely, his eyes wide with
panic.
The werewolves growled above us.
The ground tilted. I still felt dizzy, a little dazed from my fall. “We—we
can’t outrun them!” I moaned.
I heard a rumbling sound. A clatter.
Marty and I both turned. And saw two yellow eyes, glowing against the
dark sky.
Yellow eyes of a creature roaring toward us.
No. Not a creature.
As it drew nearer, I could make out its long, sleek shape.
The tram!
The tram bouncing over the road behind yellow headlights. Coming closer.
Closer.
Yes!
I turned to Marty. Did he see it, too? He did.
Without saying a word, we both began running to the road. The tram was
rolling fast. Somehow we had to climb on it. We had to!
Behind us, I heard the werewolves howl. I heard a hard thump, then another
as they dropped off the wall.
The twin yellow headlights of the tram swept over us.
The werewolves snarled and howled angrily as they chased after us.
A few feet ahead of me, Marty was hurtling forward, his head down, his
legs pumping furiously.
The tram bumped closer. Closer.
The howling werewolves were inches behind us. I could almost feel their
hot breath on the back of my neck.
A few more seconds. A few more seconds—and Marty and I would make
our jump.
I watched the tram speed around a curve, the yellow headlights washing
over the dark road. I kept my eyes on the front car. Took a deep breath. Prepared
to jump.
And then Marty fell.
I saw his hands shoot out. Saw his mouth open wide in surprise. In horror.
He stumbled over his own bare feet and dropped to the ground, landing
hard on his stomach.
I couldn’t stop in time.
I ran right into him. Stumbled over him.
Fell heavily on top of him.
And watched the tram speed past us.
22
“Owoooooooo!”
The two werewolves uttered long howls of triumph.
My heart pounding, I scrambled to my feet. “Get up!” I frantically pulled
Marty up by both arms.
We took off after the tram, our bare feet pounding the hard road. The last
car bounced a few feet ahead of us.
I reached it first. Shot out my right hand. Grabbed the back of the car.
With a desperate leap, I hoisted myself up. Up. And into the last seat.
Struggling to catch my breath, I turned back to find Marty running behind
the tram. His hands reached for the back of the tramcar. “I—I can’t make it!” he
gasped.
“Run! You’ve got to!” I screamed.
Behind him, I could see the werewolves scampering close behind.
Marty put on a burst of speed. He grabbed the back of the car with both
hands. It dragged him for several feet—until he swung himself around and
dropped into the seat beside me.
Yes! I thought happily. We made it! We got away from those howling
werewolves.
Or did we?
Would they jump into the tram after us?
I spun around, my whole body trembling. And I watched the werewolves
fade into the distance. They ran for a while, then gave up. They both stood in the
road, hunched over in defeat, watching us escape.
Escape.
What a wonderful word.
Marty and I grinned at each other. I slapped him a high five.
We were both breathing hard, covered in mud. My legs ached from running.
My bare feet throbbed. My heart still thudded from the frightening chase.
But we had escaped. And now we were safe in the tram, on our way back to
the starting platform. Back to my dad.
“We’ve got to tell your dad that this place is messed up,” Marty said
breathlessly.
“Something is horribly wrong here,” I agreed.
“Those werewolves—they weren’t kidding around,” Marty continued.
“They—they were real, Erin. They weren’t actors.”
I nodded. I felt so glad that Marty finally agreed with me. And he wasn’t
pretending to be brave anymore. He wasn’t pretending that it was all robots and
special effects.
We both knew that we had faced real dangers. Real monsters.
Something was terribly wrong at Shocker Studios. Dad had told us he
wanted a full report. Well, he was going to get one!
I settled back in the seat, trying to calm down.
But I shot straight up again when I realized we weren’t alone. “Marty—
look!” I pointed to the front of the tram. “We aren’t the only passengers.”
In fact, every tramcar appeared to be filled with people.
“What’s going on?” Marty murmured. “Your dad said we were the only
ones on the tour. And now the tram is—OH!—”
Marty never finished his sentence. His mouth fell open in a gasp. His eyes
bulged open wide.
I gasped, too.
The other passengers on the tram all turned around at the same time. And I
saw their grinning jaws, their dark, empty eye sockets, the gray bones of their
skulls.
Skeletons.
The other passengers were all grinning skeletons.
Their jaws opened in dry laughter. Cruel laughter that sounded like the
wind screeching through bare trees. Bones rattled and clattered as they raised
their yellowed, skeletal hands to point at us.
Their skulls bobbed and bounced as the tram carried us, faster, faster,
through the darkness.
Marty and I slumped low in the seat, trembling, staring at the grinning
skulls, the pointing fingers.
Who were they?
How did they get on this tram?
Where were they taking us?
23
The skeletons laughed their wheezing laugh. Their bones clanked and rattled.
Their yellowed skulls bounced loosely on their clattering shoulder bones.
The tram picked up speed. We were flying through the darkness.
I forced myself to turn away from the grinning skulls and peered out.
Beyond the trees, I could see the low buildings of the movie studio. As I stared,
they grew smaller, faded into the blackness of the night.
“Marty—we’re not going back to the main platform,” I whispered. “We’re
heading the wrong way. We’re going away from all the buildings.”
He swallowed hard. I could see the panic in his eyes. “What can we do?” he
choked out.
“We’ve got to get off!” I replied. “We’ve got to jump.”
Marty had slumped all the way down in the seat, as low as he could get. I
think he was trying to hide from the skeletons.
Now he raised his head and peeked over the side of the tram. “Erin—we
can’t jump!” he cried. “We’re going too fast.”
He was right.
We were rocketing along the road. And the tram kept picking up speed. The
trees and shrubs whirred past in a dark blur.
And then as we squealed into a sharp curve, a tall building seemed to jump
into our path.
A castle, bathed in swirling spotlights. All gray and silver. Twin towers
reached up to the sky. A solid stone wall rose up from the road.
The road.
It curved straight into the castle wall. The road ended at the wall.
And we were roaring down the road, still picking up speed.
Roaring toward the castle.
The skeletons rattled and clattered and laughed their dry, screeching laugh.
They bounced in their seats, bones cracking, jumping in excitement as we
zoomed at the castle.
Closer. Closer.
Right up to it now. Up to the solid stone wall.
About to smash right into it.
24
My legs trembled. My heart pounded. But somehow I managed to stand up on
the seat.
I took a deep breath. Held it. Closed my eyes—and jumped.
I landed hard on my side, and rolled.
I saw Marty hesitate. The tram bounced. Marty dove over the side.
He hit the ground on his stomach. Rolled onto his back. And kept rolling.
I came to a stop under a tree. And turned to the castle—in time to see the
tram plunge into the stone wall.
Without a sound.
The first tramcar hit the castle wall and flew through it.
Silently.
I could see the skeletons bobbing and bouncing.
And I saw the next car and the next and the next—all shoot into the castle
wall and disappear through it without making a sound.
A few seconds later, the tram disappeared.
A heavy silence fell over the road.
The spotlights on the castle wall dimmed.
“Erin—are you okay?” Marty called weakly.
I turned to find him on his hands and knees on the other side of the road. I
scrambled to my feet. I had scraped my side, but it didn’t hurt too badly.
“I’m okay,” I told him. I pointed to the castle. “Did you see that?”
“I saw it,” Marty replied, standing up slowly. “But I don’t believe it.” He
stretched. “How did the tram go through the wall? Do you think the castle isn’t
really there? That it’s an optical illusion? Some kind of trick?”
“There’s an easy way to find out,” I said.
We walked side by side on the road. The wind rustled the trees, making
them whisper all around us. The pavement felt cold under my bare feet.
“We’ve got to find my dad,” I said quietly. “I’m sure he can explain
everything to us.”
“I hope so,” Marty murmured.
We stepped up to the castle wall. I stuck out both hands, expecting them to
go right through.
But my hands slapped solid stone.
Marty lowered his shoulder and shoved it against the castle wall. His
shoulder hit the wall with a thud.
“It’s solid,” Marty said, shaking his head. “It’s a real wall. So how did the
tram go through it?”
“It’s a ghost tram,” I whispered, rubbing my hand against the cold stone. “A
ghost tram filled with skeletons.”
“But we rode in it!” Marty cried.
I slapped the wall with both hands and spun away from it. “I’m sick of
mysteries!” I wailed. “I’m sick of being scared! I’m sick of werewolves and
monsters! I’m never going to another scary movie as long as I live!”
“Your father can explain it all,” Marty said softly, shaking his head. “I’m
sure he can.”
“I don’t want him to explain it!” I cried. “I just want to get away from
here!”
Keeping close together, we made our way around to the side of the castle. I
could hear strange, animal howls behind us. And a frightening cackle cut
through the air somewhere above our heads.
I ignored all the sounds. I didn’t want to think about whether they were
being made by real monsters or fakes. I didn’t want to think about the
frightening creatures we had run into—or the close calls Marty and I had had.
I didn’t want to think.
At the back of the castle, the road appeared again. “I hope we’re going in
the right direction,” I murmured, following it as it curved into the hill.
“Me, too,” Marty replied in a tiny voice.
We picked up our pace, walking quickly in the middle of the road. We tried
not to pay attention to the sharp animal calls, the shrill cries, the howls and
moans that seemed to follow us everywhere.
The road sloped uphill. Marty and I leaned forward as we climbed. The
frightening cries and howls followed us up the hill.
As we neared the top, I saw several low buildings.
“Yes!” I cried. “Marty—look! We must be heading back to the main
platform.” I started jogging toward the buildings. Marty trotted close behind.
We both stopped when we realized where we were.
Back on Shock Street.
Somehow we had made a circle.
Past the old houses and small shops, The Shock Street Cemetery came into
view. Staring at the fence, I remembered the green hands poking up from the
ground. The green shoulders. The green faces. The hands pulling us, pulling us
down.
My whole body shuddered.
I didn’t want to be back here. I never wanted to see this terrifying street
again.
But I couldn’t turn away from the cemetery. As I stared at the old
gravestones from across the street, I saw something move.
A wisp of gray. Like a tiny cloud.
It rose up between two crooked, old stones. Floated silently into the air.
And then another puff of gray lifted off the ground. And another.
I glimpsed Marty. He stood beside me, hands pressed against his waist,
staring hard. He saw them, too.
The gray puffs rose silently, like snowballs or cotton. Dozens of them,
floating up from the graves.
Floating over the cemetery and out over the street.
Floating above Marty and me. Hovering so low.
And then as we stared up at them, they started to grow. To inflate, like gray
balloons.
And I saw faces inside them. Dark faces, etched in shadow like the Man in
the Moon. The faces scowled at us. Old faces, lined and creased. Eyes narrowed
to dark slits. Frowning faces. Sneering faces inside the billowing, white puffs.
I grabbed Marty’s shoulder. I wanted to run, to get away, to get out from
under them.
But, like smoke, the wisps of mist with their evil faces, swirled down,
swirled around us. Trapped us. Trapped us inside.
The faces, the ugly, scowling faces, spinning around us. Spinning faster,
faster, holding us in the swirling, choking mist.
25
I pressed my hands over my eyes, trying to shut them out.
I froze in total panic. I couldn’t think. I couldn’t breathe.
I could hear the shrill rush of wind as the ghostly clouds swirled around us.
And then I heard a man’s voice, shouting over the wind: “Cut! Print that
one! Good scene, everyone!”
I lowered my hands slowly and opened my eyes. I let out my breath in a
long whoosh.
A man came striding up to Marty and me. He wore jeans and a gray
sweatshirt under a brown leather jacket. He had a blue-and-white Dodgers cap
sideways on his head. A blond ponytail tumbled out from under it.
He carried a clipboard in one hand. He had a silver whistle around his neck.
He smiled at Marty and me and flashed us a thumbs-up.
“Hey, what’s up, guys? I’m Russ Denver. Good job! You looked really
scared.”
“Huh?” I cried, my mouth dropping open. “We were really scared!”
“I’m so glad to see a real live human!” Marty cried.
“This tour—it’s totally messed up!” I shrieked. “The creatures—they’re
alive! They tried to hurt us! They really did! It wasn’t any fun! It wasn’t like a
ride!” The words spilled out of me in a rush.
“It was really gross! The werewolves snapped at us and chased us up a
wall!” Marty exclaimed.
The two of us started talking at once, telling this guy Denver all of the
frightening things that had happened to us on the tour.
“Whoa! Whoa!” A smile crossed his handsome face. He raised his
clipboard as if to shield himself from us. “It’s all special effects, guys. Didn’t
they explain to you that we’re making a movie here? That we were filming your
reactions?”
“No. No one explained that, Mr. Denver!” I replied angrily. “My dad
brought us here. He designed the studio tour. And he told us we were the first to
try it out. But he didn’t tell us about any movie being filmed. I really think—”
I felt Marty’s hand on my shoulder. I knew Marty was trying to calm me
down. But I didn’t want to be calmed down.
I was really angry.
Mr. Denver turned back to a group of crew members behind him in the
street. “Take thirty, guys. Let’s break for dinner.”
They moved away, talking among themselves. Mr. Denver turned back to
us. “Your father should have explained to you—”
“It’s okay. Really,” Marty interrupted. “We just got a little scared. All of the
creatures seemed so real. And we didn’t see any other people anywhere. You’re
the first real person we’ve seen all afternoon.”
“My dad must be really worried,” I told the movie director. “He said he’d
be waiting for us on the main platform. Can you tell us how to get there?”
“No problem,” Mr. Denver replied. “See that big house there with the open
door?” He pointed with his clipboard.
Marty and I stared at the house across the street. A narrow path led up to the
house. A pale yellow light shone inside the open front door.
“That’s Shockro’s House of Shocks,” the director explained. “Go right in
that door and straight through the house.”
“But won’t we get shocked in there?” Marty demanded. “In the movie,
anyone who goes into Shockro’s house gets jolted with twenty million volts of
electricity!”
“That’s just in the movie,” Mr. Denver replied.
“The house is just a set. It’s perfectly safe. Go through the house. Then out
the back, and you will see the main building on the other side of the street. You
can’t miss it.”
“Thank you!” Marty and I called out at once.
Marty turned and started running full speed toward the house.
I turned back to Mr. Denver. “I’m sorry for yelling before,” I told him. “I
was just so scared, and I thought—”
I gasped.
Mr. Denver had turned away. And I saw the long power cord—the power
cord that was plugged into his back.
He wasn’t a real human. He wasn’t a movie director. He was some kind of
robot.
He was fake like all the others. He was lying to us. Lying!
I turned and cupped my hands around my mouth. I started to run, frantically
calling after Marty: “Don’t go in there! Marty—stop! Don’t go in that house!”
Too late.
Marty was already running through the door.
26
“Marty—wait! Stop!” I shouted as I ran.
I had to stop him.
The director was a fake. I knew he wasn’t telling the truth.
“Marty—please!”
My bare feet pounded the hard pavement. I plunged up the path as Marty
trotted into the doorway.
“Stop!”
I flew to the doorway. Reached out both hands. Made a wild dive to tackle
him.
And missed.
I skidded across the walk on my stomach.
As soon as Marty entered the house, I saw the flash of white light. I heard a
loud buzz. Then the sharp crackle of electricity.
The room exploded in a flash of lightning. So bright I had to shield my
eyes.
When I opened them, I saw Marty sprawled facedown on the floor.
“Nooooo!” I let out a terrified wail.
Scrambling to my feet, I dove into the house.
Would I get shocked, too?
I didn’t care. I had to get to Marty. I had to help him out of there.
“Marty! Marty!” I screamed his name again and again.
He didn’t move.
“Marty—please!” I grabbed his shoulders and started to shake him. “Wake
up, Marty! Snap out of it! Marty!”
He didn’t open his eyes.
I suddenly felt a chill. A dark shadow slid over me.
And I realized I wasn’t alone in the house.
27
I spun around with a gasp.
Was it Shockro? Some other scary creature?
A tall figure leaned over me. I squinted into the darkness, struggling to see
his face.
“Dad!” I cried as he came into focus. “Dad! Oh, I’m so glad to see you!”
“Erin, what are you doing here?” he asked in a low voice.
“It—it’s Marty!” I stammered. “You’ve got to help him, Dad. He’s been
shocked and he—he—”
Dad leaned closer. Behind his eyeglasses, his brown eyes were cold. His
face set in a troubled frown.
“Do something, Dad!” I pleaded. “Marty is hurt. He isn’t moving. He won’t
open his eyes. The studio tour was so awful, Dad! Something is wrong.
Something is terribly wrong!”
He didn’t reply. He leaned closer.
And as his face came into the soft light, I saw that he wasn’t my father!
“Who are you?” I shrieked. “You’re not my dad! Why aren’t you helping
me? Why aren’t you helping Marty? Do something—please! Where’s my dad?
Where is he? Who are you? Help me! Somebody? Help me
AAAAAARRRRRRRRR. Help MRRRRRRRRRRRR. Dad—
MARRRRRRRRRRRRRR. DRRRMMMMMMMMmmmmm.”
28
Mr. Wright stood staring down at Erin and Marty. He shook his head unhappily.
He shut his eyes and let out a long sigh.
Jared Curtis, one of the studio engineers, came running into The House of
Shocks. “Mr. Wright, what happened to your two kid robots?” he demanded.
Mr. Wright sighed again. “Programming problems,” he muttered.
He pointed to the Erin robot, frozen in place on her knees beside the Marty
robot. “I had to shut the girl off. Her memory chip must be bad. The Erin robot
was supposed to think of me as her father. But just now, she didn’t recognize
me.”
“And what about the Marty robot?” Jared asked.
“It’s totally down,” Mr. Wright replied. “I think the electrical system
shorted out.”
“What a shame,” Jared said, bending to roll the Marty robot over. He pulled
up the T-shirt and fiddled with some dials on the back. “Hey, Mr. Wright, it was
a great idea to make robot kids to test the park. I think we can fix them.”
Jared opened up a panel on Marty’s back and squinted at the red and green
wires. “All the other creatures, and monsters, and robots worked perfectly. Not a
single bug.”
“I should have known there was a problem yesterday,” Mr. Wright said.
“We were in my office. The Erin robot asked about her mother. I built her. She
doesn’t have a mother.”
Mr. Wright tossed up his hands. “Oh, well. No problem. We’ll reprogram
these two. Put in new chips. They’ll be good as new in no time. Then we’ll try
them out once again on the Shocker Studio Tour, before we open the park to real
kids.”
He took the Marty robot from Jared and slung it over his shoulder. Then he
picked up the Erin robot. He tossed it over his other shoulder. Then, humming to
himself, he carried them to the engineering building.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.


THE HAUNTED
MASK II
Goosebumps - 36
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
I don’t know if you have ever spent any time with first graders. But there is only
one word to describe them. And that word is ANIMALS.
First graders are animals.
You can quote me.
My name is Steve Boswell, and I am in the sixth grade. I may not be the
smartest guy at Walnut Avenue Middle School. But I know one thing for sure:
First graders are animals.
How do I know this fact? I learned it the hard way. I learned it by coaching
the first-grade soccer team after school every day.
You might want to know why I chose to coach their soccer team. Well, I
didn’t choose it. It was a punishment.
Someone set a squirrel loose in the girls’ locker room. That someone was
me. But it wasn’t my idea.
My best friend, Chuck Green, caught the squirrel. And he asked me where I
thought he should set it free.
I said, “How about the girls’ locker room before their basketball game on
Thursday?”
So maybe it was partly my idea. But Chuck was just as much to blame as I
was.
Of course, I was the one who got caught.
Miss Curdy, the gym teacher, grabbed me as I was letting the squirrel out of
its box. The squirrel ran across the gym to the bleachers. The kids in the
bleachers all jumped up and started running and screaming and acting crazy.
It was just a dumb squirrel. But all the teachers started chasing after it. It
took hours to catch it and get everyone calmed down.
So Miss Curdy said I had to be punished.
She gave me a choice of punishments. One: I could come into the gym after
school every day and inflate basketballs—by mouth—until my head exploded.
Or two: I could coach the first-grade soccer team.
I chose number two.
The wrong choice.
My friend Chuck was supposed to help me coach the team. But he told
Miss Curdy he had an after-school job.
Do you know what his after-school job is? Going home and watching TV.
A lot of people think that Chuck and I are best friends because we look so
much alike. We’re both tall and thin. We both have straight brown hair and dark
brown eyes. We both wear baseball caps most of the time. Sometimes people
think we’re brothers!
But that’s not why I like Chuck and Chuck likes me. We’re best friends
because we make each other laugh.
I laughed really hard when Chuck told me what his after-school job was.
But I’m not laughing now.
I’m praying. Every day I pray for rain. If it rains, the first graders don’t
have soccer practice.
Today, unfortunately, is a bright, clear, beautiful October day. Standing on
the playground behind school, I searched the sky for a cloud—any cloud—but
saw only blue.
“Okay, listen up, Hogs!” I shouted. I wasn’t making fun of them. That’s the
name they voted for their team. Do you believe it? The Walnut Avenue Hogs.
Does that give you an idea of what these kids are like?
I cupped my hands around my mouth and shouted again. “Line up, Hogs!”
Andrew Foster grabbed the whistle I wear around my neck and blew it in
my face. Then Duck Benton tromped down hard on my new sneakers. Everyone
calls him Duck because he quacks all the time. He and Andrew thought that was
a riot.
Then Marnie Rosen jumped up behind me, threw her arms around my neck,
and climbed on my back. Marnie has curly red hair, freckles all over her face,
and the most evil grin I ever saw on a kid. “Give me a ride, Steve!” she shouted.
“I want a ride!”
“Marnie—get off me!” I cried. I tried to loosen her grip on my neck. She
was choking me. The Hogs were all laughing now.
“Marnie—I… can’t… breathe!” I gasped.
I bent down and tried to throw her off my back. But she hung on even
tighter.
Then I felt her lips press against my ear.
“What are you doing?” I cried. Was she trying to kiss me or something?
Yuck! She spit her bubble gum into my ear.
Then, laughing like a crazed fiend, she hopped off me and went running
across the grass, her curly red hair bouncing behind her.
“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. The purple gum stuck in my ear. It took
me a while to scrape it all out.
By the time I finished, they had started a practice game.
Have you ever watched six-year-olds play soccer? It’s chase and kick, chase
and kick. Everybody chase the ball. Everybody try to kick it.
I try to teach them positions. I try to teach them how to pass the ball to each
other. I try to teach them teamwork. But all they want to do is chase and kick,
chase and kick.
Which is fine with me. As long as they leave me alone.
I blow my whistle and act as umpire. And try to keep the game going.
Andrew Foster kicked a big clump of dirt on my jeans as he ran by. He
acted as if it were an accident. But I knew it was deliberate.
Then Duck Benton got into a shoving fight with Johnny Myers. Duck
watches hockey games on TV with his dad, and he thinks you’re supposed to
fight. Some days Duck doesn’t chase after the ball at all. He just fights.
I let them chase-and-kick, chase-and-kick for an hour. Then I blew the
whistle to call practice to an end.
Not a bad practice. Only one bloody nose. And that was a win because it
wasn’t mine!
“Okay, Hogs—see you tomorrow!” I shouted. I started to trot off the
playground. Their parents or baby-sitters would be waiting for them in front of
the school.
Then I saw that a bunch of the kids had formed a tight circle in the middle
of the field. They all wore grins on their faces, so I decided I’d better see what
they were up to.
“What’s going on, guys?” I asked, trotting back to them.
Some kids stepped back, and I spotted a soccer ball on the grass. Marnie
Rosen smiled at me through her freckles. “Hey, Steve, can you kick a goal from
here?”
The other kids stepped away from the ball. I glanced to the goal. It was
really far away, at least half the field.
“What’s the joke?” I demanded.
Marnie’s grin faded. “No joke. Can you kick a goal from here?”
“No way!” Duck Benton called.
“Steve can do it,” I heard Johnny Myers say. “Steve can kick it farther than
that.”
“No way!” Duck insisted. “It’s too far even for a sixth grader.”
“Hey—that’s an easy goal,” I bragged. “Why don’t you give me something
hard to do?”
Every once in a while I have to do something to impress them. Just to prove
that I’m better than they are.
So I moved up behind the ball. I stopped about eight or ten steps back.
Gave myself plenty of running room.
“Okay, guys, watch how a pro does it!” I cried.
I ran up to the ball. Got plenty of leg behind it.
Gave a tremendous kick.
Froze for a second.
And then let out a long, high wail of horror.
2
On my way home a few minutes later, I passed my friend Chuck’s house. Chuck
came running down the gravel driveway to greet me.
I didn’t really feel like talking to anyone. Not even my friend.
But there he was. So what could I do?
“Yo—Steve!” He stopped halfway down the driveway. “What happened?
Why are you limping?”
“Concrete,” I groaned.
He pulled off his black-and-red Cubs cap and scratched his thick brown
hair. “Huh?”
“Concrete,” I repeated weakly. “The kids had a concrete soccer ball.”
Chuck squinted at me. I could see he still didn’t understand.
“One of the kids lives across the street. He had his friends help roll a ball of
concrete to the school,” I explained. “Painted white and black to look like a
soccer ball. Solid concrete. They had it there on the field. They asked me to kick
a goal and—and—” My voice caught in my throat. I couldn’t finish.
I hobbled over to the big beech tree beside Chuck’s driveway and leaned
back against its cold, white trunk.
“Wow. That’s not a very funny joke,” Chuck said, replacing his cap on his
head.
“Tell me about it,” I groaned. “I think I broke every bone in my foot. Even
some bones I don’t have.”
“Those kids are animals!” Chuck declared.
I groaned and rubbed my aching foot. It wasn’t really broken. But it hurt. A
lot. I shifted my backpack on my shoulders and leaned back against the tree.
“Know what I’d like to do?” I told Chuck.
“Pay them back?”
“You’re right!” I replied. “How did you know?”
“Lucky guess.” He stepped up beside me. I could see that he was thinking
hard. Chuck always scrunches up his face when he’s trying to think.
“It’s almost Halloween,” he said finally. “Maybe we could think of some
way to scare them. I mean, really scare them.” His dark eyes lit up with
excitement.
“Well… maybe.” I hesitated. “They’re just little kids. I don’t want to do
anything mean.”
My backpack felt weird—too full. I pulled it off my shoulder and lowered it
to the ground.
I leaned over and unzipped it.
And about ten million feathers came floating out.
“Those kids—!” Chuck exclaimed.
I pulled open the backpack. All of my notebooks, all of my textbooks—
covered in sticky feathers. Those animals had glued feathers to my books.
I tossed down the backpack and turned to Chuck. “Maybe I do want to do
something mean!” I growled.
A few days later, Chuck and I were walking home from the playground. It was a
cold, windy afternoon. Dark storm clouds rose up in the distance.
The storm clouds were too late to help me. I had just finished afternoon
practice with the Hogs.
It hadn’t been a bad practice. It hadn’t been a good practice, either.
Just as we started, Andrew Foster lowered his head and came at me full
speed. He weighs about a thousand pounds, and he has a very hard head. He
plowed into my stomach and knocked the wind out of me.
I rolled around on the ground for a few minutes, groaning and choking and
gasping. The kids thought it was pretty funny. Andrew claimed it was an
accident.
I’m going to get you guys back, I vowed to myself. I don’t know how. But
I’m going to get you guys.
Then Marnie Rosen jumped on my back and tore the collar off my new
winter coat.
Chuck met me after practice. He’d started doing that now. He knew that
after one hour with the first graders, I usually needed help getting home.
“I hate them,” I muttered. “Do you know how to spell hate? H-O-G-S.” My
torn coat collar flapped in the swirling wind.
“Why don’t you make all of them practice with a concrete ball?” Chuck
suggested. He adjusted his Cubs cap over his hair. “No. Wait. I’ve got it. Let
them take turns being the ball!”
“No. No good,” I replied, shaking my head. The sky darkened. The trees
shook, sending a shower of dead leaves down around us.
My sneakers crunched over the leaves. “I don’t want to hurt them,” I told
Chuck. “I just want to scare them. I just want to scare them to death.”
The wind blew colder. I felt a cold drop of rain on my forehead.
As we crossed the street, I noticed two girls from our class walking on the
other side. I recognized Sabrina Mason’s black ponytail swinging behind her as
she hurried along the sidewalk. And next to her, I recognized her friend Carly
Beth Caldwell.
“Hey—!” I started to call out to them, but I stopped.
An idea flashed into my mind.
Seeing Carly Beth, I knew how to scare those first graders.
Seeing Carly Beth, I knew exactly what I wanted to do.
3
I started to call to the girls. But Chuck clamped his hand over my mouth and
dragged me behind a wide tree.
“Hey—get your clammy paws off me. What’s the big idea?” I cried when
he finally pulled his hand away.
He pushed me against the rough bark of the tree trunk. “Ssshhh. They
haven’t seen us.” He motioned with his eyes toward the two girls.
“So?”
“So we can sneak up and scare them,” Chuck whispered, his dark eyes
practically glowing with evil excitement. “Let’s make Carly Beth scream.”
“You mean for old times’sake?”
Chuck nodded, grinning.
For many years, making Carly Beth scream had been our hobby. That’s
because she was a really good screamer, and she would scream at just about
anything.
One day in the lunchroom last year, Chuck tucked a worm inside his turkey
sandwich. Then he gave the sandwich to Carly Beth.
She took one bite and knew that something tasted a little weird. When
Chuck showed her the big bite she had taken out of the worm, Carly Beth
screamed for a week.
Chuck and I took bets on who could scare Carly Beth the most and who
could make her scream. I guess it was kind of mean. But it was funny too.
And sometimes when you know that people are real easy to scare, you have
no choice. You have to scare them as often as you can.
Anyway, that all changed last Halloween.
Last Halloween Chuck and I had a horrible scare. Carly Beth wore the most
frightening mask I had ever seen. It wasn’t a mask. It was like a living face.
It was so ugly, so real. It glared at us with evil, living eyes. Its mouth
sneered at us with real lips. The skin glowed a sick green. And Carly Beth’s
normally soft voice burst out in a terrifying animal growl.
Chuck and I ran for our lives.
No joke. We were terrified.
We ran for blocks, screaming the whole way. It was the worst night of my
life.
Everything changed after that.
Nearly a whole year has gone by, and we haven’t tried to scare Carly Beth
once. I don’t think Carly Beth can be scared. Not anymore.
After last Halloween, I don’t think anything scares her.
She is totally fearless. I haven’t heard her shriek or scream once the entire
year.
So I didn’t want to try to scare her now. I needed to talk to her. About that
scary mask of hers.
But Chuck kept pressing me back against the tree trunk. “Come on, Steve,”
he whispered. “They don’t see us. We’ll duck down behind the hedges and get
ahead of them. Then when they come by, we’ll jump out and grab them.”
“I don’t really—” I started. But I could see that Chuck had his heart set on
scaring Carly Beth and Sabrina. So I let him pull me down out of sight.
A light rain had started to fall. The gusting wind blew the raindrops into my
face. I crept along the hedge, bent low, following Chuck.
We passed by the girls and kept moving. I could hear Sabrina’s laugh
behind us. I heard Carly Beth say something else. Then Sabrina laughed again.
I wondered what they were talking about. I stopped to glance through the
hedge. Carly Beth had a weird expression on her face. Her dark eyes stared
straight ahead. She was moving stiffly. She had the collar of her blue down
jacket pulled up high around her face.
I ducked down low again as the girls came closer. I turned and saw that
Chuck and I were standing on the wide front lawn of the old Carpenter mansion.
I felt a chill as I stared across the weed-choked lawn at the gloomy old
house, covered in a deep darkness. Everyone said that the house was haunted—
haunted by people who had been murdered inside it a hundred years ago.
I don’t believe in ghosts. But I don’t like standing so close to the creepy old
Carpenter mansion, either.
I pulled Chuck into the empty lot next door. Rain pattered the ground. I
wiped raindrops off my eyebrows.
Carly Beth and Sabrina were only a few yards away. I could hear Sabrina
talking excitedly about something. But I couldn’t make out her words.
Chuck turned to me, an evil grin spreading across his face. “Ready?” he
whispered. “Let’s get ’em!”
We leaped to our feet. Then we both jumped out, screaming at the top of
our lungs.
Sabrina gasped in shock. Her mouth dropped to her knees. Her hands flew
up in the air.
Carly Beth stared at me.
Then her head tilted against the blue jacket collar—tilted and fell.
Her head fell off her shoulders.
It dropped to the ground and bounced onto the grass.
Sabrina lowered her eyes to the ground. She gaped at Carly Beth’s fallen
head in disbelief.
Then Sabrina’s hands began to flail the air crazily. She opened her mouth in
a scream of horror. And screamed and screamed and screamed.
4
I swallowed hard. My knees started to buckle.
Carly Beth’s head stared up at me from the grass. Sabrina’s shrieks rang in
my ears.
And then I heard soft laughter. Laughter from inside Carly Beth’s jacket.
I saw a clump of brown hair poke up through the raised collar. And then
Carly Beth’s laughing face shot up from under the jacket.
Sabrina stopped her wild cries and started to laugh.
“Gotcha!” Carly Beth cried. She and Sabrina fell all over each other,
laughing like lunatics.
“Oh, wow,” Chuck groaned.
My knees were still shaking. I don’t think I had taken a breath the whole
time.
I bent down and picked up Carly Beth’s head. Some kind of dummy head.
A sculpture, I guess. I rolled it around between my hands. It was amazing. It
looked just like her.
“It’s plaster of Paris,” Carly Beth explained, grabbing it away from me.
“My mom made it.”
“But—it’s so real-looking!” I choked out.
She grinned. “Mom is getting pretty good. She keeps doing my head over
and over. This is one of her best.”
“It’s okay. But it didn’t fool us,” Chuck said.
“Yeah. We knew it was a fake,” I quickly agreed. But my voice cracked
when I said it. I was still kind of in shock.
Sabrina shook her head. Her black ponytail waved behind her. Sabrina is
very tall, taller than Chuck and me. Carly Beth is a shrimp. She only comes up to
Sabrina’s shoulder.
“You should have seen the looks on your faces!” Sabrina exclaimed. “I
thought your heads were going to fall off!”
The two girls hugged each other again and had another good laugh.
“We saw you a mile away,” Carly Beth said, twirling the head in her hands.
“Luckily, I brought this head in to show off in art class today. So I pulled my
jacket over my head, and Sabrina tucked the plaster head into the collar.”
“You guys scare pretty easy,” Sabrina smirked.
“We weren’t scared. Really,” Chuck insisted. “We were just playing along.”
I wanted to change the subject. The girls would talk all day and night about
how dumb Chuck and I were. If we let them. I didn’t want to let them.
The rain kept pattering down, blown by the gusting wind. I shivered. We
were all getting pretty wet.
“Carly Beth, you know that mask you wore last Halloween? Where did you
get it?” I asked. I tried to sound casual. I didn’t want her to think it was any big
deal.
She hugged her plaster head against the front of her jacket. “Huh? What
mask?”
I groaned. She is such a jerk sometimes!
“Remember that really scary mask you had last Halloween? Where did you
get it?”
She and Sabrina exchanged glances. Then Carly Beth said, “I don’t
remember.”
“Give me a break!” I groaned.
“No. Really—” she insisted.
“You remember,” Chuck told her. “You just don’t want to tell.”
I knew why Carly Beth didn’t want to tell. She was probably planning to
get another truly terrifying mask at the same store for this Halloween. She
wanted to be the scariest kid in town. She didn’t want me to be scary too.
I turned to Sabrina. “Do you know where she bought that mask?”
Sabrina made a zipper motion over her lips. “I’m not telling, Steve.”
“You don’t want to know,” Carly Beth declared, still hugging the head.
“That mask was too frightening.”
“You just want to be scarier than me,” I replied angrily. “But I need a really
scary mask this year, Carly Beth. There are some kids I want to scare and—”
“I’m serious, Steve,” Carly Beth interrupted. “There was something totally
weird about the mask. It wasn’t just a mask. It came alive. It clamped onto my
head, and I couldn’t get it off. The mask was haunted or something.”
“Ha-ha,” I said, rolling my eyes.
“She’s telling the truth!” Sabrina cried, narrowing her dark eyes at me.
“The mask was evil,” Carly Beth continued. “It started giving me orders. It
started talking all by itself, in a horrible, harsh growl. I couldn’t control it. And I
couldn’t get it off. It was attached to my head! I—I was so scared!”
“Oh, wow,” Chuck murmured, shaking his head. “You’ve got a good
imagination, Carly Beth.”
“Good story,” I agreed. “Save it for English class.”
“But it’s the truth!” Carly Beth cried.
“You just don’t want me to be scary,” I grumbled. “But I need a good, scary
mask like that one. Come on,” I begged. “Tell.”
“Tell us,” Chuck insisted.
“Tell,” I repeated, trying to sound tough.
“No way,” Carly Beth replied, shaking her fake round, little head. “Let’s get
home. It’s really raining hard.”
“Not till you tell!” I cried. I stepped in front of her to block her path.
“Grab the head!” Chuck cried.
I grabbed the plaster head from Carly Beth’s hands.
“Give it back!” she shrieked. She swiped at it, but I swung it out of her
reach. Then I tossed it to Chuck.
He backed away. Sabrina chased after him. “Give that back to her!”
“We’ll give it back when you tell us where you bought that mask!” I told
Carly Beth.
“No way!” she cried.
Chuck tossed the head to me. Carly Beth made a wild grab for it. But I
caught it and heaved it back to Chuck.
“Give it back! Come on!” Carly Beth cried, running after Chuck. “My mom
made that. If it gets messed up, she’ll kill me!”
“Then tell me where you bought the mask!” I insisted.
Chuck tossed the head to me. Sabrina jumped up and batted it down. She
made a wild dive for it, but I got there first. I picked it up off the grass and
heaved it back to Chuck.
“Stop it! Give it back!”
Both girls were screaming angrily. But Chuck and I kept up our game of
keep-away.
Carly Beth made a frantic leap for the head and fell on her stomach onto the
grass. When she stood up, the front of her jacket and her jeans were soaked, and
she had grass stains on her forehead.
“Tell!” I insisted, holding the head high in the air. “Tell, and you can have
the head back!”
She growled at me.
“Okay,” I warned her. “I guess I have to drop-kick it onto that roof.”
I turned toward the house at the top of the lawn. Then I held the head in
front of me in both hands and pretended I was going to punt it onto the roof.
“Okay, okay!” Carly Beth cried. “Don’t kick it, Steve.”
I kept the head in front of me. “Where did you get the mask?”
“You know that weird little party store a couple of blocks from school?”
I nodded. I had seen the store, but I had never gone in.
“That’s where I bought it. There’s a back room. It was filled with weird,
ugly masks. That’s where I got mine.”
“All right!” I cried happily. I handed Carly Beth back her head.
“You guys are creeps,” Sabrina muttered, pulling her collar up against the
rain. She pushed me out of the way and wiped the grass stain off Carly Beth’s
forehead.
“I really didn’t want to tell you,” Carly Beth moaned. “I wasn’t making that
story up about the mask. It was so terrifying.”
“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes again.
“Please, don’t go there!” Carly Beth begged. She grabbed my arm tightly.
“Please, Steve. Please, don’t go to that party store!”
I pulled my arm away. I narrowed my eyes at her. And I laughed.
Too bad I didn’t take her seriously.
Too bad I didn’t listen to her.
It might have saved me from a night of endless horror.
5
“Get off me! Get off me, Marnie! I mean it!” I shouted.
The little redheaded pest hung onto my back, laughing and digging her
pudgy fingers into my neck. Why did she think I was some kind of thrill ride?
“Get off! This is my good sweater!” I cried. “If you wreck it—”
She laughed even harder.
It had rained all night and all morning. But the clouds had parted at
lunchtime. Now the sky was blue and clear. I had no choice. I had to hold soccer
practice for the Hogs.
Across the playground, I saw Duck Benton fighting with Andrew Foster.
Andrew picked up the soccer ball and heaved it with all his might into Duck’s
stomach.
Duck’s mouth shot open. He let out a whoosh of breath, and a huge wad of
bubblegum went flying into the air.
“Get off!” I pleaded with Marnie. I tried spinning and twirling as fast as I
could, trying to throw her off my back. I knew if anything happened to this
sweater, Mom would have a fit.
You might ask why I was wearing my best, blue wool sweater to soccer
practice. Good question.
The answer is: It was Class Photo Day. And Mom wanted me to take a
really good picture to send to all my aunts and uncles. She made me wear the
sweater. And she made me shampoo my hair before school and not wear my
Orlando Magic cap over it.
So I looked like a jerk all day. And now, here was soccer practice. And I
had forgotten to bring a sweatshirt or something to replace my good sweater.
“Whoooooa!” Marnie gave me a final kick in the side as she hopped off my
back.
I pulled down my sweater, hoping it wasn’t stretched too badly. I heard
angry shouts and glanced up to find Andrew and Duck swinging their fists at
each other and butting heads across the field.
I reached for my whistle.
And grabbed air.
Marnie had swiped it. She held it high above her head and ran, laughing,
over the grass.
“Hey, you—!” I screamed, chasing after the little thief.
I took three steps—and my sneakers slid in the mud. My feet flew out from
under me. With an angry cry, I fell forward. And landed on my stomach in deep,
wet mud.
“Noooooo!” I let out a howl of dread. “Please. Nooooo!”
But when I pulled myself up, the mud came with me. My entire body was
caked in thick, wet mud. My beautiful blue sweater? It was now an ugly brown
sweater.
With a sad groan, I sank back onto the ground. I just wanted to disappear, to
sink from sight into the big mud hole.
My faithful team, the Horrible Hogs, were laughing and hooting. They
thought it was a riot. Nice kids, huh?
At least my mud dive had stopped Andrew and Duck from fighting.
The mud weighed me down as I climbed slowly to my feet. I felt like
Andrew. I felt as if I weighed a thousand pounds. Maybe I did!
I wiped mud off my eyes with both hands—and saw Chuck standing over
me. He tsk-tsked a few times. “You look really bad, man.”
“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered.
“Why did you do that?” he asked.
I squinted through two inches of mud at him. “Excuse me?”
“You look like a Mud Monster or something.” Chuck snickered.
“Ha-ha,” I said glumly.
“You told me to meet you here, Steve. You said we were going straight to
that party store to buy the you-know-what.”
He glanced back at my team of first graders. They weren’t listening to our
conversation. They were too busy flinging mud balls at each other.
I scooped my hand along the front of my sweater and scraped off about ten
pounds of glop. “I… uh… I think I’d better go home after practice and get
changed first,” I told Chuck.
Talk about your long afternoons!
I had to break up the mud ball fight. Then I had to hand over all of the little
angels to their parents and baby-sitters.
Then I had to explain to their angry parents and baby-sitters why they had
practiced mud ball fighting instead of soccer.
I crept home. Chuck waited for me outside. I hid my mud-caked clothes in
the back of my closet. I didn’t have time to explain to my mom.
Then I changed into a clean pair of jeans and a gray-and-red Georgetown
Hoyas sweatshirt one of my uncles had sent me. I don’t know anything about the
Hoyas. I don’t even know what a Hoya is. But it is a cool sweatshirt.
I pulled my cap down over my mud-drenched hair. Then I hurried to meet
Chuck.
“Steve—is that you?” Mom called from the den.
“No, it isn’t!” I called back. I closed the front door behind me and ran down
the driveway before she could stop me from going out again.
I was really eager to find that party store and check out the weird masks. So
eager, I forgot to bring any money with me.
Chuck and I walked two blocks before I reached into my jeans pocket and
realized it was empty. We jogged back to my house, and I crept up to my room
once again.
“This just isn’t my day,” I muttered to myself.
But I knew that buying a really gross and frightening mask would instantly
cheer me up. Then I could go ahead with my plan to terrify the Hogs, to get my
revenge.
Revenge!
What a beautiful word.
When I’m older and have my own car, that’s what I want it to say on my
license plate.
I pulled all of my allowance money out of the dresser drawer where I hide
it. I counted it quickly—about twenty-five dollars. Then I jammed the bills into
my jeans pocket and hurried back downstairs.
“Steve—are you going out again?” Mom called from the den.
“Be right back!” I shouted. I slammed the front door and ran down the
driveway to meet Chuck.
Our sneakers slid over fat, wet leaves as we walked. A pale full moon hung
low over the trees.
The streets and sidewalks still glistened from all the rain.
Chuck had his hands stuffed into the pockets of his hooded sweatshirt. He
leaned into the wind as we walked. “I’m going to be late for dinner,” he
grumbled. “I’m probably going to get into major trouble.”
“It’ll be worth it,” I told him, feeling a little more cheerful. We crossed the
street that led to the party store. A small grocery stood on the corner. Other small
shops came into view.
“I can’t wait to see these masks!” I exclaimed. “If I find one just half as
scary as Carly Beth’s…”
There it stood! In the darkness above a small, square store, I could make out
the sign: THE PARTY PLACE.
“Let’s check it out!” I cried.
I leaped over a fire hydrant.
Flew over the sidewalk. Up to the big front window.
And peered in the window.
6
“Oh, wow!” Chuck cried breathlessly, stepping up beside me.
We both pressed our faces against the window glass and stared in.
Stared into total darkness.
“Is it closed?” Chuck asked softly. “Maybe it’s just closed for the night.”
I uttered an unhappy sigh. “No way. It’s closed for good. The store is gone.”
Peering through the dust-smeared glass, I could see empty shelves and
display racks inside. A tall metal shelf lay on its side across the center aisle. A
trash basket, overflowing with paper and empty soda cans, stood on top of the
counter.
“There’s no ‘Out of Business’ sign on the door,” Chuck said. He’s a good
friend. He saw how disappointed I looked. He was trying to stay hopeful.
“It’s empty.” I sighed. “Totally cleaned out. It isn’t going to open up again
tomorrow morning.”
“Yeah. Guess you’re right,” Chuck murmured.
He slapped my shoulder. “Yo—snap out of it. You’ll find a scary mask at
some other store.”
I pushed myself away from the window. “I wanted one like Carly Beth’s,” I
complained. “You remember that mask. You remember those glowing eyes,
right? And the way the mouth moved. The way it growled at us with those long,
dripping fangs. It was so gross. And it looked totally real. Like a real monster!”
“They probably have masks like that at K-Mart,” Chuck said.
“Give me a break,” I muttered. I kicked at a candy wrapper that blew across
the sidewalk.
A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights rolled over the front of the store,
lighting up the bare shelves, the empty counters inside.
“We’d better get home,” Chuck warned, pulling me away from the store.
“I’m not allowed to wander around town after dark.”
He said something else, but I didn’t hear him. I was still picturing Carly
Beth’s mask, still unable to get over my disappointment.
“You don’t understand how important this is to me,” I told Chuck. “Those
first graders are ruining my life. I have to pay them back this Halloween. I have
to.”
“They’re just first graders,” he replied.
“No, they’re not. They’re monsters. Vicious, man-eating monsters.”
“Maybe we can make a scary mask,” Chuck suggested. “You know. Out of
papier-mâché and stuff.”
I didn’t even bother to answer him. Chuck is a good guy, but sometimes he
has the dumbest ideas ever thought up by a human.
I could just see Marnie Rosen and Duck Benton when I popped out on
Halloween. “Ooh, we’re scared! We’re scared! Papier-mâché!”
“I’m hungry,” Chuck grumbled. “Come on, Steve. Let’s get out of here.”
“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed. I started to follow him down the sidewalk—then
stopped.
Another car had turned onto the street. Its headlights rolled over a narrow
alley beside the party store.
“Whoa, Chuck! Check it out!” I grabbed the shoulder of his sweatshirt and
spun him around. “Look!” I pointed into the alley. “That door is open!”
“Huh? What door?”
I dragged Chuck into the alley. A large black trapdoor in the sidewalk had
been left up. It caught the light from a streetlamp on the sidewalk.
Chuck and I peered in through the door. Steep concrete steps led down to a
basement.
The basement of the party store!
Chuck turned to me, a confused expression on his face. “So? They left the
basement door open. So what?”
I grabbed the open trapdoor and leaned over the steps, squinting into the
dim light from the streetlamp. “There are boxes down there. A whole bunch of
cartons.”
He still didn’t understand.
“Maybe all the masks and costumes and party things are packed up in those
cartons. Maybe the stuff hasn’t been shipped away yet.”
“Whoa. What are you thinking about?” Chuck demanded. “You’re not
going down there—are you? You’re not going to sneak down to that dark
basement and try to steal a mask—are you?”
I didn’t answer him.
I was already halfway down the stairs.
7
My heart began to pound as I made my way down. The steps were narrow and
slippery. Slick from all the rain.
“Ohh!” I let out a cry as one foot slid over the concrete step and I felt
myself start to fall. I shot out both hands in search of a railing—but there wasn’t
one.
I landed on the hard basement floor with a loud thud—luckily, on both feet.
Feeling shaken, I took a deep breath and held it.
Then I turned back to the trapdoor and called up to Chuck. “I’m okay. Get
down here.”
In the light from the streetlamp, I could see his unhappy face peering down
at me. “I—I really don’t want to,” he called softly.
“Chuck—hurry,” I insisted. “Get out of the alley. If someone drives by and
sees you, they’ll get suspicious.”
“But it’s so late, Steve,” he whined. “And it isn’t right to break into
basements and—”
“We’re not breaking in,” I called up to him impatiently. “The door was open
—right? Hurry up. If the two of us search the boxes, we can do it in five
minutes.”
He leaned down over the opening. “It’s too dark,” he complained. “We
don’t have a flashlight or anything.”
“I can see fine,” I replied. “Get down here. You’re wasting time.”
“But it’s against the law…” he started. Then I saw his expression change.
His mouth dropped open as car headlights washed over him. With a low gasp,
Chuck ducked through the opening, and bolted down the stairs.
He stepped up close beside me, breathing hard. “I don’t think they saw me.”
His eyes darted around the large basement. “It’s too dark, Steve. Let’s go home.”
“Give your eyes a chance to adjust,” I instructed him. “I can see okay.”
I gazed slowly around the basement. It was bigger than I’d thought. I
couldn’t really see the walls. They were hidden in darkness.
The ceiling was low, only a foot or two over our heads. Even in the dim
light, I could see the thick cobwebs in the rafters.
The cartons had been stacked in two rows near the steps. Somewhere way
across the room, I could hear the steady drip drip drip of water.
“Oh!” I jumped when I heard a clattering sound.
It took me a few seconds to figure out that it was the wind blowing against
the metal trapdoor up in the alley.
I made my way over to the nearest carton and bent over to examine it. The
flaps were folded over each other. But the carton wasn’t sealed.
“Let’s have a look,” I murmured, reaching for the flaps.
Chuck had his arms crossed tightly in front of his chest. “This isn’t right,”
he protested. “It’s stealing.”
“We haven’t taken anything,” I protested. “And even if we do find a good,
scary mask and take it, we’ll just borrow it. We’ll return it after Halloween.”
“Aren’t you… a little scared?” Chuck asked softly, his eyes moving all
around the dark room.
I nodded. “Yeah. I’m a little scared,” I admitted. “It’s cold and creepy down
here.” The wind clattered the trapdoor above us again. I heard the faint drip of
water against the concrete floor.
“Let’s hurry,” I urged. “Help me.”
Chuck stepped beside me, but he just stared down at the box and didn’t try
to help.
I pulled open the first carton, pushed back the cardboard flaps, and peered
inside. “What is this stuff?” I reached in and pulled out a cone-shaped party hat.
The box was stuffed with party hats.
“This is great!” I whispered happily to Chuck.
I dropped the hat back in the box. “I was right. All the stuff from the store is
packed up down here. We’re going to find the scary masks. I know we will!”
Cartons were stacked on top of cartons. I pulled down another one and
started to pull it open. “Chuck, you take the bottom one,” I instructed.
He hesitantly reached for the box. “I have a bad feeling about this, Steve,”
he murmured.
“Just find the masks,” I replied. My heart was thudding. My hands were
shaking as I pulled open the second carton. I was really excited.
“This one is filled with candles,” Chuck reported.
My carton had piles of party place mats, napkins, and paper cups. “Keep
going,” I urged. “The masks have got to be down here.”
Above our heads, the wind shook the trapdoor. I hoped it wouldn’t suddenly
slam shut on us. I didn’t want to be trapped down in this cold basement in the
dark.
Chuck and I slid two more cartons into the pale square of light from
outside. My carton was taped shut. I struggled to pull off the tape.
I stopped when I heard the creaking sound above my head.
Creaking floorboards?
I froze, my hands over the carton. “What was that?” I whispered.
Chuck frowned at me. “What was what?”
“Didn’t you hear that noise upstairs? It sounded like a footstep.”
Chuck shook his head. “I didn’t hear anything.”
I listened for a few more seconds. Silence now. So I went back to work on
the carton.
I pulled it open and peered eagerly inside.
Greeting cards. Dozens of greeting cards. I sifted through them. Birthday
cards. Valentines. A whole carton of cards.
Disappointed, I shoved the carton to the side and turned to Chuck. “Any
luck?”
“Not yet. Let’s see what’s in this one.”
He pulled open the carton with both hands. Then he leaned over it and
peered inside.
“Oh, yuck!” he cried.
8
“It’s so gross!” Chuck groaned.
“What is? What?” I demanded. I leaped over my carton to get to him.
“Check it out.” A grin spread over Chuck’s face as he pulled something out
of the carton.
I gasped as I saw an ugly purple face with broken teeth and a long, fat
worm poking out of a hole in its cheek.
“You found them!” I shrieked.
Chuck let out a gleeful laugh. “A whole carton of masks! And they’re all
totally gross!”
I grabbed the ugly mask from his hand and studied it. “Hey—it feels
warm!”
It was so cold down in that basement. Why did the mask feel warm?
The worm bobbed out of the ugly face, as if it were alive.
I dropped the mask, plunged my hand into the carton, and pulled out
another one. A disgusting pig face with thick gobs of green stuff dripping from
its snout.
“That one looks like Carly Beth!” Chuck joked.
“These are scarier than the mask Carly Beth had last year,” I said.
I pulled another one from the box. A furry animal face, sort of like a gorilla,
except that it had two long pointed fangs sliding down past its chin.
I dropped it and grabbed up another mask. Then another. A hideous bald
head with one eye hanging down by a thread and an arrow through the forehead.
I tossed it to Chuck and pulled out another one.
“This is amazing!” I cried happily. “These will terrify those kids. How will
I ever choose the best one?”
Chuck let out a disgusted groan and dropped the mask he was holding into
the box. “They feel like real skin. They’re so warm.”
I didn’t pay any attention to him. I was busy digging down to the bottom of
the carton. I wanted to check out each mask before I made my choice.
I wanted the scariest, grossest mask in the box. I wanted a mask that would
give those first graders more nightmares than they had given me!
I pulled out a mask of a girl’s face with a lizard’s head poking out from her
mouth.
No. Not scary enough.
I pulled out a mask of a snarling wolf, its lips pulled back to show two
jagged rows of pointed teeth.
Too wimpy.
I pulled out an ugly mask of a leering old man, his mouth twisted in an evil
grin. One long, crooked tooth stuck down over his lower lip.
The mask had long, stringy yellow hair that drooped down over the old
man’s craggy forehead. I could see big black spiders climbing in the hair and in
the ears. A chunk of forehead was missing, revealing a patch of gray skull
underneath.
Not bad, I thought.
This one even smelled bad!
I started to put it back when I heard a creaking sound again.
Louder this time.
The ceiling above my head groaned.
I gasped. It really sounded like a footstep. Someone walking around up
there.
But the store had appeared dark and empty. Chuck and I had both stared
into the window for a long time. If anyone was hiding there in the darkness, we
would have seen them.
Another creak made me suck in a mouthful of air.
I froze, listening hard. I could hear the steady drip drip of water across the
dark basement. I could hear the trapdoor rattling outside.
And I could hear my own shallow breathing.
The ceiling squeaked. I swallowed hard.
It’s an old building, I told myself. All old buildings squeak and creak.
Especially on a windy night.
A scraping footstep made me gasp out loud.
“Chuck—did you hear that?”
Gripping the old-man mask, I listened hard.
“Did you hear that?” I whispered. “Do you think someone else is in the
building?”
Silence.
Another scraping footstep.
“Chuck?” I whispered. “Hey—Chuck?”
My heart pounding, I turned to him.
“Chuck?”
He was gone.
9
“Chuck?”
A stab of fear made my breath catch in my throat.
I heard the hard thud of sneakers against concrete, and turned to the stairs.
In the dim light, I saw Chuck disappear out through the trapdoor.
As soon as he reached the alley, he poked his head back in. “Steve—get
out!” he called down in a loud whisper. “Hurry! Get out of there!”
Too late.
A ceiling light flashed on.
As I blinked against the bright light, I saw a man move quickly across the
basement. He swept along the wall, pulled a long, black cord—and the trapdoor
slammed shut with a deafening clang.
“Oh!” I uttered a weak cry as he turned angrily to me.
I was trapped.
Chuck got out. But I was trapped. Trapped in the basement with this guy.
And what a weird-looking guy! To begin with, he wore a long black cape
that swept behind him as he crossed the room to me.
Is that a Halloween costume? I wondered.
Does he wear a black cape all the time?
Beneath the billowing cape, he wore a black suit, kind of old-fashioned
looking.
He had shiny black hair, parted in the middle and slicked down with some
kind of hair grease, and a pencil-thin, black mustache that curled over his upper
lip.
As he stood over me, his black eyes glowed like two burning coals.
Like vampire eyes! I thought.
My whole body was shaking. I gripped the sides of the carton and tried to
return his stare.
Trapped, I thought, waiting for him to speak. Trapped with a vampire.
“What are you doing here?” he asked finally. He pushed back his cape and
crossed his arms in front of him. The glowing eyes glared down at me sternly.
“Uh… just looking at masks,” I managed to choke out. I was still on my
knees on the floor. I knew that my legs were shaking too hard to stand up.
“The store is closed,” the man said through gritted teeth.
“I know,” I admitted, lowering my eyes to the floor. “I—”
“The store went out of business. We’re closed for good.”
“I… I’m sorry,” I murmured.
Was he going to let me go? What was he going to do with me?
If I started to scream, no one would hear me.
Would Chuck try to get help for me? Or was he halfway home by now?
“I live upstairs,” the man explained, still glaring at me angrily. “I heard
scraping sounds down here. Boxes being moved around. I was going to call the
police.”
“I’m not a burglar,” I blurted out. “Please don’t call the police. The trapdoor
was open and my friend and I came down.”
His eyes moved quickly around the room. “Your friend?”
“He ran away when he heard you coming,” I told him. “I just wanted to see
if there were any masks. You know. For Halloween. I wasn’t going to steal
anything. I just—”
“But the store is closed,” the man repeated. He glanced at the open carton in
front of me. “Those masks are very special. They’re not for sale.”
“N-not for sale?” I stammered.
“You shouldn’t break into stores,” the man replied, shaking his head. His
slicked-down hair gleamed under the low ceiling light. “How old are you?”
I drew a blank. My mouth dropped open, but no answer came out. I was so
terrified, I forgot how old I was!
“Twelve,” I answered finally. I took a deep breath, trying to calm myself.
“Twelve and you’re already breaking into stores,” the man said softly.
“I don’t break into stores!” I protested. “I mean, I never did before. I came
to buy a mask. Look. I brought money.”
I jammed my trembling hand into my jeans pocket and pulled out the wad
of bills. “Twenty-five dollars,” I said, holding up the money so he could see it.
“Here. Is it enough for one of these masks?”
He rubbed his chin. “I told you, young man. These masks are special. They
cannot be sold. Believe me—you do not want one of these.”
“But I do!” I cried. “They’re awesome! They’re the best masks I’ve ever
seen. Halloween is only a few days away. I need one. I need one desperately.
Please—!”
“No!” the man shouted sharply. “Not for sale.”
“But why not?” I wailed.
He eyed me thoughtfully. “Too real,” he replied. “The masks are too real.”
“But that’s why they’re so awesome!” I exclaimed. “Please? Please? Take
my money. Here.” I pushed the wad of bills toward him.
He didn’t reply. Instead, he turned away. His cape swirled behind him.
“Come with me, young man.”
“Huh? Where?” Cold fear ran down my back. I was still holding the money
out in front of me.
“Come upstairs with me. I’m going to call your parents.”
“No!” I shrieked. “Please—!”
If my mom and dad found out I got caught breaking into the basement of a
store, they would go totally ballistic! They’d ground me for life! I’d miss this
Halloween—and the next thirty Halloweens to come!
The man eyed me coldly. “I don’t want to call the police,” he said softly.
“I’d rather call your parents.”
“Please…” I murmured again, climbing to my feet.
I suddenly had an idea.
I could make a run for it.
I glanced quickly at the concrete stairs leading up to the trapdoor. If I took
off—and really flew—I could get up those stairs before the man could reach me.
The trapdoor was shut. But it probably wasn’t locked. I could push it open
from underneath, and just keep running.
I glanced again at the steps. It was worth a try, I decided.
I took a deep breath and held it.
Then I silently counted to three.
One… two… THREE!
On three, I took off. My heart thudded louder than my sneakers on the hard
floor. But I made it to the stairs in about a second and a half!
“Hey—stop!” I heard the caped man cry out in surprise. I could hear his
heavy steps as he plunged after me.
“Stop, young man! Where are you going?”
I didn’t slow down or glance back.
I took the stairs two at a time.
Yes! Yes! I’m getting away! I thought.
As I reached the top, I shot out both hands—and pushed up on the trapdoor
with all of my might.
It didn’t budge.
10
“Ohh!” I let out a terrified moan.
The caped man had reached the bottom of the steps. I could practically feel
his breath on the back of my neck.
The door has got to open! I told myself. It’s got to!
I took a deep breath. Then I heaved my shoulder against the door. I uttered
a desperate groan as I pushed.
Pushed.
The caped man made a grab for me.
I felt his hand brush my ankle.
I kicked the hand away. Then I shoved my shoulder hard against the
trapdoor.
And it opened.
“Yes!” A happy cry escaped my throat as I scrambled out into the alley.
The cold air rushed against my hot face. I stumbled over something hard—a
stone or a brick. I didn’t stop to look. I ran through the narrow alley, to the
sidewalk in front of the store.
My eyes swept back and forth. I searched for Chuck. No sign of him.
Had the caped man followed me out the trapdoor? Was he chasing after me?
I turned back to the alley. And saw only darkness.
Then I took off, running fast, my feet practically flying over the pavement. I
shot across the street. Bright lights washed over me. A car horn honked, making
me jump about a mile! The car roared past.
“Hey, Steve—!”
Chuck stepped out from behind a tall evergreen shrub. “You made it!”
“Yeah. I made it,” I replied, gasping for breath.
“I—I didn’t know what to do!” he stammered.
I shook my head. “So you just stood here?”
“I waited for you,” he said. “I was kind of scared.”
Big help.
“Get going,” I urged, glancing back across the street. “He may be chasing
us.”
We ran side by side, our breath steaming up into the cold night air. The
houses and dark lawns whirred past in a gray-black blur. We didn’t say another
word to each other.
Three blocks later, I slowed down as we reached Chuck’s house. I leaned
over and tried to shake away the sharp pain in my side. I always get a pain like
that when I run more than a few blocks.
“See you!” Chuck cried breathlessly. “Sorry you didn’t get your mask.”
“Yeah. It’s too bad,” I murmured glumly.
I watched him run along the side of his house until he disappeared around
the back. Then I took a deep breath and took off again, jogging now, toward my
house on the next block.
My heart was still racing in my chest. But I was starting to feel calmer. The
man in the black cape didn’t chase after us. In a few seconds, I would be safe in
my own home.
Halfway up our driveway, I slowed to a stop. The pain in my side had faded
to a dull ache.
I stepped into the yellow light from the front porch. I could hear my dog
Sparky barking inside the house. Sparky knew I was home.
As I climbed onto the front stoop, a smile crossed my face.
A very wide smile.
I was pleased with myself. In fact, I was overjoyed. I felt like leaping in the
air. Or maybe doing a wild, crazy dance. Or crowing like a rooster. Or tilting
back my head and howling at the moon.
The evening had been a total success.
I didn’t tell Chuck. I didn’t want Chuck to know.
But when the caped man clicked on the basement light—in that split second
before he saw me and I saw him—I grabbed a mask from the carton. And I
shoved it under my sweatshirt.
I had a mask!
It hadn’t been easy. In fact, being trapped in that eerie basement with that
strange man had been the scariest time of my life.
But I had a mask! Safely tucked under my sweatshirt.
I could feel it against my chest as I ran. And I could feel it now, warm
against my skin as I reached for the front door.
I was so happy. So pleased with myself.
And then I felt the mask start to move.
And I screamed as something sharp bit into my chest.
11
I grabbed the front of my sweatshirt. I pressed both hands tight against the bulge
of the mask.
“Whoa,” I murmured, holding the mask in place under the sweatshirt.
Stop imagining things, Steve, I scolded myself.
Calm down. The mask started to slip down your chest. That’s all. It wasn’t
moving. It didn’t bite you.
Get in the house, I ordered myself. Hide the thing in a drawer in your room.
And pull yourself together.
Why was I so nervous?
The scary part was over. I had escaped with one of the great masks. Now it
was my turn to scare other people. Why was I standing there scaring myself?
Still holding the front of my sweatshirt, I pushed open the front door and
stepped into the house. “Down, boy! Get down, Sparky!” I cried as the little
black terrier greeted me. He leaped high off the floor, bouncing off me, barking
and whining as if he hadn’t seen me in twenty years.
“Get down, Sparky! Down!”
I wanted to sneak into the house, run up to my room, and stash the mask
away before my parents heard me return. But Sparky ruined that plan.
“Steve—is that you?” Mom stormed into the living room, a fretful frown on
her face. She glared at me and angrily blew a curl of blond hair from in front of
her eyes. “Where on earth were you? Your father and I went ahead and ate
dinner. Yours is ice-cold by now!”
“Sorry, Mom,” I said, still holding the front of my sweatshirt to keep the
mask in place as I tried to push Sparky away.
The lock of hair fell back over her forehead. She blew at it again. “Well?
Where were you?”
“I… well…”
Think fast, Steve.
You can’t tell her you sneaked out to steal a Halloween mask from the
basement of a store.
“I had to help Chuck with something,” I finally answered.
Sure, it was a lie. But it wasn’t a serious lie.
I’m usually a very honest guy. But right then, all I cared about was having
the mask! I had it, and I was desperate to get it out from under my sweatshirt and
hidden in a safe place in my room.
“Well, you should have told me where you were going,” Mom scolded.
“Your father went out to do the grocery shopping. But he’s very angry, too. You
should have been home for dinner.”
I lowered my head. “Sorry, Mom.”
Sparky gazed up at me. Was he staring at the bulge in my sweatshirt?
If the dog could see it, Mom could see it too.
“I’ll take off my coat and come right down,” I told her.
I didn’t give her a chance to reply. I spun around, leaped onto the stairs, and
ran up two at a time. I flew down the hall, burst into my room, and slammed the
door behind me.
I took a few seconds to catch my breath. I listened hard, making sure that
Mom hadn’t followed me upstairs.
No. I could hear her banging around in the kitchen, getting my dinner ready.
I couldn’t wait to check out the mask!
Which one did I take? When the light came on in the store basement, I
grabbed a mask without looking. I stuffed it under my sweatshirt before I could
see it.
Now I eagerly reached under the sweatshirt and pulled out my hard-won
prize.
“Wow!” I raised it in both hands and admired it.
The old-man mask. I took the mask of the creepy old man.
I smoothed out its long strings of yellow-white hair. Holding it by the big,
pointy ears, I lifted it in front of my face and examined it closely.
A single white tooth hung down over the bottom lip. A brown wormhole
poked through the center of the tooth.
Outside on the front stoop, the big tooth had scraped my chest, I realized.
That’s what made me think the mask was biting me.
The mouth was twisted in an evil sneer. The lips curled like two brown
worms.
The long nose had gobs of green dripping from each nostril. A square patch
of skin was missing just above the forehead. I could see gray skull bone in the
hole.
The whole face was creased and lined. The flesh was a sickly green. The
skin appeared to be peeling off the face. Dark scabs bulged from the sunken
cheeks.
Black spiders appeared to crawl through the stringy, yellow hair. Spiders
poked out of the two ears.
“Yuck!” I cried.
Was I holding the scariest Halloween mask in the world?
No. In the universe!
I began to feel a little queasy just holding it. I rubbed the scabby cheek with
one finger. The skin felt warm, like real skin.
“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced laughing like an old man. “Heh-heh-heh.” I
tried a dry cackle.
Look out, Hogs! I told myself. When I come leaping out at you on
Halloween night in this mask, you will jump out of your skins!
“Heh-heh-heh.”
I raked the ugly, long hair back over the head. My fingers bumped over the
spiders tangled in the hair. The spiders didn’t feel rubbery. They felt soft and
warm like the skin.
I gazed down happily at the disgusting, old face. It sneered back at me. The
brown worm lips quivered.
Should I try it on?
I carried it over to the mirror on my closet door. I was dying to see what I’d
look like.
I’ll slip it on for just a second, I decided. Long enough to see how ugly and
frightening I’d look.
Holding it in both hands, I raised the mask over my head.
Then slowly, carefully… very carefully… I began to pull the mask down,
down, down over my face.
12
“Steve—!”
Mom’s loud cry from downstairs startled me.
“Steve—where are you? Get down here for your dinner!”
“Coming!” I shouted back. I lowered the mask. I’d try it on later, I decided.
I walked quickly to the dresser and pulled open my sock drawer. Smoothing
the long, spidery hair over the ugly face, I set the mask down carefully in the
drawer. Then I hid it under several pairs of socks and closed the drawer.
I hurried down to the kitchen. Mom had a salad on the table and a plate of
warmed-up macaroni-and-cheese.
My stomach growled. I suddenly realized that I was starved! I sat down,
pushed the salad aside, and started forking up the macaroni as fast as I could.
I glanced down to see Sparky staring up at me with his big, black, soulful
eyes. He saw me looking at him and tilted his head.
“Sparky,” I said, “you don’t like macaroni—remember?”
He tilted his head the other way, as if trying to understand. I slipped him a
couple of noodles. He sniffed them and left them on the floor.
Behind me, Mom busily cleaned out the refrigerator, making room for the
groceries Dad was out buying. I was dying to tell her about the scary mask. I
wanted to show it to her. Maybe put it on and make her scream.
But I knew she’d ask too many questions about where I bought it, and how
much it cost, and how much of my allowance I used up to pay for it.
All questions I couldn’t answer.
So I bit my tongue and forced myself not to blurt out the exciting news that
I wouldn’t have to be a hobo again this Halloween.
That was my costume for the past five years. A hobo. Actually, it wasn’t
much of a costume. I wore one of Dad’s baggy old suits with patches on the
pants. Mom rubbed charcoal on my face to make me look dirty. And I carried a
knapsack on a fishing pole over my shoulder.
Bor-ring!
This Halloween will be different, I promised myself. This Halloween will
not be boring.
I was so happy. As I sat gobbling down macaroni-and-cheese, I couldn’t get
that creepy mask out of my mind.
I’m not going to tell anyone about it, I decided. I’m going to scare everyone
I know.
I’m not even going to tell Chuck. After all, he ran away and left me down in
that dark basement.
Look out, Chuckie Boy! I told myself, grinning so hard some noodles
slipped out of my mouth. I’m going to get you too!
13
I had soccer practice for my first graders after school the next day. It was a
sunny, cold October afternoon. The sunlight made the yellow and brown falling
leaves glitter like gold. Puffs of white cloud floated like soft cotton across the
blue sky.
Everything looked beautiful to me. Because Halloween was only one day
away.
I was staring up at the clouds when Marnie Rosen drop-kicked the soccer
ball into my stomach.
I grabbed my stomach and doubled over in pain. Duck Benton and two
other kids jumped on my back and drove me facedown into the mud.
I didn’t care.
In fact, I laughed.
Because I knew that I had only one day to wait.
I tried to show them how to pass. As I ran along the sidelines, Andrew
Foster stuck out his foot. I tripped and went sailing into the bike rack. A
handlebar caught me under the chin as I fell, and I actually saw stars.
But I didn’t care.
I picked myself up with a grin on my face.
Because I knew a secret. I knew an evil secret that the kids didn’t know. I
knew that trick-or-treat night was going to be a special treat for me!
At four o’clock, I called an end to practice. I was too weak to blow the
whistle. My clothes were soaked with mud, I walked with a limp, and I had cuts
and bruises in twenty different places.
A typical practice with the Horrible Hogs.
But did I care?
You know the answer.
I gathered them in a circle around me. They were shoving each other, and
pulling hair, and calling each other horrible names. I told you—they’re total
animals.
I raised my hands to quiet them down. “Let’s have a special Hogs’
Halloween party tomorrow,” I suggested.
“YAAAY!” they cheered.
“We’ll meet in our costumes after practice,” I continued. “The whole team.
And we’ll all go trick-or-treating together. I’ll take you.”
“YAAY!” they cheered again.
“So tell your parents to drop you off,” I told them. “This is going to be our
special party. We’ll meet in front of the old Carpenter mansion.”
Silence. This time they didn’t cheer.
“Why do we have to meet there?” Andrew asked.
“Isn’t that old house supposed to be haunted?” Marnie asked softly.
“That place is too creepy,” Duck added.
I narrowed my eyes at them, challenging them. “You guys aren’t scared—
are you?” I demanded.
Silence. They exchanged nervous glances.
“Well? Are you all too wimpy to meet me there?” I asked.
“No way!” Marnie insisted.
“No way! We’re not scared of a stupid old house!”
They all began to tell me how brave they were. They all said they would
meet me there.
“I saw a ghost once,” Johnny Myers bragged. “Behind my garage. I shouted
‘Boo!’ and it floated away.”
These kids are animals, but they have great imaginations.
The other kids all started teasing Johnny. He stuck to his story. He insisted
he saw a ghost. So they pushed him to the ground and got his jacket all muddy.
“Hey, Steve—what are you going to be for Halloween?” Marnie asked.
“Yeah. What’s your costume?” Andrew demanded.
“He’s going to be a pile of toxic waste!” someone joked.
“No. He’s going to be a ballerina!” someone else declared.
They all hooted and jeered.
Go ahead and laugh, guys, I thought. Have a good laugh now. Because
when you see me on Halloween, I’ll be the only one laughing.
“Uh… I’m going to be a hobo,” I told them. “You’ll recognize me. I’ll be
wearing a tattered old suit. And my face will be all dirty. I’ll be dressed like a
bum.”
“You are a bum!” one of my loyal team members shouted.
More wild laughing and hooting. More shoving and hair-pulling and
wrestling on the ground.
Luckily, their parents and baby-sitters showed up to take them home. I
watched them go with a big smile on my face. A big, evil smile.
Then I grabbed up my backpack and hurried home. I ran all the way. I was
eager to take another look at my mask.
Chuck stepped out as I jogged past his house. “Hey, Steve… what’s up?” he
called.
“Not much!” I called back. “Later, man!”
I kept running. I didn’t want to hang out with Chuck. I needed to check out
that mask. I needed to remind myself of how awesome it was. How totally
terrifying.
I burst through the front door. Then I ran straight up the stairs to my room,
taking the stairs three at a time.
I raced down the long hall. I turned into my room and tossed my backpack
onto the bed. Then I hurried across the room to my dresser and eagerly jerked
open my sock drawer.
“Huh?”
I peered inside. With a trembling hand, I shoved away several balled-up
pairs of socks.
The mask was gone.
14
“No!”
I began pawing frantically through the drawer, tossing all the socks onto the
floor.
No mask. Gone.
The balled-up socks bounced all over the room. My heart was bouncing too.
Then I remembered that I had moved the mask. Before school that morning.
I was worried that my mom might do laundry. And open my sock drawer. And
see it there.
So I had shoved it to the back of my closet, behind my rolled-up sleeping
bag.
Letting out a long whoosh of air, I dropped to my hands and knees. I
quickly collected all the socks and stuffed them back into the drawer. Then I
opened the closet door and pulled down the mask from the top shelf.
Steve, you’ve got to calm down, man, I told myself. It’s just a Halloween
mask, after all. You’ve got to stop scaring yourself like that.
Sometimes it helps to scold yourself, to give yourself advice.
I started to feel a little calmer. I smoothed back the stringy yellow hair and
rubbed my hand over the craggy, scab-covered skin of the mask.
The brown lips sneered at me. I poked my little finger through the
disgusting wormhole in the tooth. I squeezed the spiders hiding inside the ears.
“This is so cool!” I declared out loud.
I couldn’t wait a whole day till Halloween. I had to show it to someone.
No. I had to scare someone with it.
Chuck’s face popped instantly into my mind. My old friend Chuck was the
perfect victim. I knew that he was home. I had seen him there a few minutes ago.
Wow. Will he be shocked! I told myself. Chuck thought that I ran out of that
store basement empty-handed. When I sneak into his house and creep up on him
wearing this disgusting mask, he’ll faint!
I glanced at the clock. I had an hour before dinnertime. Mom and Dad
weren’t even home yet.
Yes, I’ll do it! I decided.
“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced my old-man cackle. “Heh-heh-heh.” The
scariest, most evil cackle I could do.
Then I grasped the wrinkled neck of the mask in both hands. Stepping in
front of the mirror, I raised the mask over my head.
And tugged it down.
It slid easily over my hair. It felt soft and warm as I pulled it over my face.
Down over my ears. Over my cheeks.
Down, down.
Until I felt the top of the mask settle onto my hair. I twisted it until I could
see out of the narrow eyeholes.
Then I lowered my hands to my sides and stepped closer to the mirror to
check myself out.
So warm.
I suddenly felt too warm.
The rubbery mask pressed tightly against my cheeks and forehead.
Warmer.
“Hey—!” I cried out as my face began to burn.
So hot…
So hard to breathe.
“Hey… what is happening to me?”
15
I could feel the skin of the mask tightening around my face.
My cheeks burned. A sour odor swept over me, choked me.
I gagged. I sucked in a deep breath through my mouth. But the mask was so
tight, I could hardly breathe.
I grabbed the ears with both hands. The outside of the mask felt normal. But
inside, I was burning up!
I tried to tug the mask off. But it wouldn’t slide up. The hot rubber stuck to
my face.
I groaned as the putrid odor washed over me again.
I tugged harder. The mask didn’t budge.
I gasped for breath.
I grabbed the stringy hair—and pulled. I slid my hands under the chin—and
pushed.
“Ohhh.” A sick groan escaped my throat. My hands dropped limply to my
sides.
I suddenly felt so tired. So weak.
So totally weak.
Every breath was a struggle. I bent over. My body began to tremble.
I felt so weak. And old.
Old.
Was this how an old man felt?
Calm down, Steve, I scolded myself. It’s just a rubber mask. It fits a little
too snug, that’s all.
It’s stuck to your face. But you’ll pull it off, and you’ll be fine.
Calm down. Count to ten. Then examine the mask in the mirror. Grab it
from the bottom, and you’ll be able to pull it up. No problem.
I counted to ten. Then I stepped up close to the mirror.
I nearly cried out when I saw my reflection. The mask really was awesome!
So real. So gross.
With my eyes staring out of it, the face seemed to come alive. The brown
lips sneered back at me. When I moved my lips, they appeared to move too. The
green gobs of goo trembled inside the big nostrils. The spiders appeared to be
crawling through the tangled, yellow hair.
It’s only a mask. A really cool mask, I said to myself.
I started to feel a little calmer.
But then a cackle escaped my throat. “Heh-heh-heh.”
Not my cackle!
Not in my voice! An old man’s cackle.
How did that happen? How did I utter such a strange sound?
I clamped my lips shut. I didn’t want to make that sound again.
“Heh-heh-heh.”
Another frightening cackle! In a shrill, high-pitched voice. More like a dry
croak than a laugh.
I tightened my jaw. Clenched my teeth. Held my breath so I wouldn’t
cackle again.
“Heh-heh-heh.”
I wasn’t doing it!
Who was cackling like that?
Where was the shrill, dry laugh coming from?
I gaped at the old face in the mirror, suddenly frozen in fear.
And then I felt a strong hand grab my leg.
16
With a choked gasp, I whirled around.
And peered down through the tight eyeholes of the mask.
I instantly saw that it wasn’t a hand on my leg. It was teeth.
Dog teeth.
“Sparky—it’s you!” I cried. But my voice came out in a dry whisper.
Sparky backed away.
I cleared my throat and tried again. “Don’t be afraid, Sparky. It’s only me.”
My voice! It sounded more like a dry cough.
It sounded like my grandpa!
I had an old man’s face—and an old man’s voice.
And I felt so tired. So totally weak and tired.
As I reached to pet Sparky, my arms drooped as if they weighed a thousand
pounds. Both of my knees cracked as I bent down.
The dog gazed up at me and tilted his head. His short stub of a tail wagged
furiously.
“Don’t be scared, Sparky,” I croaked. “I was just trying out this mask.
Pretty scary, huh?”
I lowered my face and tried to pick Sparky up.
But as I leaned forward, I could see the dog’s eyes go wide with terror.
Sparky let out a shrill yip—jumped out of my hands, and went tearing across the
room, barking at the top of his lungs. Barking in total fright.
“Sparky—it’s me!” I cried. “I know I sound different. But it’s me—Steve!”
I wanted to chase after him. But my legs felt so weak, and my knees refused
to bend.
It took me three tries to pull myself up to a standing position. My head
ached. I was too out-of-breath to run after Sparky.
Too late, anyway. I could hear him barking his head off, already downstairs.
“Weird,” I muttered, rubbing my aching back. I hobbled back to the mirror.
Sparky has seen masks before. He knew it was me. Why was he so scared? Was
it my weird voice?
How had the mask dried up my voice? And why did I suddenly feel one
hundred and ten?
At least, my face no longer felt on fire. But the skin of the mask still
pressed so tightly against my face, I could barely move my lips.
I have to get out of this thing, I decided. Chuck will have to wait until
Halloween night to be scared out of his skull.
I raised both hands to my neck and searched for the bottom of the mask. My
neck felt craggy and wrinkled. The skin was dry.
Where was the bottom of the mask?
I leaned close to the mirror on my closet door and narrowed my eyes at my
reflection. I stared hard at the neck of the mask.
Wrinkled skin flecked with ugly brown patches.
But where was the bottom? Where did the mask end and my neck begin?
My hands began to tremble as they fumbled up and down my throat. I could
feel my heart begin to race.
I moved my hands slowly, carefully, up and down my neck.
Again. And again.
Finally, I let my hands drop to my side and uttered a weary, frightened sigh.
There was no mask bottom. No line at all between the mask and my neck.
The wrinkled, spotted mask skin had become my skin.
“Nooooo! Nooooo!” I wailed in my old man’s voice. I had to get the thing
off me! There had to be a way!
I squeezed the cheeks of the mask and tugged with all my might.
“Ow!” Sharp pain ran down my face.
I pulled the hair. That sent a wave of pain shooting down my scalp.
Frantically, I grabbed at the mask, slapped at it, pulled it, tore at it.
I felt each move. Each slap and tug made my skin hurt. Every touch hurt me
as if it were my own skin.
“The eyeholes!” I croaked.
I reached for the eyeholes. Maybe I could slip my fingers inside the
eyeholes and lift the mask off.
My hands fumbled around my eyes. My trembling fingers searched, poking
and rubbing.
No eyeholes. There were no eyeholes.
The rutted, scab-covered skin had melted onto me. It had become my skin.
The ugly, disgusting mask had become my face!
I looked like a horrifying, spider-infested, decaying old man. And I felt as
old and weird as I looked!
My throat tightened in terror. I sank against the mirror, pressing my ugly,
craggy forehead against the glass.
I shut my eyes. What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated like
an unhappy chant in my mind.
And then I heard the front door slam. And I heard Mom’s voice at the
bottom of the stairway. “Steve—are you home? Steve?”
What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated and repeated.
“Steve?” Mom called. “Come down here. I want to show you something.”
No! I thought, swallowing hard, my dry throat making a sick clicking
sound. No! I can’t come down! I can’t! I don’t want you to see me like this!
“Oh, never mind!” Mom called. “I’m coming up there!”
17
I heard her footsteps on the stairs.
A shock of panic made me lurch toward the door. I nearly fell over. My old
legs were stiff, too stiff to move quickly.
I hobbled to the door and closed it just as Mom reached the second floor.
Then I leaned against the door, my hand on my throbbing chest, trying to catch
my breath.
Trying to think. Trying to decide what to say.
I couldn’t let her see me like this. I couldn’t let her see the mask. She’d start
asking questions. And I couldn’t let her see how the mask had changed me.
A few seconds later, she knocked gently on the door. “Steve, are you in
there? What are you doing?”
“Uh… nothing, Mom.”
“Well, may I come in? I brought you something.”
“Not right now,” I croaked.
Please don’t open the door! I begged silently. Please don’t come into my
room!
“Steve, why do you sound so strange?” Mom demanded. “What’s wrong
with your voice?”
“Uh…” Think fast, Steve. Think fast.
“Uh… sore throat, Mom. A really bad sore throat.”
“Let me take a look at you. Are you sick?” Glancing down, I saw the
doorknob turn.
“No!” I screamed, pressing my back against the door.
“You’re not sick?”
“I mean, yes,” I croaked in my shaky, old-man voice. “I’m not feeling well,
Mom. I’m going to lie down for a while. I’ll come down later, okay?”
I stared at the doorknob, listening to her breathing on the other side of the
door. “Steve, I bought you those black-and-white cookies that you love. Your
favorites. Do you want one? Maybe it’ll make you feel better.”
My stomach growled. Those cookies are my favorites. Dripping with
chocolate icing on one side and vanilla icing on the other. “Maybe later,” I
moaned.
“But I drove two miles out of my way to buy them for you,” Mom said.
“Later. I’m really not feeling well.” I was telling the truth. My temples
throbbed. My whole body ached. I felt so weak, I could barely stand up.
“I’ll call you for dinner,” Mom said. I listened to her make her way back
down the stairs. Then I hobbled over to the bed and slumped my old man’s body
down onto the edge.
“Now what?” I asked myself. I pressed my hands against my scabby
cheeks. “How do I get out of this thing?”
I shut my tired, burning eyes and tried to think. After a few minutes, Carly
Beth’s face floated into my mind.
“Yes!” I croaked. “Carly Beth is the one person in the world who can help
me.”
Carly Beth wore a mask from the same store last Halloween. Maybe the
same thing happened to her. Maybe her mask stuck to her face and changed her.
She got her mask off. She will know how I can get my mask off too.
The phone stood across the room beside the computer on my desk.
Normally, I’d be over there in three seconds. But it took me three minutes of
grunting and straining to get my old body to stand up. Then it took another five
minutes to drag myself across the room.
By the time I dropped into my desk chair, I was exhausted. It took all of my
strength to raise my hand and punch in Carly Beth’s number on the phone.
I can’t go on like this, I told myself. She’s got to help me. She’s got to know
how to get this mask off.
After the third ring, Carly Beth’s father answered. “Hello?”
“Hi… uh… could I speak to Carly Beth?” I choked out.
A silence. Then: “Who is this?” Mr. Caldwell sounded confused.
“It’s me,” I answered. “Is Carly Beth there?”
“Is this one of her teachers?” he demanded.
“No. It’s Steve. I—”
“I’m sorry, sir. I can’t hear you very well. Can you speak up? Why did you
wish to speak to my daughter? Perhaps I can help you?”
“No… I—”
I heard Mr. Caldwell speak softly to someone else at his house. “It’s an old
man, asking for Carly Beth. I can barely hear him. He won’t say who he is.”
He came back on the phone. “Are you one of her teachers, sir? Where do
you know my daughter from?”
“She’s my friend,” I croaked.
I heard him turn again to someone else in the room, probably Carly Beth’s
mom. He muffled the phone with his hand, but I heard what he said: “I think it’s
a nut. Some kind of crank call.”
He returned to me. “Sorry, sir. My daughter can’t come to the phone.” He
hung up.
I sat there listening to the buzz in my spider-filled ear.
Now what? I asked myself.
Now what?
18
I must have fallen asleep in the desk chair. I don’t know how long I slept.
I was awakened by Dad pounding on my bedroom door. “Steve—
dinnertime!” he called in.
I sat up with a start. My back ached from sleeping sitting up. I rubbed my
wrinkled neck, trying to rub away the stiffness.
“Steve—are you coming down to dinner?” Dad asked.
“I—I’m not very hungry,” I croaked. “I’m going to take a nap, Dad. I think
I’m getting sick.”
“Hey, don’t get sick the night before Halloween,” he replied. “You don’t
want to miss out on trick-or-treating.”
“I—I’ll be okay,” I stammered in my hoarse voice. “If I get a good night’s
sleep, I’ll be fine.”
Yeah. Right.
I’ll be one hundred and fifty. But I’ll be fine.
I let out an unhappy sigh.
“We’ll bring you up some soup or something later,” Dad called in. Then he
disappeared downstairs.
I stared at the phone. Should I try Carly Beth again?
No, I decided. She won’t believe it’s me. She’ll hang up the way her father
did.
I scratched my ears. I could feel the spiders crackling around in them. I
touched the bare spot on top of my head where the skin was ripped apart. The
skin was soft and wet. I could feel the patch of hard skull that showed through.
“Ohhhh.” Another long sigh.
I’ve got to think, I told myself. I’ve got to think of a way out of this.
But I felt so weary, so sleepy.
I pulled myself up and slumped to the bed. A few seconds later, I fell sound
asleep.
I awoke to bright sunlight streaming through my bedroom window.
I blinked several times, startled by the bright morning light. Morning.
Halloween morning.
It should have been a happy day. An exciting day. But instead…
I reached up with both hands and touched the sides of my face.
Smooth!
My cheeks felt smooth. Soft and smooth.
I rubbed my ears. Small ears. My ears. No spiders!
I raised both hands to my hair. And touched my hair. Not the stringy, old
man’s hair.
Hesitantly, carefully, I touched the torn spot on top of my head where the
skull showed through.
Not there!
“I’m me again!” I cried out loud. I let out a long whoop of joy.
No old man’s mask. No old man’s voice. No old man’s body.
It had all been a dream. A horrible nightmare.
Still blinking in the light, I gazed happily around my room.
“I dreamed it all!” I cried.
Going down to that dark store basement. Pawing through the carton of
masks. The man in the cape. The mask of the old man. Sneaking it home and
trying it on.
The mask sticking to my skin. Refusing to come off.
All a dream!
All a horrifying nightmare that was over now.
I was so happy! This had to be the happiest moment of my life.
I started to jump out of bed. I wanted to leap around my room, to dance for
joy.
But then my eyes blinked open. And I woke up for real…
19
…I woke up for real.
And knew that I had only dreamed that it was all a dream!
I grabbed my face—and felt the craggy wrinkles, the heavy scabs. I rubbed
my nose and brushed the green gobs stuck in my nostrils.
I had dreamed that the mask didn’t exist.
I had dreamed that I had my own face back. My own voice and body.
All a dream. A wonderful dream.
But now I was really awake—and really in trouble.
I pulled myself up and brushed the stringy, yellow hair out of my eyes. “I
have to tell Mom and Dad,” I decided. “I can’t spend another day like this.”
I had slept in my clothes. I staggered to my feet and dragged my old body
to the door. I tugged open the door—and saw a note taped on the other side.
Dear Steve,
Hope you’re feeling better. Mom and I had to go visit your Aunt Helen this
morning. We left early to beat the traffic. We’ll be home in time to help you with
your hobo costume. Love, Dad
My hobo costume?
Not this year. Besides, since I was now at least one hundred and fifty, I was
a little old to go trick-or-treating!
Crinkling the note in my hand, I made the long trip down to the kitchen,
holding on to the banister, taking one step at a time. I had a sudden craving for a
steaming bowl of oatmeal and a cup of hot milk.
“Oh, no!” I croaked. I was starting to think like an old man!
I made myself a breakfast of orange juice and corn flakes. I carried it to the
table and sat down to eat. The juice glass felt strange against my fat, brown lips.
And it was almost impossible to chew the cornflakes with just one long, crooked
tooth.
“What am I going to do?” I moaned out loud.
Then, suddenly, I had an answer.
I decided to go ahead with my plan to terrify the first graders. Why
shouldn’t I pay back those bratty kids for all the trouble they gave me day after
day on the soccer field?
Yes! I decided. When Mom and Dad get home, I’ll greet them and show off
my old-man costume. They won’t know it isn’t a costume. They’ll think it’s
really cool.
Then, later, I’ll go to the spooky old Carpenter mansion to meet the kids.
And I’ll scare the first graders out of their masks!
And then what?
Then I’ll find Carly Beth. It won’t be hard to find her. She’s having a
Halloween party at her house after trick-or-treating.
I’ll find Carly Beth and get her to tell me the secret. I’ll get her to show me
how to remove this horrible mask.
Then I will be a very happy guy.
Sitting there alone in the kitchen, struggling to choke down my cornflakes,
it seemed like a really good plan.
Too bad it didn’t work out the way I hoped.
20
When Mom and Dad returned home that evening, I hobbled downstairs to greet
them. They both gasped when they saw my ugly, scabby face.
Mom dropped the bag she was carrying. Her mouth fell open to her knees.
Dad’s eyes bulged. He stared at me for a long time. Then he burst out
laughing. “Steve—that is the best costume!” he exclaimed. “Where did you get
that?”
“It’s disgusting,” Mom said. “Ohh. I can’t stand that open patch on top of
the head. And that horrible hole in your tooth.”
Dad walked in a circle around me, admiring my new look.
I had put on the patched, black suit that I wore as my hobo costume. And I
had found one of my grandpa’s old canes in the closet, which I leaned on now.
“It’s great!” Dad declared, squeezing my shoulder.
“I bought the mask at a party store,” I croaked. It was almost the truth.
Mom and Dad exchanged glances. “The old man’s voice is very good,”
Mom said. “Have you been practicing?”
“Yes. All day,” I replied.
“Do you feel better?” Dad asked. “We didn’t want to disturb you this
morning since you weren’t feeling good. Your mom and I had to leave so
early…”
“I’m feeling much better,” I lied. Actually, my legs were trembling and my
whole body was drenched in a cold sweat.
Feeling weak, I leaned harder on the cane.
“Yuck! What’s that in your hair?” Mom cried.
“Spiders,” I told her. I shuddered. I could feel them crawling over my head
and in my ears.
“They’re so real-looking,” Mom declared, raising a hand to her cheek. She
shook her head. “Are you sure you don’t want to be a hobo? That mask must be
so hot and uncomfortable.”
If she only knew how uncomfortable it was!
“Leave him be,” Dad scolded her. “He looks great. He’s going to terrify
everyone on the street tonight.”
I hope so, I thought. I glanced at my watch. Time to get going.
“Well, he’s terrifying me!” Mom exclaimed. She shut her eyes. “I can’t
stand to look at you, Steve. Why did you buy something so… so ugly?”
“I think it’s funny,” Dad told her. He poked a finger at my long tooth.
“Great mask. Is it rubber?”
“Yeah. I guess,” I muttered in my quivering, old voice.
Mom made a disgusted face. “Are you trick-or-treating with Chuck?”
I yawned. I suddenly felt sleepy. “I promised my soccer players I’d meet
them,” I croaked. “Then I’m going over to Carly Beth’s house.”
“Well, don’t stay out too late,” Mom said. “And if that heavy mask gets too
hot, take it off for a while—okay?”
I wish! I thought bitterly.
“See you later,” I said. Leaning on the cane, I began dragging myself to the
front door.
Mom and Dad laughed at my funny walk.
I wasn’t laughing. I wanted to cry.
Only one thing kept me from breaking down and telling them the truth.
Only one thing kept me from telling Mom and Dad that I was trapped inside this
horrible mask, that it had turned me into a weak, ancient creature.
Revenge.
I could see the terrified expressions on the faces of my soccer team. And I
could hear their howls of horror as they went running for their lives.
That cheered me up and kept me going.
I grabbed the doorknob and struggled to pull open the front door.
“Steve—wait!” Dad cried. “My camera. Wait. I want to take a picture.” He
disappeared in search of the camera.
“Your trick-or-treat bag!” Mom cried. “You forgot your trick-or-treat bag.”
She rummaged around in the front closet until she found the shopping bag with
little pumpkins all over both sides.
I knew I couldn’t manage the cane and the shopping bag. But I took it from
her anyway. I’ll throw the bag away when I get outside, I decided. I didn’t plan
to trick-or-treat. I knew it would take me half an hour just to walk up someone’s
driveway!
Dad burst back into the living room. “Say cheese!” he cried, raising his
little camera.
I tried to twist my wormy lips into a smile.
Dad flashed the camera once. Then three more times.
Blinded by flashbulb lights, I said good-bye and made my way out the door.
The white circles followed me into the night. I nearly fell off the front stoop.
I grabbed the railing and waited for my heart to stop pounding. Slowly the
flashes of light faded from my eyes, and I began to pull myself down the
driveway.
It was a clear, cold night. No wind at all. The nearly bare trees stood as still
as statues.
I limped onto the sidewalk and started in the direction of the Carpenter
mansion. There was no moon. But the street appeared brighter than usual. Most
houses had all of their front lights on to welcome trick-or-treaters.
I stuffed the shopping bag into a trash can at the foot of our neighbors’
driveway. Then I continued down the block, my cane tap-tapping on the
sidewalk.
My back began to ache. My old legs trembled. I leaned over the cane,
breathing hard.
After half a block, I had to take a rest against a lamppost. Luckily, the
Carpenter mansion was on the next block.
As I started on my way, two little girls came hurrying down the sidewalk,
followed by their father. One girl wore colorful butterfly wings. The other wore
lots of makeup, a gold crown, and a long fancy dress.
“Ooh, he’s ugly,” the butterfly whispered to her friend as they came near.
“Yuck!” I heard the princess reply. “Look at the green stuff in his nose.”
I leaned close to them, opened my lips in a snarl, and rasped, “Get out of
my way!”
The little girls both let out frightened squeals and took off down the
sidewalk. Their father flashed me an angry stare and hurried after them.
“Heh-heh-heh.” An evil cackle escaped my lips.
Seeing their frightened faces gave me new energy. Leaning on my cane, I
tap-tapped my way across the street.
A few minutes later, the Carpenter mansion came into view. The huge old
house stood dark and empty. Its stone turrets rose up to the purple night sky like
castle towers.
Huddled under a streetlamp at the bottom of the weed-choked front yard
stood my soccer team. My Hogs. My first graders.
My victims.
They were all in costumes. I saw Power Rangers and Ninja Turtles.
Mummies and monsters. Two ghosts, a Beauty, and a Beast.
But I recognized them anyway. I recognized them because they were
shoving each other, grabbing at trick-or-treat bags, shouting and fighting.
I leaned against my cane, watching them from halfway down the block. My
heart started to pound. My whole body trembled.
This was it. My big moment.
“Okay, guys,” I murmured softly to myself. “It’s show time!”
21
I was trembling with excitement as I dragged myself up to them. I stepped into
the light, my wormy lips twisted in a frightening sneer.
I stared from one to another, giving them a chance to see my terrifying face.
Giving them a chance to see the spiders crawling through my hair. The
wormhole in my tooth. The patch of skull poking up through my rutted scalp.
They grew quiet. I could feel their eyes on me. I could sense their instant
fear.
I opened my mouth to let out a frightening growl that would send them
running for their mommies.
But Marnie Rosen, wearing a white bride’s dress and veil, stepped up to me
before I could get it out. “Can we help you, sir?” she asked.
“Are you lost?” one of the Power Rangers asked.
“Do you need directions?”
“Can we help you get somewhere?”
No. No!
This wasn’t going right. This wasn’t going the way I’d planned—the way
I’d dreamed!
Marnie took my arm. “Which way were you headed, sir? We’ll walk with
you. It’s kind of a scary night to be walking around a strange neighborhood.”
The others pushed in closer, trying to be helpful.
Trying to be helpful to an old man. An old man they weren’t the least bit
scared of.
“Nooooo!” I howled in protest. “I’m the ghost of the Carpenter mansion!
I’ve come to pay you back for trespassing on my front yard!”
I tried to shriek—but my voice came out in a weak whisper. I don’t think
they heard a word I uttered.
I’ve got to scare them, I told myself. I’ve got to!
I raised both hands together in the air as if I planned to strangle them all.
My cane flew out of my grasp. I lost my balance and tottered over
backward.
“Ohhhh!” I let out a groan as I hit the sidewalk sitting up.
They all cried out. But not in fear. They cried out because they were
worried about me.
Helping hands reached down to pull me to my feet.
“Are you okay? Here’s your cane.” I recognized Duck Benton’s scratchy
voice.
I heard murmurs of sympathy. “Poor old guy,” someone whispered.
“Are you hurt?”
“Can we get you some help?”
No. No. No. No. No.
They weren’t terrified. The weren’t the tiniest bit afraid.
I sank onto the cane. I suddenly felt so weary. So totally exhausted I could
barely keep my head up.
Forget about scaring them, Steve, I told myself. You’ve got to get to Carly
Beth’s house before you collapse. You’ve got to find out from Carly Beth how to
get the mask off. How to get your old face—and strength—back.
Marnie was still holding on to my trembling arm. “Where are you trying to
go?” she asked, her freckled face filled with concern.
“Uh… do you know where Carly Beth Caldwell’s house is?” I asked in a
weak croak.
“It’s on the next block. Across the street. I know her brother,” I heard
Andrew Foster say.
“We’ll take you there,” Marnie offered.
She gripped my arm tighter. A mummy stepped up and took my other arm.
They began to walk me slowly, gently down the sidewalk.
I don’t believe this! I thought bitterly. They’re supposed to be scared out of
their costumes! They should be shrieking and crying by now.
But instead, they’re helping me walk.
I sighed. The sad thing was, I felt so tired and weak, I couldn’t have made it
to Carly Beth’s without their help.
They led me halfway up her driveway. Then I thanked them and told them I
could make it the rest of the way.
I watched them scurry away to go trick-or-treating. “I guess Steve isn’t
going to show up,” Duck said.
“He was probably too big a wimp to go out on Halloween night!” Marnie
joked.
They all laughed.
Leaning heavily on the cane, I turned toward Carly Beth’s house. The lights
were all on. But I couldn’t see anyone in the windows.
She probably isn’t back from trick-or-treating yet, I decided.
I heard chattering voices. Footsteps on the gravel drive.
I wheeled around to see Carly Beth and her friend Sabrina Mason hurrying
across the lawn, heading toward the house.
I recognized Carly Beth’s duck costume. She wore it every year. Except for
last Halloween, when she wore that terrifying mask.
Sabrina was some kind of superhero. She wore silvery tights and a long
silvery cape. She had a silvery mask pulled over her face, but I recognized her
long, black hair.
“Carly Beth—!” I tried to shout. But her name came out in a choked
whisper.
She and Sabrina kept chattering excitedly as they hurried across the lawn.
“Carly Beth—! Please!” I cried.
Halfway to the house, they both turned. They saw me.
Yes!
“Carly Beth—” I cried.
She pulled off her duck mask and took a few steps toward the driveway.
She squinted hard at me. “Who are you?”
“It’s me!” I cried weakly. “I—”
“Are you the man who tried to call me earlier?” she demanded coldly.
“Well… yes,” I croaked. “You see, I need—”
“Well, leave me alone!” Carly Beth screamed. “Why are you following me?
Leave me alone, or I’ll get my father!”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered helplessly.
The two girls spun away and began jogging to the house.
Leaving me standing there in the driveway.
Leaving me all alone.
Leaving me doomed.
22
I let out a bitter wail. “Carly Beth—it’s me! It’s me! Steve!” I cried. “Steve
Boswell!”
Did she hear me?
Yes.
She and Sabrina had stepped onto the stone walk that led to the front porch.
In the square of yellow light from the porch, I saw them both turn around.
“It’s Steve! It’s Steve!” I repeated, my throat aching from my desperate
cries.
Slowly, cautiously, both girls made their way back to me.
“Steve?” Carly Beth stared hard at me, her mouth falling open.
“Is that a mask?” Sabrina demanded, keeping close to Carly Beth.
“Yes, it’s a mask,” I croaked.
“Yuck. It’s disgusting!” Sabrina declared. She pulled off her silver mask to
see better. “Are those spiders? Yuck!”
“I need help,” I confessed. “This mask—”
“You went to the party store!” Carly Beth cried. The duck mask fell to the
ground. She raised both hands to the sides of her face. “Oh, no! No! Steve, I
warned you!”
“Yes. That’s where I got it,” I said, pointing to my hideous face. “I didn’t
listen to you. I didn’t know.”
“Steve, I told you not to go there,” Carly Beth said, her expression still tight
with horror. Hands still pressed against her cheeks.
“Now the mask won’t come off,” I wailed. “It’s stuck to me. It’s part of me.
And it’s—it’s turning me into an old, old man. A feeble old man.”
Carly Beth shook her head sadly. She stared at my ugly face, but didn’t say
a word.
“You’ve got to help me,” I pleaded. “You’ve got to help me get this mask
off.”
Carly Beth let out a frightened sigh. “Steve—I don’t think I can.”
23
I grabbed her duck feathers and held on. “You’ve got to help me, Carly Beth,” I
begged. “Why won’t you help me?”
“I want to help you,” she explained. “But I’m not sure I can.”
“But you had a mask from the same store last Halloween,” I protested.
“You pulled the mask off. You escaped from it—right?”
“It can’t be pulled off,” Carly Beth said. “There’s no way to pull it off.”
Over her shoulder, I saw three kids in costumes at the next house. A woman
appeared in the doorway. I saw her dropping candy bars into the three trick-ortreat bags.
Some kids are having fun tonight, I thought bitterly.
I am not having fun tonight.
I may never have fun again.
“Come into the house,” Carly Beth suggested. “It’s cold out here. I’ll try to
explain.”
I tried to follow them up the driveway. But my legs wobbled like rubber.
Carly Beth and Sabrina practically had to carry me into her house. They dropped
me down on the green leather couch in the living room.
On a table across the room, a carved jack-o’-lantern grinned at me. The
pumpkin had more teeth than I did!
Carly Beth dropped down on the couch arm. Sabrina sat on the edge of the
armchair beside it. She leaned over and sifted through her trick-or-treat bag.
How could she think of candy at a time like this?
I turned to Carly Beth. “How do I get the mask off?” I croaked.
Carly Beth chewed her bottom lip. She raised her eyes to me, her
expression grim. “It isn’t a mask,” she said softly.
“Excuse me?” I cried.
“It isn’t a mask,” she explained. “It’s a real face. A living face. Did you
meet the man in the black cape?”
I nodded.
“He’s some kind of weird scientist, I think. He made the faces. In his lab.”
“He—he made them?” I stammered.
Carly Beth nodded solemnly. “They are real, living faces. The man in the
cape tried to make them good-looking. But something went wrong. They all
came out ugly. As ugly as the one you’re wearing.”
“But, Carly Beth—” I started.
She raised a hand to hush me. “The caped man calls the faces The Unloved.
No one wants them because they turned out so ugly. They are The Unloved.
They’re alive. And they attach themselves to anyone who comes near enough.”
“But how do I get it off?” I cried impatiently. I raised my hands and tugged
at my rutted, scabby cheeks. “I can’t spend the rest of my life like this. What can
I do?”
Carly Beth jumped up and began pacing back and forth in front of Sabrina
and me. Sabrina unwrapped a Milky Way bar and began chewing it, watching
Carly Beth pace.
“The same thing happened to me last Halloween,” Carly Beth said. “I had
chosen a really ugly mask. It was so scary. It attached itself to my head. And
then it turned me evil.”
“And what did you do?” I cried, leaning forward on my cane.
“I went back to the party store. I found the man in the cape. He told me
there was only one way to get rid of the mask. It could only be done with a
symbol of love.”
“Huh?” I gaped at her. I didn’t understand.
“I had to find a symbol of love,” Carly Beth continued. “At first, I didn’t
know what the man meant. I didn’t know what to do. But then I remembered
something my mom had made for me.”
“What?” I demanded eagerly. “What was it?”
“It was that head,” Sabrina chimed in, her mouth bulging with chocolate.
“My mom had sculpted a head of me,” Carly Beth said. “It looked just like
me. You’ve seen it. Mom sculpted it because she loves me. It was a symbol of
love.”
Carly Beth dropped back down beside me. “I placed Mom’s sculpted head
over The Unloved face. And The Unloved disappeared. The ugly face slipped
right off.”
“Great!” I cried happily. “Go get it. Hurry!”
“Huh?” Carly Beth stared at me, confused.
“Go get the sculpted head,” I begged. “I’ve got to get this thing off me!”
Carly Beth shook her head. “You don’t get it, Steve. You can’t use my
symbol of love. It will only work for me. You have to find your own symbol of
love.”
“But maybe it won’t work for Steve’s mask,” Sabrina interrupted. “Maybe
each mask is different.”
“Give me a break, Sabrina,” I muttered angrily. “It’s got to work! Don’t you
understand? It’s got to!”
“You have to find your own symbol of love,” Carly Beth repeated. “Can
you think of one, Steve?”
I stared back at her, thinking hard. I thought. And thought. Symbol of
love… symbol of love… No. I couldn’t think of anything. Not a single thing.
And then an idea popped into my mind.
24
I leaned on the cane and tried to pull myself up from the couch. But my feeble
arms gave way, and I fell back into the cushion.
“You’ve got to help me get home,” I told Carly Beth. “I thought of a
symbol of love. It’s at my house.”
“Okay. Let’s go!” she replied.
“But what about the kids coming over here?” Sabrina asked, swallowing a
chunk of Milky Way. “What about the party?”
“You stay here and greet them,” Carly Beth told her. “If Steve really can
find a symbol of love at his house—and if it works—we’ll be right back.”
“It’ll work,” I said. “I know it will.”
But I had my fingers crossed. Which made it even harder to climb up from
the couch.
Carly Beth saw me struggling. She took both my hands and pulled me to
my feet. “Yuck! What are those things moving around in your ears?” she cried,
making a disgusted face.
“Spiders,” I said quietly.
She swallowed hard. “I sure hope you find something that works.”
“Me too,” I murmured as she guided me to the door.
Carly Beth turned back into the living room. “Don’t eat all the chocolate
while we’re gone,” she called to Sabrina.
“It’s only my second piece!” Sabrina protested with her mouth full.
We stepped into the darkness. Some kids in costumes were coming up the
driveway, all carrying bulging trick-or-treat bags. “Hey, Carly Beth—where are
you going?” a girl called.
“I’m doing a good deed!” Carly Beth replied. “See you guys later!” She
turned back to me. “I can’t believe you didn’t listen to me, Steve. You really
look disgusting.”
“I can’t even wipe the green gobs out of my nose!” I wailed.
Holding me by the shoulder, she guided me toward my house. We crossed
the street onto my block. I heard kids laughing and loud music inside the house
on the corner. A Halloween party.
As we passed the house, I stumbled over a moving shadow. Carly Beth
caught me before I fell. “What was that?” I cried.
Then I saw it scamper silently across the street. A black cat.
I laughed. What else could I do? I had to laugh.
Go ahead, cat, I thought bitterly. Go ahead and cross my path. I couldn’t
have any worse luck—could I?
My house came into view past a row of tall evergreen shrubs. Through the
shrubs, I could see that nearly all the downstairs lights were on.
“Are your parents home?” Carly Beth asked, helping me across the grass.
I nodded. “Yeah. They’re home.”
“Do they know about the… uh…”
“No,” I replied. “They think it’s a costume.”
As we stepped onto the front stoop, I could hear Sparky start to bark inside
the house. I pushed open the door, and the little dog let out an excited yip and
leaped up at me.
His paws landed on my waist and pushed me back hard. I toppled against
the wall.
“Down, Sparky! Please! Get down!” I pleaded in my old man’s croak.
I knew Sparky was glad to see me. But I was too feeble for his usual
greeting.
“Down, boy! Please!”
Carly Beth finally managed to pull the dog off me so that I could stand up.
Then she held onto Sparky until I regained my balance.
“Steve—is that you?” I heard Mom call from the den. “You’re back so
early!”
Mom stepped into the living room. She had changed into the gray flannel
housedress she usually relaxes in at night, and she had her blond hair in curlers.
“Oh, hi, Carly Beth!” she cried in surprise. “I wasn’t expecting visitors. I
—”
“That’s okay, Mom,” I croaked. “We’re only staying a minute. We came
back to get something.”
“Don’t you love Steve’s costume?” Mom asked Carly Beth. “Isn’t that the
most horrible mask you ever saw?”
“You mean he’s wearing a mask?” Carly Beth joked. She and Mom enjoyed
a good laugh.
Sparky sniffed my shoes.
“What did you come back here for?” Mom asked me.
“Those black-and-white cookies,” I replied eagerly. “You know. The ones
you bought me yesterday.”
Those cookies were a symbol of love.
Mom had told me how she drove two miles out of her way to buy them for
me. She knew they were my favorite cookies in the whole world. And she drove
out of her way to buy them because she loves me.
So the cookies were the perfect symbol of love.
I couldn’t wait to bite into one. One bite, I knew—and I’d be able to pull
off this horrible mask.
Mom’s face twisted in surprise. She narrowed her eyes, studying me. “You
came back here for those cookies? Why? What about all your trick-or-treat
candy?”
“Uh… well…” I stammered. My brain stalled. I couldn’t think of a good
reason.
“He had a strong craving,” Carly Beth chimed in. “He told me he’s been
thinking about those cookies all night.”
“That’s right. I had a craving,” I repeated. “Candy bars can’t compare,
Mom. Those cookies are the best.”
“I love them, too,” Carly Beth added. “So I came back with Steve. We want
to bring them to my Halloween party.”
Mom tsk-tsked. “What a shame,” she said.
“Huh?” I cried, feeling my heart skip a beat. “What do you mean? What’s
wrong?”
Mom shook her head. “The cookies are gone,” she replied softly. “The dog
found the box this morning and broke into it. I’m sorry, guys. But Sparky ate
them all.”
25
Mom’s words sent a cold shiver down my back. I let out a weak moan. And
stared down at Sparky.
The dog gazed up at me and began wagging his stubby tail. As if he were
pleased with himself!
“You’ve ruined my life, Sparky!” That’s what I felt like screaming. “You
greedy pig! Couldn’t you save me just one cookie? Now I’m doomed. Doomed
to live with this gross, frightening face forever.”
And all because Sparky loved black-and-white cookies as much as I did.
Still wagging his tail, Sparky ran over to me and brushed his furry, black
body against my leg. He wanted to be petted.
Forget it, I thought. No way I’m petting you—you traitor.
I heard Dad calling Mom from the den. “Have fun, guys,” Mom said. She
waved to Carly Beth and me and hurried off to see what Dad wanted.
Have fun, guys?
I’m never going to have fun again, I realized.
Feeling weak and defeated, I turned to Carly Beth. “Now what do we do?” I
whispered.
“Quick—pick up Sparky,” she whispered back, motioning to the dog with
both hands.
“Huh? Do what? I’m never touching this dog again!” I croaked miserably.
Panting hard, his tongue hanging to the floor, Sparky brushed my ankle
again.
“Pick him up!” Carly Beth insisted.
“Why?”
“Sparky is your symbol of love!” Carly Beth declared. “Look at him, Steve.
Look how much that dog loves you.”
“He loves me so much, he ate all my cookies!” I wailed.
Carly Beth frowned at me. “Forget about the cookies. Pick up the dog.
Sparky is your symbol of love. Pick him up and hold him against you. And I’ll
bet the mask will come right off.”
“I guess it’s worth a try,” I said softly. I started to pick up the little black
terrier. My back creaked as I bent down. My aching knees cracked.
Please work! I pleaded silently. Please let this work!
I reached for Sparky—and he darted through my hands and ran across the
carpet toward the den.
“Sparky—come back! Sparky!” I cried, still bent over, still reaching out
both hands.
The dog stopped halfway across the living room and turned back.
“Come back, Sparky!” I called in my old man’s quivering voice. “Come
back, boy! Come back to Steve!”
His stubby tail started wagging again. He stared at me, head tilted, and
didn’t move.
“He’s playing games with me,” I told Carly Beth. “He wants me to chase
him.”
I got down on my knees and motioned to Sparky with both hands. “Come,
boy! Come! I’m too old to chase you! Come, Sparky!”
To my surprise, the dog let out a yip, ran back across the room, and jumped
into my arms.
“Hug him tight, Steve,” Carly Beth urged. “Hug him tight. It’s going to
work. I know it will!”
The little dog felt so heavy in my weak, aching arms. But I held him against
my chest. Held him tight.
Held him as tight as I could.
Held him for a long, long time.
And nothing happened.
26
After about a minute, the dog got tired of being squeezed. He jumped out of my
arms, bounced over the carpet, and disappeared into the den.
I tugged at the mask with both hands.
But I knew I was wasting my strength. It didn’t feel any different. Nothing
had changed. The hideous face was still tightly attached to my head.
Carly Beth put a hand gently on my shoulder. “Sorry,” she murmured. “I
guess each mask is different.”
“You mean I need something else to get it off,” I said, shaking my old,
spider-infested head sadly.
Carly Beth nodded. “Yes. Something else. But we don’t know what it is.”
I uttered a helpless cry. “I’m doomed!” I wailed. “I can’t even climb up off
my knees!”
Carly Beth slid both of her hands under my shoulders and lifted me to my
feet. I steadied myself, leaning on the cane.
And then I had an idea.
“The man in the cape,” I croaked. “He’ll know what I can do.”
“You’re right!” Carly Beth’s face brightened. “Yes, you’re right, Steve. He
helped me last Halloween. If we go back to the party store, I know he’ll help
you!”
She started to pull me to the front door. But I held back. “There’s just one
little problem,” I told her.
She turned back to me. “Problem?”
“Yeah,” I replied. “I forgot to tell you. The party store is closed. It went out
of business.”
We walked there anyway. Well, I didn’t exactly walk. I limped and hobbled,
feeling weaker and more feeble every second. Carly Beth practically had to carry
me.
The streets stood empty, glimmering dimly under the rows of streetlamps.
Lights were going out in all the houses. It was pretty late. All of the trick-ortreaters had gone home.
Two dogs followed us down the street. Big German shepherds. Maybe they
thought we’d share our Halloween candy with them. Of course, I didn’t have any
Halloween candy.
“Go away,” I snarled at them. “I don’t like dogs anymore. Dogs are
useless!”
To my surprise, they seemed to understand. They turned and went loping
across a dark front lawn, disappearing around the side of the house.
A few minutes later, we passed the row of small shops and stepped up in
front of the party store. Dark. Empty.
“Out of business,” I murmured.
Carly Beth pounded on the front door. I peered into the blue shadows
beyond the dusty front window. Nothing moved. No one in there.
“Open up! We need help!” Carly Beth shouted. She banged on the wooden
door with both fists.
Silence inside. No one stirred.
A cold wind swept down the street. I shivered. I tried to bury my ugly head
in my shoulders. “Let’s go,” I mumbled. Defeated.
Doomed.
Carly Beth refused to give up. She pounded the door with both fists.
I turned away from the window—and gazed at the alley beside the store.
“Whoa. Wait,” I called to her. “Come over here.”
I dragged myself to the alley. Carly Beth followed. She rubbed her
knuckles. I guess they were sore from pounding so hard on the door.
I could see from the sidewalk that the trapdoor was shut. But I led Carly
Beth into the alley. We stopped beside the trapdoor.
“It leads into the basement of the party store,” I explained. “All the masks
and other stuff are down there.”
“If we can get down there,” Carly Beth whispered, “maybe we can find a
way to help you.”
“Maybe,” I whispered back.
Carly Beth bent down and grabbed the wire handle to the trapdoor. She
tugged it up hard.
The door didn’t budge.
“I think it’s locked,” she groaned.
“Try again,” I urged. “It sticks. It’s very hard to open.”
She bent down, grasped the handle in both hands, and pulled again.
This time the door swung up, revealing the concrete stairs that led down to
the basement.
“Come on. Hurry, Steve.” Carly Beth tugged my arm.
My last chance, I thought. My last chance.
Trembling, I followed her down into the heavy darkness.
27
We huddled close together as we made our way across the basement floor. Pale
light from a streetlamp floated in through the open trapdoor.
Across the room, I heard the steady drip drip drip I’d heard before. The
large cartons stood just where Chuck and I had left them. Three or four of them
were still open.
“Well. Here we are,” Carly Beth murmured. Her words sounded hollow,
echoing softly against the stone basement walls. Her eyes darted around the
room, then stopped on me. “Now what?”
I shrugged. “Search through the cartons, maybe?”
I stepped over to the nearest one and peered inside. “This one has all the
masks,” I told her. I picked up a monster mask covered in bristly fur.
“Yuck,” Carly Beth groaned. “Put it down. We don’t need another mask.”
I dropped the mask back into the carton. It made a soft plop as it landed on
the other masks.
“I don’t know what we need,” I said. “But maybe we can find
something…”
“Look at these!” Carly Beth cried. She had pulled open another carton. She
held up some kind of jumpsuit. It had a long, pointy tail on the back.
“What’s that?” I demanded, stepping around two cartons to get to her.
“A costume,” she replied. She leaned into the carton and pulled out another
one. A pair of furry tights covered with leopard spots. “The box is filled with
costumes.”
“Big deal,” I grumbled. “That’s not going to help me.”
I sighed. “Nothing is going to help me.”
Carly Beth didn’t seem to hear me. She leaned over the edge of the box and
pulled out another costume. She held it up in front of her. A shiny black suit.
Very fancy. Like a tuxedo.
As I stared at it, my face began to tingle.
“Put it down,” I said glumly. “We need to find—”
“Oh, yuck!” Carly Beth cried. “This suit—it’s crawling with spiders!”
“Huh?” I gasped. My face tingled harder. I heard a loud buzzing in my ears.
The tingle became an itch.
“Hey, I’ll bet this is the costume that goes with your mask!” Carly Beth
declared. She carried it over to me. “See? Spiders and more spiders!”
I scratched my itching cheeks. The itch was quickly becoming painful. I
scratched harder.
“Get it away from me! It’s making me itch!” I cried.
Carly Beth ignored my plea. She held the shiny black suit up in front of me,
beneath my itching, burning face.
“See? You have the head—and this is the body that goes with it,” she said,
holding it against me. Admiring it.
“Put it away!” I shrieked. “My face—it’s burning! Ow!”
I slapped frantically at my cheeks. My forehead. My chin.
“Owwwwww!” I howled. “I feel so weird! What is happening to me?”
28
“It’s burning hot!” I shrieked. “Owwwwww! What is happening?”
I grabbed the sides of my face, trying to soothe away the burning pain.
As I gripped my cheeks, the face began to slide under my hands.
I felt it begin to rise. Up, up.
I pulled my hands away—as the old man’s head slid over my head. Lifted
off. Floated up.
Cool air greeted my cheeks. I took a deep breath of the cold, fresh air.
The craggy old head hovered above me for a moment. Then it floated
toward the shiny black suit in Carly Beth’s hand.
The head floated down onto the collar of the suit.
Carly Beth let out a startled cry as the suit’s arms thrashed out. The trouser
legs kicked. The suit twitched and squirmed as if trying to break free.
Carly Beth let go of it and jumped back.
A smile spread over the ugly old face. The suit legs lowered themselves to
the floor. The old man performed a little dance, arms flapping, trouser legs
hopping.
And then he turned away from us. The head attached to the suit. The trouser
legs bent at the knees, he shuffled toward the steps.
Carly Beth and I both cried out in shock as the old man climbed up the
steps and disappeared out the trapdoor.
We stood there, eyes bulging, mouths wide-open. We stared at the opening
at the top of the stairs. Stared in silence. Stared in amazement.
And then we both began to laugh.
We fell on each other, laughing, laughing till tears rolled down our cheeks.
I laughed louder and harder than I had ever laughed. Because I was
laughing in my voice. Laughing with my face. My real face.
The old-man face found its body—and escaped.
And now I was me again!
This had to be the best Halloween ever! I had never been so happy in all my
life just to have things normal.
Carly Beth and I danced down the street as we made our way home. We
sang at the top of our lungs. Sang and twirled each other around.
And danced and strutted down the middle of the street.
We were both so happy!
We were half a block from my house—when the creature leaped out from
behind a hedge.
It opened its jaws in a broken-toothed roar.
Carly Beth and I grabbed each other and uttered shrill cries of terror.
The creature had bright purple skin that glowed in the light from the
streetlamp. Fiery red eyes. A mouth full of broken, rotting teeth. And a fat,
brown worm poking out from the middle of its cheek.
“Huh?” I stared at the worm as it bobbed from the creature’s skin. Stared at
the frightening purple face.
And recognized it.
“Chuck!” I cried.
He let out a hoarse laugh from behind the mask. “I gotcha!” he bellowed. “I
got both of you! You should have seen the looks on your faces!”
“Chuck—”
“I’ve been waiting here. Waiting to surprise you,” he rasped. The disgusting
worm bobbed up and down in his cheek as he talked.
“You didn’t see me grab this mask when I ran out of that store basement,”
he growled. “I kept it a secret. I wanted to give you a good scare.”
“You scared me to death!” Carly Beth admitted, giving him a playful shove.
“Now take off the mask and let’s go to my house.”
“Uh… I have a problem,” Chuck replied, lowering his voice.
“Problem?”
Chuck nodded. “I’m having a little trouble getting this mask off. Think you
guys could help me?”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

THE HEADLESS GHOST
Goosebumps - 37
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
Stephanie Alpert and I haunt our neighborhood.
We got the idea last Halloween.
There are a lot of kids in our neighborhood, and we like to haunt them and
give them a little scare.
Sometimes we sneak out late at night in masks and stare into kids’
windows. Sometimes we leave rubber hands and rubber fingers on windowsills.
Sometimes we hide disgusting things in mailboxes.
Sometimes Stephanie and I duck down behind bushes or trees and make the
most frightening sounds—animal howls and ghostly moans. Stephanie can do a
terrifying werewolf howl. And I can toss back my head and shriek loud enough
to shake the leaves on the trees.
We keep almost all the kids on our block pretty frightened.
In the mornings, we catch them peeking out their doors, seeing if it’s safe to
come out. And at night, most of them are afraid to leave their houses alone.
Stephanie and I are really proud of that.
During the day we are just Stephanie Alpert and Duane Comack, two
normal twelve-year-olds. But at night, we become the Twin Terrors of Wheeler
Falls.
No one knows. No one.
Look at us, and you see two sixth graders at Wheeler Middle School. Both
of us have brown eyes and brown hair. Both of us are tall and thin. Stephanie is a
few inches taller because she has higher hair.
Some people see us hanging out together and think we’re brother and sister.
But we’re not. We don’t have any brothers and sisters, and we don’t mind one
bit.
We live across the street from one another. We walk to school together in
the morning. We usually trade lunches, even though our parents both pack us
peanut-butter-and-jelly sandwiches.
We’re normal. Totally normal.
Except for our secret late-night hobby.
How did we become the Twin Terrors? Well, it’s sort of a long story….
Last Halloween was a cool, clear night. A full moon floated over the bare trees.
I was standing outside Stephanie’s front window in my scary Grim Reaper
costume. I stood up on tiptoes, trying to peek inside to check out her costume.
“Hey—beat it, Duane! No looking!” she shouted through the closed
window. Then she pulled down the shade.
“I wasn’t looking. I was just stretching!” I shouted back.
I was eager to see what Stephanie was going to be. Every Halloween, she
comes up with something awesome. The year before, she came waddling out
inside a huge ball of green toilet paper. You guessed it. She was an iceberg
lettuce.
But this year I thought maybe I had her beat.
I’d worked really hard on my Grim Reaper costume. I wore high platform
shoes—so high that I’d tower over Stephanie. My black, hooded cape swung
along the ground. I hid my curly brown hair under a tight rubber skullcap. And I
smeared my face with sick-looking makeup, the color you see on moldy bread.
My dad didn’t want to look at me. He said I turned his stomach.
A success!
I couldn’t wait to make Stephanie sick! I banged my Grim Reaper sickle on
Stephanie’s window. “Hey, Steph—hurry up!” I called. “I’m getting hungry. I
want candy!”
I waited and waited. I started pacing back and forth across her front lawn,
my long cape sweeping over the grass and dead leaves.
“Hey! Where are you?” I called again.
No Stephanie.
With an impatient groan, I turned back to the house.
And a huge, hairy animal jumped me from behind and chewed off my head.
2
Well, it didn’t really chew off my head.
But it tried to.
It growled and tried to sink its gleaming fangs into my throat.
I staggered back. The creature looked like an enormous black cat, covered
in thick, black bristles. Gobs of yellow goo poured from its hairy ears and black
nose. Its long, pointed fangs glowed in the dark.
The creature snarled again and shot out a hairy paw. “Candy… give me all
your candy!”
“Stephanie—?” I choked out. It was Stephanie. Wasn’t it?
The creature jabbed its claws into my stomach in reply. That’s when I
recognized Stephanie’s Mickey Mouse watch on its hairy wrist.
“Wow. Stephanie, you look awesome! You really—” I didn’t finish.
Stephanie ducked behind the hedge and yanked me down beside her.
My knees hit the sidewalk hard. “Ow! Are you crazy?” I shrieked. “What’s
the big idea?”
A group of little kids in costumes paraded by. Stephanie leapt out of the
hedge. “Arrrggghhh!” she growled.
The little kids totally freaked. They turned and started to run. Three of them
dropped their trick-or-treat bags. Stephanie scooped up the bags. “Yummmm!”
“Whoa! You really scared them,” I said, watching the little kids run up the
street. “That was cool.”
Stephanie started to laugh. She has a high, silly laugh that always starts me
laughing, too. It sounds like a chicken being tickled. “That was kind of fun,” she
replied. “More fun than trick-or-treating.”
So we spent the rest of the night scaring kids.
We didn’t get much candy. But we had a great time.
“I wish we could do this every night!” I exclaimed as we walked home.
“We can,” Stephanie said, grinning. “It doesn’t have to be Halloween to
scare kids, Duane. Get my meaning?”
I got her meaning.
She tossed back her bristly head and let out her chicken laugh. And I
laughed, too.
And that’s how Stephanie and I started haunting our neighborhood. Late at
night, the Twin Terrors strike, up and down our neighborhood. We’re
everywhere!
Well… almost everywhere.
There’s one place in our neighborhood that even Stephanie and I are afraid
of.
It’s an old stone house on the next block. It’s called Hill House. I guess
that’s because it sits up on a high hill on Hill Street.
I know. I know. A lot of towns have a haunted house.
But Hill House really is haunted.
Stephanie and I know that for sure.
Because that’s where we met the Headless Ghost.
3
Hill House is the biggest tourist attraction in Wheeler Falls. Actually, it’s the
only one.
Maybe you’ve heard of Hill House. It’s written up in a lot of books.
Tour guides in creepy black uniforms give the Hill House tour every hour.
The guides will act real scary and tell frightening stories about the house. Some
of the ghost stories give me cold shivers.
Stephanie and I love to take the tour—especially with Otto. Otto is our
favorite guide.
Otto is big and bald and scary-looking. He has tiny black eyes that seem to
stare right through you. And he has a booming voice that comes from deep
inside his huge chest.
Sometimes when Otto leads us from room to room in the old house, he
lowers his voice to a whisper. He talks so low, we can barely hear him. Then his
tiny eyes will bulge. He’ll point—and scream: “There’s the ghost! There!”
Stephanie and I always scream.
Even Otto’s smile is scary.
Stephanie and I have taken the Hill House tour so often, we could probably
be tour guides. We know all the creepy old rooms. All the places where ghosts
have been spotted.
Real ghosts!
It’s the kind of place we love.
Do you want to know the story of Hill House? Well, here’s the story that
Otto, Edna, and the other guides tell:
Hill House is two hundred years old. And it’s been haunted practically from the
day the stones were gathered to build it.
A young sea captain built the house for his new bride. But the day the big
house was finished, the captain was called out to sea.
His young wife moved into the huge house all alone. It was cold and dark,
and the rooms and hallways seemed to stretch on forever.
For months and months, she stared out of their bedroom window. The
window that faced the river. Waiting patiently for the captain’s return.
Winter passed. Then spring, then summer.
But he never came back.
The captain was lost at sea.
One year after the sea captain disappeared, a ghost appeared in the halls of
Hill House. The ghost of the young sea captain. He had come back from the
dead, back to find his wife.
Every night he floated through the long, twisting halls. He carried a lantern
and called out his wife’s name. “Annabel! Annabel!”
But Annabel never answered.
In her grief, she had fled from the old house. She never wanted to see it
again.
Another family had moved in. As the years passed, many people heard the
ghost’s nightly calls. “Annabel! Annabel!” Through the twisting halls and cold
rooms of the house.
“Annabel! Annabel!”
People heard the sad, frightening calls. But no one ever saw the ghost.
Then, one hundred years ago, a family named Craw bought the house. The
Craws had a thirteen-year-old boy named Andrew.
Andrew was a nasty, mean-natured boy. He delighted in playing cruel tricks
on the servants. He scared them out of their wits.
He once threw a cat out of a window. He was disappointed when it
survived.
Even Andrew’s own parents couldn’t stand to spend time with the meantempered boy. He spent his days on his own, exploring the old mansion, looking
for trouble he could get into.
One day he discovered a room he had never explored before. He pushed
open the heavy wooden door. It let out a loud creak.
Then he stepped inside.
A lantern glowed dimly on a small table. The boy saw no other furniture in
the large room. No one at the table.
“How strange,” he thought. “Why should I find a burning lantern in an
empty room?”
Andrew approached the lantern. As he leaned down to lower the wick, the
ghost appeared.
The sea captain!
Over the years, the ghost had grown into an old and terrifying creature. He
had long, white fingernails that curled in spirals. Cracked, black teeth poked out
from between swollen, dry lips. And a scraggly white beard hid the ghost’s face
from view.
The boy stared in horror. “Who—who are you?” he stammered.
The ghost didn’t utter a word. He floated in the yellow lantern light, glaring
hard at the boy.
“Who are you? What do you want? Why are you here?” the boy demanded.
When the ghost still didn’t reply, Andrew turned—and tried to run.
But before he moved two steps, he felt the ghost’s cold breath on his neck.
Andrew grabbed for the door. But the old ghost swirled around him, swirled
darkly, a swirl of black smoke in the dim yellow fight.
“No! Stop!” the boy screamed. “Let me go!”
The ghost’s mouth gaped open, revealing a bottomless black hole. Finally, it
spoke—in a whisper that sounded like the scratch of dead leaves. “Now that you
have seen me, you cannot leave.”
“No!” The boy shrieked. “Let me go! Let me go!”
The ghost ignored the boy’s cries. He repeated his dry, cold words: “Now
that you have seen me, you cannot leave.”
The old ghost raised his hands to the boy’s head. His icy fingers spread over
Andrew’s face. The hands tightened. Tightened.
Do you know what happened next?
4
The ghost pulled off the boy’s head—and hid it somewhere in the house!
After hiding the head, hiding it away in the huge, dark mansion, the ghost
of the sea captain let out a final howl that made the heavy stone walls tremble.
The terrifying howl ended with the cry, “Annabel! Annabel!”
Then the old ghost disappeared forever.
But Hill House was not freed from ghosts. A new ghost now haunted the
endless, twisting halls.
From then on, Andrew haunted Hill House. Every night the ghost of the
poor boy searched the halls and rooms, looking for his missing head.
All through the house, say Otto and the other tour guides, you can hear the
footsteps of the Headless Ghost, searching, always searching.
And each room of the house now has a terrifying story of its own.
Are the stories true?
Well, Stephanie and I believe them. That’s why we take the tour so often.
We must have explored the old place at least a hundred times.
Hill House is such awesome fun.
At least it was fun—until Stephanie had another one of her bright ideas.
After Stephanie’s bright idea, Hill House wasn’t fun anymore.
Hill House became a truly scary place.
5
The trouble started a few weeks ago when Stephanie suddenly got bored.
It was about ten o’clock at night. We were out haunting the neighborhood.
We did our terrifying wolf howl outside Geena Jeffers’ window. Then we went
next door to Terri Abel’s house. We put some chicken bones in her mailbox—
just because it’s creepy to reach in your mailbox and feel bones.
Then we crept across the street to Ben Fuller’s house.
Ben was our last stop for the night. Ben is a kid in our class, and we have a
special scare for him.
You see, he’s afraid of bugs, which makes him really easy to scare.
Even though it’s pretty cold out, he sleeps with his bedroom window open.
So Stephanie and I like to step up to his window and toss rubber spiders onto
Ben as he sleeps.
The rubber spiders tickle his face. He wakes up. And starts to scream.
Every time.
He always thinks the spiders are real.
He screams and tries to scramble out of bed. He gets all tangled in his
covers and thuds onto the floor.
Then Stephanie and I congratulate each other on a job well done. And we
go home to bed.
But tonight, as we tossed the rubber spiders at Ben’s sleeping face,
Stephanie turned to me and whispered, “I just had a great idea.”
“Huh?” I started to reply. But Ben’s scream interrupted me.
We listened to him scream, then thud to the floor.
Stephanie and I slapped each other a high five. Then we took off, running
across the dark backyards, our sneakers thumping the hard, nearly-frozen
ground.
We stopped in front of the split oak tree in my front yard. The tree trunk is
completely split in two. But Dad doesn’t have the heart to have the tree taken
away.
“What is your great idea?” I asked Stephanie breathlessly.
Her dark eyes flashed. “I’ve been thinking. Every time we go out to haunt
the neighborhood, we scare the same old kids. It’s starting to get boring.”
I wasn’t bored. But I knew that once Stephanie gets an idea, there’s no
stopping her. “So, do you want to find some new kids to scare?” I asked.
“No. Not new kids. Something else.” She began to walk around the tree.
Circling it. “We need a new challenge.”
“Like what?” I asked.
“Our scares are all kid stuff,” she complained. “We make some spooky
sounds, toss a few things inside an open window—and everyone is frightened to
death. It’s too easy.”
“Yeah,” I agreed. “But it’s funny.”
She ignored me. She stuck her head through the split in the tree trunk.
“Duane, what’s the scariest place in Wheeler Falls?”
That was easy. “Hill House, of course,” I answered.
“Right. And what makes it so scary?”
“All the ghost stories. But especially the one about the boy searching for his
head.”
“Yes!” Stephanie cried. All I could see now was her head, poking through
the split oak tree. “The Headless Ghost!” she cried in a deep voice, and let out a
long, scary laugh.
“What’s your problem?” I demanded. “Are you trying to haunt me now?”
Her head seemed to float in the darkness. “We need to haunt Hill House,”
she declared in a whisper.
6
“Excuse me?” I cried. “Stephanie, what are you talking about?”
“We’ll take the Hill House tour and sneak off on our own,” Stephanie
replied thoughtfully.
I shook my head. “Give me a break. Why would we do that?”
Stephanie’s face seemed to glow, floating by itself in the tree trunk. “We’ll
sneak off on our own—to search for the ghost’s head.”
I stared back at her. “You’re kidding, right?”
I walked behind the tree and tugged her away from it. The floating head
trick was starting to give me the creeps.
“No, Duane, I’m not kidding,” she replied, shoving me away. “We need a
challenge. We need something new. Prowling around the neighborhood,
terrifying everyone we know—that’s just kid stuff. Bor-ring.”
“But you don’t believe the story about the missing head—do you?” I
protested. “It’s just a ghost story. We can search and search. But there is no head.
It’s all a story they made up for the tourists.”
Stephanie narrowed her eyes at me. “I think you’re scared, Duane.”
“Huh? Me?” My voice got pretty shrill.
A cloud rolled over the moon, making my front yard even darker. A chill
ran down my back. I pulled my jacket around me tighter.
“I’m not afraid to sneak off from the tour and search Hill House on our
own,” I told Stephanie. “I just think it’s a big waste of time.”
“Duane, you’re shivering,” she teased. “Shivering with fright.”
“I am not!” I screamed. “Come on. Let’s go to Hill House. Right now. I’ll
show you.”
A grin spread over Stephanie’s face. She tossed back her head and let out a
long howl. A victory howl. “This is going to be the coolest thing the Twin
Terrors have ever done!” she cried, slapping me a high five that made my hand
sting.
She dragged me up Hill Street. The whole way there, I didn’t say one word.
Was I afraid?
Maybe a little.
We climbed the steep, weed-choked hill and stood before the front steps of
Hill House. The old house looked even bigger at night. Three stories tall. With
turrets and balconies and dozens of windows, all dark and shuttered.
All the houses in our neighborhood are brick or clapboard. Hill House is the
only one made out of stone slabs. Dark gray slabs.
I always have to hold my breath when I stand close to Hill House. The
stone is covered with a blanket of thick green moss. Two hundred years of it.
Putrid, moldy moss that doesn’t exactly smell like a flower garden.
I peered up. Up at the round turret that stretched to the purple sky. A
gargoyle, carved in stone, perched at the very top. It grinned down at us, as if
challenging us to go inside.
My knees suddenly felt weak.
The house stood in total darkness, except for a single candle over the front
doorway. But the tours were still going on. The last tour left at ten-thirty every
night. The guides said the late tours were the best—the best time to see a ghost.
I read the sign etched in stone beside the door. ENTER HILL HOUSE—
AND YOUR LIFE WILL BE CHANGED. FOREVER.
I’d read that sign a hundred times. I always thought it was funny—in a
corny sort of way.
But tonight it gave me the creeps.
Tonight was going to be different.
“Come on,” Stephanie said, pulling me by the hand. “We’re just in time for
the next tour.”
The candle flickered. The heavy wooden door swung open. By itself. I
don’t know how, but it always does that.
“Well, are you coming or not?” Stephanie demanded, stepping into the dark
entryway.
“Coming,” I gulped.
7
Otto met us as we stepped inside the door. Otto always reminds me of an
enormous dolphin. He has a big, smooth bald head. And he’s sort of shaped like
a dolphin. He must weigh about three hundred pounds!
Otto was dressed entirely in black, as always. Black shirt. Black pants.
Black socks. Black shoes. And gloves—you guessed it—black. It’s the uniform
that all the tour guides wear.
“Look who’s here!” he called. “Stephanie and Duane!” He broke out into a
wide grin. His tiny eyes flashed in the candlelight.
“Our favorite guide!” Stephanie greeted him. “Are we in time for the next
tour?”
We pushed through the turnstile without paying. We’re such regulars at Hill
House that they don’t even charge us anymore.
“About five minutes, guys,” Otto told us. “You two are out late tonight,
huh?”
“Yeah… well,” Stephanie hesitated. “It’s more fun to take the tour at night.
Isn’t it, Duane?” She jabbed my side.
“You can say that again,” I mumbled.
We moved into the front hall with some others who were waiting for the
tour to begin. Teenagers mostly, out on dates.
The front hall is bigger than my living room and dining room put together.
And except for the winding staircase in the center, it’s completely bare. No
furniture at all.
Shadows tossed across the floor. I gazed around the room. No electric
lights. Small torches were hung from the peeling, cracked walls. The orange
torchlight flickered and bent.
In the dancing light, I counted the people around me. Nine of them.
Stephanie and I were the only kids.
Otto lighted a lantern and crossed to the front of the hall. He held it up high
and cleared his throat.
Stephanie and I grinned at each other. Otto always starts the tour the same
way. He thinks the lantern adds atmosphere.
“Ladies and gentlemen,” he boomed. “Welcome to Hill House. We hope
you will survive your tour tonight.” Then he gave a low, evil laugh.
Stephanie and I mouthed Otto’s next words along with him:
“In 1795, a prosperous sea captain, William P. Bell, built himself a home on
the highest hill in Wheeler Falls. It was the finest home ever built here at the
time—three stories high, nine fireplaces, and over thirty rooms.
“Captain Bell spared no expense. Why? Because he hoped to retire here and
finish his days in splendor with his young and beautiful wife. But it was not to
be.”
Otto cackled, and so did Stephanie and I. We knew every move Otto had.
Otto went on. “Captain Bell died at sea in a terrible shipwreck—before he
ever had a chance to live in his beautiful house. His young bride, Annabel, fled
the house in horror and sorrow.”
Now Otto’s voice dropped. “But soon after Annabel left, strange things
began to happen in Hill House.”
This was Otto’s cue to start walking toward the winding stairs. The old,
wooden staircase is narrow and creaky. When Otto starts to climb, the stairs
groan and grumble beneath him as if in pain.
Keeping silent, we followed Otto up the stairs to the first floor. Stephanie
and I love this part, because Otto doesn’t say a word the whole time. He just
huffs along in the darkness while everyone tries to keep up with him.
He starts talking again when he reaches Captain Bell’s bedroom. A big,
wood-paneled room with a fireplace and a view of the river.
“Soon after Captain Bell’s widow ran away,” Otto reported, “people in
Wheeler Falls began reporting strange sightings. Sightings of a man who
resembled Captain Bell. He was always seen here, standing by his window,
holding his lantern aloft.”
Otto moved to the window and raised his lantern. “On a windless night, if
you listened carefully, you could sometimes hear him calling out her name in a
low, mournful voice.”
Otto took a deep breath, then called softly: “Annabel. Annabel. Annabel…”
Otto swung the lantern back and forth for effect. By now, he had everyone’s
complete attention.
“But of course, there’s more,” he whispered.
8
As we followed him through the upstairs rooms, Otto told us how Captain Bell
haunted the house for about a hundred years. “People who moved into Hill
House tried all kinds of ways to get rid of the ghost. But it was determined to
stay.”
Then Otto told everyone about the boy finding the ghost and getting his
head pulled off. “The ghost of the sea captain vanished. The headless ghost of
the boy continued to haunt the house. But that wasn’t the end of it.”
Into the long, dark hallway now. Torches darting and flickering along the
walls. “Tragedy continued to haunt Hill House,” Otto continued. “Shortly after
young Andrew Craw’s death, his twelve-year-old sister Hannah went mad. Let’s
go to her room next.”
He led us down the hall to Hannah’s room.
Stephanie loves Hannah’s room. Hannah collected porcelain dolls. And she
had hundreds of them. All with the same long yellow hair, painted rosy cheeks,
and blue-tinted eyelids.
“After her brother was killed, Hannah went crazy,” Otto told us all in a
hushed voice. “All day long, for eighty years, she sat in her rocking chair over
there in the corner. And she played with her dolls. She never left her room.
Ever.”
He pointed to a worn rocking chair. “Hannah died there. An old lady
surrounded by her dolls.”
The floorboards creaked under him as Otto crossed the room. Setting the
lantern down, he lowered his big body into the rocking chair.
The chair made a cracking sound. I always think Otto is going to crush it!
He started to rock. Slowly. The chair groaned with each move. We all watched
him in silence.
“Some people swear that poor Hannah is still here,” he said softly. “They
say they’ve seen a young girl sitting in this chair, combing a doll’s hair.”
He rocked slowly, letting the idea sink in. “And—then we come to the story
of Hannah’s mother.”
With a grunt, Otto pulled himself to his feet. He grabbed up the lantern and
made his way to the top of the long, dark stairway at the end of the hall.
“Soon after her son’s tragedy, the mother met her own terrible fate. She was
on her way down these stairs one night when she tripped and fell to her death.”
Otto gazed down the stairs and shook his head sadly.
He does this every time. As I said, Stephanie and I know his every move.
But we hadn’t come here tonight to watch Otto perform. I knew that sooner
or later, Stephanie would want to get going. So I started glancing around. To see
if it was a good time for us to sneak away from the others.
And that’s when I saw the strange kid. Watching us.
I didn’t see him when we first came in. In fact, I’m sure he wasn’t there
when the tour started. I had counted nine people. No kids.
The boy was about our age, with wavy blond hair and pale skin. Very pale
skin. He was wearing black jeans and a black turtleneck that made his face look
even whiter.
I edged over to Stephanie. She was hanging back from the group.
“You ready?” she whispered.
Otto had started back down the stairs. If we were going to sneak away from
the tour, now was the time.
But I could see that weird kid still staring at us.
Staring hard.
He was giving me the creeps.
“We can’t go. Someone’s watching us,” I whispered to Stephanie.
“Who?”
“That weird kid over there.” I motioned with my eyes.
He was still staring at us. He didn’t even try to be polite and turn away
when we caught him.
Why was he watching us like that? What was his problem?
Something told me we should wait. Something told me not to hide from the
others just yet.
But Stephanie had other ideas. “Forget him,” she said. “He’s nobody.” She
grabbed my arm—and tugged. “Let’s go!”
We pressed against the cold wall of the hallway and watched the others
follow Otto down the stairs.
I held my breath until I heard the last footsteps leave the stairway. We were
alone now. Alone in the long, dark hall.
I turned to Stephanie. I could barely see her face. “Now what?” I asked.
9
“Now we do some exploring on our own!” Stephanie declared, rubbing her
hands together. “This is so exciting!”
I gazed down the long hallway. I didn’t feel real excited. I felt kind of
scared.
I heard a low groan from a room across the hall. The ceiling creaked above
our heads. The wind rattled the windows in the room we had just come from.
“Steph—are you sure—?” I started.
But she was already hurrying down the hall, walking on tiptoes to keep the
floors from squeaking. “Come on, Duane. Let’s search for the ghost’s head,” she
whispered back to me, her dark hair flying behind her. “Who knows? We might
find it.”
“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes.
I didn’t think the chances were too good. How do you find a hundred-yearold head? And what if you do find it?
Yuck!
What would it look like? Just a skull?
I followed Stephanie down the hall. But I really didn’t want to be there. I
like haunting the neighborhood and scaring other people.
I don’t like scaring myself!
Stephanie led the way into a bedroom we had seen on other tours. It was
called the Green Room. Because the wallpaper was decorated with green vines.
Tangle after tangle of green vines. Up and down the walls and across the ceiling,
too.
How could anyone sleep in here? I wondered. It was like being trapped in a
thick jungle.
We both stopped inside the doorway and stared at the tangles of vines on all
sides of us. Stephanie and I call the Green Room by another name. The
Scratching Room.
Otto once told us that something terrible happened here sixty years ago.
The two guests who stayed in the room woke up with a disgusting purple rash.
The rash started on their hands and arms. It spread to their faces. Then it
spread over their entire bodies.
Big purple sores that itched like crazy.
Doctors from all around the world were called to study the rash. They
couldn’t figure out what it was. And they couldn’t figure out how to cure it.
Something in the Green Room caused the rash.
But no one ever figured out what it was.
That’s the story Otto and the other guides tell. It might be true. All the
weird, scary stories Otto tells might be true. Who knows?
“Come on, Duane!” Stephanie prodded. “Let’s look for the head. We don’t
have much time before Otto sees that we’re missing.”
She trotted across the room and dove under the bed.
“Steph—please!” I started. I stepped carefully over to the low, wooden
dresser in the corner.
“We’re not going to find a ghost’s head in here. Let’s go,” I pleaded.
She couldn’t hear me. She had climbed under the bed.
“Steph—?”
After a few seconds, she backed out. As she turned toward me, I saw that
her face was bright red.
“Duane!” she cried. “I… I…”
Her dark eyes bulged. Her mouth dropped open in horror. She grabbed the
sides of her face.
“What is it? What’s wrong?” I cried, stumbling across the room toward her.
“Ohhh, it itches! It itches so badly!” Stephanie wailed.
I started to cry out. But my voice got caught in my throat.
Stephanie began to rub her face. She frantically rubbed her cheeks, her
forehead, her chin.
“Owwww. It itches! It really itches!” She started to scratch her scalp with
both hands.
I grabbed her arm and tried to pull her up from the floor. “The rash! Let’s
get you home!” I cried. “Come on! Your parents will get the doctor! And…
and…”
I stopped when I saw that she was laughing.
I dropped her arm and stepped back.
She stood up, straightening her hair. “Duane, you jerk,” she muttered. “Are
you going to fall for every dumb joke tonight?”
“No way!” I replied angrily. “I just thought—”
She gave me a shove. “You’re too easy to scare. How could you fall for
such a stupid joke?”
I shoved her back. “Just don’t pull any more dumb jokes, okay?” I snarled.
“I mean it, Stephanie. I don’t think it’s funny. I really don’t. I’m not going to fall
for any more stupid jokes. So don’t even try.”
She wasn’t listening to me. She was staring over my shoulder. Staring in
open-mouthed shock.
“Oh, I d-don’t believe it!” she stammered. “There it is! There’s the head!”
10
I fell for it again.
I couldn’t help myself.
I let out a shrill scream.
I spun around so hard, I nearly knocked myself over. I followed Stephanie’s
finger. I squinted hard in the direction she pointed.
She was pointing to a gray clump of dust.
“Sucker! Sucker!” She slapped me on the back and started to giggle.
I uttered a low growl and balled my hands into tight fists. But I didn’t say
anything. I could feel my face burning. I knew that I was blushing.
“You’re too easy to scare, Duane,” Stephanie teased again. “Admit it.”
“Let’s just get back to the tour,” I grumbled.
“No way, Duane. This is fun. Let’s try the next room. Come on.”
When she saw that I wasn’t following her, she said, “I won’t scare you like
that anymore. Promise.”
I saw that her fingers were crossed. But I followed her anyway.
What choice did I have?
We crept through the narrow hall that connected us to the next room. And
found ourselves in Andrew’s room. Poor, headless Andrew.
It still had all his old stuff in it. Games and toys from a hundred years ago.
An old-fashioned wooden bicycle leaning against one wall.
Everything just the way it was. Before Andrew met up with the sea
captain’s ghost.
A lantern on the dresser cast blue shadows on the walls. I didn’t know if I
believed the ghost story or not. But something told me that if Andrew’s head
were anywhere, we’d find it here. In his room.
Under his old-fashioned-looking canopy bed. Or hidden under his dusty,
faded toys.
Stephanie tiptoed over to the toys. She bent down and started to move
things aside. Little wooden bowling pins. An old-fashioned board game, the
colors all faded to brown. A set of metal toy soldiers.
“Check around the bed, Duane,” she whispered.
I started across the room. “Steph, we shouldn’t be touching this stuff. You
know the tour guides never let us touch anything.”
Stephanie set down an old wooden top. “Do you want to find the head or
not?”
“You really think there’s a ghost’s head hidden in this house?”
“Duane, that’s what we’re here to find out—right?”
I sighed and stepped over to the bed. I could see there was no use arguing
with Stephanie tonight.
I ducked my head under the purple canopy and studied the bed. A boy
actually slept in this bed, I told myself.
Andrew actually slept under this quilt. A hundred years ago.
The thought gave me a chill.
I tried to picture a boy about my age sleeping in this heavy, old bed.
“Go ahead. Check out the bed,” Stephanie instructed from across the room.
I leaned over and patted the gray and brown patchwork quilt. It felt cold
and smooth.
I punched the pillows. They felt soft and feathery. Nothing hidden inside
the pillow cases.
I was about to test the mattress when the quilt began to move.
It rustled over the sheets. A soft, scratchy sound.
Then, as I stared in horror, the gray and brown quilt began to slide down the
bed.
There was no one in the bed. No one!
But someone was pushing the quilt down, down to the bottom of the bed.
11
I swallowed a scream.
“You’ve got to move faster, Duane,” Stephanie said.
I turned and saw her standing at the end of the bed. Holding the bottom of
the quilt in both hands.
“We don’t have all night!” she declared. She pulled the quilt down farther.
“Nothing in the bed. Come on. Let’s move on.”
A sigh escaped my lips. Stephanie had tugged down the quilt and scared me
again.
No ghost in the bed. No ghost pushing down the covers to climb out and
grab me.
Only Stephanie.
At least this time she hadn’t seen how frightened I was.
We worked together to pull the quilt back into place. She smiled at me.
“This is kind of fun,” she said.
“For sure,” I agreed. I hoped she couldn’t see that I was still shaking. “It’s a
lot more fun than tossing rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s bedroom window.”
“I like being in this house so late at night. I like sneaking off from the
group. I can feel a ghost lurking nearby,” Stephanie whispered.
“You c-can?” I stammered, glancing quickly around the room.
My eyes stopped at the bottom of the door to the hallway.
There it sat. On the floor. Wedged between the door and the wall. Halfhidden in deep shadow.
The head.
This time, I saw the head.
Not a joke. Not a cruel trick.
Through the gray-black shadows, I saw the round skull. And I saw the two
black eye sockets. Empty eye sockets. Two dark holes in the skull.
Staring up at me.
Staring.
I grabbed Stephanie’s arm. I started to point.
But there was no need.
Stephanie saw it, too.
12
I was the first to move. I took a step toward the door. Then another.
I heard sharp gasps. Someone breathing hard. Close behind me.
It took me a few seconds to realize it was Stephanie.
Keeping my eyes on the head, I made my way into the dark corner. My
heart started to pound as I bent down and reached for it with both hands.
The black eye sockets stared up at me. Round, sad eyes.
My hands trembled.
I started to scoop it up.
But it slipped out of my hands. And started to roll away.
Stephanie let out a cry as the head rolled over the floor toward her.
In the orange light from the lantern, I saw her frightened expression. I saw
that she was frozen there.
The head rolled over the floor and bumped against her sneaker. It came to a
stop inches in front of her.
The empty black eye sockets stared up at her.
“Duane—” she called, staring down at it, hands pressed against her cheeks.
“I didn’t think—I didn’t really think we’d find it. I—I—”
I hurried back across the room. It’s my turn to be the brave one, I decided.
My turn to show Stephanie that I’m not a wimp who’s afraid of every shadow.
My turn to show Stephanie.
I scooped up the ghost’s head in both hands. I raised it in front of Stephanie.
Then I moved toward the lantern on the dressertop.
The head felt hard. Smoother than I thought.
The eye sockets were deep.
Stephanie stayed close by my side. Together we made our way into the
orange lantern light.
I let out a groan when I realized I wasn’t carrying a ghost’s head.
Stephanie groaned too when she saw what I held in my hands.
13
A bowling ball.
I was carrying an old wooden bowling ball, the pale wood cracked and
chipped.
“I don’t believe it,” Stephanie murmured, slapping her forehead.
My eyes went to the wooden bowling pins, lying among Andrew’s old toys.
“This must be the ball that went with those pins,” I said softly.
Stephanie grabbed it from me and turned it between her hands. “But it only
has two holes.”
I nodded. “Yeah. In those days, bowling balls only had two holes. My dad
told me about it one day when we went bowling. Dad never could figure out
what they did with their thumb.”
Stephanie stuck her fingers into the two holes. The “eye sockets”. She
shook her head. I could see she was really disappointed.
We could hear Otto’s voice, booming from somewhere downstairs.
Stephanie sighed. “Maybe we should go down and rejoin the tour,” she
suggested. She rolled the ball back to the pile of toys.
“No way!” I exclaimed.
I liked being the brave one for a change. I didn’t want to quit while I was
ahead.
“It’s getting kind of late,” Stephanie said. “And we’re not going to find any
ghost head up here.”
“That’s because we’ve already explored these rooms a hundred times,” I
told her. “I think we should find a room we’ve never explored before.”
She scrunched up her face, thinking hard. “Duane, do you mean—?”
“I mean, the ghost head is probably hidden in a room the tour doesn’t go
through. Maybe upstairs. You know. On the top floor.”
Stephanie’s eyes grew wide. “You want to sneak up to the top floor?”
I nodded. “Why not? That’s probably where all the ghosts hang out—
right?”
She studied me, her eyes searching mine. I knew she was surprised by my
brave idea.
Of course, I didn’t feel very brave at all. I just wanted to impress her. I just
wanted to be the brave one for a change.
I was hoping that she’d say no. I was hoping she’d say, “Let’s go back
downstairs, Duane.”
But instead, an excited grin spread over her face. And she said, “Okay. Let’s
do it!”
14
So I was stuck being the brave one.
We both had to be brave now. The Twin Terrors, on their way up the dark,
creaking stairway that led to the third floor.
A sign beside the stairs read: NO VISITORS.
We stepped right past it and began climbing the narrow staircase. Side by
side.
I couldn’t hear Otto’s voice anymore. Now I could only hear the creak and
squeak of the steps beneath our sneakers. And the steady thud thud thud of my
heart.
The air grew hot and damp as we reached the top. I squinted down a long,
dark hallway. There were no lanterns. No candles.
The only light came from the window at the end of the hall. Pale light from
outside that cast everything in an eerie, ghostly blue.
“Let’s start in the first room,” Stephanie suggested, whispering. She
brushed her dark hair off her face.
It was so hot up here, I had sweat running down my forehead. I mopped it
up with my jacket sleeve and followed Stephanie to the first room on the right.
The heavy wooden door was half open. We slid in through the opening.
Pale blue light washed in through the dust-caked windows.
I waited for my eyes to adjust. Then I squinted around the large room.
Empty. Completely empty. No furniture. No sign of life.
Or ghosts.
“Steph—look.” I pointed to a narrow door against the far wall. “Let’s check
it out.”
We crept across the bare floor. Through the dusty window, I glimpsed the
full moon, high over the bare trees now.
The doorway led to another room. Smaller and even warmer. A steam
radiator clanked against one wall. Two old-fashioned-looking couches stood
facing each other in the center of the room. No other furniture.
“Let’s keep moving,” Stephanie whispered.
Another narrow door led to another dark room. “The rooms up here are all
connected,” I murmured. I sneezed. Sneezed again.
“Ssshhh. Quiet, Duane,” Stephanie scolded. “The ghosts will hear us
coming.”
“I can’t help it,” I protested. “It’s so dusty up here.”
We were in some kind of sewing room. An old sewing machine stood on a
table in front of the window. A carton at my feet was filled with balls of black
yarn.
I bent down and pawed quickly through the balls of yarn. No head hidden
in there.
We stepped into the next room before we realized it was completely dark.
The window was partly shuttered. Only a tiny square of gray light crept
through from outside.
“I-I can’t see anything,” Stephanie declared. I felt her hand grasp my arm.
“It’s too dark. Let’s get out of here, Duane.”
I started to reply. But a loud thump made my breath catch in my throat.
Stephanie’s hand squeezed my hand. “Duane, did you make that thump?”
Another thump. Closer to us.
“No. Not m-me,” I stammered.
Another thump on the floor.
“We’re not alone in here,” Stephanie whispered.
I took a deep breath. “Who is it?” I called. “Who’s there?”
15
“Who’s there?” I choked out.
Stephanie squeezed my arm so hard, it hurt. But I made no attempt to move
away from her.
I heard soft footsteps. Ghostly footsteps.
A cold chill froze the back of my neck. I clamped my jaw shut to keep my
teeth from chattering.
And then yellow eyes floated toward us through the thick darkness.
Four yellow eyes.
The creature had four eyes!
A gurgling sound escaped my throat. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move.
I stared straight ahead. Listening.
Watching.
The eyes floated apart in pairs. Two eyes moved to the right, two to the left.
“Noooo!” I cried out when I saw more eyes.
Yellow eyes in the corners of the room. Evil eyes glinting at us from against
the wall.
Yellow eyes all along the floor.
Yellow eyes all around us.
Catlike yellow eyes glaring in silence at Stephanie and me as we huddled
together in the center of the room.
Catlike eyes.
Cat’s eyes.
Because the room was filled with cats.
A shrill yowl gave them away. A long meeeeyoww from the windowsill
made Stephanie and me both sigh in relief.
A cat brushed against my leg. Startled, I jumped aside, bumping into
Stephanie.
She bumped me back.
More cats meowed. Another cat brushed the back of my jeans leg.
“I-I think these cats are lonely,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you think
anyone ever comes up here?”
“I don’t care,” I snapped. “All these yellow eyes floating around. I
thought… I thought… well… I don’t know what I thought! It’s creepy. Let’s get
out of here.”
For once, Stephanie didn’t argue.
She led the way to the door at the back of the room. All around us, cats
were howling and yowling.
Another one brushed my leg.
Stephanie tripped over a cat. In the darkness, I saw her fall. She landed on
her knees with a hard thud.
The cats all began to screech.
“Are you okay?” I cried, hurrying to help pull her up.
The cats were howling so loud, I couldn’t hear her reply.
We jogged to the door, pulled it open, and escaped.
I closed the door behind us. Silence now. “Where are we?” I whispered.
“I-I don’t know,” Stephanie stammered, keeping close to the wall.
I moved to a tall, narrow window and peered through the dusty glass. The
window led out to a small balcony. The balcony jutted out from the gray
shingled roof.
Pale white moonlight washed in through the window.
I turned back to Stephanie. “We’re in some kind of back hallway,” I
guessed. The long, narrow hallway seemed to stretch on forever. “Maybe these
rooms are used by the workers. You know. Manny, the night watchman. The
house cleaners. And the tour guides.”
Stephanie sighed. She stared down the long hallway. “Let’s go downstairs
and find Otto and the tour group. I think we’ve done enough exploring for
tonight.”
I agreed. “There must be stairs at the end of this hall. Let’s go.”
I took four or five steps. Then I felt the ghostly hands.
They brushed over my face. My neck. My body.
Sticky, dry, invisible hands.
The hands pushed me back as they clung to my skin.
“Ohhhh, help!” Stephanie moaned.
The ghosts had her in their grasp, too.
16
The ghost’s filmy hands brushed over me. I could feel the soft fingers—dry and
soft as air—tighten around my skin.
Stephanie’s hands thrashed wildly. Beside me in the dark hall, she struggled
to free herself.
“It-it’s like a net!” she choked out.
I swiped at my face. My hair.
I spun away. But the dry fingers clung to me. Tightening. Tightening.
And I realized we hadn’t walked into a ghost’s grasp.
Tugging and tearing frantically with both hands, I realized we had walked
into cobwebs.
A thick curtain of cobwebs.
The blanket of sticky threads had fallen over us like a fisherman’s net. The
more we struggled, the tighter it wrapped itself around us.
“Stephanie—it’s cobwebs!” I cried. I tugged a thick, stringy wad of them
off my face.
“Of course it’s cobwebs!” she shot back, squirming and thrashing. “What
did you think it was?”
“Uh… a ghost,” I muttered.
Stephanie snickered. “Duane, I know you have a good imagination. But if
you start seeing ghosts everywhere, we’ll never get out of here.”
“I… I… I…” I didn’t know what to say.
Stephanie thought the same thing I did. She thought she’d been grabbed by
a ghost. But now she was pretending she knew all along.
We stood there in the darkness, tearing the sticky threads off our faces and
arms and bodies. I let out an angry groan. I couldn’t brush the stuff from my
hair!
“I’m going to itch forever!” I wailed.
“I’ve got more bad news for you,” Stephanie murmured.
I pulled a thick wad off my ear. “Huh?”
“Who do you think made these cobwebs?”
I didn’t have to think about it. “Spiders?”
My arms and legs started to tingle. My back began to itch. I felt a light
tingling on the back of my neck.
Were there spiders crawling up and down my body? Hundreds and
hundreds of them?
Forgetting the wispy strings of cobweb, I started to run. Stephanie had the
same idea. We both ran down the long hall, scratching and slapping at ourselves.
“Steph—the next time you have a great idea, don’t have a great idea!” I
warned her.
“Let’s just get out of here!” she groaned.
We reached the end of the hall, still scratching as we ran.
No stairway.
How do we get back downstairs?
Another hall twisted to the left. Low candles over the doorways flickered
and danced. Shadows darted over the worn carpet like slithering animals.
“Come on.” I pulled Stephanie’s arm. We had no choice. We had to follow
this hallway, too.
We jogged side by side. The rooms were all dark and silent.
The candle flames dipped as we ran past. Our long shadows ran ahead of
us, as if eager to get downstairs first.
I stopped when I heard someone laughing.
“Whoa,” Stephanie murmured, breathing hard. Her dark eyes grew wide.
We both listened hard.
I heard voices. Inside the room at the end of the hall.
The door was closed. I couldn’t make out the words. I heard a man say
something. A woman laughed. Other people laughed.
“We caught up to the tour,” I whispered.
Stephanie scrunched up her face. “But the tour never comes up here to the
top floor,” she protested.
We stepped up close to the door and listened again.
More laughter on the other side. A lot of people talking cheerfully, all at the
same time. It sounded like a party.
I pressed my ear against the door. “I think the tour ended, and everyone is
just chatting,” I whispered.
Stephanie scratched the back of her neck. She pulled a stringy gob of
cobweb from her hair. “Well, hurry, Duane. Open the door. Let’s join them,” she
urged.
“I hope Otto doesn’t ask us where we’ve been,” I replied.
I grabbed the doorknob and pushed open the door.
Stephanie and I took a step inside.
And gasped in shock at what we saw.
17
The room stood empty.
Empty, silent, and dark.
“What happened? Where is everyone?” Stephanie cried.
We took another step into the dark room. The floor creaked beneath us. The
only sound.
“I don’t get it,” Stephanie whispered. “Didn’t we just hear voices in here?”
“Lots,” I said. “They were laughing and talking. It really sounded like a
party.”
“A big party,” Stephanie added, her eyes darting around the empty room.
“Tons of people.”
A cold chill ran down the back of my neck. “I don’t think we heard people,”
I whispered.
Stephanie turned to me. “Huh?”
“They weren’t people,” I croaked. “They were ghosts.”
Her mouth dropped open. “And they all disappeared when we opened the
door?”
I nodded. “I—I think I can still feel them in here. I can feel their presence.”
Stephanie let out a frightened squeak. “Feel them? What do you mean?”
At that moment, a cold wind came whooshing through the room. It rushed
over me, cold and dry. And it chilled me down to my toes.
Stephanie must have felt it, too. She wrapped her arms around her chest.
“Brrr! Do you feel that breeze? Is the window open? How come it got so cold in
here all of a sudden?” she asked.
She shivered again. Her voice became tiny. “We’re not alone in here, are
we?”
“I don’t think so,” I whispered. “I think we just crashed someone’s party.”
Stephanie and I stood there, feeling the cold of the room. I didn’t dare
move. Maybe a ghost stood right beside me. Maybe the ghosts we heard were all
around us, staring at us, preparing to swoop over us.
“Stephanie,” I whispered. “What if we really have crashed their party?
What if we’ve invaded the ghosts’ quarters?”
Stephanie swallowed hard. She didn’t reply.
Hadn’t Andrew, the ghost boy, lost his head when he stumbled into the
ghost’s living quarters? Were we standing in the same living quarters? The same
room where Andrew found the ghost of the old sea captain?
“Stephanie, I think we should get out of here,” I said softly. “Now.”
I wanted to run. I wanted to fly down the stairs. Fly out of Hill House. Fly
to my safe, warm home where there were no ghosts.
No ghosts.
We spun around and bolted for the door.
Were the ghosts going to try to stop us?
No. We made it back into the flickering orange light of the hallway. I pulled
the door shut behind us.
“The stairs. Where are the stairs?” Stephanie cried.
We stood at the end of the hall. Facing a solid wall. The flowers on the
wallpaper appeared to open and close, moving in the darting candlelight.
I banged both fists against the wall. “How do we get out of here? How?”
Stephanie had already pulled open a door across the hall. I followed her
inside.
“Oh, no!” Ghostly figures filled the room. It took me a few seconds to
realize that I was staring at sheets pulled over furniture. Chairs and couches
covered with sheets.
“M-maybe this is the ghosts’ living room,” I stammered.
Stephanie didn’t hear me. She had already burst through the open door
against the far wall.
I followed her into another room, cluttered with large crates. The crates
were piled nearly to the ceiling.
Another room. Then another.
My heart began to pound. My throat ached.
I felt so discouraged. Were we ever going to find our way to the stairs?
Another door. Another dark, empty room.
“Hey, Steph—” I whispered. “I think we’re going in circles.”
Out into a long, twisting hallway. More candles. More flowers flickering
darkly on the wallpaper.
We ran side by side down the hall. Until we came to a door I hadn’t seen
before. A door with a horseshoe nailed onto it.
Maybe it meant that our luck was about to change. I sure hoped so!
I grabbed the knob with a trembling hand. I pulled open the door.
A staircase!
“Yes!” I cried.
“Finally!” Stephanie gasped.
“This must be the servants’staircase,” I guessed. “Maybe we’ve been in the
servants’ quarters all this time.”
The stairway was blanketed in darkness. The stairs looked steep.
I took a step down, holding onto the wall. Then another step.
Stephanie had one hand on my shoulder. When I stepped down, she stepped
down, too.
Another step. Another. The soft thuds of our sneakers echoed in the deep
stairwell.
We had taken about ten steps when I heard footsteps.
Someone coming up the stairs.
18
Stephanie bumped me hard. I shot out both hands. Grabbed the wall to keep
from falling down the stairs.
No time to turn and run.
The footsteps grew louder. And heavier. Light from a flashlight swept over
Stephanie, then me.
Squinting against the light, I saw a dark figure climbing up to us. “So there
you are!” his voice boomed, echoing in the stairwell.
A familiar voice.
“Otto!” Stephanie and I both cried.
He bounced up in front of us, moving the flashlight from her face to mine.
“What are you two doing up here?” he demanded breathlessly.
“Uh… we got lost,” I answered quickly.
“We got separated from the tour,” Stephanie added. “We tried to find you.”
“Yes. We tried,” I chimed in. “We were searching everywhere. But we
couldn’t catch up to the group.”
Otto lowered the flashlight. I could see his tiny dark eyes narrowing at us. I
don’t think he believed our story.
“I thought you two knew my tour by heart,” he said, rubbing his chin.
“We do,” Stephanie insisted. “We just got turned around. We got lost. And
we—”
“But how did you get up here on the top floor?” Otto demanded.
“Well…” I started. But I couldn’t think of a good answer. I turned back to
Stephanie on the step above me.
“We heard voices up here. We thought it was you,” she told Otto.
It wasn’t exactly a lie. We did hear voices.
Otto lowered the beam of light to the stairs. “Well, let’s get back
downstairs. No one is allowed on this floor. It’s private.”
“Sorry,” Stephanie and I murmured.
“Watch your step, kids,” Otto warned. “These back stairs are very steep and
rickety. I’ll lead you back to the group. Edna took over for me while I went to
find you.”
Edna was our second-favorite tour guide. She was old and white-haired.
Very pale and frail-looking, especially in her black tour-guide outfit.
But she was a great storyteller. With her quivering, old voice, she really
made you believe every frightening story she told.
Stephanie and I eagerly clumped down the stairs, following Otto. His
flashlight swept in front of us as he led us out onto the second floor. We followed
a long hallway. A hallway I knew very well.
We stopped outside Joseph Craw’s study. Joseph was Andrew’s father. I
peeked inside. A bright fire blazed in the fireplace.
Edna stood beside the fireplace, telling the tragic story of Joseph Craw to
the tour group.
Stephanie and I had heard the sad story a hundred times. A year after
Andrew had his head cut off, Joseph came home late one winter night. He took
off his coat, then moved to the fireplace to warm himself.
No one knows how Joseph was burned up. At least, that’s how Otto, Edna,
and the other guides tell the story. Was he pushed into the fireplace? Did he fall
in?
One guess is as good as another.
But when the maid came into the study the next morning, she found a
horrifying sight.
She found two charred, blackened hands gripping the mantel.
Two hands, holding on tightly to the marble mantelpiece.
All that was left of Joseph Craw.
It’s a yucky story—isn’t it?
It gives me a chill every time I hear it.
As Otto led us to the study, Edna was just getting to the sickening part. The
ending. “Do you want to rejoin the group?” Otto whispered.
“It’s pretty late. I think we’d better get home,” Stephanie told him.
I quickly agreed. “Thanks for rescuing us. We’ll catch the tour again soon.”
“Good night,” Otto said, clicking off his flashlight. “You know the way
out.” He hurried into the study.
I started to leave. But stopped when I saw the boy again, the pale boy with
the wavy blond hair. The boy in the black jeans and black turtleneck.
He stood away from the tour group. Close to the door. And he was staring
at Stephanie and me again. Staring hard at us, a cold expression on his face.
“Come on,” I whispered, grabbing Stephanie’s arm. I tugged her away from
the study door.
We quickly found the front stairway. A few seconds later, we pushed open
the front door and stepped outside. A cold wind greeted us as we started down
the hill. Wisps of black cloud floated like snakes over the moon.
“Well, that was fun!” Stephanie declared. She zipped her coat to her chin.
“Fun?” I wasn’t so sure. “It was kind of scary.”
Stephanie grinned at me. “But we weren’t afraid—right?”
I shivered. “Right.”
“I’d like to go back and explore some more,” she said. “You know. Maybe
go back to that room with all the voices. Find some real ghosts.”
“Yeah. Great,” I agreed. I didn’t feel like arguing with her. I felt pretty tired.
She pulled a wool muffler from her coat pocket. As she swung it around her
neck, one end caught in a low pine bush.
“Hey—!” she cried out.
I moved to the bush and started to pull the muffler free.
And that’s when I heard the voice.
Just a whisper. A whisper from the other side of the bush.
But I heard it very clearly.
“Did you find my head?”
That’s what I heard.
“Did you find my head? Did you find it for me?”
19
I uttered a startled gasp and stared into the bush. “Stephanie—did you hear
that?” I choked out.
No reply.
“Stephanie? Steph?”
I spun around. She was staring at me, her mouth open in surprise.
“Did you hear that whisper?” I asked again.
Then I realized she wasn’t staring at me. She was staring past me.
I turned—and saw the strange, blond boy standing there beside the pine
bush. “Hey—did you just whisper to us?” I demanded sharply.
He narrowed his pale gray eyes at me. “Huh? Me?”
“Yeah. You,” I snapped. “Were you trying to scare us?”
He shook his head. “No way.”
“You didn’t whisper from behind this bush?” I asked again.
“I just got out here,” the boy insisted.
We saw him in Joseph Craw’s study less than a minute ago, I told myself.
How did he get out here so fast?
“Why did you follow us?” Stephanie demanded, shoving her muffler
around her coat collar.
The boy shrugged.
“Why were you staring at us?” I asked, stepping up close to Stephanie.
The wind howled over the hilltop. The row of pine bushes shook in the
gusty wind, as if shivering. Thin black clouds continued to snake their way over
the pale moon.
The boy wore no coat. Only the black turtleneck and black jeans. The wind
fluttered his long, wavy hair.
“We saw you staring at us,” Stephanie repeated. “How come?”
He shrugged again. He kept his strange, gray eyes down at the ground. “I
saw you sneak away,” he said. “I wondered if… if you saw anything
interesting.”
“We got lost,” I told him, glancing at Stephanie. “We didn’t see much.”
“What’s your name?” Stephanie asked.
“Seth,” he replied.
We told him our names.
“Do you live in Wheeler Falls?” Stephanie asked.
He shook his head. He kept his eyes down at his shoes. “No. I’m just
visiting.”
Why wouldn’t he look us in the eye? Was he just shy?
“Are you sure you didn’t whisper something from behind that bush?” I
asked again.
He shook his head. “No way. Maybe someone was playing a joke on you.”
“Maybe,” I said. I stepped closer and kicked the bush. I don’t know what I
expected.
But nothing happened.
“You and Stephanie went exploring on your own?” Seth asked.
“Yeah. A little,” I confessed. “We’re kind of into ghosts.”
When I said that, he jerked his head up. He raised his gray eyes and gazed
hard at Stephanie, then at me.
His face had been a blank. No life to it. No expression at all.
But now I could see that he was really excited.
“Do you want to see some real ghosts?” he asked us, staring hard. “Do
you?”
20
Seth stared at us as if challenging us. “Do you two want to see some real
ghosts?”
“Yeah. Sure,” Stephanie replied, returning his stare.
“What do you mean, Seth?” I demanded. “Have you ever seen a ghost?”
He nodded. “Yeah. In there.” He pointed with his head, back to the big
stone house.
“Huh?” I cried. “You saw a real ghost in Hill House? When?”
“Duane and I have taken the tour a hundred times,” Stephanie told him.
“We’ve never seen any ghost in there.”
He snickered. “Of course not. Do you think the ghosts come out when the
tour groups are in there? They wait till the house closes. They wait until all the
tourists go home.”
“How do you know?” I asked.
“I sneaked in,” Seth replied. “Late one night.”
“You what?” I cried. “How?”
“I found a door around back. It was unlocked. I guess everyone forgot about
it,” Seth explained. “I sneaked in after the house was closed. And I—”
He stopped suddenly. His eyes were on the house.
I turned and saw the front door open. People stepped out, fastening their
coats. The last tour had ended. People were heading for home.
“Over here!” Seth whispered.
We followed him behind the pine bushes and ducked down low. The people
walked past us. They were laughing and talking about the house and all the ghost
stories.
When they were down the hill, we stood up again. Seth brushed his long
hair off his forehead. But the wind blew it right back.
“I sneaked in late at night, when the house was dark,” he repeated.
“Your parents let you go out so late at night?” I asked.
A strange smile crossed his lips. “They didn’t know,” he said softly. The
smile faded. “Your parents let you two out?”
Stephanie laughed. “Our parents don’t know, either.”
“Good,” Seth replied.
“And you really saw a ghost?” I asked.
He nodded. Brushed his hair back again. “I crept past Manny, the night
watchman. He was sound asleep. Snoring away. I made my way to the front of
the house. I was standing at the bottom of the big staircase—when I heard a
laugh.”
I gulped. “A laugh?”
“From the top of the stairs. I backed up against the wall. And I saw the
ghost. A very old lady. In a long dress and a black bonnet. She wore a heavy
black veil over the front of her face. But I could see her eyes through the veil. I
could see them because they glowed bright red—like fire!”
“Wow!” Stephanie cried. “What did she do?”
Seth turned to the house. The front door had closed. The lantern over the
door had been put out. The house stood in total darkness.
“The old ghost came sliding down the banister,” he reported. “She tossed
back her head—and screamed all the way down. And as she slid, her red eyes
left a bright trail, like the tail of a comet.”
“Weren’t you scared?” I asked Seth. “Didn’t you try to run away?”
“There was no time,” he replied. “She came sliding down the banister, right
toward me. Eyes blazing. Screaming like some kind of crazed animal. I was
pressed against the wall. I couldn’t move. And when she reached the bottom, I
thought she’d grab me. But she vanished. Disappeared into the darkness. And all
that was left was the faint red glow, floating in the air. The glow of her eyes.”
“Oh, wow!” Stephanie cried.
“That’s awesome!” I agreed.
“I want to sneak back in again,” Seth declared, watching the house. “I’ll bet
there are more ghosts in there. I really want to see them.”
“Me, too!” Stephanie cried eagerly.
Seth smiled at her. “So you’ll come with me? Tomorrow night? I don’t want
to go back alone. It’ll be so much more fun if you come, too.”
The wind swirled sharply. The black clouds rolled over the moon, covering
it, shutting out its light. The old house appeared to grow darker on its hilltop
perch.
“So you’ll come with me tomorrow night?” Seth asked again.
“Yeah. Great!” Stephanie told him. “I can’t wait. How about you, Duane?”
She turned to me. “You’ll come, too—won’t you, Duane? Won’t you?”
21
I said yes.
I said I couldn’t wait to see a real ghost.
I said I was shivering because of the cold wind. Not because I was scared.
We made a plan to meet at midnight tomorrow at the back of Hill House.
Then Seth hurried away. And Stephanie and I walked home.
The street was dark and empty. Most of the house lights were out. Far in the
distance, a dog howled.
Stephanie and I walked quickly, leaning into the wind. We usually didn’t
stay out this late.
Tomorrow night, we’d be even later.
“I don’t trust that guy,” I told Stephanie as we reached her front yard. “He’s
too weird.”
I expected her to agree. But she said, “You’re just jealous, Duane.”
“Huh? Me? Jealous?” I couldn’t believe she said that. “Why would I be
jealous?”
“Because Seth is so brave. Because he saw a ghost and we didn’t.”
I shook my head. “Do you believe that crazy story about a ghost sliding
down the banister? I think he made it up.”
“Well,” Stephanie replied thoughtfully, “we’ll find out tomorrow night—
won’t we!”
Tomorrow night came too quickly.
I had a math test in the afternoon. I don’t think I did too well on it. I
couldn’t stop thinking about Seth, and Hill House, and ghosts.
After dinner, Mom cornered me in the living room. She brushed back my
hair and studied my face. “Why do you look so tired?” she asked. “You have
dark circles around your eyes.”
“Maybe I’m part raccoon,” I replied. That’s what I always say when she
tells me I have circles around my eyes.
“I think you should go to bed early tonight,” Dad chimed in. Dad always
thinks that everyone should go to bed early.
So I went to my room at nine-thirty. But of course I didn’t go to sleep.
I read a book and listened to a tape on my Walkman. And waited for Mom
and Dad to go to bed. And watched the clock.
Mom and Dad are very heavy sleepers. You can pound and pound on their
bedroom door, and they don’t wake up. They once slept through a hurricane.
That’s the truth. They didn’t hear the tree that fell onto our house!
Stephanie’s parents are heavy sleepers, too. That’s why it’s so easy for the
two of us to sneak out of our bedroom windows. That’s why it’s so easy for us to
haunt our neighborhood at night.
As the clock neared midnight, I wished we were going out on one of our
usual haunting trips. I wished we were going to hide under Chrissy Jacob’s
window and howl like wolves. And then toss rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s
bed.
But Stephanie had decided that was too boring.
We needed excitement. We needed to go ghost hunting. With a strange kid
we’d never seen before.
At ten to twelve, I pulled on my down coat and crept out of my bedroom
window. Another cold, windy night. I felt sprinkles of frozen rain on my
forehead. So I pulled up my hood.
Stephanie was waiting for me at the bottom of her driveway. She had pulled
her brown hair back in a ponytail. Her coat was open. She wore a heavy ski
sweater underneath, pulled down over her jeans.
She raised her head and let out a ghostly howl. “Owooooooo!”
I clapped my hand over her open mouth. “You’ll wake up the whole block!”
She laughed and backed away from me. “I’m a little excited. Aren’t you?”
She opened her mouth in another howl.
The frozen rain pattered the ground. We hurried toward Hill House. The
swirling wind scattered twigs and dead leaves as we walked. Most of the house
lights had been turned off.
A car rolled by slowly as we turned onto Hill Street. Stephanie and I ducked
behind a hedge. The driver might wonder why two kids were wandering around
Wheeler Falls at midnight.
I wondered, too.
We waited for the car to disappear. Then we continued our journey.
Our sneakers crunched over the hard ground as we climbed the hill that led
to the old haunted house. Hill House rose above us, like a silent monster waiting
to swallow us up.
The last tour had ended. The lights were all off. Otto and Edna and the other
tour guides were probably all home by now.
“Come on, Duane. Hurry,” Stephanie urged. She started to run around the
side of the house. “Seth is probably waiting.”
“Wait up!” I cried. We followed a narrow dirt path around to the back.
Squinting into the darkness, I searched for Seth. No sign of him.
The backyard was cluttered with equipment of all kinds. A row of rusted
metal trashcans formed a fence along one wall. A long wooden ladder lay on its
side in the tall weeds. Wooden cartons and barrels and cardboard boxes were
strewn everywhere. A hand lawnmower tilted against the house.
“It—it’s so much darker back here,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you see
Seth?”
“I can’t see anything,” I replied in a whisper. “Maybe he changed his mind.
Maybe he isn’t coming.”
Stephanie started to reply. But a choked cry from the side of the house made
us both jump.
I turned to see Seth stagger into view.
His blond hair was wild, flying around his face. His eyes bulged. His hands
gripped his throat.
“The ghost!” he cried, stumbling clumsily. “The ghost—he—he got me!”
Then Seth collapsed at our feet and didn’t move.
22
“Nice try, Seth,” I said calmly.
“Nice fall,” Stephanie added.
He raised his head slowly, staring up at us. “I didn’t fool you?”
“No way,” I replied.
Stephanie rolled her eyes. “That’s Joke Number One,” she told Seth.
“Duane and I have pulled that one a thousand times.”
Seth climbed to his feet and brushed off the front of his black turtleneck. He
scowled, disappointed. “Just trying to give you a little scare.”
“You’ll have to do better than that,” I told him.
“Duane and I are experts at giving scares,” Stephanie added. “It’s sort of
our hobby.”
Seth straightened his hair with both hands. “You two are weird,” he
murmured.
I brushed cold raindrops off my eyebrows. “Can we get inside?” I asked
impatiently.
Seth led the way to the narrow door at the far side of the house. “Did you
two have any trouble sneaking out?” he asked, whispering.
“No. No trouble,” Stephanie told him.
“Neither did I,” he replied. He stepped up to the door and lifted the wooden
latch. “I took the tour again tonight,” he whispered. “Otto showed me some new
things. Some new rooms we can explore.”
“Great!” Stephanie exclaimed. “Do you promise we’ll see a real ghost?”
Seth turned back to her. A strange smile spread over his face. “Promise,” he
said.
23
Seth gave the door a tug, and it creaked open.
We slipped inside. Into total blackness. Too dark to see where we were.
I took a few steps into the room—and bumped into Seth.
“Ssshhh,” he warned. “Manny the night watchman is posted in the front
room. He’s probably asleep already. But we’d better stay in back.”
“Where are we?” I whispered.
“In one of the back rooms,” Seth whispered. “Wait a few seconds. Our eyes
will adjust.”
“Can’t we turn on a light?” I asked.
“Ghosts won’t come out in the light,” Seth replied.
We had closed the door behind us. But a cold wind still blew at my back.
I shivered.
A soft rattling sound made my breath catch in my throat.
Was I starting to hear things?
I pulled off my hood to hear better.
Silence now.
“I think I know where I can find some candles,” Seth whispered. “You two
wait here. Don’t move.”
“D-don’t worry,” I stammered. I didn’t plan to go anywhere until I could
see!
I heard Seth move away, making soft, scraping footsteps over the floor,
keeping as quiet as he could. His footsteps faded into silence.
Then I felt another rush of cold wind against the back of my neck.
“Oh!” I cried out when I heard the rattling again.
A gentle rattling. Like the rattling of bones.
Another cold gust of wind swept over me. A ghost’s cold breath, I thought.
My whole body shook as a chill ran down my back.
I heard the rattling bones again. Louder. A clattering sound. So close.
I reached out in the thick blackness. Tried to grab onto a wall. Or a table. Or
anything.
But my hands grabbed only air.
I swallowed hard. Calm down, Duane, I ordered myself. Seth will be back
in a moment with some candles. Then you’ll see that everything is okay.
But another jangle and clatter of bones made me gasp.
“Steph—did you hear that?” I whispered.
No reply.
A cold wind tingled my neck.
The bones rattled again.
“Steph? Do you hear that noise, too? Steph?”
No reply.
“Stephanie? Steph?” I called.
She was gone.
24
Panic time.
My breaths came short and fast. My heart clattered louder than the skeleton
bones. My whole body began to shake.
“Stephanie? Steph? Where are you?” I choked out weakly.
Then I saw the two yellow eyes moving toward me. Two glowing eyes,
floating silently, gleaming with evil. Coming nearer. Nearer.
I froze.
I couldn’t move. I couldn’t see anything but those two gleaming, yellow
eyes.
“Ohh!” I uttered a moan as they floated closer. And I could see them more
clearly. See that they were candle flames.
Two candle flames, moving side by side.
In the soft yellow light, I saw Seth’s face. And Stephanie’s. They each
carried a lighted candle in front of them.
“Stephanie—where were you?” I cried in a choked whisper. “I—I thought
—”
“I went with Seth,” she replied calmly.
The orange glow from her candle washed over me. I guess Stephanie could
see how panicked I was. “I’m sorry, Duane,” she said softly. “I said I was going
with Seth. I thought you heard me.”
“S-something is rattling,” I stammered. “Bones, I think. I keep feeling a
cold wind, and I keep hearing—”
Seth handed me a candle. “Light it,” he instructed. “We’ll look around. See
what’s rattling.”
I took the candle and raised it to his. But my hand was shaking so badly, it
took me five tries to light the wick. Finally, the candle flamed to life.
I gazed around in the flickering orange light.
“Hey—we’re in the kitchen,” Stephanie whispered.
A gust of cold wind blew past me. “Did you feel that?” I cried.
Seth pointed his candle flame toward the kitchen window. “Look, Duane—
that window-pane. It’s missing. The cold air is blowing in through the hole.”
“Oh. Right.”
Another blast of air. And then the rattling.
“Did you hear it?” I demanded.
Stephanie giggled. She pointed to the kitchen wall. In the dim light, I saw
big pots and pans hanging on the wall. “The wind is making them rattle,”
Stephanie explained.
“Ha-ha.” I uttered a feeble laugh. “I knew that. I was just trying to scare
you,” I lied. “You know. Give you a thrill.”
I felt like a total jerk. But why should I admit that a bunch of pots on the
wall nearly had me scared out of my skin?
“Okay. No more jokes,” Stephanie insisted, turning to Seth. “We want to
see a real ghost.”
“Follow me. I’ll show you something that Otto told me about,” Seth
whispered.
Holding his candle in front of him, he led the way across the kitchen to the
wall beside the stove. He lowered his candle in front of a cabinet door. Then he
pulled open the cabinet door and moved the candle closer so we could see inside.
“Why are you showing us a kitchen cabinet?” I demanded. “What’s scary
about that?”
“It’s not a cabinet,” Seth replied. “It’s a dumbwaiter. Watch.” He reached
inside and pulled a rope beside the cabinet shelf. The shelf began to slide up.
He raised the shelf, then lowered it. “See? This dumbwaiter is like a little
elevator. It was used to send food from the kitchen to the master bedroom
upstairs.”
“You mean for midnight snacks?” I joked.
Seth nodded. “The cook would put the food on the shelf. Then he would
pull the rope, and the shelf would carry it upstairs.”
“Thrills and chills,” I said sarcastically.
“Yeah. Why are you showing it to us?” Stephanie demanded.
Seth brought the candle up close to his face. “Otto told me that this
dumbwaiter is haunted. A hundred and twenty years ago, things suddenly started
to go wrong with it.”
Stephanie and I moved closer. I lowered my candle and examined the
dumbwaiter cabinet. “What went wrong?” I asked.
“Well,” Seth began softly, “the cook would put food on the shelf and send it
upstairs. But when the shelf reached the bedroom up there, the food was gone.”
Stephanie narrowed her eyes at Seth. “It disappeared between the first and
second floor?”
Seth nodded solemnly. His gray eyes glowed in the soft candlelight. “This
happened several times. When the shelf reached the second floor, it was empty.
The food had vanished.”
“Wow,” I murmured.
“The cook became very frightened,” Seth continued. “He was afraid that
the dumbwaiter had become haunted. He decided to stop using it. And he
ordered everyone on his staff never to use the dumbwaiter again.”
“And that’s the end of the story?” I asked.
Seth shook his head. “And then something horrible happened.”
Stephanie’s mouth dropped open. “What? What happened?”
“Some kids were visiting the house. One of them was a boy named Jeremy.
Jeremy was a real show-off, and very athletic. When he saw the dumbwaiter, he
decided it would be fun to ride it to the second floor.”
“Oh, wow,” Stephanie murmured.
I felt a chill. I thought I could guess what was coming.
“So Jeremy squeezed onto the shelf. And one of the other kids pulled the
rope. Suddenly the rope caught. The kid couldn’t get it to move up or down.
Jeremy was stuck somewhere between the floors.
“The other kids called up to him, ‘Are you okay?’ But Jeremy didn’t reply.
They started to get very worried. They tugged and tugged, but they couldn’t
move the rope.
“Then suddenly, the shelf came crashing back down.”
“And was Jeremy on it?” I asked eagerly.
Seth shook his head. “There were three covered bowls on the shelf. The
kids lifted the lid off the first bowl. Inside was Jeremy’s heart, still beating.
“They opened the second bowl. Inside were Jeremy’s eyes, still staring in
horror. And they opened the third bowl. And saw Jeremy’s teeth, still
chattering.”
The three of us stood silent in the orange glow of candlelight. We stared at
the dumbwaiter shelf.
I shivered. The pots rattled against the wall. But I was no longer frightened
by them. I raised my eyes to Seth. “Do you think that story is true?”
Stephanie laughed. Nervous laughter. “It can’t be true,” she said.
Seth’s face remained solemn. “Do you believe any of Otto’s stories?” he
asked me quietly.
“Well. Yes. No. Some.” I couldn’t decide.
“Otto swears the story is true,” Seth insisted. “But of course, he may just be
doing his job. His job is to make this house as scary as possible.”
“Otto is a great storyteller,” Stephanie murmured. “But enough stories. I
want to see a real ghost.”
“Follow me,” Seth replied. His candle flame dipped low as he spun around.
He led us back through the kitchen, into a long, narrow room at the back.
“This is the old butler’s pantry,” he announced. “All of the food for the house
was stored in here.”
Stephanie and I stepped past him, raising our candles to see the room better.
When I turned around, Seth was closing the pantry door behind us.
Then I saw him turn the lock.
“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried.
“Why are you locking us in here?” Stephanie demanded.
25
I dropped my candle. It bounced on the hard floor, and the flame went out. The
candle rolled under a shelf.
When I glanced back up, Stephanie was storming toward Seth. “Seth—what
are you doing?” she demanded angrily. “Unlock that door. This isn’t funny!”
I gazed around the long, narrow room. Shelves from floor to ceiling on
three walls. No windows. No other door to escape through.
With a sharp cry, Stephanie grabbed for the door handle. But Seth moved
quickly to block her way.
“Hey—!” I cried, my heart pounding. I stepped up beside Stephanie.
“What’s the big idea, Seth?”
His silvery eyes glowed with excitement behind his candle flame. He stared
back at us without speaking. The same cold stare I had seen on his face the night
before.
Stephanie and I took a step back, huddling close together.
“Sorry, guys. But I played a little trick on you,” he said finally.
“Excuse me?” Stephanie cried, more angry than frightened.
“What kind of trick?” I asked.
He pushed back his long, blond hair with his free hand. The flickering
candle sent shadows dancing across his face. “My name isn’t Seth,” he said
softly, so softly I could barely hear him.
“But—but—” I stammered.
“My name is Andrew,” he said.
Stephanie and I both cried out in surprise.
“But Andrew is the name of the ghost,” Stephanie protested. “The ghost
who lost his head.”
“I am the ghost,” he said softly. A dry laugh escaped his lips. More like a
cough than a laugh. “I promised you a real ghost tonight. Well… here I am.”
He blew out the candle. He appeared to vanish with the light.
“But, Seth—” Stephanie started.
“Andrew,” he corrected her. “My name is Andrew. My name has been
Andrew for more than a hundred years.”
“Let us out of here,” I pleaded. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you. We
won’t—”
“I can’t let you go,” he replied in a whisper.
I remembered the story of the sea captain’s ghost. When Andrew stumbled
into the sea captain’s room and saw the old ghost, the sea captain had said the
same thing to him. “Now that you have seen me, I can never let you go.”
“You—you lost your head!” I blurted out.
“So you can’t be Andrew!” Stephanie cried. “You have a head!”
In the dim light from Stephanie’s candle, I could see the sneer spread over
Andrew’s face. “No,” he said softly. “No, no, no. I do not have my head. This is
one that I borrowed.”
He raised both hands to the sides of his face. “Here. Let me show you,” he
said.
Then he pressed his hands against his cheeks and started to tug the head up
from the black turtleneck.
26
“No! Stop!” Stephanie screeched.
I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to see him pull off his head.
When I opened my eyes, Andrew had lowered his hands.
I gazed once again around the narrow pantry. How could we escape? How
could we get out of there? The ghost was blocking the only exit.
“Why did you trick us?” Stephanie asked Andrew. “Why did you bring us
here? Why did you lie to us?”
Andrew sighed. “I told you. I borrowed this head.” He ran one hand
through the hair, then down over the cheek, as if petting it. “I borrowed it. But I
have to return it.”
Stephanie and I stared back at him in silence, waiting for him to continue.
Waiting for him to explain.
“I saw you last night in the tour group,” he said finally, his eyes locked on
me. “The others couldn’t see me. But I made myself visible to you.”
“Why?” I asked in a trembling voice.
“Because of your head,” he replied. “I liked your head.”
“Huh?” A frightened gasp escaped my throat.
He gripped the blond hair again. “I have to return this head, Duane,” he said
calmly, coldly. “So I’m going to take yours.”
27
A frightened giggle escaped my throat.
Why do people suddenly start laughing when they’re terrified? I guess it’s
because if you don’t laugh, you’ll scream. Or explode or something.
Trapped in that small, dark room with a hundred-year-old ghost that wanted
my head, I felt like laughing, screaming, and exploding all at once!
I stared hard at Andrew, squinting in the dim light. “You’re kidding, right?”
He shook his head. His silvery eyes narrowed, hard and cold. “I need your
head, Duane,” he said softly. He shrugged, as if apologizing. “I’ll pull it off
quickly. It won’t hurt a bit.”
“But—but I need it, too!” I sputtered.
“I’m only going to borrow it,” Andrew said. He took a step toward us. “I’ll
return it when I find my own head. Promise.”
“You’re not cheering me up,” I replied.
He took another step toward us.
Stephanie and I backed up a step.
He took a step. We backed up a step.
We didn’t have much more room to back up. We were nearly to the back
wall of pantry shelves.
Suddenly Stephanie spoke up. “Andrew, we’ll find your head!” she offered.
Her voice shook.
I turned to her. I’d never seen her scared before. Knowing that Stephanie
was scared made me even more scared!
“For sure!” I croaked. “We’ll find your real head. We’ll search all night. We
know this house really well. I’m sure we can find it if you give us a chance.”
He stared back at us without replying.
I wanted to get down on my knees and beg him to give us a chance.
But I was afraid that if I got down on my knees, he’d pull off my head.
“We’ll find it, Andrew. I know we will,” Stephanie insisted.
He shook his head. His borrowed head. “There’s no way,” he murmured
sadly. “How long have I been searching this house? For more than a hundred
years. For more than a hundred years, I’ve searched every hallway, every room,
every closet.”
He took another step closer. His eyes were locked on my head. I knew he
was studying it, thinking about how it would look on his shoulders.
“In all these years, I haven’t found my head,” Andrew continued. “So what
makes you think you can find it tonight?”
“Well… uh…” Stephanie turned to me.
“Uh… maybe we’ll get lucky!” I declared.
Lame. How lame can you get?
“Sorry,” Andrew murmured. “I need your head, Duane. We’re wasting
time.”
“Give us a chance!” I cried.
He took a step closer. He was studying my hair now. Probably deciding if
he should let it grow longer.
“Andrew—please!” I begged.
It was no use. His eyes were glassy now. He reached out both hands and
took another step.
Stephanie and I backed up.
“Give me your head, Duane,” the ghost whispered.
My back bumped a shelf on the wall behind me.
“I need your head, Duane.”
Stephanie and I huddled close and pressed our backs against the shelves.
The ghost floated closer, hands outstretched.
We pressed ourselves tighter against the shelves. My elbow bumped
something hard. I heard some heavy objects fall from the shelf.
“I need your head, Duane.”
He clenched and unclenched his hands. Two more steps and he’d be close
enough to grab me.
“Your head. Give me your head.”
I jammed my back against the shelves.
I heard a creaking sound—and the shelf started to slide.
I stumbled back. And realized that the whole wall was sliding.
“Wh-what’s happening?” I stammered.
The ghost reached for my head. “Gotcha!”
28
The ghost leaped at me, hands outstretched.
I ducked—and stumbled back as the wall slid away.
The wall made a loud grinding sound as it slowly spun around.
Stephanie fell to the hard floor.
I pulled her up quickly as Andrew made another wild grab for my head.
“A tunnel!” I shouted over the grinding of the wall.
As the wall spun away, it revealed a dark opening. Just big enough to
squeeze through.
I pulled Stephanie to the opening—and we squeezed inside.
We found ourselves in a long, low passageway. Some kind of tunnel.
Hidden behind the sliding wall.
I’d always heard about old houses that had secret halls and hidden rooms
built in them. I never thought I’d be so glad to find one!
Stephanie and I started to run. Our footsteps echoed loudly on the concrete
floor.
We ran past bare, concrete walls, cracked and pitted by time. We had to
stoop as we ran. The ceiling wasn’t as tall as we were!
Stephanie slowed down to glance back. “Is he following us?”
“Just keep running!” I cried. “This tunnel has got to lead out of here! Out of
this house! It’s got to!”
“I can’t see where it leads!” she replied breathlessly.
The low tunnel stretched out in a straight line. I could see only darkness at
the end.
Did it stretch on forever?
If it did, I’d keep running forever. I didn’t plan to stop running until I was
safely outside.
And once I was outside, I planned never to visit Hill House again. And I
planned to stay away from ghosts and to keep my head on my shoulders where it
belonged.
Big plans.
But plans don’t always work out.
“Ohh!” Stephanie and I both cried out as we nearly crashed into a solid
concrete wall.
The tunnel ended. It just ended.
“It—it doesn’t go anywhere!” I gasped. Breathing hard, I pounded both fists
against the wall. “Who would build a secret tunnel that leads nowhere?”
“Push on the wall,” Stephanie cried. “Let’s both push. Maybe this wall will
slide open, too.”
We turned and leaned our shoulders into the wall. And pushed. Groaning
and gasping, I pushed with all my strength.
I was still pushing when I heard the scraping footsteps moving toward us
down the tunnel.
Andrew!
“Push!” Stephanie cried.
We shoved ourselves against the wall.
“Come on—slide! Slide!” I ordered it.
I glanced back and saw Andrew, jogging slowly, steadily toward us.
“We’re trapped,” Stephanie moaned. She collapsed against the wall with a
sigh.
Andrew came trotting closer.
“Duane—I want your head!” he called, his voice echoing against the
concrete walls.
“Trapped,” Stephanie murmured.
“Maybe not,” I choked out. I pointed into the dark corner. “Look. A ladder.”
“Huh?” Stephanie leaped to her feet. She squinted at the ladder. A metal
ladder, the rungs blanketed with dust. It led straight up the wall, through a small,
square opening in the low ceiling.
To where?
“Give me your head!” the ghost called.
I grabbed the sides of the metal ladder. I raised a foot onto the first rung and
peered straight up.
Into thick blackness. I couldn’t see a thing up there.
“Duane—” Stephanie whispered. “We don’t know where it leads!”
“It doesn’t matter,” I replied, starting to climb. “We don’t have a choice—
do we?”
29
“Where are you going, Duane? I need your head!”
I ignored the ghost’s shout and scrambled up the ladder. Stephanie kept
bumping me from behind.
My sneakers slipped on the thick dust. My hands slid over the cold, metal
railings.
“Duane—you can’t get away!” Andrew called from down below.
Straight up. Straight up the ladder. Stephanie and I, breathing hard,
climbing frantically, as fast as we could climb.
Straight up.
Until the ladder started to tilt.
“Noooo!” I uttered a scream as it spilled forward.
A crumbling, cracking noise drowned out my scream.
It took me a few seconds to realize that the wall was breaking apart.
Crumbling into powdery chunks.
And we were falling.
I heard Stephanie scream.
I grabbed the metal railings with both hands—and held on tight.
But the ladder was sailing down now. Tumbling over the cracking,
crumbling old wall.
“Oww!” I landed hard. Bounced once. Twice.
My hands flew up and I was tossed off the ladder. I rolled onto my stomach,
rolled in the chunks of dirt and concrete of the broken wall.
Stephanie landed on her knees. She shook her head, dazed.
Chunks of wall spilled all around us. Stephanie’s hair was covered in dust.
I shielded my eyes and waited for the wall to stop crumbling down.
When I opened my eyes, Andrew stood above me. His hands were balled
into fists. His mouth hung open. And he was staring… staring past me.
I struggled to my feet. Turned to see what he was staring at.
“A hidden room!” Stephanie cried, moving beside me. “A room behind the
old wall.”
Slipping over the chunks of broken concrete, I took a few steps closer to the
room.
And saw what Andrew was staring at.
A head.
A boy’s head lying on the floor of the hidden room.
“I don’t believe it!” Stephanie gasped. “We found it! We actually found it!”
I swallowed hard. And took a careful step forward.
The head was pale, shimmering white, even in the dim light.
I could see clearly that it was a boy’s head. But the long, wavy hair had
turned to white. The round eyes glowed green, sparkling like emeralds in the
shimmering, pale face.
“The ghost head,” I murmured.
I turned back to Andrew. “Your head—we found it for you.”
I expected to see a smile on his face. I expected him to shout or jump for
joy.
For a hundred years, he had waited for this happy moment. And now his
long search was over.
But to my shock, Andrew’s face was twisted in horror.
He wasn’t even looking at his long lost head. He stared above it. And as he
stared, his entire body began to quiver. Frightened cries escaped his lips.
“Andrew—what is your problem?” I demanded.
But I don’t think he even heard me.
He stared up at the ceiling, trembling. Hands balled into tight fists at his
sides. Then, slowly, he raised one hand and pointed. “Nooooo,” he moaned.
“Ohhhh, nooooooo.”
I turned to see what had frightened him.
Turned in time to see a filmy figure float down from the ceiling.
At first I thought it was a thin window curtain, falling from above.
But as it curled slowly, softly to the floor, I saw that it had arms. And legs.
I could see right through it!
The air around us suddenly grew cold.
“It—it’s a ghost!” Stephanie cried, grabbing my arm.
30
The ghost landed softly, silently on the floor of the hidden room, raising its arms
like bird wings.
Stephanie and I both gasped as it raised its arms and stood upright.
It was short and very thin. It wore baggy, old-fashioned-looking pants and a
long-sleeved shirt with a high collar.
A high collar.
A collar.
And no head.
The ghost had no head!
I felt a burst of cold air as it bent down, shimmering, bending, as if made of
soft gauze. It reached down. Lifted the head off the floor.
Lifted the head to the stiff, tall collar.
Gently pressed the head into place.
And as the head touched the ghostly, gauzy neck, the green eyes flashed.
The cheeks twitched. The pale white eyebrows arched up and down.
And then the mouth moved.
The ghost turned to us—to Stephanie and me. And the lips moved in a
silent “Thank you.”
And then the arms rose into the air. Its green eyes still on us, the ghost
floated up into the air. Lighter than air, it floated silently up.
I watched in amazement, my heart pounding, until the ghostly figure
vanished in the darkness.
And then Stephanie and I both turned to Andrew at the same time. We had
just seen the headless ghost. We had just seen Andrew, the boy from a hundred
years ago. We had just watched him collect his head.
But the boy who claimed to be Andrew was still there. He stood behind us,
still trembling, his eyes wide, staring into the hidden room, making soft
swallowing sounds.
I narrowed my eyes at him. “If you aren’t Andrew,” I started—“if you
aren’t the headless ghost—then who are you?”
31
Stephanie turned on the boy, too. “Yeah. Who are you?” she asked angrily.
“If you’re not the headless ghost, why did you chase us?” I demanded.
“Well. I… uh…” The boy raised both hands as if surrendering. Then he
started to back away.
He had only gone three or four steps when we heard footsteps coming down
the long tunnel.
I turned to Stephanie. Another ghost?
“Who’s in here?” a deep voice boomed.
I saw a circle of light from a flashlight sweeping over the tunnel floor.
“Who is here?” the voice repeated.
I recognized the deep voice. Otto!
“Uh… back here,” the boy called softly.
“Seth—is that you?” The circle of light floated closer. Otto appeared behind
it, squinting at us. “What’s going on? What are you doing back here? This part
of the house is dangerous. It’s all falling apart.”
“Well… we were exploring,” Seth started. “And we got lost. It really wasn’t
our fault.”
Otto gazed at Seth sternly. Then his face filled with surprise as his flashlight
washed over Stephanie and me. “You two! How did you get in? What are you
doing here?”
“He… well… he let us in,” I answered. I pointed at Seth.
Otto turned back to Seth and shook his head unhappily. “More of your
tricks? Were you scaring these kids?”
“Not really, Uncle Otto,” Seth replied, keeping his eyes on the ground.
Uncle Otto? So Seth was Otto’s nephew!
No wonder he knew so much about Hill House.
“Tell the truth, Seth,” Otto insisted. “Were you pretending to be a ghost
again? Haven’t you played that trick on enough kids? Haven’t you scared
enough kids to death?”
Seth stood silent.
Otto rubbed a hand back over his smooth, bald head. Then he let out a
weary sigh. “We have a business to run here,” he told Seth. “Do you want to
scare my customers away? Do you want to get the whole neighborhood upset?”
Seth lowered his head and still didn’t reply.
I could see that he was in major trouble. So I decided to jump in. “It’s okay,
Otto,” I said. “He didn’t scare us.”
“That’s right,” Stephanie chimed in. “We didn’t believe he was a ghost. Did
we, Duane?”
“Of course not,” I replied. “He didn’t fool us for a minute.”
“Especially when we saw the real ghost,” Stephanie added.
Otto turned to her, studying her in the light from the flashlight. “The what?”
“The real ghost!” Stephanie insisted.
“We saw the real ghost, Uncle Otto!” Seth exclaimed. “It was awesome!”
Otto rolled his eyes. “Save the jokes, Seth. It’s too late at night. You’re just
trying to get out of trouble.”
“No. Really!” I insisted.
“Really!” Seth and Stephanie cried.
“We saw the headless ghost, Uncle Otto. You’ve got to believe us!” Seth
pleaded.
“Sure, sure,” Otto muttered. He turned and motioned with his flashlight.
“Come on. Everyone out.”
32
After our scary night at Hill House, Stephanie and I gave up haunting the
neighborhood.
It just wasn’t that exciting anymore. Especially since we’d seen a real
ghost.
We stopped sneaking out at night. We stopped peeking into kids’ windows
in scary masks. We stopped hiding behind bushes and howling like werewolves
in the middle of the night.
We gave up all the scary stuff. And we never even talked about ghosts.
Stephanie and I found other things to be interested in. I tried out for the
basketball team at school, and I became a starting forward.
Stephanie joined the Theater Arts Club. This spring, she’s going to be
Dorothy in The Wizard of Oz. Either Dorothy or a Munchkin.
We had a good winter. Lots of snow. Lots of unscary fun.
Then late one evening we were heading home from a birthday party. It was
the first warm night of spring. Tulips were blooming in some of the front yards
we passed. The air smelled fresh and sweet.
I stopped in front of Hill House and gazed up at the old mansion. Stephanie
stopped beside me. She read my mind. “You want to go in, don’t you, Duane?”
I nodded. “How about taking the tour? We haven’t been in there since…”
My voice trailed off.
“Hey, why not?” Stephanie replied.
We climbed the steep hill. Tall weeds brushed the legs of my jeans as I
made my way to the front door. The huge old house stood as dark and as creepy
as ever.
As Stephanie and I climbed onto the front stoop, the door creaked open. As
it always had.
We stepped into the small front entryway. A few seconds later, Otto
bounced into view. Dressed all in black. A friendly smile on his round, bald
head.
“You two!” he exclaimed happily. “Welcome back.” He called into the front
room. “Edna, come see who is here.”
Edna came tottering into the room. “Oh, my!” she cried, pressing a hand
against her pale, wrinkled face. “We were wondering if we would see you two
again.”
I gazed into the front room. No other customers.
“Could you take us on the tour?” I asked Otto.
He smiled his toothy smile. “Of course. Wait. I’ll get my lantern.”
Otto took us around Hill House. He gave us the complete tour.
It was great to see the house again. But it no longer held any secrets for
Stephanie and me.
After the tour, we thanked Otto and said good night.
We were halfway down the hill when a police car pulled up to the curb. A
dark-uniformed officer stuck his head out of the passenger window. “What were
you kids doing up there?” he called.
Stephanie and I made our way down to the police car. The two officers eyed
us suspiciously.
“We just took the tour,” I explained, pointing up to Hill House.
“Tour? What tour?” the officer demanded gruffly.
“You know. The haunted house tour,” Stephanie replied impatiently.
The police officer stuck his head farther out the window. He had blue eyes,
and freckles all over his face. “What were you really doing up there?” he asked
softly.
“We told you,” I said shrilly. “Taking the tour. That’s all.”
Behind the wheel, the other policeman chuckled. “Maybe a ghost gave
them the tour,” he told his partner.
“There are no tours,” the freckle-faced officer said, frowning. “There
haven’t been any tours in that house for months.”
Stephanie and I both uttered cries of surprise.
“The house is empty,” the police officer continued. “Shut down. There
hasn’t been anyone in there all winter. Hill House went out of business three
months ago.”
“Huh?” Stephanie and I exchanged startled glances. Then we both turned to
gaze up at the house.
The gray stone turrets rose up into the purple-black sky. Nothing but
darkness all around.
And then I saw a trail of soft light across the front window. Lantern light.
Orange and soft as smoke.
In the soft light, I saw Otto and Edna. They floated in front of the window. I
could see right through them, as if they were made of gauze.
They’re ghosts, too, I realized, staring into the soft, smoky light.
I blinked. And the light faded out.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

THE ABOMINABLE
SNOWMAN OF PASADENA
Goosebumps - 38
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
All my life, I’ve wanted to see snow.
My name is Jordan Blake. My life has been twelve years of sun, sand, and
chlorine. I’d never felt cold, ever—unless you count air-conditioned
supermarkets. And I don’t. It doesn’t snow in the supermarket.
I’d never felt cold, that is, until the adventure.
Some people think I’m a lucky guy to live in Pasadena, California, where
it’s always sunny and warm. It’s okay, I guess. But if you’ve never seen snow, it
seems like something out of a science-fiction movie.
Fluffy white frozen water that falls out of the sky? It piles up on the ground,
and you can make forts and snowmen and snowballs out of it? You have to admit
it sounds weird.
One day, my wish came true. I got to see snow at last. And it turned out to
be weirder than I thought.
Way weirder.
“Pay attention, kids. This is going to be cool.”
Dad’s face glowed under the red darkroom light. My sister, Nicole, and I
watched him developing film. With a pair of tongs, he dipped a sheet of special
paper in a chemical bath.
I’ve watched Dad develop film all my life. He’s a professional
photographer. But I’d never seen him so excited about photos before—and that’s
saying a lot.
Dad takes nature photos. Well, actually, he takes pictures of everything!
He never stops taking pictures. My mom says that once when I was a baby I
saw Dad and screamed. I didn’t recognize him without a camera in front of his
face. I used to think he had a zoom lens for a nose!
Our house is filled with embarrassing pictures of me—me as a baby in
baggy diapers, me with food all over my face, me crying after scraping my knee,
me hitting my sister…
Anyway, Dad had just returned from a trip to the Grand Tetons. That’s a
mountain range in Wyoming—part of the Rocky Mountains. He was all worked
up about the pictures he took there.
“I wish you kids had seen those bears,” Dad said. “A whole family of them.
The cubs reminded me of you two—always teasing each other.”
Teasing. Ha. Dad thinks Nicole and I tease each other. That’s putting it
mildly. Nicole—Miss Know-it-all—drives me crazy.
Sometimes I wish she’d never been born. I’ve made it my mission to make
her feel the same way. I mean, I try to make her wish she’d never been born.
“You should have taken us with you to the Grand Tetons, Dad,” I
complained.
“It’s very cold in Wyoming this time of year,” Nicole said.
“How do you know, Brainiac?” I jabbed her in the ribs. “You’ve never been
to Wyoming.”
“I read up on it while Dad was away,” she explained. Of course. “There’s a
picture book about it in the library if you want to know more, Jordan. It’s just
right for you—it’s for first graders.”
I couldn’t think of anything to say back. That’s my problem. I’m too slow
with the comebacks. So I jabbed her again.
“Hey, hey,” Dad murmured. “No jabbing. I’m working here.”
Dumb Nicole. Not that she’s dumb—she’s really smart. But in a dumb way
—that’s my opinion. She’s so smart she skipped fifth grade—and landed in my
class. She’s a year younger than I am and she’s in my class—and she gets
straight A’s.
Dad’s pictures floated in the chemical bath, slowly becoming clear. “Did it
snow in the mountains while you were there, Dad?” I asked.
“Sure, it snowed,” Dad replied. He was concentrating on his work.
“Did you go skiing?” I asked.
Dad shook his head. “I was too busy working.”
“How about ice-skating?” Nicole asked.
Nicole acts as if she knows everything. But like me, she’d never seen snow,
either. We’d never left Southern California—and you could tell by looking at us.
We’re both tan all year round. Nicole’s hair is greenish-blond from the
chlorine in the community pool, and mine is brown with blond streaks. We’re on
the school swim team.
“I’ll bet it’s snowing at Mom’s house right now,” Nicole said.
“Could be,” Dad replied.
Mom and Dad are divorced. Mom just moved to Pennsylvania. We’re going
to spend the summer with her. But we stayed in California with Dad to finish out
the school year.
Mom sent us some pictures of her new house. It was covered with snow. I
stared at the pictures, trying to imagine the cold.
“I wish we stayed at Mom’s house while you were gone,” I said.
“Jordan, we’ve been over this.” Dad sounded a little impatient. “You can
visit your mother when she’s settled. She hasn’t even bought furniture yet.
Where would you sleep?”
“I’d rather sleep on a bare floor than listen to Mrs. Witchens snoring on the
couch,” I grumbled.
Mrs. Witchens stayed with Nicole and me while Dad was away. She was a
nightmare. Every morning we had to clean our rooms—she actually inspected
them for dust. Every single night she served us liver, brussels sprouts, and fishhead soup with a tall glass of soy milk.
“Her name’s not Witchens,” Nicole corrected me. “It’s Hitchens.”
“I know that, Sicole,” I retorted.
Under the red light in the darkroom, the photos grew clearer. I heard
excitement in Dad’s voice.
“If these shots come out well, I can publish them in a book,” he said. “I will
call it The Brown Bears of Wyoming, by Garrison Blake. Yes, that has a nice ring
to it.”
He stopped to pull a photo out of the liquid. It dripped as he stared at it.
“That’s weird,” he murmured.
“What’s weird?” Nicole asked.
He set the picture down without saying anything. Nicole and I glanced at it.
“Dad—” Nicole said. “I hate to break it to you, but that looks like a teddy
bear.”
It was a picture of a teddy bear. A stuffed brown toy bear with a lopsided
grin, sitting in the grass. Not the kind of creature you usually find in the Grand
Tetons.
“There must be some mistake,” Dad said. “Wait until the rest of the photos
develop. You’ll see. They’re amazing.”
He pulled up another picture. He studied it. “Huh?”
I grabbed the photo. Another teddy bear.
Dad picked up a third picture. Then a fourth. He moved faster and faster.
“More teddy bears!” he cried. He was frantic. Even in the darkroom, I could
see the panic on his face.
“What’s going on?” he shouted. “Where are the photos I took?”
2
“Dad—” Nicole began. “Are you sure those bears you saw were real?”
“Of course I’m sure!” Dad boomed at her. “I know the difference between a
brown bear and a teddy bear!”
He began to pace back and forth across the darkroom floor. “Did I lose the
film somehow?” he murmured, clutching his head with one hand. “Could
someone have switched it?”
“The weird part is that you were taking pictures of bears,” Nicole noted.
“And you ended up with teddy bears. That’s just so strange.”
Dad furiously tapped his hands on the developing table. He muttered to
himself. He was starting to lose it.
“Did I lose the film on the plane somehow? Switch carry-on bags with
someone else, maybe?”
I turned my back to Dad, my shoulders shaking.
“Jordan? What’s the matter?” Dad grabbed my shoulders. “Are you all
right?”
He spun me around. “Jordan!” Dad cried. “You’re—laughing!”
Nicole crossed her arms. She narrowed her eyes at me. “What did you do to
Dad’s pictures?”
Dad frowned. His voice was calmer now. “All right, Jordan. What’s the big
joke?”
I gasped for breath, trying to stop laughing. “Don’t worry, Dad. Your
pictures are okay.”
He shoved one of the teddy bear shots in my face. “Okay! You call this
okay?!”
“I borrowed your camera before you left for Wyoming,” I explained. “I
took a bunch of shots of my old teddy bear, for a joke. The rest of the film
should have your real bears on it.”
I can’t resist a good practical joke.
Nicole said, “I had nothing to do with it, Dad. I swear.”
Little Miss Goody-Goody.
Dad shook his head. “A joke?” He turned back to the photos and developed
a few more. The next shot showed a real bear cub fishing in a stream. Dad
laughed.
“You know,” he said, putting the picture of the real bear next to one of the
teddy bear shots, “they don’t look as different as you’d think.”
I knew Dad wouldn’t stay angry. He never does. That’s one reason I like to
play tricks on him. He likes to play practical jokes, too.
“Did I ever tell you about the trick I pulled on Joe Morrison?” he asked. Joe
Morrison is a photographer friend of Dad’s.
“Joe had just gotten back from Africa, where he had spent months
photographing gorillas. He was all excited about these fabulous gorilla shots
he’d taken. I saw the pictures, and they were really spectacular.
“Joe had a big meeting set up with the editor of a nature magazine. He was
going to go in and show the editor these photos. He was sure the magazine
would snap them up in a second.
“Joe didn’t know that the editor and I had gone to college together. So I
called her up and asked her to help me play a little joke on Joe.
“When Joe went to see her, he showed her the pictures. She looked at them
without saying a word.
“Finally he couldn’t stand the suspense any longer. He blurted out, ‘Well?
Do you like them or not?’ He’s an impatient guy, Joe.”
“What did she say?” I asked.
“She frowned and said, ‘You’re a good photographer, Mr. Morrison. But
I’m afraid you’ve been tricked. The creatures you photographed aren’t gorillas at
all.’
“Joe’s jaw practically fell off his face. He said, ‘What do you mean, they’re
not gorillas?’
“She said, with a perfectly straight face, ‘They’re people in gorilla suits.
Can’t you tell the difference between a real gorilla and a man in a gorilla suit,
Mr. Morrison?’”
I chuckled. Nicole asked, “Then what happened?”
“Joe practically had a nervous breakdown. He snatched up the photos and
stared at them. He shouted, ‘I don’t get it! How could that happen? I spent six
months of my life studying people in gorilla suits?’
“Finally the editor burst out laughing and told him it was a joke. She loved
the photos and wanted to publish them. Joe wouldn’t believe her at first—it took
her fifteen minutes to get him to calm down.”
Dad and I both laughed.
“I think that’s really mean, Dad,” Nicole scolded.
I get my joker streak from Dad. Nicole takes after Mom. She’s more
practical.
“Joe thought it was funny once he got over the shock,” Dad assured her.
“He’s played his share of tricks on me, believe me.”
Dad swished another photo through the chemical bath. Then he held it up
with his tongs. It showed two bear cubs wrestling. He smiled with satisfaction.
“This roll came out great,” he said. “But I’ve got a lot more work to do in
here, kids. Go on outside for a while, okay?”
He turned the red light off and flipped on the normal light. Nicole opened
the door.
“Don’t get all messed up and dirty, though,” Dad added. “We’re all going
out to dinner tonight. I want to celebrate my luck with the brown bears.”
“We’ll be careful,” Nicole promised.
“Speak for yourself,” I said.
“I mean it, Jordan,” Dad warned.
“Just kidding, Dad.”
A wave of heat blasted us when we opened the darkroom door. Nicole and I
stepped out into the backyard, blinking in the afternoon sun. It always takes my
eyes a long time to adjust after I’ve been in the darkroom.
“What do you want to do?” Nicole asked.
“I don’t know,” I replied. “It’s so hot. It’s too hot to do much of anything.”
Nicole closed her eyes and zoned out for a minute.
“Nicole?” I nudged her. “Nicole? What are you doing?”
“I’m thinking about the snow in Dad’s pictures of the Grand Tetons. I
thought it would make me feel cooler.”
She stood perfectly still with her eyes closed. A bead of sweat dripped
down her forehead.
“Well?” I asked. “Is it working?”
She opened her eyes and shook her head. “No. How can I imagine snow if
I’ve never felt it?”
“Good point.” I sighed and gazed around me.
We live in a subdivision in the suburbs of Pasadena. There are only three
different kinds of houses in our neighborhood. The same three house styles are
repeated for miles around.
It’s so boring to look at, it makes me feel even hotter, somehow. Each block
has a couple of palm trees, not enough to give much shade. There’s a vacant lot
across the street from us, next door to the Millers’. The most exciting feature of
our backyard—maybe the whole block—is Dad’s disgusting compost heap.
I squinted and stared some more. Everything appeared bleached in the
sunlight. Even the grass looked almost white.
“I’m so bored I could scream,” I complained.
“Let’s ride our bikes,” Nicole suggested. “Maybe the breeze will cool us
off.”
“Maybe Lauren will want to go with us,” I added.
Lauren Sax lives next door to us. She’s in our class at school. I see her so
often, she might as well be my sister.
We rolled out our bikes from the garage and walked them over to Lauren’s.
We left our bikes at the side of her house. Then we went around back.
We found Lauren sitting on a towel under a palm tree in her backyard.
Nicole sat beside Lauren on the towel. I leaned against the tree.
“It’s so hot!” Lauren whined. She tugged on her yellow shorts. She’s tall
and muscular, with long brown hair and bangs.
She has a nasal voice, good for complaining. “This is supposed to be winter.
It’s winter everywhere else. A normal winter has snow and ice and sleet and
freezing rain and cold, cold air. What do we get? Nothing but sun! Why do we
have to be so hot?”
Suddenly I felt a pain in my back.
“Ow!” I jerked forward. Something stabbed me. Something stinging sharp
—and ice cold! My face twisted in pain.
“Jordan!” Nicole gasped. “What’s wrong? What’s wrong?”
3
I clutched the icy spot on my back. “What is it?” I cried. “It’s so cold!”
Nicole jumped to her feet and examined my back. “Jordan, you’ve been
stabbed!” she announced. “With a purple Popsicle!”
As I turned around I heard mean laughter. The Miller twins jumped out
from behind the tree.
I should’ve known. The Miller twins—Kyle and Kara. The twin pug noses,
the beady little eyes, the matching short-cropped red hair. Yuck. They carried
twin Super Soakers, red ones.
The Miller twins love practical jokes. They’re worse than I am. And much
meaner.
Everyone in the neighborhood is afraid of them. They pounce on little kids
waiting at the bus stop and rob them of their lunch money. Once they blew up
the Saxes’ mailbox with a stink bomb. Last year, Kyle sucker-punched me
during a basketball game. He thought it was funny to watch me turn purple.
The Millers like to pick on me more than anyone, for some reason.
Kara is just as scary as her brother Kyle. I hate to admit it, but Kara can
take me out with one punch. I know that for a fact. She gave me a black eye last
summer.
“‘Oh, it’s so hot. It’s so hot!’” Kara sneered, making fun of Lauren’s whiny
voice.
Kyle flipped his Super Soaker from one hand to the other behind his back.
He tried to make it look like a really complicated move.
“Arnold taught me how to do that,” he bragged.
Kyle wanted me to think he was talking about Arnold Schwarzenegger. He
claims he knows Arnold. I have my doubts.
Nicole tugged on the back of my shirt. “Dad’s going to kill you, Jordan,”
she said.
“Why?”
I craned my neck backwards. The back of my white polo shirt was stained
dark purple.
“Oh, great,” I muttered.
“Dad said not to get messed up,” Nicole reminded me. As if I needed to be
reminded.
“Don’t worry, Jordan,” Kyle said. “We’ll clean it off for you.”
“Uh—that’s okay,” I murmured, backing away. Whatever Kyle meant by
“clean it off”, I knew I wouldn’t like it.
I was right.
He and Kara raised their Super Soakers and squirted me, Nicole, and
Lauren.
“Stop it!” Lauren screamed. “You’re getting us all wet!”
Kyle and Kara laughed their maniac laughs. “You said you were hot!”
They drenched us. My shirt was so wet I could wring a glass of water out of
it. I glared at them.
Kyle shrugged. “We were only trying to help.”
Yeah. Sure they were.
I should’ve been grateful that all they did was soak us. We got off easy.
I can’t stand the Miller twins. Neither can Nicole and Lauren. They think
they’re so hot. Just because they’re thirteen and they have a swimming pool in
their backyard.
Their father works at a movie studio. They’re always bragging about how
they go to sneak previews and hang out with movie stars.
I haven’t seen a movie star show up at their house yet. Not once.
“Aw, you’re all wet,” Kara said, sneering. “Why don’t you take a bike ride
to dry off?”
Nicole and I exchanged glances. When we’re alone, we don’t get along so
well. But when the Millers are around, we have to stick together.
We knew the Millers too well. They wouldn’t mention our bikes without a
reason. A bad reason.
“What did you do to our bikes?” Nicole demanded.
The Millers faked wide-eyed innocence. “Who—us? We didn’t do anything
to your precious bikes. Go see for yourself.”
Nicole and I glanced around the side of Lauren’s house, where we’d left our
bikes.
“They look okay from here,” Nicole whispered.
“There’s something wrong with them,” I said. “They look weird.”
We approached our bikes. They looked weird all right. The handlebars had
been unscrewed and twisted backwards.
“Hope you have reverse gear,” Kyle snickered.
Normally, I’m not the kind of guy who goes around getting into fights. But
something in me snapped. This time Kyle and Kara had gone too far.
I jumped on Kyle. We tumbled to the ground. We wrestled. I tried to pin
him with my knee, but he pushed me over onto my side.
“Stop it!” Nicole screamed. “Stop it!”
Kyle rolled me onto my back. “You thought you could jump me, Jordan?
You’re too big a wimp!”
I kicked him. He pinned my shoulder to the ground with one knee.
Nicole shouted hysterically, “Jordan! Look out!”
I glanced up. Kara stood over me, clutching a rock the size of her head. A
mean grin spread across her face.
“Drop it, Kara!” Kyle ordered.
I tried to roll out of the way, but I couldn’t move. Kyle had me pinned.
Kara heaved the rock. Then she let it drop—right onto my head.
4
I squeezed my eyes shut.
The rock landed on my forehead—and bounced off.
I opened my eyes. Kara laughed like a hyena. She picked up the rock and
dropped it on my face again. It bounced off, just like the first time.
Lauren grabbed it. “It’s made of sponge,” she announced. She squeezed it
in her hand. “It’s a fake.”
Kyle laughed. “It’s a movie prop, moron.”
“You should’ve seen your face,” Kara added. “What a chicken!”
I kicked Kyle off me and pounced on him again. This time I was so mad I
had the strength of two Kyles. I wrestled him to the ground. I had him pinned!
“What’s going on, guys?”
Uh-oh. Dad.
I leaped to my feet. “Hi, Dad. We were just kidding around.”
Kyle sat up, rubbing his elbow.
Dad didn’t even seem to notice that we’d been fighting. He was excited
about something.
“Listen, kids—I have great news. Wilderness magazine just called. They
want to fly me to Alaska!”
“Great, Dad,” I said sarcastically. “You get to go on another exciting trip
while we stay here and die of boredom.”
“And heat,” Nicole added.
Dad laughed. “I called Mrs. Hitchens to see if she could come stay with you
again—” he began.
“Not Mrs. Hitchens again!” I cried. “Dad, she’s horrible! I can’t stand her
cooking. I’ll starve to death if she stays with us!”
“You will not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “Even if you ate only bread and water,
you could survive a week easily.”
“Nicole? Jordan? Hello?” Dad said, knocking lightly on our heads. “Will
you please listen to me? I haven’t finished yet.”
“Sorry, Dad.”
“Anyway, Mrs. Hitchens can’t come. So, I guess you two will just have to
come along with me.”
“To Alaska?” I cried. I was too excited to believe it.
“Hurray!” Nicole yelled. We jumped up and down.
“You guys are so lucky!” Lauren said. Kara and Kyle stood by. Saying
nothing.
“We’re going to Alaska!” I shouted. “We’ll get to see snow! Tons of snow!
Alaskan snow!”
I was thrilled. And Dad hadn’t even told us the interesting part yet.
“It’s a strange project,” Dad continued. “They want me to track down some
kind of snow creature—an Abominable Snowman.”
“Wow!” I gasped.
Kyle and Kara snorted.
Nicole shook her head. “An Abominable Snowman? Has anybody really
seen him?”
Dad nodded. “Some kind of snow creature has been spotted. Who knows
what it really is. Whatever it is, the magazine wants me to shoot photos of it. I’m
sure it’s a wild-goose chase. There’s no such thing as an Abominable
Snowman.”
“So why are you going?” Nicole asked.
I poked her in the ribs. “Who cares? We’re going to Alaska!”
“The magazine is paying a big fee,” Dad explained. “And even if we don’t
find a snow creature, I’ll still get some great shots of the tundra.”
Lauren asked, “What’s a tundra?”
Dad began to reply, but Nicole stepped forward. “I’ll handle this one, Dad,”
she interrupted. I felt like screaming. She does that in school all the time, too.
“A tundra is a huge frozen plain. It exists in the Arctic, in Alaska, and in
Russia. The word tundra comes from the Russian, meaning—”
I clapped my hand over her big mouth. “Any other questions, Lauren?”
Lauren shook her head. “That’s all I needed to know.”
“Egghead here goes on forever if you don’t stop her.” I let go of Nicole’s
mouth. She stuck her tongue out at me.
“This trip is going to be great,” I cried happily. “We’ll see ice and snow for
real! We’re going hunting for an Abominable Snowman! Awesome!”
An hour earlier we’d been bored out of our minds. Now suddenly
everything had changed.
Dad smiled. “I’ve got to go back to the darkroom for a while. Don’t forget
—we’re going out to dinner tonight.” He wandered back across the lawn and
into the house.
As soon as Dad was gone, Kara started laughing. “An Abominable
Snowman! What a joke!”
Typical Kara—she was too chicken to say a word while Dad was around.
Kyle made fun of me, jumping up and down and squealing, “Alaska!
Alaska! I’ll get to see snow!”
“You both will probably turn blue and freeze,” Kara sneered.
“We’ll be fine,” Nicole said. “It’s your turn to freeze!” She grabbed Kara’s
Super Soaker and sent a spray of water into Kara’s face.
“Stop it!” Kyle shouted. He dove at Nicole. Nicole laughed and ran away,
turning around to soak them every few feet.
“Give that back!” Kara yelled.
The Millers chased Nicole. Kyle raised his Super Soaker and let Nicole
have it in the back.
Lauren and I ran after them. Nicole raced into our backyard. She turned
around and squirted the Millers again.
“You can’t catch me!” she cried, shooting and walking backward.
She was backing right into Dad’s compost heap.
Should I warn her? I thought.
No way.
“Take that!” she shouted, blasting the Millers with water.
Then she slipped and fell backward—into the compost heap.
“Yuck,” Lauren groaned.
Nicole stood up slowly. Greenish-brown slime oozed in her hair and
dripped down her back, her arms, and her legs. “Ugh!” she screamed, frantically
wiping the glop off her hands. “Uggghhh!”
We all stood and stared. She looked like some kind of Abominable
Snowman herself. All covered in glop.
We were still staring when Dad popped his head out the back door. “You
kids ready to go to dinner?” he called.
5
“There it is!” Dad shouted over the roar of the small plane’s engine. “Iknek.
That’s the airstrip.”
I stared out the window at the tiny brown patch where we’d be landing. For
the last half hour I’d seen nothing but miles and miles of snow. Wow. It was so
white!
It was cool the way the snow sparkled in the sunlight. It made me think of
Christmas carols. I couldn’t get “Winter Wonderland” out of my head—and it
was driving me crazy!
I watched for giant footprints as we flew. How big would an Abominable
Snowman’s footsteps be? Big enough to see from a low-flying plane?
“I hope there’s a restaurant down there,” Nicole said. “I’m starving.”
Dad patted her shoulder. “We’ll have a big, hot meal before we set out. But
after that, it’s camping food.”
“How are we going to build a fire in the snow?” Nicole asked.
“We’ll be staying in a little cabin,” Dad replied. “It’s a long way out in the
tundra, but it’s better than sleeping in tents. There should be a stove in the cabin.
I hope so, anyway.”
“Can we build an igloo and sleep in that?” I asked. “Or dig out an ice
cave?”
“You can’t build an igloo just like that, Jordan,” Nicole snapped. “It’s not
like a snow fort or something. Right, Dad?”
Dad took the lens cap off his camera and started taking pictures through the
plane window. “Sure,” he said absently. “Uh-huh.”
Nicole turned to the window, too. I mimicked her behind her back. You
can’t build an igloo just like that, I mouthed. She acts like she’s my teacher or
something. It’s really embarrassing when she does it in front of everybody at
school.
“How are we going to find the cabin?” Nicole asked. “Everything looks the
same in all this snow.”
Dad turned and snapped a picture of her. “Did you say something, Nicole?”
“I was wondering how we’re going to find the cabin,” Nicole repeated. “Do
you know how to use a compass, Dad?”
“A compass? No, but that doesn’t matter. A man named Arthur Maxwell is
supposed to meet us at the airport. He’ll be our guide through the tundra.”
“I know Arthur,” the pilot shouted back to us. “He’s an old musher from
way back. Knows everything about dogs and sleds. He knows this part of Alaska
better than anybody, I guess.”
“Maybe he’s seen the Abominable Snowman,” I suggested.
“How do you know there is such a thing?” Nicole taunted. “We haven’t
seen any sign of him yet.”
“Nicole, people have seen him with their own eyes,” I replied. “And if
there’s no such thing, what are we doing here?”
“Some people say they’ve seen him,” Nicole said. “Or maybe they think
they’ve seen one. I won’t believe it until I get more facts.”
The plane circled the small town. I played with the zipper on my new
Arctic jacket. I’d been hungry a few minutes earlier, but now I was too excited to
think about food.
There really is an Abominable Snowman down there, I thought. I know
there is. I felt a chill, despite a blast of hot air from the plane’s heater.
What if we find him? What will happen then?
What will happen if the Abominable Snowman doesn’t like to be
photographed?
The plane flew very low now, getting ready to land. We touched down with
a bump and taxied along the runway. The plane lurched as the pilot put on the
brakes.
Something big loomed at the end of the runway. Something huge, white,
and monstrous.
“Dad, look!” I cried. “I see him! The Abominable Snowman!”
6
The plane squealed to a stop right in front of the big monster.
Dad, Nicole, and the pilot all laughed—at me.
I hate that. But I couldn’t blame them. The big white monster was a polar
bear.
A statue of a polar bear.
“The polar bear is the symbol of the town,” the pilot explained.
“Oh,” I murmured. I knew I was blushing. I turned away.
“Jordan knew that,” Dad said. “He was just playing one of his practical
jokes.”
“Uh—yeah.” I went along with it. “I knew it was a statue all along.”
“You did not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “You were really scared!”
I punched Nicole in the arm. “I was not! It was a joke.”
Dad put an arm around each of us. “Isn’t it great the way these two kid each
other?” he said to the pilot.
“If you say so,” the pilot replied.
We hopped out of the plane. The pilot opened the cargo hold. Nicole and I
grabbed our backpacks.
Dad had brought a huge, airtight trunk for film, cameras, food, sleeping
bags, and other supplies. The pilot helped him carry it off the airstrip.
The trunk was so big, Dad could fit inside it. It reminded me of a red plastic
coffin.
Iknek Airport was like a tiny wooden house, just two rooms. Two pilots in
leather jackets sat at a table playing cards.
A tall, brawny man with dark hair, a thick beard, and leathery skin stood up
and crossed the room to greet us. His gray parka hung open over a flannel shirt
and deerskin pants.
This must be our guide, I realized.
“Mr. Blake?” the man said to Dad. His voice was low and hoarse. “I’m
Arthur Maxwell. Need some help there?” He grabbed one end of the trunk from
the pilot.
“This is an awfully big trunk you brought,” Arthur added. “Do you really
need all this stuff?”
Dad reddened. “I’ve got a lot of cameras, tripods and things…. Well, maybe
I overpacked.”
Arthur frowned at me and Nicole. “I’d say so.”
“Call me Garry,” Dad said. “These are my kids, Jordan and Nicole.” He
nodded toward us.
Nicole said “Hi,” and I added, “Nice to meet you.” I can be polite when I
have to be.
Arthur stared at us. Then he grunted.
“You didn’t mention kids,” he mumbled to Dad after a minute.
“I’m sure I did,” Dad protested.
“I don’t remember it,” Arthur replied, frowning.
Everyone was silent. We pushed through the airport door and started down
the muddy road.
“I’m hungry,” I said. “Let’s go into town and get some food.”
“How far is it to town, Arthur?” Dad asked.
“How far?” Arthur echoed. “You’re looking at it.”
I stared around in surprise. There was only one road. It began at the airport
and ended in a pile of snow about two blocks away. A few wooden buildings
were sprinkled along it.
“This is it?” I cried.
“It’s not Pasadena,” Arthur grumbled. “But we call it home.”
He led us down the muddy road to a diner called Betty’s.
“I guess you’re hungry,” he grumbled. “Might as well eat a hot meal before
we set out.”
We settled into a booth by a window. Nicole and I ordered hamburgers,
french fries, and Cokes. Dad and Arthur ordered coffee and beef stew.
“I’ve got a sled and four dogs ready to go,” Arthur announced. “The dogs
can pull this trunk of yours and the other supplies. We’ll walk beside the sled.”
“That sounds fine,” Dad said.
“Whoa!!” I protested. “We’re walking? How far?”
“Ten miles or so,” Arthur replied.
“Ten miles!” I’d never walked that far before. “Why do we have to walk?
Why can’t we take a helicopter or something?”
“Because I want to take photos along the way, Jordan,” Dad explained.
“The landscape is fascinating. You never know what we’ll come across.”
Maybe we’ll come across the Abominable Snowman, I thought. That would
be cool.
Our food arrived. We all ate in silence. Arthur wouldn’t look me in the eye.
He wouldn’t look any of us in the eye. He stared out the window while he ate.
Outside on the street, a Jeep drove by.
“Have you ever seen this snow creature we’re looking for?” Dad asked
Arthur.
Arthur speared a piece of meat with his fork and popped it into his mouth.
He chewed. He chewed some more. Dad, Nicole, and I all watched him, waiting
for his answer.
Finally he swallowed. “Never seen it,” he said. “Heard about it, though.
Lots of stories.”
I waited to hear one of the stories. But Arthur kept on eating.
I couldn’t stand waiting any longer. “What kind of stories?”
He swabbed at some gravy with his bread. He stuffed it into his mouth.
Chewed. Swallowed.
“A couple of people in town,” he said. “They’ve seen the monster.”
“Where?” Dad asked.
“Out by the big snow ridge,” Arthur said. “Beyond the musher’s cabin.
Where we’re staying.”
“What does he look like?” I asked.
“They say he’s big,” Arthur said. “Big and covered with brown fur. You
might think he’s a bear. But he’s not. He walks on two feet like a man.”
I shuddered. The Abominable Snowman sounded a lot like a vicious cave
monster I saw in a horror movie once.
Arthur shook his head. “Personally, I hope we never find him.”
Dad’s jaw dropped. “But that’s what we’re here for. It’s my job to find him
—if he exists.”
“He exists all right,” Arthur declared. “Friend of mine—another musher—
he was out in a blizzard one day. Ran smack into the snow monster.”
“What happened?” I asked.
“You don’t want to know.” Arthur stuffed more bread into his mouth.
“We certainly do want to know,” Dad persisted.
Arthur stroked his beard. “The monster picked up one of the dogs and made
off with him. My friend chased after him, trying to get the dog back. Never
found him. But he could hear the dog whining. Pitiful howls. Whatever
happened to that dog—it sounded pretty bad.”
“He’s probably a carnivore,” Nicole said. “A meat-eater. Most animals
around here are. There’s so little vegetation—”
I jabbed Nicole. “I want to hear about the snowman—not your stupid nature
facts.”
Arthur flashed Nicole an annoyed glance. I figured he was thinking, What
planet is she from? That’s what I’m usually thinking, anyway.
He cleared his throat and continued. “My friend came back to town. He and
another guy went out to try and capture the snow monster. Darn foolish, if you
ask me.”
“What happened to them?” I asked.
“Don’t know,” Arthur said. “They never came back.”
“Huh?” I gaped at the big guide. I swallowed hard. “Excuse me? Did you
say they never came back?”
Arthur nodded solemnly. “They never came back.”
7
“Maybe they got lost in the tundra,” Dad suggested.
“Doubt it,” Arthur said. “Those two knew what they were doing. The
monster killed them. That’s what happened.”
He paused to butter another slice of bread.
“Close your mouth, Jordan,” Nicole said. “I don’t want to look at your
chewed-up french fries.”
I guess my mouth had been hanging open. I shut it and swallowed.
Arthur seems like a weird guy, I thought. But he’s not lying to us. He
definitely believes in the Abominable Snowman.
Nicole asked him, “Has anyone else seen the snow monster?”
“Yep. A couple of TV people from New York. They heard about what
happened to my friend and came to town to investigate. They set out into the
tundra. Never came back, either. We found one of them, frozen to death in a
block of ice. Who knows what became of the other.
“Then Mrs. Carter—she lives at the end of Main Street—she saw the snow
monster a few days later,” Arthur continued in a low voice. “She was looking
through her telescope and spied him out in the tundra. He was chewing on bones,
she said. Don’t believe me, go ask her yourself.”
Dad made a noise. I glanced at him. He was trying to keep from laughing.
I didn’t see what was so funny. This snow monster sounded pretty scary to
me.
Arthur glared at Dad. “You don’t have to believe me if you don’t want to,
Mr. Blake,” he said.
“Call me Garry,” Dad repeated.
“I’ll call you what I please, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said sharply. “What I’m
telling you is true. That monster is real—and he’s a killer! You’re taking a big
risk, chasing after him. No one has ever caught him. Anyone who goes out after
him… doesn’t return.”
“We’ll take our chances,” Dad said. “I’ve heard stories like this before, in
other parts of the world. Stories about monsters in the jungle or weird creatures
in the ocean. So far the stories have never turned out to be true. I have a feeling
the Abominable Snowman will be no different.”
Part of me really wanted to see the snow creature. But part of me hoped
Dad was right. I don’t deserve to die, I thought—just because I want to see
snow!
“Well,” Dad said, wiping his mouth. “Let’s get going. Everybody ready?”
“I’m ready,” Nicole piped up.
“Me too,” I said. I couldn’t wait to get out in the snow.
Arthur said nothing. Dad paid the lunch check.
We waited for change. “Dad,” I asked, “what if the Abominable Snowman
is real? What if we run into him? What will we do?”
He pulled something small and black out of his coat pocket.
“This is a radio transmitter,” he explained. “If we get into any kind of
trouble out in the wilderness, I can radio the ranger station in town. They’ll send
a helicopter to rescue us.”
“What kind of trouble, Dad?” Nicole asked.
“I’m sure there won’t be any trouble,” Dad assured us. “But it’s good to be
prepared for emergencies. Right, Arthur?”
Arthur smacked his lips and cleared his throat. But he didn’t reply. I figured
he was angry because Dad didn’t believe his stories about the snow monster.
Dad returned the radio transmitter to his coat pocket. He left a tip for the
waitress. Then we spilled outside into the cold Alaskan air, ready to head out for
the frozen tundra.
Was an Abominable Snowman waiting for us somewhere out there?
We would soon find out.
8
Smack!
Bulls-eye. I hit Nicole in the middle of her backpack with a snowball.
“Dad!” Nicole cried. “Jordan hit me with a snowball!”
Dad had his camera in front of his face, clicking away, as usual. “Good for
you, Nicole,” he said absently. Nicole rolled her eyes.
Then she ripped off my ski cap. She stuffed it with snow and smushed it on
top of my head.
Snow trickled down my face. The cold burned my skin.
At first I thought snow was cool. I could mush it up in my hand to make
snowballs. Fall down in it without getting hurt. Put it on my tongue and let it
melt into water.
But I was beginning to feel the cold. My toes and fingers were getting
numb. We had already walked two miles out of town. When I looked back, I
couldn’t see it. I could only see snow and sky.
Only eight more miles to the cabin, I thought, wiggling my fingers inside
my mittens. Eight more miles! It was going to take forever. And all around us,
nothing but snow—miles and miles of it.
Dad and Arthur trudged beside the dogsled. Arthur had brought along four
Alaskan huskies—Binko, Rocky, Tin-tin, and Nicole’s favorite, Lars. They
pulled Dad’s big trunk and the other supplies in a long, narrow sled.
Nicole and I each carried a backpack filled with emergency food and other
supplies. Just in case, Dad said.
In case of what? I wondered. In case we get lost? In case the dogs run away
with the sled? In case the Abominable Snowman captures us?
Dad snapped pictures of the dogs, of us, of Arthur, of the snow.
Nicole threw herself backwards into a snowdrift. “Look—an angel!” she
cried, waving her arms up and down.
She jumped up and we checked out the snow angel. “Cool,” I admitted. I
lay on my back to make one, too. When Nicole came closer to inspect it, I
whopped her with a snowball.
“Hey!” she cried. “I’m going to get you for that!”
I leaped up and darted away. The deep snow crunched under my shoes.
Nicole ran after me. We raced ahead of the dogsled.
“Be careful, kids!” Dad called after us. “Stay out of trouble!”
I stumbled in the snow. Nicole pounced on me. I wriggled free and bolted
away.
What kind of trouble could we get into? I thought as my feet crunched
along. There’s nothing but snow for miles around. We couldn’t even get lost out
here!
I turned around and ran backwards, waving at Nicole. “Try and catch me,
Miss Factoid!” I teased.
“Name-calling is so immature!” she yelled, chasing after me.
Then she stopped and pointed behind me. “Jordan! Look out!”
“Hey—I’m not falling for that old trick,” I called back. I skipped backwards
through the snow. I didn’t want to take my eyes off her, in case she planned to
pelt me with snowballs.
“Jordan, I mean it!” she screamed. “Stop!”
9
Thud!
I landed hard on my back in a pile of snow. “Unh!” I grunted, stunned.
I struggled to catch my breath. Then I stared around me.
I had fallen down some kind of deep crevasse. I sat shivering in the pile of
snow, surrounded by narrow cliffs of bluish ice and rock.
I stood and looked up. The opening of the crevasse was at least twenty feet
above me. Frantically, I clutched at the icy walls. I grabbed onto a jutting rock
and fumbled for a foothold, hoping to climb out.
I hoisted myself up a couple of feet. Then my hand slipped and I slid back
to the bottom. I tried again. The ice was too slick.
How would I ever get out of here?
Where were Dad and Nicole? I tried to warm my cheeks with my mittens.
Why don’t they come to get me? I’m going to freeze down here!
Nicole’s face appeared at the top of the crevasse. I’d never been so happy to
see her in my life.
“Jordan? Are you all right?”
“Get me out of here!” I shouted.
“Don’t worry,” Nicole assured me. “Dad’s coming.”
I leaned against the pit wall. The sunlight didn’t reach the bottom. My toes
felt ready to break off. They were so cold! I jumped up and down to keep warm.
A few minutes later, I heard Dad’s voice. “Jordan? Are you hurt?”
“No, Dad!” I called up to him. He, Nicole, and Arthur all stared down at me
from above.
“Arthur is going to lower a rope down to you,” Dad instructed. “Hold on to
it, and we’ll hoist you out of there.”
I stepped aside as Arthur tossed one end of a knotted rope into the crevasse.
I clutched the rope with my mittened hands.
Arthur shouted, “Heave!”
Dad and Arthur tugged on the rope. I planted my feet in footholds in the
ice, bracing myself against the side of the crevasse. The rope slipped out of my
hands. I clutched it tighter.
“Hold on, Jordan!” Dad called.
They pulled again. My arms felt as if they were going to be yanked out of
their sockets. “Ow!” I cried. “Careful!”
Slowly they hoisted me to the top of the crevasse. I wasn’t much help—my
feet kept slipping on the icy walls. Dad and Arthur each took one of my hands
and dragged me out of the pit.
I lay on the snow, trying to catch my breath.
Dad tested my arms and legs for sprains and breaks. “You sure you’re all
right?” he asked.
I nodded.
“It was a mistake to haul kids along,” Arthur grumbled. “The snow is not as
solid as it looks, you know. If we hadn’t seen you fall, we never would have
found you.”
“We’ve got to be more careful,” Dad agreed. “I want you both to stick close
to the sled.” He leaned over the side of the crevasse and snapped a picture.
I stood up and brushed the snow from the seat of my pants. “I’ll be careful
from now on,” I promised.
“Good,” Dad said.
“We’d better push on,” Arthur said.
We started walking again across the snow. I gave Nicole a shove once in a
while, and she shoved me back. But we were quieter now. Neither of us wanted
to end up frozen to death at the bottom of a snow hole.
Dad snapped away as we walked. “How much farther to the cabin?” he
asked Arthur.
“Another couple of miles,” Arthur replied. He pointed to a steep mountain
of snow in the distance. “See that snow rise, about ten miles off? That’s where
the monster was last spotted.”
The Abominable Snowman had been seen by that snow rise, I thought.
Where was he now?
Could he see us coming? Was he hiding somewhere, watching us?
I kept my eyes on the snow rise as we walked. It seemed to grow bigger as we
came closer to it. The snow rise was dotted with pine trees and boulders.
After about an hour, a tiny brown speck appeared a mile or so away.
“That’s the abandoned musher’s cabin where we’ll stop for the night,” Dad
explained. He rubbed his gloves together and added, “It sure will be nice to sit
by a roaring fire.”
I clapped my mittens together to keep the blood flowing through my hands.
“I can’t wait,” I agreed. “It must be minus two thousand degrees out here!”
“Actually, it’s about minus ten,” Nicole stated. “At least, that’s the average
temperature for this area at this time of year.”
“Thank you, Weather Girl,” I joked. “And now for sports. Arthur?”
Arthur frowned into his beard. I guess he didn’t get the joke.
He fell behind us a little to check the back of the sled. Dad turned around to
snap Arthur’s picture.
“When we get to the musher’s cabin I’ll take a few more scenery photos,”
Dad said, as he changed his film. “Maybe I’ll photograph the cabin, too. Then
we’ll all turn in. We have a big day tomorrow.”
By the time we reached the cabin it was almost eight o’clock at night.
“Took us too long to get here,” Arthur grumbled. “We left town after lunch.
It should’ve taken us about five hours. The kids having accidents and all is
slowing us down.”
Dad stood a few feet away from him, shooting a portrait of Arthur while he
talked.
“Mr. Blake, did you hear me?” Arthur growled. “Stop taking my picture!”
“What?” Dad said, letting his camera drop to his chest. “Oh, yeah—the
kids. Bet they’re hungry.”
I explored the musher’s cabin. It didn’t take long. The tiny wooden shack
was empty except for an old wood-burning stove and a couple of broken-down
cots.
“Why is the cabin so empty?” Nicole asked.
“Mushers don’t stop here anymore,” Arthur explained. “They’re afraid of
the monster.”
I didn’t like the sound of that. I glanced at Nicole. She rolled her eyes.
Arthur bedded the dogs in a lean-to outside the cabin. The lean-to was a
shed built against the back cabin wall. It was filled with straw for the dogs to
sleep on. I spotted a rusty old dogsled propped in a corner.
Then Arthur lit a fire and began to fix some supper.
“Tomorrow we’ll search for this so-called monster,” Dad announced.
“Everybody get a good night’s sleep.”
After supper we crawled into our sleeping bags. I lay awake for a long time,
listening to the howling wind outside. Listening for the thudding footsteps of an
Abominable Snowman.
“Nicole, get off me!” She rolled over in her sleeping bag and jabbed her elbow
into my ribs. I knocked her arm away and snuggled deeper inside my own toasty
warm sleeping bag.
Nicole opened her eyes. Bright morning sunshine streamed into the cabin.
“I’ll be back in a minute to fix breakfast, kids,” Dad said. He sat in a chair,
lacing up his snow boots. “First I’m going out to check on the dogs. Arthur went
out to feed them a few minutes ago.”
He bundled up and stepped outside. I rubbed my nose—it was cold. The
fire in the stove had gone out during the night. No one had relit it yet.
I forced myself to climb out of my sleeping bag and start pulling on clothes.
Nicole began dressing, too.
“Do you think there’s a hot shower in this dump?” I wondered aloud.
Nicole smirked at me. “You know perfectly well there’s no hot shower,
Jordan.”
“Oh, wow! This is incredible!” I heard Dad’s shout from outside.
I jammed my feet into my boots and raced out the door. Nicole pushed right
behind me.
Dad stood at the side of the musher’s cabin, pointing in shock at the ground.
I gazed down—and saw deep footprints in the snow. Huge footprints.
Enormous footprints.
So big that only a monster could have made them.
10
“Unbelievable,” Dad murmured, staring at the snow.
Arthur hurried over from the lean-to. He stopped when he saw the prints.
“No!” he cried. “He was here!”
His ruddy face grew pale. His jaw trembled with terror.
“We’ve got to get away from here—now!” he said to Dad in a low,
frightened voice.
Dad tried to calm him down. “Hold on a minute. Let’s not jump to
conclusions.”
“We’re in terrible danger!” Arthur insisted. “The monster is nearby! He’ll
rip us all to shreds!”
Nicole knelt in the snow, studying the footprints. “Do you think they’re
real?” she asked. “Real Abominable Snowman footprints?”
She thinks they’re real, I thought. She believes.
Dad knelt beside her. “They look pretty real to me.”
Then I saw a light glimmer in his eyes. He lifted his head and squinted at
me suspiciously.
I backed away.
“Jordan!” Nicole cried in an accusing voice.
I couldn’t help it. I started laughing.
Dad shook his head. “Jordan. I should’ve known.”
“What?” Arthur looked confused—and then angry. “You mean the kid
made these prints? It’s a joke?”
“I’m afraid so, Arthur,” Dad sighed.
Arthur scowled at me. Beneath his beard, his face reddened to the color of a
slab of raw steak.
I cowered. I couldn’t help it. Arthur scared me. He sure didn’t like kids—
especially not kids who play jokes.
“I’ve got work to do,” Arthur muttered. He turned and stomped away
through the snow.
“Jordan, you crumb,” Nicole said. “When did you do it?”
“I woke up early this morning and sneaked out,” I admitted. “You were all
sleeping. I carved the footprints over my own prints, with my mittens. Then I
stepped in the prints on my way back, to cover my tracks.
“You believed,” I added, jabbing a finger at Nicole. “For a minute there,
you believed in the snow monster.”
“I did not!” Nicole protested.
“Yes, you did. I got you to believe!”
I glanced from Nicole’s peevish face to Dad’s stern one. “Don’t you think
it’s funny?” I asked. “It’s just a joke!”
Usually Dad liked my jokes.
Not this time.
“Jordan, we’re not at home in Pasadena now. We’re out in the middle of
nowhere. The wilds of Alaska. Things could get very dangerous. You saw that
yesterday when you fell down the crevasse.”
I nodded and hung my head.
“I’m serious, Jordan,” Dad warned me. “No more practical jokes. I’m here
to work. And I don’t want anything to happen to you, or Nicole, or any of us.
Understood?”
“Yes, Dad.”
No one said anything for a minute. Then Dad patted me on the back. “Okay,
then. Let’s go inside and get some breakfast.”
Arthur returned to the cabin a few minutes later. He stamped the snow off
his boots, glaring at me.
“You think you’re funny,” he muttered. “But wait till you see the snowman.
Will you be laughing then?”
I swallowed hard.
The answer to his question was no. Definitely no.
11
After breakfast we hitched the dogs to the sled and set off for the snow rise.
Arthur wouldn’t talk to me and would hardly look at me. I guess he was angry
about my joke.
Everybody else has forgiven me, I thought. Why won’t he?
Nicole and I walked at the front of the sled with the dogs. Behind me I
heard Dad’s camera clicking furiously. I knew that meant he’d found something
good to photograph. I turned around.
A large herd of elk moved toward us, toward the snow rise. We stopped to
watch them.
“Look at them,” Dad whispered. “Amazing.” He quickly loaded new film
into his camera and started snapping away again.
The elk calmly picked their way across the snow, antlers high. They
stopped to eat at a stand of bushes. Arthur pulled back the rein on the lead sled
dog to keep him from barking.
Suddenly, one elk lifted its head. It seemed to sense something.
The other elk tensed up, too. Then they turned and began to gallop away
across the tundra. Their hooves thundered over the snow.
Dad let his camera fall against his chest. “That’s strange,” he said. “I
wonder what happened.”
“Something scared them,” Arthur said grimly. “It wasn’t us. And it wasn’t
the dogs.”
Dad scanned the horizon. “What was it, then?”
We all waited for Arthur’s answer. But he only said, “We ought to turn
around and head back to town right now.”
“We’re not going back,” Dad insisted. “Not after coming all this way.”
Arthur stared at him. “Are you going to take my advice or not?”
“No,” Dad replied. “I’ve got a job to do here. And I’ve hired you to do a
job. We’re not going back without a good reason.”
“We’ve got a good reason,” Arthur insisted. “Only you won’t see it that
way.”
“Push ahead,” Dad ordered.
Arthur frowned and shouted “Mush!” to the dogs. The sled began to move.
We followed it, on toward the snow rise.
Nicole walked a few feet ahead of me. I picked up a pile of snow and patted
it into a ball. But then I thought I’d better not throw it. No one seemed to be in
the mood for snowball fights.
We marched through the snow for a couple of hours. I slipped off my
mittens and wiggled my fingers. Frost kept collecting on my upper lip. I wiped it
away.
We reached a stand of pine trees at the base of the snow rise. Suddenly the
dogs stopped short. They began to bark.
“Mush!” Arthur shouted.
The dogs refused to go farther.
Nicole ran up to her favorite dog, Lars. “What is it, Lars? What’s the
matter?”
Lars howled.
“What’s wrong with them?” Dad asked Arthur.
Arthur’s face paled again. His hands shook. He stared intently into the trees,
squinting into the brightness.
“Something’s frightened the dogs,” he said. “Look how their fur stands on
end.”
I patted Lars. It was true. His fur stood straight up. The dog growled.
“Not much scares these dogs,” Arthur said. “Whatever it is, it’s scaring
them bad.”
The dogs all howled.
Nicole huddled close to Dad.
“There’s something dangerous on that snow rise,” Arthur said. “Something
dangerous—and very near.”
12
“I’m warning you, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said. “We’ve got to go back.”
“No way,” Dad protested. “We’re not going back. I mean it.”
The dogs barked and skittered nervously. Arthur shook his head. “I won’t
go any farther. The dogs won’t, either.”
Dad shouted, “Mush!” to the dogs. They howled and started backing up.
“Mush!” he cried again. Instead of going forward, the dogs tried to turn
around in the snow.
“You’re upsetting them,” Arthur said. “They won’t go any farther—I told
you that.
“If we turn around now,” Arthur added, “we can make it back to the cabin
before it gets too late.”
“What are we going to do, Dad?” I asked.
Dad frowned. “Maybe Arthur’s right. Something is definitely frightening
the dogs. There could be a bear or something nearby.”
“Not a bear, Mr. Blake,” Arthur insisted. “These dogs are spooked. And so
am I.”
He marched away across the snow, heading back toward the musher’s
cabin.
“Arthur!” Dad called. “Come back here!”
Arthur didn’t turn around. He didn’t say a word. He just kept walking.
He must be really scared, I thought. And that sent a chill of fear down my
back.
Still barking excitedly, the dogs pulled the sled around and started
following Arthur.
Dad peered into the woods. “I wish I could see what’s out there.”
“Let’s go check it out,” I urged. “Whatever it is, it’ll probably make a great
photo.” That usually gets Dad.
He glanced back at Arthur, the dogs, and the sled, rushing toward the cabin.
“No—it’s too dangerous. We have no choice. Let’s go, kids.”
We trudged back to the cabin. “Maybe I can persuade Arthur to push on
tomorrow,” Dad muttered.
I didn’t say anything. But I had a feeling it wouldn’t be easy to get Arthur
to climb that snow rise.
And maybe Arthur was right, I thought. Those dogs really were scared. It
was definitely creepy.
Arthur was unhitching the dogs from the sled when we reached the cabin.
The dogs had calmed down a lot.
I yanked off my backpack and collapsed on top of my sleeping bag.
“We might as well eat supper,” Dad grumbled. I could tell he was in a
terrible mood. “Jordan—why don’t you and Nicole go gather some firewood.
But be careful.”
“We will, Dad,” Nicole promised.
I stood up and started out of the cabin.
“Jordan!” Dad scolded. “Put your knapsack back on. I don’t want you going
anywhere without it. Understood?”
“We’re just going for firewood,” I protested. “I’m tired of carrying it. We’ll
only be gone for a few minutes—and anyway, Nicole is wearing hers.”
“No arguments,” Dad snapped. “If you get lost, that food could keep you
alive until we find you. You leave this cabin, you wear that backpack. Is that
clear?”
Boy, was he in a bad mood. “It’s clear,” I said, strapping on my pack.
Nicole and I crunched across the snow to the nearest trees. They lined a
snow ridge about half a mile away.
We climbed the snow ridge. I made it to the top first.
“Nicole—look!”
On the other side of the snow ridge, I saw a frozen stream. The first water
we’d seen since we’d set out.
Nicole and I skittered down the ridge and stared into the icy stream. I tested
the ice with my foot.
“Don’t step on it, Jordan!” Nicole cried. “You might fall in.”
I tapped the ice with the tip of my boot. “It’s solid,” I told her.
“Still,” Nicole said. “Don’t take any chances. Dad will kill you if you have
another accident.”
“I wonder if there are fish swimming under there,” I said, staring into the
ice.
“We should tell Dad about this,” Nicole said. “He might want to photograph
it.”
We left the stream to gather dead branches under the trees. We lugged them
over the snow ridge and back across the snow to the cabin.
“Thanks, kids,” Dad said when we burst into the cabin. He took the wood
from us and started a fire in the stove. “How about pancakes for supper tonight?”
He’s in a better mood now, I thought with relief.
Nicole told Dad about the frozen stream.
“Interesting,” Dad said. “I’ll go take a look at it after supper. I’ve got to find
something to photograph besides all this ice and snow.”
The pancakes cheered all of us up—except for Arthur.
He ate a lot, but he didn’t say much. He appeared jittery. He dropped his
fork on the floor. Muttering to himself, he picked it up and started eating without
wiping it off.
When supper was over, Nicole and I helped Dad clean up.
We were gathering up the supplies when the dogs started to bark.
I saw Arthur freeze.
“What’s that?” I cried. “What’s upset the dogs?”
13
The dogs yelped and barked.
Was someone out there?
An animal? A monster?
“I’ll go check,” Arthur said solemnly. He pulled on his coat and wool cap
and hurried out of the cabin.
Dad grabbed his coat. “Stay here,” he instructed Nicole and me. He
followed Arthur.
We stared at each other, listening to the yelping dogs. A few seconds later,
the barking stopped.
Dad poked his head back into the cabin. “Nothing out there. We don’t know
what got them upset. But Arthur is calming them down.”
Dad grabbed his camera. “You two get some sleep, okay? I’m going to
check out that stream. I won’t be gone long.”
He draped the camera over his fur coat collar. The cabin door slammed
behind him.
We heard Dad’s footsteps crunching over the snow. Then silence. Nicole
and I climbed into our sleeping bags.
I rolled onto my side, trying to get comfortable. It was after eight o’clock,
but still light outside. The sun filtered through the window of the cabin.
The light reminded me of when I was little. Mom used to try to make me
take a nap in the afternoon. I never could sleep in the daytime.
I closed my eyes. I opened them. I wasn’t sleepy.
I turned my head and glanced at Nicole. She lay on her back, her eyes wide
open.
“I can’t sleep,” I announced.
“Me either,” she replied.
I squirmed in my sleeping bag.
“Where’s Arthur?” Nicole asked. “I wonder what’s taking him so long?”
“I guess he’s hanging out with the dogs,” I said. “I think he likes them
better than he likes us.”
“That’s for sure,” Nicole agreed.
We tossed and turned some more. The sky stayed bright. The light poured
in through the cabin window.
“I give up,” I groaned. “Let’s go outside and build a snowman or
something.”
“Dad said to stay put.”
“We won’t go anywhere. We’ll stay by the cabin,” I assured her.
I crawled out of my sleeping bag and started getting dressed. Nicole sat up.
“We shouldn’t,” she warned.
“Come on. What could happen?”
She stood up and pulled on her sweater. “If I don’t do something, I’ll go
stir-crazy,” she admitted.
We bundled up. I pulled open the cabin door.
“Jordan—wait!” Nicole cried. “You forgot your backpack.”
“We’re just going out the door,” I complained.
“Come on. Dad said we have to. He’ll be furious if he finds us outside. And
he’ll be even more furious if you’re not wearing your pack.”
“Oh, all right,” I grumbled. I hoisted the pack over my shoulders. “Like
something’s really going to happen to us.”
We stepped out into the cold. I kicked at the snow.
Nicole grabbed my coat sleeve. “Listen!” she whispered.
We heard the crunch of footsteps behind the cabin. “It’s Arthur,” I told her.
We crept around to the back. It was Arthur.
He crouched beside the dogsled, hitching up one of the dogs. Two others
were already tied to the sled.
“Arthur!” I cried. “What’s up?”
Startled, he turned to us. He didn’t reply. Instead, he jumped on the back of
the sled.
“Mush!” he commanded the dogs at the top of his lungs.
The dogs leaned forward, tugging hard. The sled began to slide away.
“Arthur! Where are you going?” I screamed. “Come back!”
The sled picked up speed.
“Arthur! Arthur!” Nicole and I ran after him, shouting his name.
But the sled raced farther and farther away from us.
Arthur never turned back.
14
Nicole and I chased after the sled, watching it grow tinier and tinier.
“Arthur! Come back!”
“He’s got our food!” I cried.
We couldn’t let him get away. We ran as fast as we could, our boots falling
deep into the snow.
The sled climbed over a tall ridge of snow.
“Stop! Stop!” Nicole screamed. “Please!”
“We can’t keep up with the dogs,” I gasped.
“We have to try,” Nicole cried frantically. “We can’t let Arthur leave us
here!”
The sled disappeared over the top of the ridge. We clawed our way up. The
snow slid under our feet.
By the time we reached the top, Arthur and the dogs were far ahead of us.
We watched in horror as they quickly disappeared across the tundra.
Exhausted, I collapsed in the snow. “They’re getting away,” I choked out.
“Jordan, get up!” Nicole pleaded.
“We can’t catch him,” I moaned.
Then Nicole said in a small voice, “Where are we?”
I stood up and gazed around. Snow, snow, snow. All around us, nothing but
snow. No landmarks. No sign of the cabin.
Clouds had covered the sun. The wind picked up. Snow began to fall.
I had no idea where we were.
“Which way is the cabin?” I asked in a shrill voice. “Which way did we
come?”
We scanned the horizon through the falling snow. I didn’t see the cabin
anywhere.
Nicole tugged on my arm. “The cabin is that way. Let’s go!”
“No!” The snow came down harder and faster, stinging my eyes. I shouted
into the wind. “The cabin’s the other way! That’s not the way we came.”
“Look!” Nicole yelled, pointing down. “Our tracks! We’ll just follow them
home.”
We started down the ridge, following the ruts we’d made in the snow. The
wind howled, growing stronger.
We followed our own footprints for a short while. It was so hard to see in
the falling snow. All white and gray. The whole world. White and gray.
Nicole peered at me through the thick curtain of snow. “I can hardly see
you!” she shouted.
We crouched low, searching for our footprints.
“They’re gone!” I cried. The snow had already covered them up.
Nicole clutched my arm. “Jordan, I’m getting scared.”
I was getting scared, too. But I didn’t tell Nicole.
“We’ll find the cabin,” I assured her. “Don’t worry. I bet Dad’s looking for
us right now.”
I wished I believed it myself. The wind pelted us with hard, icy snow. I
squinted into the wind. Nothing but white. White on white. White on gray.
“Don’t let go of me!” I shouted to Nicole.
“What?”
“I said, don’t let go of me! We could easily lose each other in the storm!”
She tightened her grip on my arm to show she understood.
“I’m so cold,” she shouted. “Let’s run!”
We tried to run through the snow, stumbling against the wind. “Dad!” we
called out. “Dad!”
I had no idea where we were going—but I knew we had to go somewhere.
“Look!” Nicole cried, pointing through the thick snow. “I think I see
something!”
I stared as hard as I could, but I didn’t see anything.
Nicole pulled me along. “Come on!” she shouted.
We ran blindly. Suddenly, the ground gave way under our feet.
Still holding onto Nicole, I felt myself being sucked down under the snow.
15
Down we fell. Down into the freezing white.
The snow rushed up, swirled around us.
And buried us.
Another crevasse, I thought. Another deep pit in the snow.
Much deeper than the first.
We both cried out as we landed. Tangled up in each other.
“Get off!” Nicole shrieked. “Where are we? Get off!”
Feeling dazed, I struggled to my feet. Then I grabbed both of her hands and
tugged her up.
“Oh no,” Nicole groaned.
We both stared up to the top. I could barely make out the gray of the sky,
high above our heads.
And all around us, high walls of snow. Powdery snow that blew down on
us. I peered up to the top of the pit. Chunks of snow broke off the icy walls.
They made soft thuds as they landed beside us on the snowy pit floor.
“We’re trapped down here!” Nicole wailed. “Dad will never find us.
Never!”
I grabbed the shoulders of her coat. A chunk of snow fell off the pit wall
and landed on top of my boots. “Try to stay calm,” I told her. But my voice
trembled as I said it.
“Calm? How can I stay calm?” she demanded shrilly.
“Dad will find us,” I said. I wasn’t sure I believed it. I swallowed hard,
trying to fight down my panic.
“Daaaaaad!” Nicole screamed. She cupped her hands around her mouth,
raised her head toward the sky, and screamed at the top of her lungs.
“Daaaaaaad! Daaaaaaaaad!”
I clapped a mitten over her mouth.
Too late.
I heard a low rumbling.
The rumbling became a roar as the snow walls began to crack and crumble.
Crumble down. Down on us.
Trembling in horror, I knew what was happening.
Nicole had started an avalanche.
16
As sheets of snow tumbled down on us, I grabbed Nicole.
I pushed her against the pit wall. Then I flattened myself against the wall,
too.
The snow roared down.
I pressed myself tight against the wall—and to my shock, the wall gave
way!
“Ooooh!” I let out a startled cry. Nicole and I tumbled through the side of
the pit.
We stumbled forward into total darkness.
I heard a crash behind us. My heart pounding, I turned in time to see the pit
fill up. Snow piled over the opening in the wall.
Nicole and I were sealed in. Shut in this dark hole.
Our way out was gone. The pit was gone.
We crouched in the dark tunnel-like opening, trembling, gasping in fright.
“Where are we?” Nicole choked out. “What do we do now?”
“I don’t know.” I grabbed the wall. We seemed to be in a narrow
passageway. The walls around us were made of rock instead of snow.
My eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see a dim light at the end of the
passageway.
“Let’s see what’s down there,” I urged Nicole.
We crawled on our hands and knees through the passage toward the light.
The passage ended. We stood up.
We found ourselves in a big cave. The top of the cave towered high above
our heads. Water trickled slowly down one of the walls. A dim glow came from
somewhere near the back.
“The light must be coming from outside,” Nicole said. “That means there’s
a way out of here.”
We crept slowly through the cave. The only sound I could hear was the
drip, drip, drip of melting icicles.
Soon we’ll be out of here, I thought. “Jordan,” she whispered. “Look!”
On the floor of the cave I could make out a footprint. A gigantic footprint.
Bigger than the fake one I’d made in the snow that morning.
Five of my shoes could fit inside that footprint.
I took a few steps—and saw another footprint.
Nicole grabbed my arm.
“Do you think it’s…?” She stopped.
I knew what she was thinking.
We traced the giant footprints across the cave floor. They led us straight to a
shadowy corner in the back—and stopped.
I glanced up.
Nicole gasped.
We both saw it at the same time.
The creature.
The Abominable Snowman!
He loomed over us.
He stood upright like a human, covered in brown fur. Black eyes stared out
of an ugly face, half-human, half-gorilla.
He wasn’t that tall—about a head taller than me—but he seemed huge. His
body was thick and powerful, with gigantic feet and fur-covered hands—as big
as baseball gloves.
“We’re t-trapped!” Nicole stammered.
She was right.
The entrance behind us had been blocked by the avalanche. There was no
way we could slip past this giant creature.
No way.
The Abominable Snowman glared down at us. Then it started to move.
17
My teeth began to chatter.
I squeezed my eyes shut and trembled, waiting for the monster to grab us.
A second passed. Then another.
Nothing happened.
I opened my eyes. The snowman hadn’t moved.
Nicole took a step forward. “He’s frozen!” she cried.
I blinked in the dim light. “Huh?” It was true. The snowman stood frozen in
a huge block of clear ice.
I touched the ice. The monster stood inside it like a statue.
“If he’s frozen in ice,” I wondered, “then what made those giant
footprints?”
Nicole bent down to study the prints. She shuddered again at their huge
size.
“They lead right to the block of ice,” she declared. “The snowman must
have made them somehow.”
“Maybe he walked back here and accidently froze,” I suggested. I touched
the back wall of the cave, where icy water dripped from above.
“Or maybe he goes into the ice to rest,” I added. “Like Dracula going to
sleep in his coffin at dawn.”
I backed away. It was too frightening, being this close to him. But the
monster stayed perfectly still under the thick ice.
Nicole leaned close to the ice. “Look at his hands!” she cried. “Or paws, or
whatever.”
Like the rest of his body, his hands were covered with brown fur. He had
thick fingers, like a man’s. Jutting out of them were long, sharp claws.
A chill ran down my spine at the sight of those claws. What did he use them
for? Ripping wild animals to pieces? Tearing up people who got in his way?
He had powerful legs, with shorter claws on his toes. I studied his face. Fur
covered his whole head, except for a circle of hairless skin around his eyes, nose,
and mouth. The skin was a pinkish red. His lips were thick and white and set in a
mean-looking grimace.
“He’s definitely a mammal,” Nicole declared. “The fur is a dead giveaway.”
I rolled my eyes. “This is no time for biology lessons, Nicole. Wait until
Dad sees this. He’ll go crazy! If he can get a picture of this, he’ll be famous!”
“Yeah,” Nicole sighed. “If we can find Dad. If we ever get out of here.”
“There’s got to be a way out,” I said. I moved to a side wall and pressed it
with my hands, searching for a hole, a chink in the rock, anything.
After a few minutes I found a tiny crack. “Nicole!” I cried. “I found
something!”
She raced to my side. I pointed out the crack in the cave wall. She frowned
with disappointment.
“That’s just a crack,” she said.
“You don’t know everything,” I protested. “Maybe there’s a secret door
here. A hidden passage. Or something.”
She sighed. “I guess it’s worth a shot.”
We pressed on the crack. We stuck our fingers into it. We kicked it. I even
tried karate-chopping it.
Nothing.
“I hate to break this to you, Jordan,” she said. “But I was right. As always.
All you found was a crack in the wall.”
“Well, keep looking,” I snarled. “We’ve got to get out of here!”
I kept searching. I ran my hands along the wall, my back to the monster.
Suddenly I heard a noise. A loud crack!
“Nicole!” I cried. “Did you find something?”
I whirled around. I realized Nicole hadn’t made that sound. She stared at the
monster in horror.
“What?” I asked her. “What’s wrong?”
I heard another crack!
“The ice is cracking!” Nicole screamed. “The monster—he’s breaking out!”
18
Crack!
The block of ice splintered apart. Nicole and I pressed ourselves against a
wall, watching in horror.
The Abominable Snowman burst from the ice. Chunks of ice smashed on
the floor and shattered like glass. The snowman shook himself, growling like a
wolf.
“Run!” I screamed.
Nicole and I took off. But there was nowhere to go. We scrambled to the
other side of the cave—as far away from the monster as we could get.
“The passageway!” I cried. I ducked down and started to crawl through the
passage.
Nicole grabbed me.
“Wait! It’s blocked! The avalanche—remember?”
Yes. Of course. The way out of the cave was blocked by tons of snow.
Across the cave, the monster uttered a ferocious roar that shook the walls.
Nicole and I cowered in a corner of the cave. I felt her trembling next to
me.
“Maybe he didn’t see us,” I whispered.
“Then why is he roaring?” Nicole whispered back.
The monster twitched his gorilla nose in the air, sniffing.
Oh, no! I thought. Can he smell us from across the cave?
He turned his huge, furry head one way and then the other.
He’s searching for us, I realized. He smells us.
“Unh!” he grunted. He stared into a corner of the cave—our corner of the
cave.
“Unh!” he grunted again.
“Oh, no!” Nicole moaned. “He sees us!”
The big creature staggered toward us, grunting with each heavy step.
I pressed myself against the cave wall, wishing the cave would swallow us
up.
Anything would be better than having him swallow us!
The monster kept coming. His footsteps shook the floor of the cave. Boom,
boom, boom.
We huddled on the floor. We tried to make ourselves as small as we could.
He stopped inches in front of us and roared again. A deafening roar.
“His teeth!” Nicole cried.
I saw them, too. Two rows of huge, razor-sharp teeth.
The monster growled.
And reached for us. His sharp claws flashed.
He swiped at me. I tried to duck away.
The monster snarled in frustration. He reached out again….
He clamped a powerful paw on Nicole’s head.
“Help!” Nicole screamed. “He’s crushing me!”
19
“Let go of her!” I shrieked.
But I knew I was helpless.
The Abominable Snowman growled and turned Nicole around roughly.
Then he reached behind her and grabbed her backpack. He ripped it off her
shoulder with a sharp, hard tug.
“Hey!” I cried in horror.
With one claw he sliced open the canvas backpack. He reached inside. And
pulled something out.
A bag. A bag of trail mix.
Nicole and I stared in amazement as he poured the trail mix into his mouth.
“Weird,” I choked out. “He likes trail mix.”
The monster crumpled up the bag and shifted through Nicole’s pack,
searching for more.
“That’s all there is,” Nicole whispered to me.
With an angry growl, the monster tossed Nicole’s pack away.
“Now what?” Nicole whispered.
I reached into my own backpack, and with a trembling hand I yanked out
my bag of trail mix. I heaved it at the monster.
The bag hit the floor and slid to the monster’s feet. He bent down. Grabbed
it. Tore it open. And hungrily gulped down the trail mix.
When he finished, I shoved my pack toward him.
He grunted. Then he dumped out my stuff.
No more trail mix.
Uh-oh.
The monster stretched and roared. Then he reached down. With two
gigantic arms, he grabbed Nicole and me.
He lifted us up.
He raised us toward his face.
Toward his mouth.
Preparing to eat us.
20
I struggled, but he was too strong. I pounded my fists on his chest. I kicked as
hard as I could. He didn’t seem to feel it.
He clutched Nicole and me like a couple of dolls.
“Please don’t eat us!” I begged. “Please!”
The monster grunted. He draped us both over the crook of one arm. Then he
staggered back across the cave, gripping us tightly.
I kicked him in the side. No reaction. Nothing.
“Let go!” I shrieked. “Let us down!”
“Where’s he taking us?” Nicole cried, bouncing as the creature tromped
across the cave.
Maybe he wants to roast us, I thought grimly. Maybe he doesn’t like his
kids raw.
He lugged us to the back of the cave. With one powerful swipe of the paw,
he knocked a boulder aside. A narrow passage appeared behind it.
Nicole moaned. “Why didn’t we see that before? Maybe we could have
escaped!”
“Too late now,” I groaned.
The snowman pulled us through the passage. We came out into a smaller
cave, flooded with light. I glanced up.
Above us I could see the gray sky.
A way out!
Balancing us in one arm, the monster scaled the wall of the cave. With big,
lurching steps, he climbed out of the hole.
Cold air blasted me in the face. But the monster’s body pulsed with heat.
The blizzard had stopped. Fresh snow covered the tundra.
The monster stumbled through the snow, grunting as he walked.
His gigantic feet sank deep into the snow. But with each huge step he
covered a lot of ground.
Where was he taking us? Where?
Maybe he has another cave, I thought with a shudder. A cave with more
monsters in it. His friends. They’ll all feast on us!
I tried again to break out of the snowman’s grip. I kicked and squirmed as
hard as I could.
The monster growled. He dug his claws into my side.
“Ow!” I yelped. But I stopped squirming. If I moved, his claws dug deeper.
Poor Dad, I thought sadly. He’ll never know what happened to us.
Unless he finds our bones buried in the snow.
Suddenly, I heard barking. A dog!
The Abominable Snowman stopped. He growled and sniffed the air. Then
he gently dropped Nicole and me in the snow.
We landed unsteadily on our feet.
Nicole stared at me in surprise.
We started to run, stumbling through the deep snow. I glanced back.
“Is he chasing us?” Nicole asked.
I couldn’t be sure. I couldn’t see him now. I only saw white.
“Keep running!” I shouted.
Then I saw something familiar in the distance. A brown speck.
I bumped Nicole. “The cabin!”
We ran even faster. If we could just get to the cabin…
From the cabin we heard furious barking—the dog Arthur had left behind.
“Dad! Dad!” we shrieked. We burst through the door. “We found him! We
found the Abominable Snowman!”
“Dad?”
The cabin stood empty. Empty and bare.
Dad was gone.
21
My eyes darted around the empty cabin.
“Dad? Dad?”
My heart skipped a beat. My throat went dry.
Where did he go?
Was he out searching for Nicole and me? Did he get lost in the snow?
“We—we’re all alone,” I murmured.
Nicole and I ran to the window. A thin layer of snow frosted the pane. We
peered out into the bright sunlight.
No sign of Dad.
“At least the snowman didn’t follow us,” I said.
“Jordan, why did he drop us?” Nicole asked softly.
“I think the barking dog scared him,” I replied.
If that dog hadn’t barked, what would the monster have done to us?
As the question pushed into my mind, I heard the dog start to bark again.
Nicole and I both gasped.
“The snowman—!” I cried. “He’s back! Hide!”
We glanced around, frantically searching for a good hiding place. The cabin
was so bare—it wouldn’t take the monster long to find us.
“Behind the stove!” Nicole urged.
We dashed to the small, square stove and crouched behind it.
Outside the cabin we heard the slow, heavy footsteps of the monster.
Crunch, crunch, crunch. Footsteps over the snow.
Nicole grabbed my hand. We froze, waiting. Listening.
Crunch, crunch.
Please don’t come into the cabin, I prayed. Please don’t capture us again.
The footsteps stopped outside the door. I squeezed my eyes shut.
The door burst open. A blast of cold air blew into the room.
“Jordan? Nicole?”
Dad!
We jumped out from behind the stove. There stood Dad, with his camera
around his neck.
We both ran to him and hugged him. “Dad! I’m so glad it’s you!”
“Hi!” he replied. “What’s going on, guys? I expected you to be asleep.” He
glanced around the cabin. “Hey—where’s Arthur?”
“He took off!” I cried breathlessly. “He took the sled. He took all the food
and three of the dogs.”
“We chased after him,” Nicole added. “But he got away.”
Dad’s face filled with surprise, then horror. “I’d better radio for help. We
won’t last long without food.”
“Dad—listen.” I blocked his way to the radio. “Nicole and I—found the
Abominable Snowman!”
He sidestepped around me. “This is no time for jokes, Jordan. If we don’t
get help, we could starve to death out here!”
“He’s not joking, Dad,” Nicole insisted, tugging Dad’s arm. “We really
found the snowman. He lives in a cave under the snow.”
Dad stopped and studied Nicole. He always believes her. But this time he
wasn’t sure.
“It’s true!” I cried. “Come on—we’ll show you!”
Nicole and I tugged him out the door.
“Jordan, if this is one of your tricks, you are going to be in major trouble,”
he warned. “We’re in a serious situation here and—”
“Dad, he’s not kidding!” Nicole cried impatiently. “Come on!”
We led him out into the snow to the spot where the snowman had dropped
us. We pointed out his huge footprints.
“Why should I believe this?” Dad said. “You faked the snowman’s
footprints this morning, Jordan. These just look a little bigger.”
“Dad, I swear—I didn’t make these prints!”
“We’ll show you the cave, Dad,” Nicole promised. “Follow the footprints.
You’ll see. It’s unbelievable!”
I knew Dad went along with us only because Nicole insisted. He trusted
her. She never played jokes on him.
Leaning into the wind, we traced the giant prints across the snow. Dad
couldn’t resist snapping pictures of them—just in case.
The footsteps led us back to the cave. They stopped at an opening in the
ground.
“The cave is down that hole,” I told Dad, pointing.
I think Dad believed us now. “Let’s go. Check it out,” he said.
“Huh?” I cried. “Back down there? To the monster?”
Dad was already sliding down to the cave opening. He reached up to help
Nicole climb down.
I hesitated. “Dad—wait. You don’t understand. There’s a monster down
there!”
“Come on, Jordan,” Dad urged. “I want to see this for myself.”
I had no choice. Dad was going in there no matter what I said. And I didn’t
want to wait outside alone. I scrambled down to the opening of the cave.
The three of us felt our way along the narrow passage until we reached the
mouth of the big cave.
Keeping close together, Dad and Nicole walked in. But I stopped at the
entrance and stared into the cave.
“Jordan! Come on!” Dad whispered.
There’s a monster in there, I thought with a shudder. A huge monster with
long claws and sharp teeth.
We managed to escape from him once. Why are we going back? What’s
going to happen to us in there?
I had a bad feeling. A very bad feeling.
22
Dad grabbed me by the hand and pulled me into the cave. I heard the drip of icy
water against the back wall. I blinked in the darkness.
Where was he? Where was the Abominable Snowman?
I heard Dad’s camera clicking away. I tried to stay close to Dad. I cried out
when I spotted the snowman. I expected him to roar and lumber after us.
But he stood stiffly, staring straight ahead.
Refrozen again. Inside a huge block of ice.
Nicole stepped closer to the block of ice. “How does he do that?”
“This is amazing!” Dad cried, snapping picture after picture. “Incredible!”
I stared up at the monster’s face. He glared out at us from inside the ice. His
black eyes glittered, his mouth set in a toothy snarl.
“This is the most amazing discovery in history!”
Dad exclaimed. “Do you realize how famous we are going to be?”
He stopped shooting for a second and peered up at the brown-furred
monster.
“Why stop here?” he murmured. “Why go home with nothing but photos?
Why not take the snowman himself back to California? Do you know what a
sensation that will create?”
“But—how?” Nicole asked.
“He’s alive, you know, Dad,” I warned. “I mean, he can crack out of that
ice. And when he does, it’s really scary. I don’t think you could control him.”
Dad knocked gently on the ice, testing it. “We won’t let him out of the ice,”
he said. “At least not until we’ve got him under control.”
Dad walked all the way around the block of ice, rubbing his chin. “If we cut
the ice a bit, it might fit into the supply trunk,” he said. “Then we could carry the
snowman back to California in the block of ice, locked in the trunk. It’s airtight,
so the ice won’t melt.”
He stepped up close to the ice and snapped a few more shots of the
snowman’s snarling face. “Let’s go get the trunk, kids.”
“Dad—wait.” I didn’t like this idea. “You don’t understand. The snowman
could rush us! He let us go once. But why take another chance?”
“Look at his teeth, Dad,” Nicole pleaded. “He’s so strong, he picked us both
up at once!”
“It’s worth the risk,” Dad insisted. “Neither of you is hurt, right?”
Nicole and I nodded. “Yes, but—”
“Let’s go.” Dad had made his mind up. He wasn’t going to listen to our
warnings.
I’d never seen him so excited. As we hurried from the cave, he called to the
snowman, “Don’t go away—we’ll be right back!”
We rushed over the snow to the cabin. Dad pulled the supply trunk outside.
It was about six feet long and three feet wide.
“The snowman will fit,” he said. “But with him inside the trunk, it will be
very heavy.”
“We need the dogsled to pull it,” Nicole said.
“But Arthur took the sled,” I reminded them. “So I guess the deal is off.
We’ll just have to go home without an Abominable Snowman. Too bad!”
“Maybe there’s another sled around somewhere,” Dad suggested. “This is
an old musher’s cabin, after all.”
I remembered the old sled I’d seen in the dog shed. Nicole had seen it, too.
She led Dad to it.
“Fantastic!” Dad cried. “Now let’s go get that snowman before he escapes.”
We hitched Lars, our only dog, to the old sled and towed the supply trunk to
the cave.
Then we crept silently into the cave, pulling the trunk behind us. “Careful,
Dad,” I warned. “He might have broken out of the ice by now.”
But the Abominable Snowman stood where we’d left him, frozen in his
block of ice.
Dad began to cut the ice down to size with a hacksaw.
I paced nervously. “Hurry!” I whispered. “He could burst out any minute!”
“This isn’t easy,” Dad snapped. “I’m working as fast as I can.” He hacked
away.
Each second felt like an hour to me. I watched the snowman carefully for
any signs of movement.
“Dad, do you have to saw so loudly?” I complained. “The noise could wake
him up!”
“Relax, Jordan,” Dad said. But his voice was tight and shrill, too.
Then I heard a crack.
“Look out!” I cried. “He’s breaking out!”
Dad straightened up. “I cracked the ice a bit, Jordan.”
I studied the monster. He hadn’t moved.
“Okay, kids,” Dad said. “We’re ready.” Dad had cut the ice into a six-footlong rectangle. “Help me slide this into the trunk.”
I opened the lid of the trunk. Nicole and I helped Dad tip the ice over and
gently drop it into the trunk. It just barely fit.
We slid the trunk along the ground to the opening of the cave. Dad tied a
rope around it and climbed out of the hole. “I’ll tie the rope to the sled,” Dad
called from above. “That way Lars can help me hoist it out.”
“Hey,” I whispered to Nicole, “let’s sneak some snowballs into the trunk—
just for fun. We can throw them at Kyle and Kara when we get home. Snow
from the cave of the Abominable Snowman—they’ll never top that!”
“No—please. Don’t open the trunk,” Nicole begged. “We just barely got the
snowman inside.”
“We can squeeze a few snowballs in,” I insisted. I quickly made a bunch of
snowballs, packing them tight. Then I cracked open the trunk and slipped them
inside, next to the block of ice.
I checked the monster one last time for signs of life. The ice was solid. We
were safe.
“They won’t melt in there,” I said sealing the lid of the trunk shut. We
locked it with the bolt and tightened the rope around it. I felt pretty sure the
snowman wouldn’t be able to break out of there; even if he did crack through the
ice.
“Ready?” Dad shouted from up above. “One, two, three—heave!”
Dad and Lars tugged on the rope until the chest lifted off the ground. Nicole
and I squatted beneath it to help push it up.
“Again!” Dad yelled. “Heave!”
We pushed as hard as we could. “It’s so heavy!” Nicole complained.
“Come on, kids!” Dad called. “Push!”
We gave the trunk a shove. Dad and Lars tugged it over the lip of the cave
opening.
Dad collapsed in the snow. “Whew,” he muttered, wiping his brow. “Well,
the hardest part is over.”
He helped Nicole and me scramble out.
We all rested a few minutes. Then we dragged the trunk onto the sled. Dad
secured it with the rope. Lars pulled the sled back to the cabin.
Once inside, Dad hugged us both. “What a day! What a great day!”
He turned to me. “See, Jordan? Nothing terrible happened.”
“We’re lucky,” I said.
“I’m so sleepy,” Nicole complained, sinking onto her sleeping bag.
I glanced out the window. The sun sat high in the sky, as usual. But I knew
it had to be very late.
Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s almost midnight. You two should get some
sleep.” He frowned. “I’d hate to wake up here in the morning with no food,
though. I’m going to radio for help. You guys can sleep when we get back to
town.”
“Can we stay in a hotel?” I asked Dad. “In a bed?”
“If we can find one,” he promised. He opened his pack, searching for the
radio.
He shuffled stuff around in his pack. Then he pulled things out, one by one.
A compass. An extra camera. Cans of film. A pair of socks, balled up.
I didn’t like the look on his face. He turned the pack over and dumped
everything on the floor. He sifted through it, again, getting frantic.
“Dad? What’s the matter?”
When he turned to me, he had a terrified expression on his face. “The
radio,” he murmured. “It’s gone.”
23
“No!” Nicole and I both shrieked.
“I don’t believe it!” Dad cried, pounding his fist against his empty pack.
“Arthur must have taken the radio so we wouldn’t report him.”
I stomped around the room, frightened and furious. Our dogs, our sled, our
food—Arthur had taken them all.
And now the radio.
Did Arthur leave us here to freeze? To starve?
“Calm down, Jordan,” Dad said.
“But, Dad—” Nicole interrupted.
Dad shushed her. “Just a second, Nicole. I’ve got to think of a way out of
this.” Dad searched the cabin. “Don’t panic. Don’t panic. Don’t panic,” he
instructed himself.
“But Dad—” Nicole said, tugging at his sleeve.
“Nicole!” I snapped. “We’re in huge trouble. We could die out here!”
“Dad!” she insisted. “Listen to me! You wrapped up the radio last night so
it wouldn’t freeze. It’s in your sleeping bag!”
Dad’s mouth dropped open. “You’re right!” he cried. He hurried to his
sleeping bag and reached inside. He dug into his sleeping bag—and pulled out
the radio, wrapped in a wool scarf.
He switched on the radio and fiddled with the dials. “Iknek, Iknek. Come
in, Iknek.”
Dad asked the Iknek airport to send us a helicopter. He tried to describe
where we were.
Nicole and I smiled sleepily at each other.
“We’re going home!” she said happily. “Home to sunny, hot Pasadena.”
“I’m going to kiss a palm tree!” I declared. “I never want to see snow
again.”
I had no idea that our snowy adventure was just beginning!
24
“Ahhhh,” I sighed. “Feel that sun? Nice and hot.”
“The radio said it’s a hundred degrees today,” Nicole reported.
“I love it!” I beamed. “Love it!”
I slapped more tanning lotion on my chest.
Our Alaska trip all seemed unreal, now that we were home in Pasadena.
The cold, the snow, the wind blowing over the rolling white tundra. The snarling,
brown-furred Abominable Snowman. It all seemed like a dream.
But I knew it was no dream.
Dad had hidden the trunk with the Abominable Snowman inside the
darkroom in the backyard. Every time I passed it, I remembered the trip…
remembered the creature lying frozen in there—and shivered.
In our swimsuits, Nicole and I caught some rays in the backyard. Good old
sunny Pasadena. Where it never, never snowed.
Thank goodness.
Lauren came over to hear about our trip. I wanted to tell her the whole story.
But Dad told us to keep quiet about it—at least until the snowman was safely
settled somewhere.
“I don’t believe you two!” Lauren snorted. “A week ago you wouldn’t shut
up about snow. Now you’re letting the sun burn you to a crisp!”
“Well, we did the cold thing and now we’re doing the hot thing,” I told her.
“Anyway, I’ve seen enough snow to last me the rest of my life.”
“Tell me about the trip,” Lauren insisted. “Tell me everything!”
“It’s a big secret,” Nicole told her. She and I exchanged glances.
“Secret? What kind of secret?” Lauren demanded.
Before we could reply, Dad emerged from the darkroom. He squinted in the
sunlight. He wore a down jacket, a ski cap, and gloves. He had turned the airconditioning way up in the darkroom and covered the trunk with ice packs, to
keep the snowman cold.
“I’m going into the city now,” he announced, removing his coat. Dad had a
meeting with some scientists and wildlife experts in Los Angeles.
He wanted to turn the Abominable Snowman over to the right people. He
wanted to be sure the snowman would be treated well.
“Are you kids going to be all right while I’m gone?” he asked.
“Of course,” Nicole replied. “We survived the Alaskan tundra. I think we
can live through one afternoon in our own backyard.”
“My mom is home,” Lauren said. “She’ll be around if we need anything.”
“Good.” Dad nodded. “Okay, I’m off. But remember—Jordan and Nicole,
are you listening? Don’t touch the supply trunk. Stay away from it—
understood?”
“Gotcha, Dad,” I promised.
“All right. I’ll bring a pizza home for dinner.”
“Good luck, Dad!” Nicole called. I watched him jump into the car and drive
off.
“So what’s the big secret?” Lauren asked as soon as Dad was gone. “What’s
in the supply trunk?”
Nicole and I glanced at each other.
“Come on. Spill,” Lauren urged. “I won’t leave you alone until you tell
me.”
I couldn’t resist. I had to tell someone. “We found him. We found him and
we brought him back.”
“Found who?”
“The snowman!” Nicole exclaimed. “The Abominable Snowman!”
Lauren rolled her eyes. “For sure. And did you find the Tooth Fairy up
there, too?”
“Yes, we did,” I joked.
“He’s lying in the darkroom right now,” Nicole told Lauren.
Lauren’s face twisted in confusion. “Who—the Tooth Fairy?”
“No. The Abominable Snowman. A real one,” I said. “Trapped in a block of
ice.”
Along with four or five snowballs, I thought to myself.
Snowballs I could throw at Lauren. For a nice little surprise.
“Prove it,” Lauren challenged us. “You’re making it all up. You think
you’re really funny.”
Nicole and I exchanged glances. I knew what she was thinking. Dad had
just told us to stay away from the trunk.
“You two are as bad as the Miller twins,” Lauren complained.
That did it. “Come on,” I said. “We’ll show you.”
“We’d better not, Jordan,” Nicole argued.
“We won’t hurt anything,” I promised. “We’ll just pull open the lid a tiny
bit so Lauren can see him. Then we’ll slam it shut. No harm done.”
I climbed off my lounge chair and started across the lawn to the darkroom.
Nicole and Lauren followed me.
I knew they would.
I opened the darkroom door and switched on the light. A blast of cold air
swept over me, making my bare chest tingle.
Nicole hesitated in the doorway. “Jordan, maybe we shouldn’t.”
“Oh, come on, Nicole,” Lauren chided. “There’s no Abominable Snowman.
You two are ridiculous!”
“We’re not ridiculous!” Nicole protested.
“We might as well show her, Nicole,” I said.
Nicole didn’t reply. She stepped into the darkroom and shut the door.
In my bathing suit, I was shivering from the cold. It was almost like being
back in Alaska.
I knelt beside the huge trunk. I unhooked the latches.
Slowly, carefully, I lifted the heavy lid.
Peered inside.
And let out a chilling, bloodcurdling scream of horror.
25
Nicole and Lauren shrieked and leaped back.
Nicole backed into the wall with a crash.
Lauren ducked under the developing table.
I couldn’t keep a straight face. I started to laugh. “Gotcha!” I cried
gleefully. I was so pleased with myself.
I had scared them to death. They were both stiffer than the Abominable
Snowman. He lay frozen and still inside his block of ice.
“Jordan—you creep!” Nicole declared angrily. She punched me in the back.
Lauren punched me too. Then she peered into the open trunk.
And let out another scream. “He’s real! You—you weren’t kidding!” I could
see that she was breathing hard.
“It’s okay, Lauren,” I assured her. “He can’t hurt you. He’s frozen.”
She stepped closer and stared down at him.
“He’s huge!” she cried in amazement. “His—his eyes are open. They’re so
mean-looking!”
“Close the lid, Jordan,” Nicole insisted. “Quick. We’ve seen enough.”
“Now do you believe us?” I asked Lauren.
She nodded. “It’s… awesome!” She shook her head, stunned at the amazing
sight.
Before I shut the lid, I sneaked two snowballs out of the bottom of the
trunk. Snickering, I passed one to Nicole.
“What’s so funny?” Lauren asked suspiciously.
“Nothing,” I said. I sealed the lid shut and latched the trunk. That’ll hold
him, I thought. We’re safe. Dad will never know we sneaked a peek at the
monster.
We left the darkroom, closing the door carefully behind us.
“That creature is just so awesome!” Lauren exclaimed. “What is your dad
going to do with him?”
“We’re not sure yet,” Nicole replied. “Dad’s trying to figure that out.”
She held her hands behind her back, hiding the snowball from Lauren.
Suddenly she shouted, “Hey, Lauren! Think fast!”
She threw the snowball at Lauren. It missed.
Splat! It hit a tree.
“Nice shot, ace!” I cried sarcastically.
But then I gaped at the tree in shock.
The snowball—it didn’t crumble to the ground.
It started to grow!
Thick white snow spread quickly up the tree trunk—and over the branches.
Within seconds, the entire tree was covered with snow!
“Wow!” Lauren gasped. “Nicole—how did you do that?”
Nicole and I stared open-mouthed at the snow-covered tree.
I was so stunned, the snowball fell out of my hand.
I jumped back as it hit the ground—and spread!
“Oh, wow!” I shrieked. I watched snow spread over the lawn like a white
blanket.
It spread under our bare feet. Over the driveway. Out to the street.
“Ooooh! It’s cold!” Nicole wailed, hopping from foot to foot.
“This is too weird!” I cried. “It’s a hundred degrees out—and the snow isn’t
melting! It’s spreading—and growing deeper!”
I turned to see Lauren hopping and dancing, whirling around wildly.
“Snow! Snow!” she sang. “It’s wonderful! Snow in Pasadena!”
“Jordan—” Nicole said quietly. “This isn’t right. We should have left this
snow in the cave. It isn’t normal snow.”
Of course she was right. Any cave where an Abominable Snowman lives
has got to be a weird place. But how could we have guessed—?
“Let’s build a snowman!” Lauren cried gleefully.
“No!” Nicole warned. “Don’t touch it. Don’t do anything, Lauren. Not until
we’ve figured this out.”
I don’t think Lauren heard my sister. She was too excited. She kicked a
spray of snow at an evergreen bush. The bush froze over with snow.
“What are we going to do?” I asked Nicole. “What’s going to happen when
Dad comes home? He’ll kill us!”
Nicole shrugged. “Beats me.”
“But—but—you’re supposed to be the brain!” I sputtered.
“This is so cool!” Lauren squealed. “Snow in Pasadena!” She picked up a
chunk of snow and started balling it up between her hands.
“Snowball fight!” she shouted.
“Stop it, Lauren!” I cried. “We’re in big trouble here. Don’t you understand
—?”
Lauren fired the snowball at Nicole.
Instantly, thick white snow spread all over Nicole’s body. Covering her.
Covering her until she looked like a snowman!
“Nicole!” I cried, running over the snowy ground to her. “Nicole—are you
okay?”
I grabbed her arm. Stiff as an icicle. She was frozen solid!
“Nicole?” I stared into her snow-covered eyes. “Can you hear me, Nicole?
Can you breathe in there? Nicole? Nicole?”
26
“Oh, no!” Lauren shrieked. “What have I done?”
My sister was a statue. A frozen, snow-covered statue.
“Nicole, I’m so sorry,” Lauren cried. “Can you hear me? I’m so sorry!”
“Let’s take her inside,” I suggested frantically. “If we get her in the warm
house, maybe we can warm her up.”
Lauren grabbed one of Nicole’s arms. I grabbed the other. We carefully
dragged her stiff body to the house. Her bare toes, hard as ice, left a long trail in
the snow.
“She’s so freezing!” Lauren cried. “How can we melt the snow?”
“Let’s put her next to the oven,” I said. “Maybe if we turn it up full blast,
the snow will melt.”
We stood her in front of the oven. For good measure, I turned on all the
burners on top of the stove.
“That ought to do it,” I said. A bead of sweat trickled down my face. From
the heat—or from worry?
Lauren and I watched and waited.
Watched and waited.
I didn’t move. I didn’t breathe.
The snow didn’t melt.
“It’s not working,” Lauren groaned. “Nothing’s happening.”
I tapped Nicole’s arm. Solid ice.
I tried to stay calm. But I felt as if a hundred butterflies were tap dancing in
my stomach. “All right, it’s not working. We’ll have to try something else.
Something else…”
Tears rolled down Lauren’s cheeks. “Like what?” Lauren demanded in a
trembling voice.
“Well…” I racked my brain for the hottest place I could think of. “The
furnace! We’ll hold her in front of the furnace.”
We dragged Nicole into the furnace shed behind the garage. The snow
seemed to weigh a ton. It took all our strength to drag her.
I turned the furnace on full blast. Lauren stood Nicole in front of the open
furnace door.
A blast of hot air sent Lauren and me staggering back. “If this doesn’t work,
nothing will,” Lauren sobbed.
The heat roared out of the furnace. I saw reflections of the red flames on
Nicole’s icy face.
My heart pounding, I watched to see the ice start to drip and the snow slide
off her.
But the ice didn’t melt. My sister remained a human snow cone.
“Jordan—what are we going to do?” Lauren wailed.
I shook my head, thinking hard. “The furnace isn’t working. What else is
hot?” I was too scared to think clearly.
“Don’t worry, Nicole,” Lauren told my frozen sister. “We’ll get you out of
this—somehow.”
I suddenly remembered how warm the Abominable Snowman had felt
when he carried us across the Alaskan tundra. There we were, ten degrees below
zero, surrounded by deep snow, and heat had poured off the creature’s body.
“Come on, Lauren,” I ordered. “We’re taking her to the darkroom.”
Struggling and straining, we dragged Nicole back outside and across the
backyard to the darkroom.
“Stay here,” I told Lauren. “I’ll be right back.”
I raced into the kitchen. I pulled open all the cupboards and drawers,
desperately searching for one thing—trail mix.
Please, please let there be trail mix somewhere in this house! I prayed.
“Yes!” I found a plastic bag of trail mix behind an old box of spaghetti. I
grabbed it and flew back to the darkroom.
Lauren stared at the bag in my hand. “What’s that?”
“Trail mix.”
“Trail mix? Jordan, can’t you wait to eat later?”
“It’s not for me—it’s for him.” I motioned at the trunk.
“What?”
I unlatched the trunk and pulled it open. The Abominable Snowman lay
inside as before, frozen in the block of ice.
I grabbed a handful of trail mix and waved it above the snowman’s face.
“Wake up!” I begged. “Please wake up! Look—I brought you some trail mix!”
“Jordan—have you totally lost it?” Lauren screeched. “What on earth are
you doing?”
“I can’t think of any other way to save Nicole!” I cried.
My hand trembled as I frantically waved the trail mix over the snowman.
“Come on! You know you love trail mix. Wake up! Please wake up! Come out
and help us.”
I leaned over, staring hard at the monster’s eyes. Watching for him to blink.
Watching for any signs of life.
But the eyes didn’t move. The creature stared lifelessly up through the
block of ice.
I refused to give up.
“Yum, yum!” I shouted, my voice high and wild.
“Trail mix! Boy, is that good!” I popped a few raisins into my mouth and
chewed. “Mmm-mm! Delicious trail mix. So good! So tasty! Come on—wake
up and try some!”
“He’s not moving!” Lauren sobbed. “Give up, Jordan. It isn’t going to
work.”
27
I jumped when I heard a soft sound. A faint crick.
I stared down at the block of ice.
Did the monster move?
No. Silence now. The Abominable Snowman’s black eyes glittered up at
me, lifeless and blank.
Was it my imagination?
Lauren is right, I thought sadly. My plan isn’t working.
Nothing is working.
I gently touched my sister’s stiff, frozen arm. Maybe when Dad gets home,
I hoped. Maybe he’ll think of some way to save her.
“What are we going to dooooo?” Lauren sobbed. She was no help at all.
Crack.
I heard it again—louder this time.
And then: Crrraaaaaccckkkk!
A long crack ripped across the ice.
The Abominable Snowman groaned.
Lauren leaped back with a wild scream. “It’s alive!”
The ice broke up. The furry snowman slowly pulled himself up, moaning.
Lauren cried out in fear. She pressed herself against the darkroom wall.
“What’s he going to do?”
“Shhh!”
The monster shook shards of broken ice from his shoulders. He lifted
himself out of the trunk. He uttered a low growl.
“Jordan, look out!” Lauren cried.
The monster lurched toward me. My heart jumped. I wanted to back away
—or run away. But I couldn’t. I had to stay and help Nicole.
“Unh!” the snowman grunted. He swiped a giant paw at me.
Lauren let out another shrill scream.
I leaped back. What would the monster do?
“Unh!” the monster cried again. He took another swipe.
“Let’s get out of here!” Lauren shouted. “He’s going to hurt you!”
I wanted to run. But Nicole…
The monster swiped at me again—and snatched the bag of trail mix out of
my hands.
I suddenly realized that was all he wanted. He had been grabbing for the
trail mix.
He poured the trail mix into his mouth, gulping it down, swallowing it
noisily. Then he tossed the bag away.
Lauren pressed her back against the corner of the darkroom. “Make him go
back into the trunk!” she cried.
“Are you crazy? How can I do that?”
The snowman growled and staggered across the floor.
His heavy footsteps shook the floor. He stopped in front of Nicole.
He reached his powerful arms around her snow-covered body—and
squeezed.
“Stop him!” Lauren screamed. “He’s crushing her!”
28
I couldn’t move. I stared in horror.
The big creature hugged Nicole hard—so hard that he lifted her off the
ground.
“Stop!” I finally choked out. “You’re hurting her!”
Without thinking of the danger, I dove forward. I grabbed his furry arms
with both hands—and struggled to pull him off my sister.
With an angry grunt, he brushed me away.
I stumbled back—and fell into Lauren.
I turned to see the monster squeezing Nicole.
Lauren pointed down at the floor. “Jordan—look!”
Gazing down, I saw a small puddle under Nicole’s feet. Water dripped off
her and onto the floor. As it hit the floor, it evaporated. Vanished from sight.
Did I see Nicole’s toes wiggle?
Yes!
I stepped closer. Caught a glimpse of her face.
A dot of pink appeared on her cheeks.
Yes!
Chunks of snow dropped off her body. They thudded to the floor, melted,
and disappeared.
I turned to Lauren. “It’s working!” I cried happily. “He’s defrosting her!”
A trembling smile crossed Lauren’s worried face.
A few seconds later, the snowman let Nicole go. The ice and snow had all
melted and disappeared. The snowman gave a satisfied grunt and stepped back.
Nicole moved her arms stiffly. She rubbed her face, as if she were waking
up.
“Nicole!” I cried, grabbing her by the shoulders. Warm. Her shoulders were
warm. “Are you okay?”
She shook her head, dazed. “What happened?”
Lauren ran up to Nicole and threw her arms around her. “You were frozen!”
she said. “Frozen like a snowman! But thank goodness—you’re all right!”
I turned to see the snowman watching us.
“Thank you,” I called to him.
I don’t know if he understood me. He grunted.
“Let’s get out of here,” Lauren urged. “I’m freezing!”
“Maybe the sun will warm you up,” I told her.
We opened the darkroom door and stepped outside. The sun still beamed
down. The air felt sweltering hot. But the whole yard was covered in snow.
“Oh, yeah,” Lauren murmured. “I forgot about that.”
“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the Abominable Snowman leap out of the
darkroom. “He’s escaping!” I shrieked.
“Dad will kill us!” Nicole cried.
All three of us started shouting at the creature.
He ignored our cries and thudded heavily across the snow. His black eyes
narrowed on the snow-covered tree. He stepped up to the tree. Threw his arms
around it. And hugged it tightly, just like when he had hugged Nicole.
I watched as the snow began to melt. The blanket of white slipped down,
down, shrinking away—until the tree stood green and golden again under the
sunlight.
“Wow!” I uttered, hands pressed against my face.
But the big, furry creature had more surprises in store.
With a loud grunt, he dropped to the snowy ground. As we stared in
surprise, he began to roll in the snow.
The snow appeared to stick to his fur. As he rolled, the snow vanished
beneath him.
Before long, the big creature was rolling on green grass. The last of the
snow had vanished.
He jumped to his feet. His eyes went wide, and he uttered a pained cry.
“What’s the matter with him?” Lauren demanded.
The Abominable Snowman gazed around, stunned, at the green grass, the
palm trees. Then he raised his eyes to the blazing sun.
He clutched his fur-covered head and let out a scream of terror.
He seemed confused for a moment. Frightened. Then he let out a deep grunt
—and took off down the street. His big paws thudded heavily over the pavement.
I ran after him. “Wait! Come back!”
He tore through someone’s yard and kept running.
I gave up. No way I could catch him.
Nicole and Lauren caught up to me. “Where’s he going?” Nicole
demanded.
“How should I know?” I snapped, struggling to catch my breath.
“I think he’s looking for someplace cold,” Lauren said.
Nicole agreed. “You’re probably right. He must be so hot. Pasadena is no
place for an Abominable Snowman.”
“He’ll probably find a cave in the mountains,” I said. “It’s a lot colder up
there. I only hope he finds a way to get trail mix.”
We trudged back to our yard. Green again. And hot. I knew that Nicole and
I had one word in our minds—D-A-D.
He had instructed us not to touch the trunk. We had ignored his warning.
Now the snowman was gone. Dad’s big discovery. Dad’s big chance for
fame.
Gone. Gone forever.
It was all our fault.
“At least Dad has his photos,” I said softly. “The photos will amaze
everyone all by themselves.”
“I guess so,” Nicole replied, biting her bottom lip tensely.
We walked back to the darkroom to close up the supply trunk. I glanced
inside the trunk. Two magic snowballs were left.
“Those things are dangerous. We’d better get rid of them,” Nicole warned.
“I’m not touching them.” Lauren backed away.
“You’re right,” I told my sister. “We should hide them somewhere. They’re
too dangerous to keep around.”
Nicole ran into the house and returned with a heavy-duty garbage bag.
“Quick—stuff them in here.”
I carefully scooped up each snowball and dropped it in the trash bag. Then I
twisted the bag closed and knotted it tightly.
“Now what?” Lauren asked.
“We should blast them into outer space,” Nicole said. “If anyone gets hold
of them and starts spreading snow around, we’ll be in big trouble. We need the
Abominable Snowman to get rid of the snow—and he’s gone.”
“Pasadena could turn into a ski resort!” I joked. “We could ice skate on
Kyle and Kara’s swimming pool.”
I shivered. I didn’t want to think about Kyle and Kara. And I didn’t want to
think about snow. “We should bury the snowballs,” I told them. “But where?”
“Not in my yard!” Lauren protested.
I didn’t want to bury them in our yard, either. What would happen to them
down there? Would they spread snow underground? Would snow spring up
through the grass?
We left the darkroom and scanned the area for good burial spots.
“What about the empty lot?” Nicole suggested.
Across the street, right next to Kyle and Kara Miller’s house, stood a vacant
lot. There was nothing in it but piles of sand and a few empty bottles.
“Perfect,” I declared. “No one will ever find the snowballs there.”
Nicole hurried to the garage and grabbed a shovel. We crossed the street,
glancing around to make sure no one saw us.
“The coast is clear,” I said.
I grabbed the shovel and dug a deep hole in the sand. It took longer than I
thought. Sand kept falling back into the hole.
Finally, the hole was deep enough.
Nicole dropped the trash bag into the hole. “Good-bye, snowballs,” she
said. “Good-bye, Alaska.”
I covered the hole with sand. Lauren smoothed it out so you couldn’t tell
the sand had been dug up.
“Whew,” I groaned, wiping the sweat from my face. “I’m glad that’s over.
Let’s go inside and cool off.”
I put away the shovel. Then Nicole, Lauren, and I got ourselves some cold
apple juice and collapsed in front of the TV.
A short while later, we heard Dad’s car pull into the driveway.
“Uh-oh,” Lauren gasped. “I think I’d better go home now. See you guys
later.” She hurried out the back door. “Good luck!” she called. The door
slammed behind her.
I gave Nicole a nervous glance. “How angry will Dad be? He finds an
amazing, rare creature, brings it home—we let it loose, and it runs away. That’s
not so bad—is it?”
Nicole shuddered. “Maybe if we tell him the whole story, he’ll be so glad
we’re not hurt that he won’t be angry.”
“Uh-huh. Yeah. Maybe.”
The front door swung open. “Hey, kids!” Dad called. “I’m home! How’s
our snowman doing?”
29
We ate supper early that evening. Things were pretty quiet around the dinner
table.
“I’m glad you kids are safe and sound,” Dad said for the fifth time. “That’s
what counts.”
“Yeah,” Nicole said, chewing her pizza.
“Uh-huh,” I added quietly. I usually had three slices. Tonight I could barely
manage one. And I left the crust on the plate.
Poor Dad. He was trying so hard not to get upset about losing the
Abominable Snowman. But Nicole and I knew how bad he felt.
Dad dropped his half-eaten slice of pizza on his plate. “I’ll tell the Museum
of Natural History that they’ll have to make do with the photographs.”
“Photographs are better than nothing,” I said.
“Better than nothing? Are you crazy?” Nicole cried. “Those pictures are
going to amaze the whole world!”
Dad perked up. “That’s true. I mentioned them to some TV producers. They
went wild.”
He stood and carried his plate to the sink. “I think I’ll go out to the
darkroom and develop that film right now. These pictures are going to cheer me
up. I mean, they’re historic. Historic!”
I was glad to see Dad snap out of his disappointment. Nicole and I followed
him, eager to see the photos.
We sat quietly under the red light while Dad developed the negatives. At
last he pulled the first set of contact sheets out of the chemical baths.
Nicole and I leaned close to see the pictures.
“Huh?” Dad uttered an astonished cry.
Snow. Nothing but snow. Ten pictures of snow.
“That’s strange,” Dad choked out. “I don’t remember taking those shots.”
Nicole flashed me an evil stare. I knew what she was thinking.
I held my hands up innocently. “I’m not playing any tricks. I swear!”
“You’d better not be, Jordan,” Dad warned sternly. “I’m in no mood for
kidding around.”
Dad turned back to the chemical trays and developed another set of photos.
As he pulled them up, dripping wet, we all squinted at them.
More snow. Nothing but snow.
“This can’t be happening!” Dad screamed. “The Abominable Snowman—
he should be standing right there!” He pointed.
His hands shook as he grabbed the rest of the negatives and held them up to
the red light. “The tundra shots came out fine,” he declared. “The dogs, the sled,
the elk herd—all there. All perfect. All of them. But the shots in the monster’s
cave—”
His voice trailed off. He shook his head sadly. “I don’t get it. I just don’t get
it. How could this be? Not a single shot of the creature. Not one.”
I sighed. I felt so bad for Dad. I felt so bad for all three of us.
No Abominable Snowman. No photos of the Abominable Snowman.
It was almost as if he never existed. As if the whole thing never happened.
Nicole and I left Dad in the darkroom to finish his work.
We trudged around the house to the front. Nicole groaned and grabbed my
arm. “Oh, no! Look!”
Across the street in the vacant lot, I saw the Miller twins kneeling down,
digging in the sand.
“They’re digging up the snowballs!” I gasped.
“Those creeps!” Nicole growled. “They must have been spying on us while
we buried them.”
“We’ve got to stop them!” I cried.
We hurried across the street, running full speed.
I saw Kyle rip open the garbage bag—and pull out one of the snowballs.
He swung back his arm and aimed at Kara.
“No—Kyle! Stop!” I screamed. “Don’t throw it! Stop! Don’t throw it,
Kyle!”
THWOCK.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.


HOW I GOT MY
SHRUNKEN HEAD
Goosebumps - 39
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
Have you ever played Jungle King? It’s a computer game, and it’s really cool.
Unless you sink into a quicksand pit or get squeezed to death by the Living
Vines.
You’ve got to be fast to swing from vine to vine without letting them curl
around your body. And to grab the shrunken heads that are hidden under trees
and bushes.
If you collect ten shrunken heads, you get an extra life. You need a lot of
extra lives in this game. It’s not for beginners.
My friends Eric and Joel play Jungle King with me. They are twelve, like
me. My sister Jessica is eight. She hangs around, but we don’t let her play. That’s
because she always dives into the quicksand pits. She likes the thwuck thwuck
thwuck sound it makes when your body is being sucked under.
Jessica just doesn’t get it.
“Mark, why can’t we play a different game?” Joel asked me.
I knew why he wanted to quit. He had just been trampled by a red rhino, the
meanest kind.
Joel, Eric, and I were up in my room during our winter break from school,
huddled around my computer. Jessica was on the window seat, reading a book.
Sunlight poured over her, making her red hair sparkle.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted as I picked up my eighth shrunken head. Kah-leeah is my jungle cry. It’s a word that popped into my head one day. I guess I made
it up.
My face was two inches from the monitor screen. I ducked as spears came
flying at me from behind a leafy fern.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I let out my battle cry as I picked up another shrunken head.
“Come on, Mark,” Eric pleaded. “Don’t you have any other games?”
“Yeah. Don’t you have any sports games?” Joel demanded. “How about
March Madness Basketball? That’s a cool game!”
“How about Mutant Football?” Eric asked.
“I like this game,” I replied, keeping my eyes on the screen.
Why do I like Jungle King so much? I think it’s because I love swinging
from vine to vine across the sky.
You see, I’m a little chubby. Actually, I’m short and chubby. I’m built sort
of like the red rhinos. And so I guess I like being able to swing so lightly, to fly
above the ground like a bird.
Also, it’s an awesome game.
Joel and Eric don’t like it because I always win. In our first game this
afternoon, an alligator chewed Joel in half. I think that put him in a bad mood.
“Do you know what game my dad bought me?” Joel asked. “Battle
Solitaire.”
I leaned closer to the screen. I had to get past the biggest quicksand pit. One
slip, and I’d be sucked into the sandy slime.
“What kind of game is that?” Eric asked Joel.
“It’s a card game,” Joel told him. “You know. Solitaire. Only the cards fight
each other.”
“Cool,” Eric replied.
“Hey, guys—I’m in a tough spot here,” I said. “Give me a break, okay? I’ve
got to concentrate. I’m right over the quicksand pit.”
“But we don’t want to play anymore,” Eric complained.
I grabbed a vine. Swung hard. Then reached for the next one.
And someone bumped my shoulder. “Owww!”
I saw a flash of red hair and knew it was Jessica. She bumped me again and
giggled.
I watched myself tumbling down on the screen. Sucked into the bottomless
slime pit.
Thwuck thwuck thwuck. I died.
I spun around angrily. “Jessica—!”
“My turn!” She grinned at me, her wide, toothy grin.
“Now we have to start all over again!” I announced.
“No way,” Eric protested. “I’m going home.”
“Me, too,” Joel said, pulling his baseball cap lower on his forehead.
“One more game!” I pleaded.
“Come on, Mark. Let’s go outside,” Joel said, pointing to the bright
sunshine pouring through the bedroom window.
“Yeah. It’s a great day out. Let’s throw a Frisbee or something,” Eric
suggested. “Or get our skateboards.”
“One more game. Then we’ll go outside,” I insisted.
I watched them head out the door.
I really didn’t want to leave the jungle. I don’t know why I like jungles so
much. But I’ve been really into jungles since I was a teeny kid.
I like to watch all the old jungle movies on TV. And when we were little, I
used to pretend I was Tarzan, King of the Jungle. Jessica always wanted to play,
too. So I let her be Cheetah, my talking chimpanzee.
She was very good at it.
But after she was six or seven, Jessica refused to be a chimp anymore. She
became a full-time pest instead.
“I’ll play Jungle King with you, Mark,” she offered, after my two friends
left.
“No way,” I replied, shaking my head. “You just want to take a dive into the
quicksand pit.”
“No. I’ll play it right,” she promised. “I’ll try to win this time. Really.”
I was about to let her play when the doorbell rang downstairs.
“Is Mom home?” I asked, listening for her footsteps.
“I think she’s in the backyard,” Jessica replied.
So I hurried downstairs to answer the front door. Maybe Eric and Joel
changed their minds, I thought. Maybe they’ve come back for another round of
Jungle King.
I pulled open the front door.
And stared at the grossest thing I ever saw in my life.
2
I stared at a head.
A human head, wrinkled and leathery. About the size of a tennis ball.
The pale, dry lips were pulled back in a sneer. The neck was stitched closed
with heavy black string. The eyes—solid black eyes—stared up at me.
A shrunken head. A real shrunken head.
I was so shocked, so totally amazed to find it at my front door, that it took
me a long time to see the woman who was holding it.
She was a tall woman, about my mom’s age, maybe a little older. She had
short black hair with streaks of gray in it. She wore a long raincoat buttoned to
the top even though it was a warm, sunny day.
She smiled at me. I couldn’t see her eyes. They were hidden behind large
black-framed sunglasses.
She held the shrunken head by the hair—thick black hair. Her other hand
held a small canvas suitcase.
“Are you Mark?” she asked. She had a soft, smooth voice, like someone in
a TV commercial.
“Uh… yeah,” I replied, staring at the shrunken head. They never looked so
ugly in photos I’d seen. So wrinkled and dry.
“I hope I didn’t startle you with this thing,” the woman said, smiling. “I was
so eager to give it to you, I took it out of my bag.”
“Uh… give it to me?” I asked, not taking my eyes off it. The head stared
back at me with those glassy black eyes. They looked more like teddy-bear eyes
than human eyes.
“Your aunt Benna sent it for you,” the woman said. “As a present.”
She held out the head to me. But I didn’t take it. I had spent all day
collecting shrunken heads in the game. But I wasn’t sure I wanted to touch this
one.
“Mark—who is here?” My mom stepped up behind me. “Oh. Hello.”
“Hello,” the woman replied pleasantly. “Did Benna write and tell you I was
coming? I’m Carolyn Hawlings. I work with her. On the island.”
“Oh, my goodness,” Mom exclaimed. “Benna’s letter must have gotten lost.
Come in. Come in.” She pulled me back so that Carolyn could enter the house.
“Look what she brought for me, Mom,” I said.
I pointed to the small green head dangling by the hair from Carolyn’s hand.
“Yuck!” Mom cried, raising a hand to her cheek. “That isn’t real—is it?”
“Of course it’s real!” I cried. “Aunt Benna wouldn’t send a fake—would
she?”
Carolyn stepped into the living room and set down her small suitcase. I took
a deep breath. Worked up my courage. And reached for the shrunken head.
But before I could take it, Jessica swooped in—and grabbed it out of
Carolyn’s hand.
“Hey—!” I shouted, reaching for her.
She darted away, giggling, her red hair flying behind her. Holding the head
in both hands.
But then she stopped.
Her smile faded. And she stared down at the head in horror.
“It bit me!” Jessica cried. “It bit me!”
3
I gasped. Mom squeezed my shoulder.
Jessica started to giggle.
One of her dumb jokes.
She tossed the head from hand to hand. And grinned at me. “You’re dumb,
Mark. You’ll believe anything.”
“Just give me back my head!” I cried angrily. I dove across the living room
and grabbed for it.
She started to pull it away—but I held on tightly.
“Hey—you scratched it!” I shrieked.
She did. I held the head up close to my face to examine it. Jessica had
scratched a long white line on the right earlobe.
“Jessica—please,” Mom begged, crossing her arms and lowering her voice.
That’s what Mom does when she’s about to get steamed. “Shape up. We have a
guest.”
Jessica crossed her arms and pouted back at Mom.
Mom turned to Carolyn. “How is my sister Benna doing?”
Carolyn pulled off her sunglasses and tucked them into a raincoat pocket.
She had silvery-gray eyes. She looked older without the dark glasses on. I could
see hundreds of tiny wrinkles at the corners of her eyes.
“Benna is fine,” she replied. “Working hard. Too hard. Sometimes she
disappears into the jungle for days.”
Carolyn sighed and started to unbutton her raincoat. “I’m sure you know
Benna’s work is her life,” she continued. “She spends every minute exploring the
jungles of Baladora. She wanted to come visit. But she couldn’t leave the island.
So she sent me instead.”
“Well, it’s very nice to meet you, Carolyn,” Mom said warmly. “I’m sorry
we didn’t know you were coming. But any friend of Benna’s is more than
welcome.”
She took Carolyn’s raincoat. Carolyn wore khaki pants and a short-sleeved
khaki shirt. It looked like a real jungle-exploring suit.
“Come sit down,” Mom told her. “What can I offer you?”
“A cup of coffee would be nice,” Carolyn replied. She started to follow
Mom to the kitchen. But she stopped and smiled at me. “Do you like your
present?”
I gazed down at the wrinkled, leathery head in my hands. “It’s beautiful!” I
declared.
That night before going to bed, I placed the head on my dresser. I brushed its
thick black hair straight back. The forehead was dark green and wrinkled like a
prune. The glassy black eyes stared straight ahead.
Carolyn told me that the head was over one hundred years old. I leaned
against the dresser and stared at it. It was so hard to believe that it had once
belonged to a real person.
Yuck.
How had the guy lost his head? I wondered.
And who decided to shrink it? And who kept it after it was shrunk?
I wished Aunt Benna were here. She would explain everything to me.
Carolyn was sleeping in the guest room down the hall. We had sat in the
living room, talking about Aunt Benna all night. Carolyn described the work
Aunt Benna was doing on the jungle island. And the amazing things she was
finding there on Baladora.
My aunt Benna is a pretty famous scientist. She has been on Baladora for
nearly ten years. She studies the animals in the jungle. And the plant life, too.
I loved listening to Carolyn’s stories. It was as if my Jungle King computer
game had come to life.
Jessica kept wanting to play with my shrunken head. But I wouldn’t let her.
She had already put a scratch on its ear.
“It’s not a toy. It’s a human head,” I told my sister.
“I’ll trade you two of my Koosh balls for it,” Jessica offered.
Was she crazy?
Why would I trade a valuable treasure like this for two Koosh balls?
Sometimes I worried about Jessica.
At ten o’clock, Mom sent me up to my room. “Carolyn and I have some
things to talk about,” she announced. I said good night and made my way
upstairs.
I placed the shrunken head on my dresser and changed into my pajamas.
The dark eyes in the head appeared to flash for a second when I turned out the
lights.
I climbed into bed and pulled up the covers. Silvery moonlight washed into
the room from the bedroom window. In the bright moonlight, I could see the
head clearly, staring at me from the dresser top, bathed in shadows.
What a horrible sneer on its face, I thought with a shiver. Why is it locked
in such a frightening expression?
I answered my own question: You wouldn’t smile either, Mark, if someone
shrunk your head!
I fell asleep staring at the ugly little head.
I slept heavily, without any dreams.
I don’t know how long I slept. But sometime in the middle of the night, I
was awakened by a terrifying whisper.
“Mark… Mark…”
4
“Mark… Mark…”
The eerie whisper grew louder.
I sat straight up, and my eyes shot open. And in the heavy darkness, I saw
Jessica, standing beside the bed.
“Mark… Mark…” she whispered, tugging my pajama sleeve.
I swallowed hard. My heart pounded. “Huh? You? What’s your problem?”
“I-I had a bad dream,” she stammered. “And I fell out of bed.”
Jessica falls out of bed at least once a week. Mom says she’s going to build
a tall fence around Jessica’s bed to keep her in. Or else buy her a king-size bed.
But I think Jessica would just roll around even harder in a big bed and still
fall out. My sister is a pest even in her sleep!
“I need a drink of water,” she whispered, still tugging my sleeve.
I groaned and pulled my arm away. “Well, go downstairs and get it. You’re
not a baby,” I growled.
“I’m scared.” She grabbed my hand and pulled. “You have to come with
me.”
“Jessica—!” I started to protest. But why bother? Whenever Jessica has a
scary dream, I end up taking her downstairs for a glass of water.
I climbed out of bed and led the way to the door. We both stopped in front
of the dresser. The shrunken head stared out at us in the darkness.
“I think that head gave me bad dreams,” Jessica whispered softly.
“Don’t blame the head,” I replied, yawning. “You have bad dreams just
about every night—remember? It’s because you have a sick mind.”
“Do not!” she cried angrily. She punched my shoulder. Hard.
“If you hit me, I won’t get you a drink,” I told her.
She reached out a finger and poked the shrunken head on one of its
wrinkled cheeks. “Yuck. It feels like leather. It doesn’t feel like skin.”
“I guess heads get hard when you shrink them,” I said, straightening the
thick tuft of black hair.
“Why did Aunt Benna send you a shrunken head and not send me one?”
Jessica asked.
I shrugged. “Beats me.” We tiptoed out into the hall and turned toward the
stairs. “Maybe it’s because Aunt Benna doesn’t remember you. The last time she
visited us, you were just a baby. I was only four.”
“Aunt Benna remembers me,” Jessica replied. She loves to argue.
“Well, maybe she thinks that girls don’t like shrunken heads,” I said. We
made our way down to the kitchen. The stairs squeaked under our bare feet.
“Girls like shrunken heads,” Jessica argued. “I know I do. They’re cool.”
I filled a glass with water and handed it to her. She made gulping sounds as
she drank. “You’ll share your head with me—right?” she asked.
“No way,” I told her.
How do you share a head?
We made our way back upstairs in the darkness. I took her to her room and
tucked her in. Then I crept back to my room and slipped into bed.
I yawned and pulled the covers up to my chin.
I shut my eyes, but opened them again quickly. What was that yellow light
across the room?
At first, I thought someone had turned the hall light on.
But, squinting across the room, I saw that it wasn’t a light. The head. The
shrunken head—it was glowing!
As if bright flames surrounded it. A shimmering yellow glow.
And in the glow, I saw the dark eyes gleam and sparkle.
And then the lips—the thin, dry lips that had been set in a hard scowl—the
lips began to twitch. And the mouth pulled up in a horrifying smile.
5
“Nooooooo!”
I let out a terrified wail.
Glowing brightly, surrounded by eerie yellow light, the head grinned at me,
its dark eyes flashing.
My hands thrashed at the covers. I struggled to pull myself out of bed. But
my legs tangled in the blanket, and I fell with a hard thud to the floor.
“Nooooooo!” I cried. My body trembled so hard, I could barely scramble to
my feet.
Gazing up, I saw the grinning head float over the dresser. Float into the air.
Float toward me like a glowing comet.
No!
I covered my face to shield myself.
When I glanced back up, the shrunken head glowed on the dresser top.
Had I imagined it floating up?
I didn’t care. I ran out of the bedroom. “The head! The head!” I shrieked.
“It’s glowing. The head is glowing!”
Jessica jumped out as I ran past her bedroom. “Mark—what’s going on?”
she called.
I didn’t stop to answer. I kept on running, down the hall to Mom and Dad’s
room. “The head!” I wailed. “The head!” I was so terrified, I didn’t know what I
was doing!
The door was closed. But I shoved it open without knocking. Mom was
lying on her back on her side of the bed. My dad was away this week on a
business trip. But Mom still slept on her side of the bed.
As I burst in, she sat up and uttered a startled cry. “Mark?”
I ran up beside her. “Mom—the shrunken head—it started to glow!” I cried,
my voice high and shrill. “It’s glowing, and it—it grinned at me!”
Mom stood up and wrapped me in a hug. She felt so warm and soft. I was
shaking all over. I suddenly felt as if I were a little boy again.
“Mark, you had a nightmare,” Mom said softly. She ran her hand over the
back of my hair, the way she used to do when I was little.
“But, Mom—”
“That’s all it was. A nightmare. Take a deep breath. Look how you’re
shaking.”
I pulled away from her. I knew it wasn’t a nightmare. I’d been wide awake.
“Come and see,” I insisted. “Hurry.”
I pulled her out into the hall. A light clicked on in Carolyn’s room, and her
door swung open. “What’s happening?” she asked sleepily. She was wearing a
long black nightshirt.
“Mark says his shrunken head glowed,” Mom reported. “I think he had a
bad dream.”
“No, I didn’t!” I shouted angrily. “Come on. I’ll show you!”
I started to pull Mom down the hall. But I stopped when I saw the intense
expression on Carolyn’s face. She had been sleepy a second ago. But now her
eyes were wide, and she was staring at me hard. Staring at my face, studying me.
I turned away from her and nearly bumped into Jessica. “Why did you wake
me up?” Jessica demanded.
I pushed past her and led everyone down the hall to my room. “The head
glowed!” I cried. “And it smiled at me. Look. You’ll see!”
I burst into my room and strode up to the dresser.
The head was gone.
6
I stared in shock at the bare dresser top.
Behind me, someone clicked on the bedroom light. I blinked in the bright
light, expecting the shrunken head to appear.
Where was it?
My eyes searched the floor. Had it fallen and rolled away? Had it floated
out of the room?
“Mark—is this some kind of joke?” Mom asked. She suddenly sounded
very tired.
“No—” I started. “Really, Mom. The head—”
And then I saw the sly grin on Jessica’s face. And I saw that my sister had
both hands behind her back.
“Jessica—what are you hiding?” I demanded.
Her grin grew wider. She never could keep a straight face. “Nothing,” she
lied.
“Let me see your hands,” I said sharply.
“No way!” she replied. But she burst out laughing and brought her hands in
front of her. And of course she had the shrunken head gripped tightly in her right
hand.
“Jessica—!” I let out an angry cry and snatched it away from her. “It’s not a
toy,” I scolded her angrily. “You keep your paws off it. Hear?”
“Well, it wasn’t glowing,” she sneered. “And it wasn’t smiling, either. You
made that all up, Mark.”
“Did not!” I cried.
I examined the head. Its dry lips were pulled back in the toothless snarl it
always had. The skin was green and leathery, not glowing at all.
“Mark, you had a bad dream,” Mom insisted, covering her mouth as she
yawned. “Put the head down, and let’s all get some sleep.”
“Okay, okay,” I muttered. I flashed Jessica another angry look. Then I set
the shrunken head down on the dresser.
Mom and Jessica walked out of my room. “Mark is such a jerk,” I heard
Jessica say, just loud enough for me to hear. “I asked him to share the shrunken
head, and he said he wouldn’t.”
“We’ll talk about it in the morning,” Mom replied, yawning again.
I started to turn off the light. But I stopped when I saw Carolyn, still
standing in the hall. Still staring hard at me, a really intense expression on her
face.
She narrowed her silvery eyes at me. “Did you really see it glow, Mark?”
she asked softly.
I glanced at the head. Dark and still. “Yeah. I did,” I replied.
Carolyn nodded. She seemed to be thinking hard about something. “Good
night,” she murmured. Then she turned and padded silently back to the guest
room.
The next morning, Mom and Carolyn greeted me with the biggest surprise
of my life.
7
“Your aunt Benna wants you to come visit her in the jungle,” Mom announced at
breakfast.
I dropped the spoon into my Froot Loops. My mouth fell open to my knees.
“Excuse me?”
Mom and Carolyn grinned at me. I guess they enjoyed shocking me.
“That’s why Carolyn came,” Mom explained. “To take you back with her to
Baladora.”
“Wh-why didn’t you tell me?” I shrieked.
“We didn’t want to tell you until we worked out all the details,” Mom
replied. “Are you excited? You get to visit a real jungle!”
“Excited isn’t the word!” I exclaimed. “I’m… I’m… I’m… I don’t know
what I am!”
They both laughed.
“I get to go, too!” Jessica declared, bouncing into the kitchen.
I let out a groan.
“No, Jessica. You can’t go this time,” Mom said, putting a hand on my
sister’s shoulder. “This is Mark’s turn.”
“That isn’t fair!” Jessica wailed, shoving Mom’s hand away.
“Yes, it is,” I replied happily. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cheered. Then I leaped to my
feet and did a celebration dance around the kitchen table.
“Not fair! Not fair!” Jessica chanted.
“Jessica, you don’t like jungles,” I reminded her.
“Yes, I do!” she insisted.
“Next time will be your turn,” Carolyn said, taking a long sip of coffee.
“I’m sure your aunt would love to show you the jungle, Jessica.”
“Yeah. When you’re older,” I sneered. “You know, the jungle is too
dangerous for a kid.”
Of course, when I said that to my sister, I had no idea of just how dangerous
the jungle could be. No idea that I was heading toward dangers I couldn’t even
imagine.
After breakfast, Mom helped me pack my suitcase. I wanted to bring shorts and
T-shirts. I knew it was hot in the jungle.
But Carolyn insisted that I pack long-sleeved shirts and jeans, because of
the scratchy weeds and vines we’d be walking through. And because of all the
jungle insects.
“You have to protect yourself from the sun,” Carolyn instructed. “Baladora
is so close to the equator. The sun is very strong. And the temperature stays in
the nineties all day.”
Of course I carefully packed the shrunken head. I didn’t want Jessica to get
her paws on it while I was away.
I know, I know. Sometimes I’m pretty mean to my sister.
As we drove to the airport, I thought about poor Jessica, staying home
while I went off to exciting adventures with Aunt Benna.
I decided to bring her back a really cool souvenir from the jungle. Some
poison ivy, maybe. Or some kind of poisonous snake. Ha-ha!
At the airport, Mom kept hugging me and telling me to be careful. Then she
hugged me some more. It was really pretty embarrassing.
Finally, it came time for Carolyn and me to board the plane. I felt scared
and excited and glad and worried—all at once!
“Be sure to send postcards!” Mom called as I followed Carolyn to the gate.
“If I can find a mailbox!” I called back.
I didn’t think they had mailboxes in the jungle.
The flight was very long. So long, they showed three movies in a row!
Carolyn spent a lot of time reading through her notebooks and papers. But
when the flight attendants served dinner, she took a break. And she told me
about the work Aunt Benna had been doing in the jungle.
Carolyn said that Aunt Benna had made many exciting discoveries. She had
discovered two kinds of plants that no one had ever seen before. One is a kind of
crawling vine that she named after herself. Benna-lepticus. Or something like
that.
Carolyn said that Aunt Benna was exploring parts of the jungle where no
one had ever gone. And that she was turning up all kinds of jungle secrets.
Secrets that will make Aunt Benna famous when she decides to announce them.
“When was the last time your aunt visited you?” Carolyn asked. She
struggled to pull open the plastic wrapping around her silverware.
“A long time ago,” I told her. “I can hardly remember what Aunt Benna
looks like. I was only four or five.”
Carolyn nodded. “Did she give you any special presents?” she asked. She
pulled out the plastic knife and started to spread butter on her dinner roll.
I scrunched up my face, thinking hard. “Special presents?”
“Did she bring you anything from the jungle when she visited you?”
Carolyn asked. She lowered the dinner roll to the tray and turned to me.
She had her dark glasses on again, so I couldn’t see her eyes. But I had the
feeling she was staring at me, studying me.
“I don’t remember,” I replied. “I know she didn’t bring me anything as cool
as a shrunken head. That head is really awesome!”
Carolyn didn’t smile. She turned back to her food tray. I could tell she was
thinking hard about something.
I fell asleep after dinner. We flew all night and landed in Southeast Asia.
We arrived just after dawn. The sky outside the airplane window was a deep
purple. A beautiful color I’d never seen before. A big red sun rose slowly
through the purple.
“We change planes here,” Carolyn announced. “A huge jet like this could
never land in Baladora. We have to take a tiny plane from here.”
The plane was tiny, for sure. It looked like a toy. It was painted a dull red. It
had two red propellers on the slender wings. I searched for the rubber bands that
made the propellers spin!
Carolyn introduced me to the pilot. He was a young man in a red-andyellow Hawaiian shirt and khaki shorts. He had slicked-down black hair and a
black mustache. His name was Ernesto.
“Can this thing fly?” I asked him.
He grinned at me from beneath the mustache. “I hope so,” he replied,
chuckling.
He helped us up metal steps into the cabin. Then he hoisted himself into the
cockpit. Carolyn and I filled the cabin. There was only room for the two of us
back there!
When Ernesto started the engine, it chugged and sputtered like a power
mower starting up.
The propellers began to twirl. The engine roared. So loud I couldn’t hear
what Ernesto was shouting to us.
Finally I figured out that he was telling us to fasten our seat belts.
I swallowed hard and stared out the tiny window. Ernesto backed the plane
out of the hangar. The roar was so loud, I wanted to cover my ears.
This is going to be exciting, I thought. It’s kind of like flying inside a kite!
A few minutes later, we were in the air, flying low over the blue-green
ocean. The bright morning sunlight made the water sparkle.
The plane bumped and jerked. I could feel the wind blowing it, making us
bounce.
After a while, Carolyn pointed out the islands down below. They were
mostly green, with ribbons of yellow sand around them.
“Those are all jungle islands,” Carolyn told me. “See that one?” She
pointed to a large, egg-shaped island. “Some people found buried pirate’s
treasure on that island. Gold and jewels worth millions of dollars.”
“Cool!” I exclaimed.
Ernesto leaned over the throttle and brought the plane lower. So low I could
clearly make out trees and shrubs. The trees all seemed tangled together. I
couldn’t see any roads or paths.
The ocean water darkened to a deep green. The engine roared as the plane
bounced against strong winds.
“That’s Baladora up ahead!” Carolyn announced. She pointed out the
window as another island came into view. Baladora was larger than the other
islands, and very jagged. It curved around like a crescent moon.
“I can’t believe that Aunt Benna is down there somewhere!” I exclaimed.
Carolyn smiled beneath her dark glasses. “She’s there, okay.”
I glanced to the front as Ernesto turned in his seat to face us. I saw instantly
that he had a troubled expression on his face.
“We have a little problem,” he said, shouting over the roar of the engine.
“Problem?” Carolyn asked.
Ernesto nodded grimly. “Yes. A problem. You see… I don’t know how to
land this thing. You two will have to jump.”
Panic made me gasp. “But—but—but—” I sputtered. “We don’t have
parachutes!”
Ernesto shrugged. “Try to land on something soft,” he said.
8
My mouth dropped open. My breath caught in my chest. Both hands gripped the
arms of the seat.
Then I saw the smile on Carolyn’s face. She shook her head, her eyes on
Ernesto. “Mark is too smart for you,” she told him. “He’s not going to fall for a
dumb joke like that.”
Ernesto laughed. He narrowed his dark eyes at me. “You believed me—
right?”
“Ha-ha. No way!” I choked out. My knees were still shaking. “I knew you
were kidding,” I lied. “Kind of.”
Carolyn and Ernesto both laughed. “You’re mean,” she told Ernesto.
Ernesto’s eyes flashed. His smile faded. “You’ve got to get used to thinking
fast in the jungle,” he warned.
He turned back to the controls. I kept my eyes out the window, watching the
island of Baladora sweep beneath us. Broad-winged white birds swooped over
the tangled green trees.
A short strip of land had been cleared near the south shore of the island.
Beyond it, I could see ocean waves smacking against dark rocks.
The little plane hit hard as we landed—hard enough to make my knees
bounce up in the air. We bounced again on the bumpy, dirt landing strip. Then
we rolled to a stop.
Ernesto cut the engine. He pushed open the cabin door. Then he helped us
out of the plane. We had to duck our heads.
Ernesto carried our suitcases out. Carolyn had her small canvas bag. My
suitcase was a little larger. He set them down on the landing strip and gave us a
short, two-fingered salute. Then he climbed back into the little red plane and
pulled the door closed behind him.
I shut my eyes as the propellers whirred, showering sand over me. A few
seconds later, Ernesto took off. The plane nosed up steeply, just barely making it
over the trees at the end of the landing strip.
The plane turned sharply and headed back over the water. Carolyn and I
picked up our bags. “Where do we go now?” I asked, squinting in the bright
sunlight.
Carolyn pointed. A clearing of tall grass stretched beyond the narrow, dirt
airstrip. At the edge of the clearing where the trees started, I could see a row of
low gray buildings.
“That’s our headquarters,” Carolyn told me. “We built the airstrip right next
to it. The rest of the island is jungle. No roads. No other houses. Just
wilderness.”
“Do you get cable?” I asked.
She stopped short. Then laughed. I don’t think she expected me to make a
joke.
We carried our suitcases toward the low gray buildings. The morning sun
was still low in the sky. But the air was already hot and wet. Hundreds of tiny
white insects—some kind of gnat—hovered over the tall grass, darting one way
then the other.
I heard shrill buzzing. And somewhere in the distance, the high cry of a
bird, followed by a long, sad reply.
Carolyn walked quickly, taking long strides over the tall grass, ignoring the
darting white gnats. I jogged to keep up with her.
Sweat ran down my forehead. The back of my neck started to itch.
Why was Carolyn in such a hurry?
“We’re kind of trapped here, right?” I said, studying the low, twisted trees
beyond the small headquarters buildings. “I mean, how do we get off the island
when we’re finished?”
“We radio for Ernesto,” Carolyn replied, not slowing her pace. “It takes him
about an hour to get here from the mainland.”
That made me feel a little better. I scurried over the tall grass, struggling to
keep up with Carolyn.
My suitcase began to feel heavy. I wiped sweat from my eyes with my free
hand.
We were nearing the headquarters. I expected Aunt Benna to come running
out to greet me. But I couldn’t see any sign of anyone.
A radio antenna was perched off to the side. The low buildings were
perfectly square. Flat-roofed. They looked like upside-down cartons. Square
windows had been cut in each wall.
“What is that stretched over all the windows?” I asked Carolyn.
“Mosquito netting,” she replied. She turned back to me. “Have you ever
seen a mosquito as big as your head?”
I laughed. “No.”
“Well, you will.”
I laughed again. She was joking—right?
We stepped up to the first building, the largest in the row. I set down my
suitcase, pulled off my baseball cap, and mopped my forehead with my
shirtsleeve. Wow. It was hot.
A screen door led into the building. Carolyn held it open for me.
“Aunt Benna—!” I cried eagerly. Leaving the suitcase on the ground, I ran
inside. “Aunt Benna?”
Sunlight filtered through the netting over the window. It took a few seconds
for my eyes to adjust to the darker light.
I saw a table cluttered with test tubes and other equipment. I saw a
bookshelf filled with notebooks and books.
“Aunt Benna?”
Then I saw her. Wearing a white lab coat. Standing with her back to me, at a
sink against the wall.
She turned, wiping her hands on a towel.
No.
Not Aunt Benna.
A man. A white-haired man in a white lab coat.
His hair was thick and brushed straight back. Even in the dim light, I could
see the pale blue of his eyes, blue as the sky. Such strange eyes. They looked like
blue glass. Like marbles.
He smiled. Not at me.
He was smiling at Carolyn.
He motioned to me by tilting his head. “Does he have it?” he asked
Carolyn. He had a scratchy, hoarse voice.
Carolyn nodded. “Yes. He has it.” I could see that she was breathing hard.
Short, shallow breaths.
Was she excited? Nervous?
A smile crossed the man’s face. His blue eyes appeared to twinkle.
“Hi,” I said awkwardly. I felt really confused. What did that question mean?
What did I have?
“Where is my aunt Benna?” I asked.
Before he could answer, a girl appeared from the back room. She had
straight blond hair and the same pale blue eyes. She was dressed in a white T-
shirt and white tennis shorts. She appeared to be about my age.
“This is my daughter Kareen,” the man said in his hoarse voice, more like a
whisper. “I am Dr. Richard Hawlings.” He turned to Kareen. “This is Benna’s
nephew. Mark.”
“Tell me something I don’t know,” Kareen replied sharply, rolling her eyes.
She turned to me. “Hey, Mark.”
“Hi,” I replied. Still confused.
Kareen flipped her blond hair back over the shoulders of her T-shirt. “What
grade are you in?”
“Sixth,” I told her.
“Me, too. Except I’m not in school this term. I’m in this dump.” She
frowned at her father.
“Where is my aunt?” I asked Dr. Hawlings. “Is she working or something? I
thought she’d be here. You know. When I arrived.”
Dr. Hawlings stared at me with those strange blue eyes. It took him a long
time to reply. Finally, he said, “Benna isn’t here.”
“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I’d heard him correctly. It was hard to
understand his raspy voice. “Is she… uh… working?”
“We don’t know,” he replied.
Kareen played with a strand of her hair. She twisted it around her finger,
staring at me.
Carolyn stepped behind the lab table and leaned her elbows on it. She rested
her head in her hands. “Your aunt Benna is missing,” she said.
Her words made my head spin.
They were so unexpected. And she said them so flatly. Without any feeling
at all.
“She’s… missing!”
“She’s been missing for a few weeks,” Kareen said, glancing at her father.
“The three of us—we’ve been trying really hard to find her.”
“I-I don’t understand,” I stammered. I shoved my hands into my jeans
pockets.
“Your aunt is lost in the jungle,” Dr. Hawlings explained.
“But—Carolyn said—” I started.
Dr. Hawlings raised a hand to silence me. “Your aunt is lost in the jungle,
Mark.”
“But-but why didn’t you tell my mom?” I asked, confused.
“We didn’t want to worry her,” Dr. Hawlings replied. “Benna’s your mom’s
sister, after all. So Carolyn brought you here because you can help us find her.”
“Huh?” My mouth dropped open in shock. “Me? How can I help?”
Dr. Hawlings stepped across the small room toward me. His eyes locked on
mine. “You can help us, Mark,” he said in his hoarse whisper. “You can help us
find Benna—because you have Jungle Magic.”
9
“I have what?”
I stared at Dr. Hawlings. I didn’t know what he was talking about.
Was Jungle Magic some kind of computer game? Was it like Jungle King?
Why did he think I had it?
“You have Jungle Magic,” he repeated, staring back at me with those
amazing blue eyes. “Let me explain.”
“Daddy, give Mark a break,” Kareen interrupted. “He’s been flying for a
hundred hours. He must be wrecked!”
I shrugged. “Yeah. I’m a little tired.”
“Come sit down,” Carolyn said. She led me over to a tall stool beside the
lab table. Then she turned to Kareen. “Do we have any Cokes left?”
Kareen pulled open a small refrigerator against the back wall. “A few,” she
replied, bending down to get to the bottom shelf. “Ernesto is supposed to bring
another carton on his next flight.”
Kareen brought me a can of Coke. I popped it open and tilted the can to my
mouth. The cold liquid felt so good on my hot, dry throat.
Kareen leaned against the table, close to me. “Have you ever been to a
jungle before?”
I swallowed more Coke. “No. Not really. But I’ve seen a lot of jungle
movies.”
Kareen laughed. “It’s not like in the movies. I mean, there aren’t herds of
gazelles and elephants gathering at the water hole. At least, not on Baladora.”
“What animals are on the island?” I asked.
“Mosquitoes, mostly,” Kareen answered.
“There are some beautiful red birds,” Carolyn said. “Called scarlet ibises.
You won’t believe their color. Kind of like flamingos, only much brighter.”
Dr. Hawlings had been studying me the whole while. He walked over to the
table and dropped down onto a stool across from me.
I held the cold soda can against my hot forehead. Then I lowered it to the
table. “Tell me about my aunt Benna,” I said to him.
“Not much to tell,” Dr. Hawlings replied, frowning. “She was studying a
new kind of tree snail. Somewhere on this end of the jungle. But one night she
didn’t return.”
“We’re very worried about her,” Carolyn said, twisting a strand of hair. She
bit her lower lip. “Very worried. We searched and searched. Then we decided
you could help us.”
“But how can I help?” I demanded. “I told you—I’ve never been to a
jungle.”
“But you have Jungle Magic,” Carolyn replied. “Benna gave it to you. The
last time she visited you. We read about it. It’s in Benna’s notebooks over there.”
Carolyn pointed to a stack of black notebooks on the bookshelf against the
wall. I gazed at them, thinking hard. I still didn’t understand.
“Aunt Benna gave me some kind of magic?” I asked.
Dr. Hawlings nodded. “Yes, she did. She was afraid the secret might fall
into the wrong hands. So she gave it to you.”
“Don’t you remember?” Carolyn asked.
“I was so little,” I told them. “I was only four. I don’t remember. I don’t
think she gave me anything.”
“But she did,” Carolyn insisted. “We know you have Jungle Magic. We
know that you—”
“How?” I interrupted. “How do you know I have it?”
“Because you saw the shrunken head glow,” Carolyn replied. “The head
will only glow for people who have the magic. We read that in Benna’s
notebooks.”
I swallowed hard. My throat suddenly felt dry again. My heart began to
race.
“You’re telling me I have some special kind of magic powers?” I asked in a
tiny voice. “But I don’t feel strange or anything. I’ve never done anything
magic!”
“You have the magic,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “The magic is hundreds of
years old. It belonged to the Oloyan people. They used to live on this island.”
“They were headshrinkers,” Carolyn added. “Hundreds of years ago. That
head I brought you—it was Oloyan. We have uncovered many others.”
“But your aunt uncovered the secret of their ancient magic,” Dr. Hawlings
said. “And she gave it to you.”
“You’ve got to help us find her!” Kareen declared. “You’ve got to use the
magic. We’ve got to find poor Benna—before it’s too late.”
“I-I’ll try,” I told them.
But secretly, I thought: They’ve made a big mistake.
Maybe they mixed me up with someone else.
I don’t have any Jungle Magic. None at all.
What am I going to do?
10
I spent the day exploring the edge of the jungle with Kareen. We uncovered
some amazing yellow spiders that were nearly as big as my fist. And Kareen
showed me a plant that can snap its leaves closed around an insect and keep it
trapped for days until the plant has digested it all.
Pretty cool.
We climbed low, smooth-barked trees. We sat in the tree limbs and talked.
Kareen is okay, I think. She’s very serious. She doesn’t laugh a whole lot.
And she doesn’t like the jungle at all.
Kareen’s mom died when she was a little kid. She wants to go back to New
Jersey and live with her grandmother. But her father won’t let her.
As I talked with her, I kept thinking about Jungle Magic. And I kept
thinking about how—whatever it was—I didn’t have it.
Sure, I always liked jungle movies. And jungle books and jungle games. I
always thought jungles were really awesome. But that doesn’t mean I have any
special powers or anything.
And now Aunt Benna was missing. And her friends on Baladora were so
desperate to find her, they had brought me here.
But what could I do?
What?
As I lay in bed that night, the questions didn’t go away.
I stared up at the low ceiling of the small wooden shack, wide awake. There
were six or seven flat-roofed shacks in a row, behind the main building. We each
had our own little shack to sleep in.
My little cabin had a narrow bed with a flat, lumpy mattress. A low bedside
table where I placed my shrunken head. A small dresser with all the drawers
stuck except the bottom one. A narrow closet, just big enough for the clothes I’d
brought. And a tiny bathroom in the back.
Through the netting over the open window, I could hear the chirp of insects.
And in the distance, I heard a caww caww cawww. Some sort of animal cry.
How can I help find Aunt Benna? I wondered as I stared up at the dark
ceiling and listened to the strange sounds.
What can I do?
I tried to remember her. I tried to remember her visit to my house when I
was four.
I pictured a short, dark-haired woman. Chubby like me. A round pink face.
Intense dark eyes.
I remembered that she talked very fast. She had sort of a chirpy voice, and
she always seemed excited. Very enthusiastic.
And I remembered…
Nothing else.
That’s all I could remember about my aunt.
Did she give me Jungle Magic? No. I didn’t remember anything about that.
I mean, how do you give someone magic?
I kept thinking about it and thinking about it. I struggled to remember more
about her visit.
But I couldn’t.
I knew that Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings had made a terrible mistake. I’ll tell
them in the morning, I decided. I’ll tell them they got the wrong kid.
A terrible mistake… terrible mistake. The words repeated in my mind.
I sat up. No way I could get to sleep. My brain wouldn’t let me. I was wide
awake.
I decided to take a walk around the headquarters building. Maybe explore
back where the trees grew thick and the jungle started.
I crept to the screen door and peered out. My little cabin stood at the end of
the row. I could see the other cabins from my door. All dark. Kareen, Carolyn,
and Dr. Hawlings had gone to sleep.
Cawwww cawwwww. The strange cry repeated in the distance. A soft wind
made the tall grass bend and shift. Tree leaves rustled, making a whispering
sound.
I was wearing a long, baggy T-shirt pulled down over boxers. No need to
get dressed, I decided. No one else is awake. Besides, I’ll just take a very short
walk.
I slipped into my sandals. Pushed open the screen door. And stepped
outside.
Cawwww cawwwww. The cry sounded a little closer.
The night air felt hot and wet, nearly as hot as during the day. A heavy dew
had fallen, and my sandals slid over the damp, tall grass. The wet grass tickled
my feet through the sandals.
I made my way past the silent, dark shacks. To my right, the trees bent and
swayed. Black shadows against a purple sky. No moon. No stars tonight.
Maybe taking a walk is a bad idea, I told myself. Maybe it’s too dark.
I need a flashlight, I realized. I remembered Carolyn’s warning earlier when
she showed me where I would sleep. “Never go out at night without a flashlight.
At night,” she had warned me, “we are not in charge here. At night, this is the
creatures’ world.”
The back of the headquarters building loomed ahead of me. I decided to
turn around.
But before I could turn, I realized I wasn’t alone.
In the darkness, I caught a pair of eyes, staring back at me.
I gasped. A chill ran down my back.
Staring hard through the purple night, I saw another pair of eyes.
And then another and another.
Dark eyes, staring at me without moving, without blinking.
Dark eyes, on top of each other.
I froze. I couldn’t move.
I knew that I was trapped. There were too many of them. Too many.
11
My legs trembled. Chill after chill rolled down the back of my neck.
And as I stared at the eyes, the dark eyes in pairs, eyes on top of eyes—as I
stared at them, they began to glow.
Brighter. Brighter.
And in the golden light, I saw that these were not creature eyes.
These were not animal eyes.
These were human eyes.
I stared at the glowing eyes of a hundred shrunken heads!
A pile of shrunken heads. All heaped together. Eyes on top of eyes. Heads
like tight fists, mouths curled into snarls, or open in toothless horror.
Heads on heads. Dark and wrinkled and leathery.
So terrifying in the cold golden glow from their eyes.
I uttered a choked cry—and took off.
My legs felt rubbery and weak. My heart pounded in my chest. I ran around
the headquarters building, the yellow glow fading slowly from my eyes. I ran as
fast as I could. To the front of the dark building. To the screen door.
Gasping for breath, I pulled open the door. And leaped inside.
I pressed my back against the wall and waited. Waited for the eerie glow to
fade completely. Waited for my heart to stop racing, for my breathing to slow.
After a minute or two, I began to feel a little calmer.
Those heads, I wondered. Why are they piled back there like that?
I shook my head hard, trying to shake away the ugly picture of them. They
were all people once, I realized. Hundreds of years ago, they were people.
And now…
I swallowed hard. My throat felt tight and dry.
I started across the room to the refrigerator. I need something cold to drink,
I told myself. I bumped the edge of the lab table.
My hands shot out, and I knocked something over. I grabbed it before it
rolled off the table.
A flashlight.
“Hey—!” I cried out happily.
I’m going to listen to Carolyn’s advice from now on, I promised myself.
I’m never going out again without a flashlight.
I pushed the button, and a white beam of light swept over the floor. As I
raised the flashlight, the light settled on the bookshelf against the wall.
Aunt Benna’s black notebooks flashed into view. A tall stack of them nearly
filled the shelf.
I moved quickly to the bookshelf. With my free hand, I pulled down the top
notebook. It was heavier than I thought, and I almost dropped it.
Cradling it in my arms, I carried it over to the lab table. I climbed onto the
tall stool and opened it up.
Maybe I can find some answers in here, I thought.
Maybe I can find the part where Aunt Benna talks about giving me Jungle
Magic. Maybe I can find out why Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn think I have it.
I leaned over the notebook and aimed the light onto the pages. Then I began
flipping through, page after page, squinting in the light.
Luckily, my aunt has big, bold handwriting. Very clean and easy to read.
The pages seemed to be organized by year. I kept flipping pages, scanning
each page quickly—until I came to the year of her visit.
My eyes rolled down over a long section about lizards. Some kind of tree
lizards that Aunt Benna was studying.
Then she described a cave she had found, cut into the rocky shore at the
other side of the island. The cave, she wrote, had been lived in by the Oloyans,
maybe two hundred years ago.
I skimmed over long lists of things Aunt Benna had found in the cave. Her
handwriting got very jagged, very crooked here. I guess she was really excited
by her discovery.
I turned several more pages. And started a section marked “Summer”.
As I read the words, my mouth dropped open. My eyes nearly bulged out of
my head.
The words started to blur. I lowered the flashlight to the page so that I could
see better. I blinked several times.
I didn’t want to believe what I was reading.
I didn’t want to believe what Aunt Benna had written.
But the words were there.
And they were terrifying.
12
The flashlight shook in my hand. I steadied it between both hands. Then I leaned
forward and read Aunt Benna’s words, moving my lips silently as I read.
“Dr. Hawlings and his sister Carolyn will stop at nothing to destroy the
jungle and all the creatures who live here,” my aunt wrote in her bold, clear
handwriting. “They do not care who they hurt or who they kill. They care only
about getting what they want.”
I swallowed hard. Steadied the circle of light over the notebook page. And
kept reading.
“Finding the secret of Jungle Magic in that cave was my most amazing
discovery,” Aunt Benna wrote. “But I know the secret is not safe as long as Dr.
Hawlings and Carolyn are around. They will use the Jungle Magic to do evil.
And so I have given the Jungle Magic and its secret to my nephew Mark. He
lives four thousand miles away in the United States. And so I hope the secret
will be safe.
“If the Jungle Magic ever falls into Hawlings’ hands,” my aunt continued,
“the jungle will be destroyed. The island of Baladora will be destroyed. And so
will I.”
I gasped and turned the page. I struggled to keep the flashlight steady so
that I could read more.
“If Hawlings gets the Jungle Magic,” Aunt Benna wrote, “he will shrink my
head until there is no trace of me. I must keep my nephew four thousand miles
away from Hawlings. Because he will shrink Mark’s head, too, to get at the
magic I have hidden there.”
“Ohhhh.” A terrified moan escaped my throat.
Shrink my head?
Dr. Hawlings will shrink my head?
I read the last words again: “I must keep my nephew four thousand miles
away…”
But I’m not four thousand miles away! I told myself.
I’m here. I’m right here!
Carolyn brought me here to steal the magic. To take it from me. She and Dr.
Hawlings planned to shrink my head!
I slammed the notebook shut. I took a deep breath and held it. But it didn’t
help to slow the thudding of my heart.
What have they done to Aunt Benna? I wondered.
Did they try to get the secret from her? Did they do something terrible to
her?
Or did she run away from them? Did she escape?
Did they bring me here to track her down so that they could capture her
again? Then when I find her, do they plan to shrink both of our heads?
“Nooooo,” I murmured, trying to stop my body from trembling.
I thought they were my friends. My friends…
But I’m not safe here, I told myself. I’m in terrible danger.
I have to get away. Get dressed and get away from these evil people. As fast
as I can.
I dropped off the stool, turned, and started toward the door.
Got to get out. Got to get away.
The words repeated in rhythm with my pounding heart.
I reached for the screen door. Started to push it open.
But someone was standing there. Standing there in the deep shadows,
blocking my escape.
“Where do you think you’re going?” a voice called.
13
Kareen pulled open the door and stepped into the room. She wore an oversized
T-shirt, down past her knees. Her blond hair was wild about her face. “What are
you doing in here?” she demanded.
“Let me go!” I cried. I raised the flashlight like a weapon.
She took a step back. “Hey—!” She let out a startled cry.
“I have to go,” I insisted, pushing past her.
“Mark—what’s your problem?” she asked. “Why are you acting so crazy?”
I stopped with the screen door half open, my shoulder against the frame. “I
saw Aunt Benna’s notebook,” I told Kareen, shining the flashlight beam on her
face. “I read what Aunt Benna said. About your father. And about Carolyn.”
“Oh.” Kareen let out a long sigh.
I kept the harsh light on her face. She squinted at me, then covered her eyes
with her arm.
“Where is my aunt?” I demanded sharply. “Do you know where she is?”
“No,” Kareen replied. “Lower the light—okay? You don’t have to blind
me.”
I lowered the light. “Did your father do something terrible to my aunt? Did
he hurt Aunt Benna?”
“No!” Kareen screamed. “How can you ask that, Mark? My father isn’t
evil. He and Benna just don’t agree about some things.”
“You’re sure you don’t know where my aunt is? Is she hiding somewhere?
Hiding from your father? Is she still on the island?” The questions leaped out of
me. I wanted to grab Kareen and force her to tell me the truth.
She tugged at both sides of her blond hair. “We don’t know where your aunt
is. We really don’t,” she insisted. “That’s why Carolyn brought you here. To help
us find her. We’re worried about Benna. We really are.”
“That’s a lie!” I cried angrily. “I read my aunt’s notebook. Your father isn’t
worried about my aunt.”
“Well, I am,” Kareen insisted. “I like your aunt a lot. She’s been really nice
to me. I don’t care about Daddy and Aunt Carolyn and their arguments with
Benna. I’m worried about Benna. I really am.”
I raised the flashlight again. I wanted to check out Kareen’s expression. I
wanted to see if she was telling the truth.
Her blue eyes flashed in the light. I saw a teardrop running down one cheek.
I decided she was being honest with me.
“Well, if you’re worried about my aunt, help me get away from here,” I
said, lowering the light again.
“Okay, I’ll help you,” she answered quickly, without having to think about
it.
I pushed open the screen door and crept outside. Kareen followed. She
closed the door silently behind her. “Turn off the light,” she whispered. “We
don’t want Daddy or Carolyn to see.”
I clicked off the light and started over the wet grass toward my cabin,
walking fast. Kareen hurried to keep at my side.
“I’ll get dressed,” I whispered. “Then I’m going to try to find Aunt Benna.”
A shudder swept down my back. “But how? Where should I go?”
“Use the Jungle Magic,” Kareen whispered. “It’ll tell you where Benna is.
It’ll tell you where to go.”
“But I can’t!” I cried shrilly. “Up until today, I didn’t even know I had any
kind of magic. I’m still not sure I believe it.”
“Use the magic—” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at me.
“But I don’t know how!” I insisted.
“The magic will guide you,” she replied. “I’m sure it will. I’m sure it will
show you the way.”
I wasn’t so sure. But I didn’t say anything.
My mind was spinning. Aunt Benna’s written words kept weaving through
my thoughts.
I should be four thousand miles away, I told myself. I’m only safe if I’m
four thousand miles away.
Now, how will I escape from Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings?
How?
We were striding down the row of cabins. The air still felt hot and wet,
heavy. The sky had darkened to black. There were still no stars, no moon.
I’ll get dressed, and I’ll get away, I told myself.
Get dressed. Get away.
“Hurry, Mark,” Kareen whispered at my side. “Hurry. And don’t make a
sound. Daddy is a very light sleeper.”
My cabin came into view at the end of the row.
But before I could reach it, I heard the soft thud of footsteps on the grass.
Rapid footsteps.
Kareen gasped and grabbed my arm. “Oh, no! It’s him!”
14
I think I jumped a foot in the air.
Should I run? Try to hide?
If this was a game of Jungle King, I’d know the right moves. I’d know how
to escape from the Evil Scientist. I’d grab a vine and swing myself to safety. And
pick up a few extra lives along the way.
But, of course, this was no game.
I pressed my back against the cabin wall and froze there, waiting to be
caught.
The rapid footsteps thudded closer.
I held my breath, but my heart still pounded.
I held my breath—and watched a funny-looking animal hop into view.
Not Dr. Hawlings. But a weird-looking rabbit, with huge ears and big paws
that thudded the ground as it hopped.
I watched the weird creature dart away, disappearing between two of the
low cabins. “Is it a rabbit?”
Kareen raised a finger to her lips, reminding me to be quiet. “It’s a new
species of giant rabbit your aunt discovered.”
“Very educational,” I murmured. “But do I need a nature lesson now?”
Kareen pushed me by the shoulders toward my cabin door. “Hurry, Mark. If
my dad wakes up…” She didn’t finish her sentence.
If he wakes up, he’ll shrink my head. I finished the sentence for her.
My legs suddenly felt as if they were about to collapse. But I forced myself
into my dark cabin.
My hands were shaking so hard, I could barely get dressed. I pulled on the
jeans I’d been wearing that day. And a long-sleeved T-shirt.
“Hurry!” Kareen whispered from the door. “Hurry up!”
I wished she’d stop saying that. I jumped every time.
“Hurry, Mark!”
I pulled open my suitcase and grabbed the flashlight I’d brought. Then I
started to the door.
“Hurry, Mark. Get going!” Kareen whispered.
I stopped halfway across the cabin. Grabbed the shrunken head. Stuffed it
into my T-shirt pocket. Then I pushed open the door and stepped back outside.
Where should I go? What should I do? How could I find my aunt?
A million questions rushed through my mind. My throat felt so dry, it
ached. I thought about getting one of those cold Cokes in the lab. But I knew I
couldn’t risk waking Kareen’s father.
We started walking across the wet grass. “Don’t turn on the flashlight until
you’re hidden by the trees,” Kareen instructed.
“But where do I go? How do I find Aunt Benna?” I whispered, swallowing
hard.
“There’s only one path,” Kareen told me, pointing to the tangled dark trees
at the edge of the clearing. “It will lead you part of the way.”
“Then what?” I demanded, my voice shaking.
Her eyes locked on mine. “The Jungle Magic will take you the rest of the
way.”
Yeah. Sure.
And next week, I’ll flap my arms and fly to the moon.
I had the sudden urge to turn around. Go back to my little shack. Go to bed
and pretend I never read my aunt’s notebook.
But then Kareen and I passed the big pile of shrunken heads. The dark eyes
all seemed to stare up at me. Such sad, sad eyes.
I don’t want my head to end up on that pile, I decided. No way!
I started to jog toward the trees.
Kareen hurried to keep up with me. “Good luck, Mark!” she called softly.
“Th-thanks,” I stammered. Then I stopped and turned to her. “What are you
going to tell your dad in the morning?”
Kareen shrugged. The wind blew her blond hair around her face. “I won’t
tell him anything,” she said. “I’ll tell him I slept all night. That I didn’t hear a
thing.”
“Thanks,” I repeated. Then gripping the flashlight tightly, I turned and ran
into the trees.
The path was soft and sandy. The sand felt wet through my sandals. Vines
and big, flat leaves reached over the path. They slapped against my jeans legs as
I trotted along.
Tall weeds grew over the path. After a minute or so, it became too dark to
see. Had I wandered off the path?
I clicked on the flashlight and shone the light along the ground.
The light swept over the tall weeds, strange ferns, tendrils of vines. The
black-trunked trees appeared to lean toward me, reaching for me with their
smooth limbs.
No path.
Here I am, I thought, squinting into the pale beam of light. Here I am, all
alone in the jungle.
Now what do I do?
15
“Ow!”
I swatted a mosquito on my neck. Too late. I could feel the throb of its bite.
Rubbing my neck, I took a few steps through the tall weeds. I kept the
circle of light in front of my feet.
Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah.
A shrill cry—very close by—made me stop.
Night in the jungle belongs to the creatures, I remembered with a shiver.
Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah.
What was it?
Not a giant rabbit. It sounded really BIG.
I spun the light in a circle, keeping it low over the grass and vines. The
smooth tree trunks shone purple in the pale light.
I didn’t see any animals.
I lowered the light.
My whole body was shaking. Despite the damp heat of the night, I couldn’t
stop shivering.
A wind made the leaves all flap, the trees bend and whisper.
The jungle was alive, I realized.
Insects chittered all around. Fat leaves scraped and cracked. I heard the soft
crackle of animal footsteps, running over the ground..
Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah.
What was that?
Without realizing it, I had pressed myself against a low tree. I took a deep
breath and held it, listening hard.
Was the animal moving closer?
Thick clumps of leaves hung down from the low branches, forming a kind
of cave. I’m protected under here, I thought, gazing all around. I suddenly felt a
little safer, hidden under the thick leaves, under the low branches.
Through my leafy roof, I glimpsed a sliver of white moonlight. It made the
leaves gleam like silver.
I clicked off the flashlight and lowered myself to a sitting position on the
ground. Leaning back against the smooth trunk, I gazed up at the moon, taking
slow, steady breaths.
As soon as I felt calmer, I realized how tired I was. The sleepiness swept
over me like a heavy blanket. I yawned loudly. My eyelids seemed to weigh a
hundred pounds.
I tried to stay alert. But I couldn’t fight the drowsiness.
With the chittering of insects for a lullaby, I leaned my head against the tree
trunk and drifted into a deep sleep.
I dreamed about shrunken heads.
Dozens of shrunken heads, the leathery skin purple and green, the black
eyes glowing like dark coals, the dry black lips pulled back in angry snarls.
The heads floated and danced through my dream. They darted back and
forth like tennis balls. They flew into me, bounced against my chest, bounced off
my head. But I didn’t feel them.
They bounced and floated. And then the dry lips opened, and they all began
to sing. “Hurry, Mark. Hurry.” That was their song.
The words came out hoarse and raspy. The sound of air rattling through
dead leaves.
“Hurry, Mark. Hurry.” An ugly, frightening chant.
“Hurry, Mark. Hurry.”
The black lips twisted into a sneer as they sang. The coal eyes glowed. The
heads—dozens of shriveled, wrinkled heads—bobbed and bounced.
I woke up with the whispered words in my ear.
I blinked. Gray morning light shimmered down through the tree leaves. My
back ached. My clothes felt damp.
It took me a few seconds to remember where I was.
The frightening dream stayed in my mind. My hand slid up to my T-shirt
pocket. I felt the shrunken head tucked tightly inside.
My face itched.
I reached up to scratch my cheek—and pulled something off it. A leaf?
No.
I squinted at the insect in my hand. A large red ant. Nearly the size of a
grasshopper.
“Yuck!” I tossed it away.
My skin tingled. My back itched. Something moved up and down my legs.
I jerked myself up straight. Alert. Wide awake now.
Itching like crazy. My whole body tingling.
I stared down at myself. Stared down at my jeans and T-shirt.
And started to scream.
16
I jumped to my feet. I thrashed my arms in the air. I kicked my legs.
My body was covered with giant red ants.
Hundreds and hundreds of them. Crawling over my arms, my legs, my
chest.
Their prickly legs scratched over my throat and the back of my neck. I
pulled a fat one off my forehead. Then another off my cheek.
I reached up and felt them crawling in my hair.
“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat as I slapped at my hair. Swept my
hands through it. Watched the big red ants fall to the ground.
I felt them crawl over the backs of my hands. Hot and prickly. So big. And
so many of them.
I dropped to my knees, slapping at my chest, pulling the insects off my
neck. I began rolling frantically in the tall grass, dripping wet from the heavy
morning dew.
I rolled and slapped at myself. Rolled over and over, trying to flatten the
insects, trying to kick them off me. I grabbed another handful out of my hair and
heaved them into a leafy bush.
I struggled back to my feet, twisting and squirming. Pulling at the big red
ants.
But there were too many of them. My skin itched and tingled. Their tiny
feet prickled my arms, my legs, my chest.
It itched so badly, I felt I couldn’t breathe.
I’m suffocating, I realized. The ants—they’re going to smother me!
“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, squirming and slapping. “Kah-lee-ah!”
To my surprise, ants started to drop off my body.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed again.
Ants showered down to the ground. They leaped out of my hair, dropped
off my forehead, off the front of my shirt.
I stared in amazement as they fell to the ground. Then they scurried away,
climbing over each other, stampeding over and under the tall grass.
I rubbed my neck. I scratched my legs. My whole body still tingled. I still
itched all over.
But the big ants were gone. They had all jumped off when I shouted my
special word.
Special word.
I glanced down over my shirt, trying to rub away the horrible tingling.
Inside my pocket, the shrunken head’s eyes glowed. A bright yellow glow.
“Whoa!” I grabbed the head and tugged it from the pocket. I held it up in
front of me.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted.
The eyes glowed brighter.
My special word.
Where did the word come from? I didn’t know. I thought I made it up.
But I suddenly knew that the word was the secret behind the Jungle Magic.
The word—and the shrunken head.
Somehow the word brought the Jungle Magic to life. When I shouted it out,
the ants jumped off me and hurried away.
I gazed at the glowing little head with new excitement. My heart pounded
in my chest. I concentrated on the head, thinking hard.
I did have Jungle Magic.
Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn were right.
I had Jungle Magic and didn’t know it. And the word Kah-lee-ah was the
key that unlocked it.
It had helped me get rid of the gross red ants. Would it help lead me to Aunt
Benna?
“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!”
I knew that it would. I knew I could find her now.
I was no longer afraid of the jungle and its creatures. No longer afraid of
anything that might await me in this hot, tangled jungle.
I had Jungle Magic.
I had it—and I knew how to use it.
And now, I had to find Aunt Benna.
A red morning sun rose over the treetops. The air was already hot and
damp. Birds chirped and twittered on the tree limbs above me.
Holding the flashlight in one hand and the shrunken head in the other, I
started to run toward the sun.
I’m going east, I told myself. The sun comes up in the east.
Was it the right direction to find my aunt?
Yes. I was sure it was right. The Jungle Magic will lead me, I decided. I just
need to follow it, and it will take me to Aunt Benna, wherever she is hiding on
this island.
I ran over fat, leafy vines and low shrubs. I ducked under smooth white tree
branches. Broad leaves of huge green ferns slapped at me as I ran through them.
The sun beamed down on my face as I made my way through a wide, sandy
clearing. Sweat dripped down my forehead.
“Hey—!” I cried out as my feet slipped on the soft sand.
My feet slid. I lost my balance. My hands shot out. The flashlight and the
shrunken head flew onto the sand.
“Hey—!”
I started to sink.
Sand rolled up over my ankles. Up my legs.
I kicked. I waved my arms wildly.
I pulled up my knees. Tried to step out of the deep sand. But I was sinking,
sinking faster now. Sand up to my waist. The more I struggled, the faster I sank.
Deeper, deeper. Down into the pit of sand.
17
I couldn’t move my legs. I had sunk too deep in the hot, wet sand.
The sand crept up over my waist.
There’s no bottom, I thought. I’m going to keep sinking. I’m going to sink
down, down until it covers my head. Until I disappear forever.
My friends Eric and Joel once told me that there is no such thing as
quicksand. I wished they were here right now. I could show them how wrong
they were!
I opened my mouth to shout for help. But I was too panicked to make a
sound. Only a tiny squeak came out.
What good is shouting? I asked myself.
There’s no one around for miles. No one who will hear me.
The sand felt thick and heavy as I slid down, down deeper into it. I
stretched both hands up over my head, my hands grasping, as if trying to grab
onto something.
I tried moving my legs. Tried to pump them, like treading water or pedaling
a bike.
But the sand was too heavy. I was in too deep.
My chest heaved with terror now. I gasped in breath after breath.
I opened my mouth once again to call for help.
And had an idea.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, my voice high and frightened.
“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!”
Nothing happened.
18
“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!”
I screeched the word at the top of my lungs.
But I continued to sink deeper, deeper into the wet, marshy pit of sand.
“Kah-lee-ah!”
No. Nothing.
I waved my arms over my head. And stared up at the pale blue sky. At the
trees at the edge of the clearing.
Nothing but trees as far as I could see.
No one around. No one to help me.
“Oh!” I suddenly realized why the magic word wasn’t working. I didn’t
have the shrunken head. The head had flown from my hand when I fell into the
sandpit.
Where was it? Where?
Did it sink into the sand?
My eyes frantically searched the yellow-brown surface. The wet sand
bubbled all around me, making a pock-pock-pock sound. Like a thick soup.
I sank deeper.
And saw the shrunken head.
It lay on the surface. Its black eyes stared up at the sky. Its hair was tangled
beneath it, spread over the sand.
With an excited cry, I stretched out both hands and tried to grab it.
No. Too far away. Just out of my reach. Inches out of my reach.
“Unnnnh.” I uttered a low grunt as I struggled to grab it. Stretched out my
hands. Stretched. Stretched.
I leaned forward into the sand. Leaned and stretched.
And grabbed for it. Grabbed for it, curling my fingers. Groaning and
grunting. Reaching. Reaching across the wet sand.
But no.
I couldn’t get it. The head lay a foot from my fingertips.
A foot that seemed a mile.
No way. No way.
My fingers grabbed only air. I couldn’t reach it.
I knew I was doomed.
My hands dropped heavily onto the wet sand. I let out a defeated sigh.
19
My hands made a loud slapping sound as they hit the sand.
And the head bounced.
“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry. My heart started to pound.
I slapped the surface of the wet sand again with both palms.
The head bounced. Closer.
Another hard slap. Another bounce.
The head lay only a few inches away now.
I grabbed it, held it tightly—and joyfully shouted out the word. “Kah-leeah! Kah-lee-ah!”
At first, nothing happened.
My breath caught in my throat. I froze.
“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!”
I expected to fly up. To be lifted out of the sandpit. To float magically over
to hard ground.
“Jungle Magic—please work! Please work!” I cried out loud.
But I didn’t move. I sank a little deeper. The sand crept up over my chest.
I stared at the shrunken head in my hand. The black eyes appeared to stare
back at me.
“Help me!” I cried. “Why aren’t you helping me?”
And then I saw the vines.
Yellow-green vines creeping over the sandpit. Moving like long snakes. A
dozen twisting, crawling vines, slithering toward me from all directions.
My heart pounded as I watched the vines slither closer. Closer. Until I
reached out with my free hand and grabbed for the end of one.
But the vine swept past my hand, moving quickly with surprising force. It
wrapped itself around my chest—and started to tighten.
“No!” I uttered a cry of protest. Was it going to strangle me?
Another vine dipped into the sand. I felt it curl around my waist.
“No—stop!” I wailed.
The vines tightened around me. And then they began to pull.
The wet sand made a thwock sound as I started to move through it.
Holding the shrunken head in the air, I let the vines tug me through the
sand. They pulled hard and fast. The sand flew at my sides.
A few seconds later, the vines tugged me, on my knees, onto hard ground. I
let out a happy cry. The vines instantly let go. I watched them pull back, curling
quickly into the tall weeds.
I hunched there, struggling to catch my breath, watching until the vines
slithered out of sight. Then I pulled myself to my feet.
My legs felt shaky and weak. My whole body trembled from my close call.
But I didn’t care. I felt like jumping up and clapping and shouting for joy.
The Jungle Magic had worked. The Jungle Magic had saved me once again!
The wet sand clung to my jeans, my shirt, my arms—even my hair! I shook
myself furiously. I tucked the shrunken head into my shirt pocket. Then I began
slapping at my clothes, brushing off chunks of sand.
Now what? I asked myself, glancing quickly around. The sun had risen high
in the sky. The trees and ferns and tall grass gleamed, a shimmering blur of green
and gold. The air had grown hot. My shirt clung wetly to my back.
Now what?
How do I find Aunt Benna?
I pulled the shrunken head from my pocket and held it in front of me. “Lead
the way,” I ordered it.
Nothing happened.
I brushed chunks of sand off its leathery skin. I pried sand from between its
thin black lips.
I turned toward the sun and took a few steps. Was I still walking east?
To my surprise, the dark eyes on the shrunken head suddenly started to
glow.
What did that mean? Did that mean I was getting close to Aunt Benna? Did
it mean I was walking in the right direction?
I decided to test it.
I spun around and started walking back toward the sandpit.
The eyes on the head instantly dimmed back to black.
I turned and started walking north.
The eyes remained dark.
I turned back in the direction of the sun.
Yes! The eyes began, to glow again. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cried happily. The
head was guiding me to my aunt.
Animals howled and insects chittered loudly as I made my way through the
trees and tall weeds. It all sounded like music to me now.
“Aunt Benna, here I come!” I cheered.
I found myself walking deeper into the jungle. I had to keep ducking my
head to avoid low branches and thick vines that stretched from tree to tree.
I heard weird bird calls overhead. As if the birds were talking to each other.
As I ducked under a low limb, the whole tree seemed to shake. And a thousand
black birds leaped off the branches, cawing angrily, so many of them they
darkened the sky as they flapped away.
I suddenly came to a small clearing that forked into two branches, one to
the left, one to the right. Which way should I go?
I held the shrunken head in front of me, watching it carefully. I started to
the left.
The eyes grew dark. Wrong way.
I turned and started to the right, watching the eyes begin to glow again.
Was Aunt Benna hiding somewhere in these trees? Was I getting close?
The trees ended suddenly again, and I found myself in a grassy clearing. I
squinted in the bright sunlight, my eyes sweeping over the shimmering green
grass.
A low growl made me spin back toward the trees.
“Oh—!” I let out a sharp cry as I saw the tiger. My legs nearly crumpled
under me.
The tiger raised its head in another growl. An angry growl. It pulled back its
lips, baring enormous teeth. It arched its back, its yellow-brown fur standing
straight on end.
Then with a furious hiss, it came charging at me.
20
The tiger’s huge paws pounded over the grass. Its yellow eyes burned into mine.
I glimpsed two little cubs behind it, nestled in the shade of a tree.
“I’m not going to hurt your cubs!” I wanted to cry.
But of course there was no time.
The tiger let out a furious roar as it charged.
The roar drowned out my cry as I raised the shrunken head in front of me in
a trembling hand. “Kah-lee-ah!”
My voice came out in a whimper.
I nearly dropped the head. My knees collapsed. I sank to the grass.
The tiger closed in for the kill. Its heavy paws thudded the dirt as it leaped
toward me.
The ground felt as if it were shaking.
The ground was shaking!
To my horror, I heard a deafening ripping sound. Like Velcro being torn
apart. Only a thousand times louder.
I let out a cry as the ground trembled. Shook.
Split apart.
The grass tore away. The dirt split in two.
The earth opened up.
And I started to fall. Down into an endless hole in the earth.
Down, down.
Screaming all the way.
21
“Owww!”
I landed hard on my elbows and knees. Pain shot through my body. I
actually saw stars! Hundreds of them, all red and yellow.
Trying to blink them away, I raised myself to my knees.
The shrunken head had bounced out of my hand. I spotted it a few feet
away in the dirt. I dove for it, grabbed it up in my shaking hand, and held onto it
tightly.
I felt dizzy and shaken. I closed my eyes and waited for the dizziness to
pass.
When I opened them, I realized I had fallen into a deep pit. Walls of dirt
surrounded me. The blue sky was a small square high above my head.
Jungle Magic had saved me once again. The magic had caused the ground
to split open so that I could fall to safety. So that I could escape the tiger.
I heard a low growl above me.
With a frightened cry, I gazed up to the top of the pit. And saw two yellow
eyes glaring down at me.
The tiger snarled, baring its teeth.
I didn’t escape, I realized.
I’m trapped down here. If the tiger leaps down into the pit, it will finish me
off in seconds.
I have nowhere to run. No way to escape.
I fell back against the wall of dirt. I stared up at the snarling tiger. It eyed
me hungrily, roaring again. Preparing to leap to the attack.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I cried. “Kah-lee-ah!”
The tiger roared in reply.
I pressed my back against the dirt. Tried to stop my whole body from
shaking.
Please don’t come down here! I begged silently. Please don’t jump down
into this pit!
The yellow eyes glowed in the sunlight. The silvery whiskers twitched as
the tiger snarled its toothy warning.
And then I saw a little yellow-and-black cat face appear at the top of the pit.
One of the tiger cubs. It peered down at me over the edge of the grass.
The other cub popped up beside it. It leaned over the pit edge. Leaned so
far, it nearly fell in!
The tiger moved quickly. She lowered her head—and bumped the cub away
from the edge. Then she picked up the other cub in her teeth and carried it away.
I swallowed hard. I didn’t move. My back pressed against the cool dirt, I
stared up to the top. Watched the square of blue sky. And waited for the tiger to
return.
Waited.
And waited. Holding my breath.
Silence now. So silent I could hear the wind rushing through the tall grass.
A chunk of dirt broke off the pit wall and toppled to the bottom, crumbling
as it landed. I kept my gaze on the opening, listening hard, watching for the tiger.
After what seemed like hours, I let out a long whoosh of air. I stepped away
from the dirt wall and stretched.
The tiger isn’t coming back, I decided.
She only wanted to protect her cubs from me. By now, she has taken them
away. Far away.
I stretched again. My heart was still thumping hard in my chest. But I was
starting to feel a little more normal.
How do I get out of here? I wondered, gazing at the steep dirt walls. Can I
climb out?
I tucked the shrunken head back into my pocket. Then I dug both hands into
the soft, cool dirt and tried to climb.
I pulled myself up about a foot or two. But then the dirt broke off under my
sneakers. It crumbled and fell, sending me sliding back to the bottom.
No. No way. I can’t climb out, I realized.
I reached for the shrunken head. I’ll have to use Jungle Magic, I decided.
The magic got me down here. Now I can use it to get me out.
I raised the head in front of me. But before I could call out the word,
darkness fell over the pit.
Is the sun setting already? I wondered.
I gazed up to the top.
No. It wasn’t evening. The square of sky that I could see was still bright
blue.
Someone stood up there, blocking the sunlight.
The tiger?
A human?
I squinted hard, struggling to see.
“Who-who’s there?” I called.
22
A face leaned over the edge, peering down at me. Squinting into the bright
sunlight, I saw straight blond hair. Pale blue eyes.
“Kareen!” I shouted.
She cupped her hands around her mouth. “Mark—what are you doing down
there?”
“What are you doing here?” I cried.
Her hair fell over her face. She brushed it back. “I—I followed you. I was
so worried about you!”
“Get me out of here!” I shouted up to her. I tried climbing again. But the
dirt slid out from under my sneakers.
“How?” she called down.
“I guess you didn’t bring a ladder with you?” I shouted.
“Uh—no, Mark,” Kareen sniped.
I guess she doesn’t have much of a sense of humor.
“Maybe I could drop a rope down or something,” she suggested.
“Rope isn’t too easy to find in the middle of the jungle,” I reminded her.
She shook her head. Her face tightened into a fretful frown.
“How about a vine?” I called up. “See if you can find a long vine. I could
climb up a vine.”
Her expression brightened. She disappeared. I waited impatiently. And
waited. “Please hurry,” I murmured out loud, my eyes on the square opening at
the top. “Please hurry.”
I heard the squawk of birds somewhere up above. Fluttering wings. More
squawking and cawing.
Are the birds frightened? I wondered. If they are, why? Has the tiger
returned?
I pressed against the dirt wall, watching the sky.
Finally, Kareen reappeared. “I found a vine. But I don’t know if it’s long
enough.”
“Lower it over the side,” I instructed her. “Quick. I have to get out of here. I
feel like a trapped animal.”
“It was hard to pull it out of the ground,” she complained. She began
lowering the vine. It looked like a long snake twining down the side of the pit.
It stopped a few feet above my head. “I’m going to jump up and grab it,” I
told Kareen. “Then I’ll try to climb while you pull. Wrap the other end around
your waist, okay? Just don’t let go of it!”
“Just don’t pull me down with you!” she called back.
I waited for her to tie the vine around herself. Then I bent my knees and
jumped. I missed the end of the vine by a few inches.
This was one of those times I wished I were tall and thin instead of short
and chubby.
But I grabbed the vine on my third try. I wrapped both hands around it.
Then I pressed the soles of my sneakers against the dirt wall. And started to
pull myself up, like a mountain climber.
The dirt kept crumbling out from under me. And the vine grew more and
more slippery as my hands started to sweat. But with Kareen cheering me on, I
scrambled to the top.
I lay in the tall grass for a moment, breathing in the sweet fragrance. It felt
so wonderful to be out of that deep hole.
“How did you fall down there anyway?” Kareen asked, tossing her end of
the vine to the ground.
“It was easy,” I replied. I climbed to my feet and tried to brush the dirt off
my clothes.
“But didn’t you see that big pit there?” she demanded.
“Not exactly,” I told her. I wanted to change the subject. “How did you find
me? What are you doing here, Kareen?”
Her blue eyes locked on mine. “I was worried about you. I—I didn’t think
you should be all alone in the jungle. So I sneaked away. Daddy was working in
his lab. I crept away from the headquarters, and I followed you.”
I brushed clumps of dirt from my hair. “Well, I’m glad,” I confessed. “But
aren’t you going to be in major trouble with your dad and Carolyn?”
She bit her lower lip. “Probably. But it will be worth the risk—if we find
your aunt.”
Aunt Benna!
Trying to survive the quicksand and the tiger, I had nearly forgotten about
her.
A shadow rolled over us. The air suddenly grew cooler. I glanced up at the
sky. The sun was lowering itself behind the trees.
“It’s almost night,” I said quietly. “I—I hope we can find Aunt Benna
before it gets really dark.”
I had already spent one night out in the jungle. I didn’t want to spend
another.
“Do you know which way to go?” Kareen asked. “Are you just wandering
around, hoping to get lucky?”
“No way,” I replied. I pulled the head from my shirt pocket. “This little guy
is showing me the way.”
“Excuse me?” Kareen’s face filled with surprise.
“The eyes light up when I go the right direction,” I explained. “At least, I
think that’s why they light up.”
Kareen gasped. “You mean, you really do have Jungle Magic?”
I nodded. “Yeah. I have it. It’s so weird. There’s a word I’ve always said.
‘Kah-lee-ah.’ Just a crazy word. I thought I made it up when I was a little kid.
But it’s the word that makes the Jungle Magic work.”
“Wow!” Kareen exclaimed. A grin spread across her face. “That’s awesome,
Mark! That means we really will find Benna. That’s so great!”
The shadows over the ground grew longer as the sun dipped lower. I
shivered as a cold gust of wind blew over us.
My stomach growled. I couldn’t remember when my last meal was. I tried
not to think about food. I had to keep moving.
“Let’s get going,” I said softly. I raised the head in front of me. Then I
turned slowly—one direction, then the next—until the eyes began to glow. “This
way!” I cried, pointing across the clearing to the trees.
We started walking side by side. The tall grass swished, brushing our legs
as we stepped through it. Insects chittered in the trees.
Kareen stared in amazement at the glowing eyes on the leathery head. “Do
you really think it’s guiding us to Benna?”
“We’ll soon find out,” I said solemnly.
We stepped into the shifting darkness beneath the tangled trees.
23
As the sunlight faded, the jungle sounds changed. The birds in the trees stopped
chirping. The shrill sawing of the insects grew louder. We heard strange animal
howls and cries in the distance, the sound bouncing between the smooth trees.
I hoped the howls and cries stayed in the distance!
Dark creatures slithered through the tall weeds and low, fat ferns and
shrubs. The shrubs appeared to tremble as night creatures scurried through them.
I heard the warning hiss of snakes. The eerie hoot of an owl. The soft flap
of bat wings.
I moved closer to Kareen as we walked. The sounds were all so much more
realistic than in my Jungle King game!
I’ll probably never play that game again after this, I thought. It will seem
way too tame.
We pushed our way through a clump of tall, stiff reeds. The eyes on the
shrunken head dimmed to black.
“Wrong way!” I whispered.
Kareen and I turned until the eyes glowed again. Then we moved forward,
making our own path. We stepped over thick vines and pushed through tangles
of weeds and low shrubs.
“Ow!” Kareen slapped at her forehead. “Stupid mosquito.”
The shrill scratching of insects grew louder, drowning out the crunch of our
sneakers over the leaves and vines on the jungle floor.
As the darkness deepened, the eyes on the shrunken head appeared to glow
brighter. Like twin flashlights, guiding us through the trees.
“I’m getting kind of tired,” Kareen complained. She ducked her head to
avoid a low branch. “I hope your aunt is nearby. I don’t know how much longer I
can walk.”
“I hope she’s nearby, too,” I murmured in reply. I’d had a pretty exhausting
day myself!
As we walked, I couldn’t help thinking about Aunt Benna and her
notebook. I didn’t want to make Kareen feel bad. But I had to say something.
“My aunt didn’t write very nice things about your dad and Carolyn in her
notebook,” I said, keeping my eyes at my feet. “I was kind of surprised.”
Kareen was silent for a long moment. “That’s so horrible,” she said finally.
“They worked together for so long. I knew they had an argument.”
“About what?” I asked.
Kareen let out a sigh. “Daddy has some plans to develop the jungle. He
thinks there are valuable minerals here. Benna thinks the jungle should be
preserved.”
She sighed again. “I think that’s what they fought about. I’m not sure.”
“The notebook made it seem like your dad is evil or something,” I
muttered, avoiding her eyes.
“Evil? Daddy?” she cried. “No. No way. He’s very strong-minded. That’s
all. He isn’t evil. And I know that Daddy still cares about Benna. He still
respects her and cares about her. He’s really worried about her. He—”
“Whoa.” I grabbed Kareen’s arm, interrupting her. “Look.” I pointed
through the trees.
I spotted a clearing up ahead. And against the gray sky, I could see the
black outline of a small shack.
Kareen gasped. “That little house. Do you think—?”
We both crept to the edge of the clearing. Something scurried quickly over
my sneakers, but I ignored it.
My eyes were on the tiny, dark shack.
As we moved closer, I could see that it was built of tree limbs and sticks.
Clumps of fat leaves made the roof. It had no window. But there were narrow
openings between the branches.
“Hey—!” I whispered. I saw a pale light flicker in one of the openings.
A flashlight? A candle?
“Someone is in there,” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at the shack.
I heard a cough.
A woman’s cough? Aunt Benna’s cough? I couldn’t tell.
“Do you think it’s my aunt?” I whispered, huddling close to Kareen.
“Only one way to find out,” she whispered back.
The shrunken head glowed brightly in my hand. The eerie yellow-green
light splashed over the ground as Kareen and I crept closer.
Closer.
“Aunt Benna?” I called in a tiny voice. I cleared my throat. My heart
pounded. “Aunt Benna? Is that you?”
24
I called again and stepped close to the open doorway of the small shack. I heard
a thump inside. Saw a flash of light. And heard a startled cry.
A lantern appeared in the doorway. My eyes went to the pale yellow light.
And then moved up to see the woman holding the lantern.
She was short—very short. Only about a foot taller than me, and a little
chubby. Her straight black hair was tied back. In the glow of lantern light, I saw
that she wore khaki slacks and a khaki safari jacket.
“Who’s there?” She raised the lantern in front of her.
“Aunt Benna?” I cried, moving closer. “Is that you?”
“Mark? I don’t believe it!” she exclaimed. She came running toward me,
the lantern swinging at her side. The light bounced over the tall grass, making
shadows dance.
She wrapped me in a hug. “Mark—how did you find me? What are you
doing here?” She had a high, chirpy voice, and she talked rapidly, without taking
a breath.
She pushed me away from her to study my face. “I don’t believe I even
recognized you. I haven’t seen you since you were four!”
“Aunt Benna—what are you doing out here?” I demanded breathlessly.
“Everyone is so worried—”
“How did you get to Baladora?” she asked, gripping my shoulder with her
free hand, holding the lantern high with the other. “What are you doing in the
jungle? How did you get here?” she cried again.
“I—I used the Jungle Magic,” I stammered.
Her eyes went wide. With surprise? With fear?
I suddenly realized she wasn’t looking at me. “Hello. Who are you?” Aunt
Benna asked quietly, stretching the lantern toward the trees.
Kareen stepped out from the edge of the clearing. In all the excitement, I
didn’t realize that she had lingered behind.
“That’s Kareen,” I told my aunt. “Do you know Kareen? Dr. Hawlings’
daughter?”
Aunt Benna gasped. She squeezed my shoulder. “Why did you bring her
here? Don’t you realize—?”
“It’s okay,” Kareen said quickly. “I was worried about you. That’s why I
followed Mark.”
“She helped me,” I explained to Aunt Benna. “Kareen helped me get away
from them. From Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn. Kareen helped me get through the
jungle.”
“But—but—” Aunt Benna sputtered. “You told her about the Jungle
Magic?”
“I only came to help!” Kareen insisted. “My father is worried about you. He
—”
“Your father wants to kill me!” Aunt Benna cried angrily. “That’s why I had
to run away. That’s why I had to leave everything behind and hide in the jungle.”
She glared at Kareen, her eyes squinting, her face pinched and hard in the yellow
lantern light.
“Kareen is okay,” I assured her. “She only wants to help, Aunt Benna.
Really.”
My aunt turned to me. “Carolyn and Hawlings brought you here?”
I nodded. “Yes. To find you. Carolyn brought me this.” I pulled the
shrunken head from my shirt pocket. It had stopped glowing.
“They told me I had Jungle Magic,” I continued. “I didn’t know what they
meant. I thought they were crazy. Then, when I went out to look for you in the
jungle, I discovered that I did have it.”
Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. You have it, Mark. I gave it to you when I
visited you. When you were four. I hypnotized you. And I transferred the Jungle
Magic from me to you. To keep it safe.”
“Yes. I read your notebook,” I told her. “I read about why you gave me the
magic. But it didn’t say what Jungle Magic is. I only know—”
“It’s a powerful force,” my aunt replied, lowering her voice. “It’s a
powerful force that will do your will, carry out your wishes.”
Her eyes filled with sadness. “But we cannot talk about it now,” she said in
a whisper. “We are in danger here, Mark. Real danger.”
I started to reply. But I heard rustling, cracking sounds from the trees.
Footsteps?
All three of us spun around toward the sound.
To my surprise, Kareen started running across the grass. She cupped her
hands around her mouth. “Over here, Daddy!” she shouted. “Over here! I found
Benna, Daddy! Hurry!”
25
I gasped in shock.
No time to run.
A beam of light flickered out from the trees. Behind it came Dr. Hawlings,
trotting over the tall grass. He carried a flashlight in one hand. The light swept
into my eyes, then moved over Aunt Benna.
Was Dr. Hawlings carrying a gun? Some kind of weapon? I couldn’t see.
And I didn’t want to find out.
I grabbed Aunt Benna’s arm and tugged. I wanted to run, to escape into the
jungle.
But my aunt refused to move. She seemed frozen in surprise. Or fear.
Kareen’s father trotted up to us, breathing hard. Even in the dim light, I
could see the pleased smile on his face.
“Good work, Kareen.” He patted her shoulder. “I knew that if you helped
Mark escape, he would lead us right to his aunt.”
Still holding onto Aunt Benna’s arm, I stared at Kareen angrily. She had
tricked me. She had pretended to be my friend. But the whole time, she was
working to help her father.
Kareen stared back at me for a moment. Then she lowered her eyes to the
ground.
“Why did you trick me?” I demanded. “Why did you do it, Kareen?”
She raised her eyes to me. “Daddy needs the Jungle Magic,” she replied
softly.
“But you lied to me!” I cried.
“I didn’t have a choice,” Kareen said. “If your father needed your help,
what would you do?”
“You did the right thing, Kareen,” Dr. Hawlings told her.
He raised the light to Aunt Benna’s face. He forced her to cover her eyes.
“Did you really think you could hide forever, Benna?” he demanded softly.
“I—I’m sorry,” I told my aunt. “It’s my fault. I—”
“No.” Aunt Benna put a hand on my shoulder. “It’s not your fault, Mark.
It’s my fault. You didn’t know anything about any of this. And now I’m afraid
I’ve gotten you into a lot of trouble.”
Dr. Hawlings snickered. “A lot of trouble. That’s the truth.” He stepped up
to Aunt Benna. “I want the secret of Jungle Magic. Tell me the secret, Benna.
Let me know how it works. And I will allow you and your nephew to leave the
island in one piece.”
In one piece?
I didn’t like the sound of that.
As Dr. Hawlings stared at my aunt, I slipped the shrunken head from my
pocket. I’ll use the Jungle Magic, I decided. I’ll use the magic to get us out of
this jam.
I raised the head slowly in front of me. I opened my mouth to call out the
secret word.
But I was stopped when I caught Aunt Benna’s glance.
She was signaling me with her eyes. Telling me not to do it.
“What’s going on?” Dr. Hawlings demanded, angrily turning to me. “What
are you doing?”
“Don’t give it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna pleaded. “Don’t let them know the
secret word.”
I lowered the shrunken head. “I won’t,” I whispered.
“It’s okay, Daddy,” Kareen said, her eyes on me. “I know the word. Mark
told it to me. I can tell you what it is. It’s—”
26
I clamped my hand over Kareen’s mouth. “Run!” I cried to Aunt Benna. “Run—
now!”
With an angry cry of attack, Aunt Benna lowered her shoulder and barreled
into Dr. Hawlings. She roared into him like a football player—and sent him
sprawling against the little shack.
He uttered a startled yelp. The flashlight flew out of his hand and rolled
across the ground.
I spun away from Kareen and followed my aunt. Our shoes thudded over
the tall grass as we ran for the trees.
We were nearly to the edge of the clearing when Carolyn stepped in front of
us. “What’s your hurry?” she demanded, moving to block our way. “The party is
just starting.”
Aunt Benna and I whirled around. Dr. Hawlings had moved up behind us.
We were trapped.
Carolyn raised her flashlight. Her silvery eyes narrowed at Aunt Benna.
Carolyn smiled. A cold, unpleasant smile. “How are you, Benna? We missed
you.”
“Enough chitchat,” Dr. Hawlings muttered, gesturing with his flashlight.
“It’s too dark to go back to the headquarters. We’ll have to spend the night here.”
“How cozy,” Carolyn said, still smiling that cold smile at Aunt Benna.
Aunt Benna scowled and looked away. “Carolyn, I thought you were my
friend.”
“We’re all good friends here,” Dr. Hawlings said. “And good friends like to
share. That’s why you’re going to share the secret of Jungle Magic with us,
Benna.”
“Never!” my aunt declared, crossing her arms in front of her.
“Never isn’t a word for friends,” Dr. Hawlings scolded. “In the morning,
we will go back to the headquarters. Then you will share everything, Benna. You
will share all of your secrets. And you will give the Jungle Magic to Carolyn and
me.”
“Like a good friend,” Carolyn added.
“Let’s go,” Dr. Hawlings said. He put a heavy hand on my back and shoved
me toward the little shack. Kareen was sitting on the ground, her collar pulled
up, her back leaning against one wall.
“You and Benna—in the shack,” Dr. Hawlings ordered, giving me another
rough shove. “That way, we can keep an eye on you.”
“You’re wasting your time, Richard,” Aunt Benna told him. She was trying
to sound tough, but her voice trembled as she said it.
Dr. Hawlings forced us into the dark shack. Aunt Benna and I stretched out
on the floor. Through the cracks in the wall, I could see the darting light of their
flashlights.
“Are they going to guard us all night?” I whispered.
Aunt Benna nodded. “We’re their prisoners now,” she whispered back. She
sighed. “But we can’t let them have the Jungle Magic. We can’t!”
I slid closer to my aunt. “If we don’t give it to them,” I said softly, “what
will they do to us?”
Aunt Benna didn’t reply.
“What will they do to us?” I repeated.
She stared down at the floor and didn’t answer.
27
A red ball of a sun was rising in the early morning sky when Dr. Hawlings poked
his head into the shack and woke us up.
I had slept only a few minutes. The shack had no floor, and the ground was
hard.
Whenever I closed my eyes, I dreamed about the shrunken head in my
pocket. I dreamed that I held it in my hand. It blinked its eyes and its lips began
to move.
“You are doomed!” it exclaimed in a horrifying, hoarse whisper. “You are
doomed. Doomed. Doomed!”
Aunt Benna and I scrambled out of the shack, stretching and yawning. Even
though the sun was still low over the trees, the air already felt hot and wet.
My whole body ached from lying on the hard ground. My shirt was damp
and smelly. My stomach growled. I scratched my neck and discovered it was
covered with mosquito bites.
Not one of the great mornings.
And it wasn’t going to get any better.
We walked for hours through the sweltering jungle. Carolyn and Kareen led
the way. Dr. Hawlings walked behind Aunt Benna and me, making sure we
didn’t try to escape.
No one said a word. The only sounds were the cries of animals, the chirping
of birds overhead, and the swish of the tall weeds and grass as we pushed
through.
Swarms of white gnats flew up off the path, swirling together like small
tornadoes. The sun beamed down through the trees, burning the back of my
neck.
When we finally made it back to the row of cabins, I was hot, sweaty,
starving, and dying of thirst.
Dr. Hawlings shoved Aunt Benna and me into an empty cabin. He slammed
the door behind us and locked it.
The cabin had two folding chairs and a small bed without sheets or
blankets. I dropped down wearily onto the bare mattress. “What is he going to do
to us?”
Aunt Benna bit her lip. “Don’t worry,” she said softly. “I’ll figure
something out.” She crossed the small room and tried the window. It was either
stuck or bolted from the outside.
“Maybe we can break the glass,” I suggested.
“No, he’ll hear it,” Aunt Benna replied.
I rubbed the back of my neck. The mosquito bites were itching like crazy. I
wiped sweat off my forehead with the back of my hand.
The door opened. Kareen entered, carrying two small bottles of water. She
tossed one to me and one to my aunt. Then she turned quickly, closed the door
hard behind her, and carefully locked it.
I tilted the bottle to my mouth and gulped down the water without taking a
breath. There were a few drops left at the bottom. I sprinkled them over the top
of my head. Then I tossed the bottle to the floor.
“What are we going to do?” I asked Aunt Benna.
She was sitting in one of the folding chairs, her feet resting on the other.
She raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhh.”
Outside, I heard the rattle of machinery. A metallic clang. I heard the rush
of water from a hose.
I hurried to the window and peered out. But it faced the wrong way. I
couldn’t see anything.
“We’ve had one lucky break,” Aunt Benna murmured.
I stared at her. “Excuse me?”
“One lucky break,” she repeated. “Hawlings didn’t take away the shrunken
head. It was so dark last night, I don’t think he saw it.”
I pulled the head out from my pocket. The black hair had become tangled. I
started to smooth it back.
“Put it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna ordered sharply. “We don’t want
Hawlings to see it. He doesn’t know that the head is needed for Jungle Magic.”
“This particular head?” I asked, shoving it back in the pocket. “Only this
head?”
Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. That head and the magic word. The word I gave
you when I hypnotized you. When you were four.”
The head’s black hair fell over my pocket. I carefully tucked it inside.
Outside, I heard another metallic clank. I heard a splash. The roar of water
grew louder.
“We are in terrible danger,” Aunt Benna said softly. “You will have to use
the Jungle Magic to save us, Mark.”
I felt a chill of fear. But I muttered, “No problem.”
“Wait till I give you the signal,” Aunt Benna instructed. “When I blink my
eyes three times, pull the shrunken head out and shout the word. Keep watching
me. Watch for the signal—okay?”
Before I could reply, the door burst open. Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn hurried
in, their faces grim.
Dr. Hawlings carried a large silvery pistol. “Outside,” he ordered, waving
the pistol at Aunt Benna and me.
Carolyn led the way down the row of cabins. She turned and made us stop
behind the main headquarters building. Kareen stood against the wall, a widebrimmed straw hat pulled down over her eyes.
The sun beamed down. The back of my neck prickled and itched.
Huddling close to my aunt, I squinted into the bright sunlight. To my right,
the big pile of shrunken heads came into focus.
The dark eyes on the leathery, purple-and-brown heads seemed to stare at
me. The mouths were all twisted in ugly expressions of anger and horror.
I turned away from the terrifying pile of tiny heads—to see something even
more terrifying.
An enormous black pot stood behind the headquarters building. Water
brimmed over the top, bubbling and boiling.
The pot stood on some kind of electric burner. Like a stove burner. It glared
red hot. The boiling water inside the pot bubbled and steamed.
I turned to Aunt Benna and caught the fear on her face. “You can’t do this!”
she screamed to Dr. Hawlings. “You know you can’t get away with this!”
“I don’t want to hurt you,” Dr. Hawlings said calmly, without any emotion
at all. A smile spread over his face. “I don’t want to harm you, Benna. I just want
to own the Jungle Magic.”
I kept my eyes locked on my aunt. Waiting for her signal. Waiting for the
three blinks that meant I should go into action.
“Give me the Jungle Magic,” Dr. Hawlings insisted.
Carolyn stepped up beside him, hands on her waist. “Give it to us, Benna.
We don’t want trouble. We really don’t.”
“No!” The word shot out of my aunt’s mouth. “No! No! No! You both
know that I will never give up the secret of Jungle Magic. Not to you. Not ever!”
Carolyn sighed. “Please, Benna. Don’t make it difficult.”
My aunt stared back at her. “Never,” she murmured.
Aunt Benna blinked.
I swallowed hard, watching for two more blinks.
No. Not the signal. Not yet.
Dr. Hawlings stepped forward. “Please, Benna. I’m giving you one last
chance. Tell us the secret—now.”
Aunt Benna shook her head.
“Then I have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, shaking his head. “Since you
two are the only ones in the world who know the secret, you are both too
dangerous. The secret must die with you.”
“Wh-what are you going to do to us?” I blurted out.
“We’re going to shrink your heads,” Dr. Hawlings replied.
28
The pot hissed as water boiled over the side. I stared in horror at the billows of
steam rising up over the pot.
Was he really going to shrink our heads?
Was I going to end up shriveled and leathery, with a head the size of a
doorknob?
I forced my legs to stop wobbling and stared at Aunt Benna. Stared at her.
Stared hard. Watching her eyes. Waiting for the three blinks.
Hurry! I pleaded silently. Hurry—before he tosses us into the boiling water!
Kareen watched in silence. What was she thinking? I wondered. I couldn’t
see her expression. Her face was hidden under the brim of the straw hat.
“Benna, one last chance,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “Because I like you.
And I like your nephew. Don’t let me harm your nephew, Benna. Do it for him,
okay? Tell me the secret—for Mark’s sake.”
“It isn’t worth it, Benna,” Carolyn chimed in. “It will be so easy for you to
give the Jungle Magic to us.”
“I-I can’t,” Aunt Benna stammered.
“Then we have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, almost sadly. “The boy goes
in first.”
He took a step toward me.
Aunt Benna blinked. Once. Twice. Three times.
Finally!
With a trembling hand, I tugged the head from my pocket.
I raised it in front of me. I opened my mouth to shout the secret word.
But Dr. Hawlings swiped the head from my hand.
He grabbed it away—and tossed it onto the big pile of heads.
Then he dove for me, reaching out to grab me with both hands.
I ducked out from under him.
And threw myself onto the disgusting pile of heads.
I began frantically sorting through them with both hands. Picking one up,
tossing it aside. Grabbing the next one. The next one. The next one.
They felt sticky and warm. Hard as baseballs. The hair brushed my hands.
The dark eyes stared up at me blankly. They were so ugly, my stomach
tightened. My breath came in wheezing gasps.
Behind me, I could hear my aunt struggling with Dr. Hawlings. Wrestling
with him. Trying to keep him away from me.
I heard Carolyn’s shouts. Kareen’s cries of alarm.
I had to find my shrunken head.
I had to find it before Dr. Hawlings broke free of my aunt and grabbed me.
I picked one up. Tossed it down. Picked up another. Tossed it down.
How could I find mine?
Which one was it?
Which one? Which one?
29
I grabbed a head. Saw ants crawling over its cheeks.
Picked up another.
It stared at me with glassy green eyes.
Picked up another.
It had a long white scratch on its ear.
I started to toss it back onto the pile.
But stopped.
A white scratch on its ear?
Yes! Mine had a scratch! My sister Jessica—she scratched it back home!
Yes! This head was mine!
“Thank you, Jessica!” I cried at the top of my lungs.
With an angry cry, Dr. Hawlings dove at me. He wrapped his arms around
me and started to drag me off the pile of heads.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted, holding on tightly to the shrunken head. My
shrunken head. “Kah-lee-ah!”
Will it save Aunt Benna and me? I wondered.
Will the Jungle Magic work this time?
Dr. Hawlings still had his arms around my shoulders. He was still trying to
pull me toward the boiling pot.
“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed.
His hands slid away.
They seemed to shrink. His arms seemed to shrink into his body.
“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry when I realized that he was shrinking. Dr.
Hawlings’ entire body was shrinking, growing smaller and smaller!
I raised my eyes to Kareen and Carolyn. They were shrinking, too.
Shrinking down to the ground.
Kareen disappeared under the straw hat. Then she came running out from
under the brim. A tiny Kareen, about the size of a mouse.
All three of them—Kareen, Carolyn, and Dr. Hawlings—scampered over
the grass. Mouse-sized. Squeaking angrily in tiny mouse voices.
I stood beside the pile of heads and watched them scurry over the ground.
Squeaking and squealing. I watched them until they disappeared into the jungle.
Then I turned back to Aunt Benna. “It worked!” I cried. “The Jungle Magic
—it saved us!”
She rushed forward and wrapped me in a hug. “You did it, Mark. You did
it! The jungle is safe now! The whole world is safe!”
* * *
There were more hugs when Aunt Benna flew me home. Hugs from Mom—and
even Jessica.
They met us at the airport. Then Mom drove us home for a big welcomehome dinner. I had so many stories to tell, I started telling them in the car. And I
didn’t stop talking until way past dinner.
It was nearly bedtime when Aunt Benna led me into the den. She closed the
door behind us. Then she sat me down on the couch.
She sat down beside me. “Look into my eyes,” she said softly. “Look
deeply, Mark. Very deeply.”
I raised my eyes to hers. “What are you going to do?” I asked.
I didn’t hear her reply.
As I stared into her eyes, the room grew fuzzy. The colors all seemed to
shift and blur. I thought I saw the posters on the den wall flipping over and over.
I thought I saw the chairs and coffee table sliding across the floor.
After a while, the room came back into focus. Aunt Benna smiled at me.
“There,” she said, squeezing my hand. “You’re back to normal, Mark.”
“Huh?” I squinted at her. “What do you mean?”
“No more Jungle Magic,” she explained. “I took it back. You’re a normal
boy again.”
“You mean, if I shout ‘Kah-lee-ah’ nothing will happen?” I asked.
“That’s right.” She smiled at me, still holding my hand. “I took back the
magic. The shrunken head has no powers. And you have no powers. You never
have to worry about it again.”
She stood up, yawning. “It’s getting late. Bedtime, don’t you think?”
I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” I was still thinking about how I didn’t have
Jungle Magic anymore. “Aunt Benna?”
“Yes?”
“Can I keep the shrunken head?”
“Of course,” she replied, tugging me to my feet. “Keep the shrunken head.
As a souvenir. That way, you will always remember your jungle adventure.”
“I don’t think I could forget it too easily,” I replied. Then I said good night
and made my way to bed.
The next morning, I woke up early and pulled on my clothes as fast as I could. I
couldn’t wait to get to school and show off the shrunken head to Eric and Joel
and all the other kids.
I gulped down my cornflakes and chugged my orange juice. I strapped on
my backpack. Called good-bye to Mom. Grabbed the shrunken head and headed
out the door.
Holding the head carefully in my hand, I started to jog along the sidewalk.
It was a bright, sunny day. The air smelled warm and sweet.
My school is only three blocks from my house. But as I jogged along, it
seemed like miles.
I couldn’t wait to get there and show off to everyone.
I couldn’t wait to tell my friends about all my jungle adventures.
I could see the school in the next block. And I could see a bunch of kids
hanging out by the front door.
As I ran across the street, I suddenly felt the head move in my hand.
It twitched.
“Huh?” I let out a gasp and stared down at it.
The eyes blinked, then stared up at me. The lips closed, then opened again.
“Hey, kid,” the head growled. “Let me tell the part about the tiger!”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DUMMY III
Goosebumps - 40
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
The stairs up to my attic are narrow and steep. The fifth step is loose and
wobbles when you stand on it. All the other stairs creak and groan.
My whole house creaks and groans. It’s a big, old house. And it’s kind of
falling apart. Mom and Dad don’t really have the money to repair it.
“Trina—hurry!” my brother, Dan, whispered. His words echoed in the steep
attic stairwell. Dan is ten, and he is always in a hurry.
He’s short and very skinny. I think he looks like a mouse. He has short
brown hair, dark eyes, and a pointy little chin. And he’s always scurrying around
like a mouse searching for a place to hide.
Sometimes I call him Mouse. You know. Like a nickname. Dan hates it. So
I only call him Mouse when I want to make him mad.
Dan and I don’t look at all like brother and sister. I’m tall and I have curly
red hair and green eyes. I’m a little chubby, but Mom says not to worry about it.
I’ll probably slim down by the time I’m thirteen, next August.
Anyway, no one would ever call me Mouse! For one thing, I’m a lot braver
than Dan.
You have to be brave to go up to our attic. Not because of the creaking
stairs. Or the way the wind whistles through the attic windows and makes the
panes rattle. Not because of the dim light up there. Or the shadows. Or the low
ceiling covered with cracks.
You have to be brave because of the eyes.
The dozens of eyes that stare at you through the darkness.
The eyes that never blink. The eyes that stare with such eerie, heavy
silence.
Dan reached the attic ahead of me. I heard him take a few steps over the
squeaking, wooden floorboards. Then I heard him stop.
I knew why he stopped. He was staring back at the eyes, at the grinning
faces.
I crept up behind him, moving on tiptoe. I leaned my face close to his ear.
And I shouted, “BOO!”
He didn’t jump.
“Trina, you’re about as funny as a wet sponge,” he said. He shoved me
away.
“I think wet sponges are funny,” I replied. I admit it. I like to annoy him.
“Give me a break,” Dan muttered.
I grabbed his arm. “Okay.” I pretended to break it in two.
I know it’s dumb. But that’s the way my brother and I kid around all the
time.
Dad says we didn’t get our sense of humor from him. But I think we
probably did.
Dad owns a little camera store now. But before that he was a ventriloquist.
You know. He did a comedy act with a dummy.
Danny O’Dell and Wilbur.
That was the name of the act. Wilbur was the dummy, in case you didn’t
guess it.
Danny O’Dell is my dad. My brother is Dan, Jr. But he hates the word
junior, so no one ever calls him that.
Except me. When I want to make him really mad!
“Someone left the attic light on,” Dan said, pointing to the ceiling light. The
only light in the whole attic.
Our attic is one big room. There are windows at both ends. But they are
both caked with dust, so not much light gets through.
Dan and I made our way across the room. The dummies all stared at us,
their eyes big and blank. Most of them had wide grins on their wooden faces.
Some of their mouths hung open. Some of their heads tilted down so we couldn’t
see their faces.
Wilbur—Dad’s first dummy, the original Wilbur—was perched on an old
armchair. His hands were draped over the chair arms. His head tilted against the
chair back.
Dan laughed. “Wilbur looks just like Dad taking a nap!”
I laughed, too. With his short brown hair, his black eyeglasses, and his
goofy grin, Wilbur looked a lot like Dad!
The old dummy’s black-and-yellow checked sports jacket was worn and
frayed. But Wilbur’s face was freshly painted. His black leather shoes were
shiny.
One wooden hand had part of the thumb chipped out. But Wilbur looked
great for such an old dummy.
Dad keeps all of the dummies in good shape. He calls the attic his Dummy
Museum. Spread around the room are a dozen old ventriloquist’s dummies that
he has collected.
He spends all of his spare time fixing them up. Painting them. Giving them
fresh wigs. Making new suits and pants for them. Working on their insides,
making sure their eyes and mouths move correctly.
These days, Dad doesn’t get to use his ventriloquist skills very often.
Sometimes he’ll take one of the dummies to a kid’s birthday party and put on a
show. Sometimes people in town will invite him to perform at a party to raise
money for a school or library.
But most of the time the dummies just sit up here, staring at each other.
Some of them are propped against the attic wall. Some are sprawled out on
the couch. Some of them sit in folding chairs, hands crossed in their laps. Wilbur
is the only one lucky enough to have his own armchair.
When Dan and I were little, we were afraid to come up to the attic. I didn’t
like the way the dummies stared at me. I thought their grins were evil.
Dan liked to stick his hand into their backs and move their mouths. He
made the dummies say frightening things.
“I’m going to get you, Trina!” he would make Rocky growl. Rocky is the
mean-faced dummy that sneers instead of smiles. He’s dressed like a tough guy
in a red-and-white striped T-shirt and black jeans. He’s really evil-looking, “I’m
coming to your room tonight, Trina. And I’m going to GET you!”
“Stop it, Dan! Stop it!” I would scream. Then I would go running
downstairs and tell Mom that Dan was scaring me.
I was only eight or nine.
I’m a lot older now. And braver. But I still feel a little creeped out when I
come up here.
I know it’s dumb. But sometimes I imagine the dummies sitting around up
here, talking to each other, giggling and laughing.
Sometimes late at night when I’m lying in bed, the ceiling creaks over my
head. Footsteps! I picture the dummies walking around in the attic, their heavy
black shoes clonking over the floorboards.
I picture them wrestling around on the old couch. Or playing a wild game
of catch, their wooden hands snapping as they catch the ball.
Dumb? Of course it’s dumb.
But I can’t help it.
They’re supposed to be funny little guys. But they scare me.
I hate the way they stare at me without blinking. And I hate the red-lipped
grins frozen on their faces.
Dan and I come up to the attic because Dan likes to play with them. And
because I like to see how Dad fixes them up.
But I really don’t like to come up to the attic alone.
Dan picked up Miss Lucy. That’s the only girl dummy in the group. She has
curly blond hair and bright blue eyes.
My brother stuck his hand into the dummy’s back and perched her on his
knee. “Hi, Trina,” he made the dummy say in a high, shrill voice.
Dan started to make her say something else.
But he stopped suddenly. His mouth dropped open—like a dummy’s—and
he pointed across the room.
“Trina—l-look!” Dan stammered. “Over there!”
I turned quickly. And I saw Rocky, the mean-looking dummy, blink his
eyes.
I gasped as the dummy leaned forward and sneered. “Trina, I’m going to
GET you!” he growled.
2
I uttered a startled cry and jumped back.
I swung around, ready to run to the attic steps—and I saw Dan laughing.
“Hey—!” I cried out angrily. “What’s going on here?”
I turned back to see Dad climb to his feet behind Rocky’s chair. He carried
Rocky in one arm. Dad’s grin was as wide as a dummy’s!
“Gotcha!” he cried in Rocky’s voice.
I turned angrily on my brother. “Did you know Dad was back there? Did
you know Dad was here the whole time?”
Dan nodded. “Of course.”
“You two are both dummies!” I cried. I flung my red hair back with both
hands and let out an exasperated sigh. “That was so stupid!”
“You fell for it,” Dan shot back, grinning at Dad.
“Who’s the dummy here?” Dad made Rocky say. “Hey—who’s pulling
your string? I’m not a dummy—knock on wood!”
Dan laughed, but I just shook my head.
Dad refused to give up. “Hey—come over here!” he made Rocky say.
“Scratch my back. I think I’ve got termites!”
I gave in and laughed. I’d heard that joke a million times. But I knew Dad
wouldn’t stop trying until I laughed.
He’s a really good ventriloquist. You can never see his lips move. But his
jokes are totally lame.
I guess that’s why he had to give up the act and open a camera store. I don’t
know for sure. It all happened before I was born.
Dad set Rocky back on his chair. The dummy sneered up at us. Such a badnews dummy. Why couldn’t he smile like the others?
Dad pushed his eyeglasses up on his nose. “Come over here,” he said. “I
want to show you something.”
He put one hand on my shoulder and one hand on Dan’s shoulder and led us
to the other end of the big attic room. This is where Dad has his workshop—his
worktable and all his tools and supplies for fixing up the dummies.
Dad reached under the worktable and pulled up a large brown-paper
shopping bag. I could tell by the smile on his face what he had in the bag. But I
didn’t say anything to ruin his surprise.
Slowly, carefully, Dad reached into the shopping bag. His smile grew wider
as he lifted out a dummy. “Hey, guys—check this out!” Dad exclaimed.
The dummy had been folded up inside the bag. Dad set it down flat on the
worktable and carefully unfolded the arms and legs. He looked like a surgeon
starting an operation.
“I found this one in a trash can,” he told us. “Do you believe someone just
threw it away?”
He tilted the dummy up so we could see it. I followed Dan up to the
worktable to get a better look.
“The head was split in two,” Dad said, placing one hand at the back of the
dummy’s neck. “But it took two seconds to repair it. Just a little glue.”
I leaned close to check out Dad’s new treasure. It had wavy brown hair
painted on top of its head. The face was kind of strange. Kind of intense.
The eyes were bright blue. They shimmered. Sort of like real eyes. The
dummy had bright red painted lips, curved up into a smile.
An ugly smile, I thought. Kind of gross and nasty.
His lower lip had a chip on one side so that it didn’t quite match the other
lip.
The dummy wore a gray double-breasted suit over a white shirt collar. The
collar was stapled to his neck.
He didn’t have a shirt. Instead, his wooden chest had been painted white.
Big black leather shoes—very scuffed up—dangled from his skinny gray pants
legs.
“Can you believe someone just tossed him into the trash?” Dad repeated.
“Isn’t he great?”
“Yeah. Great,” I murmured. I didn’t like the new dummy at all. I didn’t like
his face, the way his blue eyes gleamed, the crooked smile.
Dan must have felt the same way. “He’s kind of tough-looking,” he said. He
picked up one of the dummy’s wooden hands. It had deep scratches all over it.
The knuckles appeared cut and bruised. As if the dummy had been in a fight.
“Not as tough-looking as Rocky over there,” Dad replied. “But he does
have a strange smile.” He picked at the small chip in the dummy’s lip. “I can fill
that in with some liquid wood filler. Then I’ll give the whole face a fresh paint
job.”
“What’s the dummy’s name?” I asked.
Dad shrugged. “Beats me. Maybe we’ll call him Smiley.”
“Smiley?” I made a disgusted face.
Dad started to reply. But the phone rang downstairs. One ring. Two. Three.
“I guess your mom is still at that school meeting,” Dad said. He ran to the
stairs. “I’d better answer it. Don’t touch Smiley till I get back.” He vanished
down the stairs.
I picked up the dummy’s head carefully in both hands. “Dad did a great
gluing job,” I said.
“He should do your head next!” Dan shot back.
Typical.
“I don’t think Smiley is a good name for him,” Dan said, slapping the
dummy’s hands together.
“How about Dan Junior?” I suggested. “Or Dan the Third?”
He ignored me. “How many dummies does Dad have now?” He turned
back toward the others across the attic and quickly counted them.
I counted faster. “This new one makes thirteen,” I said.
Dan’s eyes went wide. “Whoa. That’s an unlucky number.”
“Well, if we count you, it’s fourteen!” I said.
Gotcha, Danny Boy!
Dan stuck out his tongue at me. He set the dummy’s hands down on its
chest. “Hey—what’s that?” He reached into the pocket of the gray suit jacket and
pulled out a folded-up slip of paper.
“Maybe that has the dummy’s name on it,” I said. I grabbed the paper out of
Dan’s hands and raised it to my face. I unfolded it and started to read.
“Well?” Dan tried to grab it back. But I swung out of his reach. “What’s the
name?”
“It doesn’t say,” I told him. “There are just these weird words. Foreign, I
guess.”
I moved my lips silently as I struggled to read them. Then I read the words
out loud: “Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.”
Dan’s mouth dropped open. “Huh? What’s that supposed to mean?” he
cried.
He grabbed the paper from my hand. “I think you read it upside down!”
“No way!” I protested.
I glanced down at the dummy.
The glassy blue eyes stared up at me.
Then the right eye slowly closed. The dummy winked at me.
And then his left hand shot straight up—and slapped me in the face.
3
“Hey—!” I shouted. I jerked back as pain shot through my jaw.
“What’s your problem?” Dan demanded, glancing up from the slip of paper.
“Didn’t you see?” I shrieked. “He—he slapped me!” I rubbed my cheek.
Dan rolled his eyes. “Yeah. For sure.”
“No—really!” I cried. “First he winked at me. Then he slapped me.”
“Tell me another one,” Dan groaned. “You’re such a jerk, Trina. Just
because you fall for Dad’s jokes doesn’t mean I’m going to fall for yours.”
“But I’m telling the truth!” I insisted.
I glanced up to see Dad poke his head up at the top of the stairs. “What’s
going on, guys?”
Dan folded up the slip of paper and tucked it back into the dummy’s jacket
pocket. “Nothing much,” he told Dad.
“Dad—the new dummy!” I cried, still rubbing my aching jaw. “He slapped
me!”
Dad laughed. “Sorry, Trina. You’ll have to do better than that. You can’t kid
a kidder.”
That’s one of Dad’s favorite expressions: “You can’t kid a kidder.”
“But, Dad—” I stopped. I could see he wasn’t going to believe me. I wasn’t
even sure I believed it myself.
I glanced down at the dummy. He stared blankly up at the ceiling. Totally
lifeless.
“I have news, guys,” Dad said, sitting the new dummy up. “That was my
brother—your uncle Cal—on the phone. He’s coming for a short visit while
Aunt Susan’s away on business. And he’s bringing your cousin Zane with him.
It’s Zane’s spring vacation from school, too.”
Dan and I both groaned. Dan stuck his finger in his mouth and pretended to
puke.
Zane isn’t our favorite cousin.
He’s our only cousin.
He’s twelve, but you’d think he was five or six. He’s pretty nerdy. His nose
runs a lot. And he’s kind of a wimp.
Kind of a major wimp.
“Hey, stop groaning,” Dad scolded. “Zane is your only cousin. He’s
family.”
Dan and I groaned again. We couldn’t help it.
“He isn’t a bad kid,” Dad continued, narrowing his eyes at us behind his
glasses. That meant he was being serious. “You two have to promise me
something.”
“What kind of promise?” I asked.
“You have to promise me that you’ll be nicer to Zane this time.”
“We were nice to him last time,” Dan insisted. “We talked to him, didn’t
we?”
“You scared him to death last time,” Dad said, frowning. “You made him
believe that this old house is haunted. And you scared him so badly, he ran
outside and refused to come back in.”
“Dad, it was all a joke,” I protested.
“Yeah. It was a scream!” Dan agreed. He poked me in the side with his
elbow. “A scream. Get it?”
“Not funny,” Dad said unhappily. “Not funny at all. Listen, guys—Zane
can’t help it if he’s a little timid. He’ll outgrow it. You just have to be nice to
him.”
Dan snickered. “Zane is afraid of your dummies, Dad. Can you believe it?”
“Then don’t drag him up here and scare the life out of him,” Dad ordered.
“How about if we just play one or two little jokes on him?” Dan asked.
“No tricks,” Dad replied firmly. “None.”
Dan and I exchanged glances.
“Promise me,” Dad insisted. “I mean it. Right now. Both of you. Promise
me there will be no tricks. Promise me you won’t try to scare your cousin.”
“Okay. I promise,” I said. I raised my right hand as if I were swearing an
oath.
“I promise, too,” Dan said softly.
I checked to see if his fingers were crossed. They weren’t.
Dan and I had both made a solemn promise. We both promised not to terrify
our cousin. And we meant it.
But it was a promise we couldn’t keep.
Before the week was over, our cousin Zane would be terrified.
And so would we.
4
I was playing the piano when Zane arrived. The piano is tucked away in a small
room in the back of the house. It’s a small black upright piano, kind of beat-up
and scratched. Dad bought it from my old music teacher who moved to
Cleveland.
Two of the pedals don’t work. And the piano really needs to be tuned. But I
love to play it—especially when I’m stressed out or excited. It always helps to
calm me down.
I’m pretty good at it. Even Dan agrees. Most of the time he pushes me off
the piano bench so he can play “Chopsticks”. But sometimes he stands beside
me and listens. I’ve been practicing some nice Haydn pieces and some of the
easy Chopin etudes.
Anyway, I was in the back of the house banging away on the piano when
Zane and Uncle Cal arrived. I guess I was a little nervous about seeing Zane
again.
Dan and I were really mean to him during his last visit. Like Dad said, Zane
has always been scared of this old house. And we did everything we could to
make him even more scared.
We walked around in the attic every night, howling softly like ghosts,
making the floor creak. We crept into his bedroom closet in the middle of the
night and made him think his clothes were dancing. We rigged a pair of Mom’s
panty hose so they cast a ghostly shadow of legs onto his bedroom floor.
Poor Zane. I think Dan and I went a little too far. After a few days, he
jumped at every sound. And his eyes kept darting from side to side like a
frightened lizard’s.
I heard him tell Uncle Cal that he never wanted to come back here.
Dan and I laughed about that. But it wasn’t very nice.
So I was a little nervous about seeing Zane again. I was playing the piano
so loudly, I didn’t hear the doorbell. Dan had to come running in and tell me
Uncle Cal and Zane had arrived.
I jumped up from the piano bench. “How does Zane look?” I asked my
brother.
“Big,” Dan replied. “He grew. A lot. And he let his hair grow long.”
Zane was always a pretty big guy. That’s why Dan and I thought his being a
total wimp was so funny.
He’s big and beefy. Not tall. He’s built kind of like a bulldog. A big blond
bulldog.
I guess he’s actually good-looking. He has round blue eyes, wavy blond
hair, and a nice smile. He looks as if he works out or plays sports. He really
doesn’t look like the wimp type at all.
That’s why it’s such a riot to see him quivering in fear. Or wailing like a
baby. Running to his mom or dad in terror.
I followed Dan through the back hall. “Did Zane say anything to you?” I
asked.
“Just hi,” Dan replied.
“A friendly ‘hi’ or an unfriendly ‘hi’?” I demanded.
Dan didn’t have time to answer. We had reached the front hall.
“Hey—!” Uncle Cal greeted me, stretching out his arms for a hug. Uncle
Cal looks a lot like a chipmunk. He’s very small. He has a round face, a twitchy
little nose, and two teeth that poke out from his upper lip.
“You’re getting so tall!” he exclaimed as I hugged him. “You’ve grown a
lot, Trina!”
Why do grown-ups always have to comment on how tall kids are getting?
Can’t they think of anything else to say?
I saw Dad lugging their two heavy suitcases up the stairs.
“I didn’t know if you’d be hungry or not,” Mom told Uncle Cal. “So I made
a bunch of sandwiches.”
I turned to say hi to Zane. And a flash of white light made me cry out in
surprise.
“Don’t move. One more,” I heard Zane say.
I blinked rapidly, trying to clear the light from my eyes. When I finally
focused, I saw that Zane had a camera up to his face.
He clicked it. Another bright flash of light.
“That’s good,” he said. “You looked really surprised. I only like to take
candid shots.”
“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal said, grinning proudly.
“I’m blind!” I cried, rubbing my eyes.
“I needed extra flash because this house is so dark,” Zane said. He lowered
his head to the camera and fiddled with his lens.
Dad came shuffling down the stairs. Zane turned and snapped his picture.
“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal repeated to my father. “I told
him maybe you’ve got an old camera or two at the shop that he could have.”
“Uh… maybe,” Dad replied.
Uncle Cal makes a lot more money than Dad. But whenever he visits, he
always tries to get Dad to give him stuff.
“Nice camera,” Dad told Zane. “What kind of photos do you like to take?”
“Candid shots,” Zane replied, pushing back his blond hair. “And I take a lot
of still lifes.” He stepped into the hall and flashed a close-up of the banister.
Dan leaned close and whispered in my ear, “He’s still a pain. Let’s give him
a really good scare.”
“No way!” I whispered back. “No scares this time. We promised Dad—
remember?”
“I’ve set up a darkroom in the basement,” Dad told Zane. “Sometimes I
bring developing work home from the store. You can use the darkroom this
week, if you want to.”
“Great!” Zane replied.
“I told Zane maybe you have some sheets of developing paper you can
spare,” Uncle Cal said to Dad.
Zane raised his camera and flashed another picture. Then he turned to Dan.
“Are you still into video games?” he asked.
“Yeah,” Dan replied. “Mostly sports games. I have the new NBA Jams. And
I’m saving my allowance to get the new thirty-two-bit system. You still play?”
Zane shook his head. “Not since I got my camera. I don’t really have time
for games anymore.”
“How about some sandwiches, everyone?” Mom asked, moving toward the
dining room.
“I think I’d like to unpack first,” Uncle Cal told her. “Zane, you should
unpack, too.”
We all split up. Dan and Dad disappeared somewhere. Uncle Cal and Zane
went up to their rooms to unpack—our big old house has a lot of extra
bedrooms.
I was heading into the kitchen to help Mom with the sandwiches when I
heard Zane scream.
A shrill scream from upstairs.
A scream of horror.
5
Mom gasped and dropped the sandwich tray she was carrying.
I spun around and went running to the front hall.
Dad was already halfway up the stairs. “What’s wrong?” he called. “Zane—
what’s the matter?”
When I reached the second floor, I saw Dan step out of his room. Zane
stood in the hallway. Someone lay stretched across the floor at his feet.
Even from halfway down the hall, I could see that Zane was trembling.
I hurried over to him.
Who was sprawled on the floor like that, legs and arms all twisted?
“Zane—what happened? What happened?” Dad and Uncle Cal both
shouted.
Zane stood there shaking all over. The camera seemed to tremble, too,
swinging on its strap over his chest.
I glanced down at the body on the floor.
A ventriloquist’s dummy.
Rocky.
Rocky sneered up at the ceiling. His red-and-white striped shirt had rolled
up halfway, revealing his wooden body. One leg was bent under him. Both arms
were stretched out over the floor.
“That d-dummy—” Zane stammered, pointing down at Rocky. “It—it fell
on me when I opened the bedroom door.”
“Huh? It what?” Uncle Cal cried.
“It dropped down on me,” Zane repeated. “When I pushed the door. I didn’t
mean to scream. It just scared me, that’s all. It was so heavy. And it fell near my
head.”
I turned and saw Dad glaring angrily at Dan.
Dan raised both hands in protest. “Hey—don’t look at me!” he cried.
“Dan, you made a promise,” Dad said sharply.
“I didn’t do it!” Dan cried. “It had to be Trina!”
“Hey—no way!” I protested. “No way! I didn’t do it!”
Dad narrowed his eyes at me. “I suppose the dummy climbed up on top of
the door by himself!” he said, rolling his eyes.
“It was just a joke,” Uncle Cal chimed in. “You’re okay—right, Zane?”
“Yeah. Sure.” Zane’s cheeks were red. I could see he was embarrassed by
all the fuss. “I just wasn’t expecting something to fall on me. You know.” He
stared at the floor.
“Let’s finish unpacking,” Uncle Cal suggested. “I’m starting to get hungry.”
He turned to Dad. “Do you have any extra pillows? There’s only one on my bed.
And I like to sleep with a lot of pillows.”
“I’ll see if we have any more,” Dad replied. He frowned at me. “You and
Dan—take Rocky up to the attic. And no more little jokes. You promised—
remember?”
I picked Rocky up carefully and slung him over my shoulder. “Get the attic
door for me,” I instructed Dan.
We made our way down the hall. “What is your problem, Mouse?” I
whispered to my brother.
“Don’t call me Mouse,” he replied through gritted teeth. “You know I hate
it.”
“Well, I hate broken promises,” I told him. “You can’t wait one minute to
start scaring Zane? You’re going to get us in major trouble.”
“Me?” Dan put on his innocent act. “I didn’t hide the dummy up there. You
did—and you know it!”
“Did not!” I whispered angrily.
“Hey, guys, can I come with you?” I turned to see Zane right behind us. I
hadn’t realized he’d followed us.
“You want to come up to the Dummy Museum?” I asked, unable to hide my
surprise. Last visit, Zane had been afraid of the dummies.
“Yeah. I want to take some pictures,” he replied. He raised his camera in
both hands.
“Cool,” Dan said. “That’s a cool idea.” I could see that he was trying to be
friendly to Zane.
I didn’t want to be left out. “It’s neat that you’re into photography,” I told
Zane.
“Yeah. I know,” he replied.
Dan led the way up the attic stairs. Halfway up, I turned back. I saw Zane
lingering at the bottom.
“Are you coming up or not?” I called down. My voice echoed in the
narrow, dark stairwell.
I caught a look of fear on Zane’s face. He was trying to be brave, I realized.
Trying not to be afraid the way he was last time.
“Coming,” he called up. I saw him take a deep breath. Then he came
running up the stairs.
He stayed close to Dan and me as we crossed the attic. The eyes peered out
at us darkly from around the big room.
I clicked on the light. The dummies all came into view. Propped on chairs
and the old couch, leaning against the wall, they grinned at us.
I carried Rocky over to his folding chair. I slid him off my shoulder and set
him down. I crossed his arms in his lap and straightened his striped shirt. The
mean-looking dummy sneered up at me.
“Uncle Danny has a few new guys,” Zane said from across the room. He
stood close to Dan in front of the couch. He held the camera in his hands, but he
didn’t take any pictures. “Where does he find them?”
“He found the newest one in a trash can,” I replied, pointing to the meanlooking dummy.
Dan picked up Miss Lucy and held it up to Zane. “Hiya, Zane! Take my
picture!” Dan made Miss Lucy say in a high, shrill voice.
Zane obediently raised the camera to his eye. “Say cheese,” he told Miss
Lucy.
“Cheese,” Dan said in Miss Lucy’s high voice.
Zane flashed a picture.
“Give me a big wet kiss!” Dan made Miss Lucy say. He shoved the
dummy’s face close to Zane’s.
Zane backed away. “Yuck.”
“Put the dummy down,” I told my brother. “We’d better get back
downstairs. They’re all probably waiting for us.”
“Okay, okay,” Dan grumbled. He turned to set Miss Lucy down. Zane
wandered down the row of dummies, studying them.
I bent down and straightened Wilbur’s bow tie. The old dummy was
starting to look really ragged.
I was still working on the bow tie when I heard a hard slap.
And I heard Zane’s startled cry of pain.
“Owwww!”
6
I spun around and saw Zane rubbing his jaw.
“Hey—that dummy slapped me!” he cried angrily.
He pointed to a red-haired dummy on the arm of the couch.
“I-I don’t believe it!” Zane exclaimed. “It swung its arm up, and it—it
slapped me!”
Dan stood behind the couch. I saw a smile spread over his face. Then he
burst out laughing. “Get serious,” he told Zane. “That’s impossible.”
“You did it!” Zane accused my brother, still rubbing his jaw. “You moved
the dummy!”
“No way!” Dan backed away till he bumped the wall. “How could I? I was
behind the couch the whole time.”
I stepped quickly up to the couch. “Which dummy was it?” I demanded.
Zane pointed to a dummy with red hair and bright red freckles painted all
over his grinning face. “That guy.”
“Arnie,” I reported. “One of Dad’s first dummies.”
“I don’t care what his name is,” Zane snapped. “He slapped me!”
“But that’s dumb,” I insisted. “It’s just a ventriloquist’s dummy, Zane. Here.
Look.”
I picked Arnie up. The old dummy was heavier than I remembered. I started
to hand him to Zane. But my cousin backed away.
“Something weird is going on here,” Zane said, keeping his eyes on the
dummy. “I’m going to tell Uncle Danny.”
“No. Don’t tell Dad,” I pleaded. “Give us a break, Zane. It’ll get us in big
trouble.”
“Yeah. Don’t tell,” Dan chimed in. “The dummy probably just slipped or
something. You know. It fell over.”
“It reached up,” Zane insisted. “I saw it swing its arm and—”
He was interrupted by Mom’s voice from downstairs. “Hurry up, kids. Get
down here. We’re all waiting for you.”
“Coming!” I shouted. I dropped Arnie back onto the arm of the couch. He
fell into the dummy next to him. I left him like that and followed Dan and Zane
to the stairs.
I held Dan back and let Zane go down by himself. “What are you trying to
prove?” I angrily asked my brother. “That wasn’t funny.”
“Trina, I didn’t do it. I swear!” Dan claimed, raising his right hand. “I
swear!”
“So what are you saying?” I demanded. “That the dummy really reached up
and slapped him?”
Dan twisted his face. He shrugged. “I don’t know. I just know that I didn’t
do it. I didn’t swing that dummy’s arm.”
“Don’t be stupid,” I replied. “Of course you did.” I shoved my brother
toward the stairs.
“Hey—give me a break,” he muttered.
“You’re a total liar,” I told him. “You think you can scare Zane—and me.
But it isn’t worth it, Dan. We promised Dad, remember? Remember?”
He ignored me and started down the stairs.
I felt really angry. I knew that Dan had perched the dummy on top of the
bedroom door so that it would fall on Zane. And I knew that he had swung the
dummy’s arm to slap Zane.
I wondered how far Dan would go to frighten our cousin.
I knew I had to stop him. If Dan kept this up, he’d get us both grounded for
life. Or worse.
But what could I do?
I was still thinking about it in bed later that night. I couldn’t get to sleep. I
lay there, staring up at the ceiling, thinking about Dan and what a liar he was.
Dummies are made of wood and cloth, I told myself. They don’t swing their
arms and slap people.
And they don’t get up and walk around the house and climb up onto doors
on their own. They don’t walk on their own….
They don’t…
I finally started to drift off to sleep when I heard light footsteps on my
bedroom carpet.
And then a hoarse whisper close to my ear:
“Trina… Trina…”
7
“Trina… Trina…”
The hoarse whisper—so near my ear—made me shoot straight up in bed.
I leaped to my feet. Pulled the covers with me. Lurched forward.
And nearly knocked Zane onto his back.
“Zane?”
He stumbled backwards. “Sorry!” he whispered. “I thought you were
awake.”
“Zane!” I repeated. My heart thudded in my chest. “What are you doing in
here?”
“Sorry,” he whispered, backing up some more. He stopped a few inches in
front of my dresser. “I didn’t mean to scare you. I just—”
I held my hand over my heart. I could feel it start to slow back down to
normal. “Sorry I jumped out at you like that,” I told him. “I was half asleep, I
guess. And when you whispered my name…”
I clicked on the bed-table lamp. I rubbed my eyes and squinted at Zane.
He was wearing baggy blue pajamas. One pajama leg had rolled up nearly
to his knee. His blond hair had fallen over his face. He had such a frightened,
little-boy expression on his face. He looked about six years old!
“I tried to wake up Dad,” he whispered. “But he’s such a sound sleeper. I
kept knocking on his bedroom door and calling to him. But he didn’t hear me. So
I came in here.”
“What’s your problem?” I asked, stretching my arms over my head.
“I-I heard voices,” he stammered, glancing to the open bedroom door.
“Excuse me? Voices?” I pushed my hair back. Straightened my long
nightshirt. Studied him.
He nodded. “I heard voices. Upstairs. I mean, I think they were upstairs.
Funny voices. Talking very fast.”
I squinted at him. “You heard voices in the attic?”
He nodded again. “Yeah. I’m pretty sure.”
“I’m pretty sure you were dreaming.” I sighed. I shook my head.
“No. I was wide awake. Really.” He picked up a little stuffed bear from my
dresser. He squeezed it between his hands.
“I never sleep very well in new places,” he told me. “I never sleep very well
in this house!” He let out an unhappy laugh. “I was wide awake.”
“There’s no one in the attic,” I said, yawning. I tilted my ear to the ceiling.
“Listen,” I instructed. “Silent up there. No voices.”
We both listened to the silence for a while.
Then Zane set down the stuffed bear. “Do you think I could have a bowl of
cereal?” he asked.
“Huh?” I gaped at him.
“A bowl of cereal always helps calm me down,” he said. An embarrassed
smile crossed his face. “Just a habit from when I was a kid.”
I squinted at my clock radio. It was a little after midnight. “You want a
bowl of cereal now?”
He nodded. “Is that okay?” he asked shyly.
Poor guy, I thought. He’s really freaked out.
“Sure,” I said. “I’ll come down to the kitchen with you. Show you where
everything is.”
I found my flip-flops and slipped my feet into them. I keep them under my
bed. I don’t like walking barefoot on the floorboards in the hall. There are a lot
of nails that poke up from the floor.
Mom and Dad keep saying they’re going to buy carpet. But money is tight.
I don’t think carpet is tops on their list.
Zane appeared a little calmer. I smiled at him and led the way into the hall.
He’s not such a bad guy, I thought. He’s a little wimpy—but so what? I
decided to have a serious talk with Dan first thing in the morning. I planned to
make Dan promise he wouldn’t pull any more scares on Zane.
The long hall was so dark, Zane and I both held onto the wall as we made
our way to the stairs. Mom and Dad used to keep a little night-light at the end of
the hall. But the bulb burned out, and they never replaced it.
Holding onto the banister, we made our way slowly down the steps. Pale
light from outside cast long blue shadows over the living room. In the dim light,
our old furniture rose up like ghosts around the room.
“This house always creeps me out,” Zane whispered, staying close by my
side as we crossed through the front room.
“I’ve lived here all my life, and sometimes I’m scared of it, too,” I
confessed. “Old houses make so many strange sounds. Sometimes I think I hear
the house groaning and moaning.”
“I really did hear voices,” Zane whispered.
We crept through the shadows to the kitchen. My flip-flops slapped on the
linoleum. Silvery moonlight washed through the curtains over the kitchen
window.
I started to fumble on the wall for the light switch.
But I stopped when I saw the dark figure slumped at the kitchen table.
Zane saw him, too. I heard Zane gasp. He jerked back into the doorway.
“Dad? Are you still up?” I called. “Why are you sitting in the dark?”
My hand found the light switch. I clicked on the kitchen light.
And Zane and I both let out a scream.
8
I recognized the red-and-white striped shirt. I didn’t even have to see the face.
Rocky leaned over the table, his wooden head propped in his hands.
Zane and I crept closer to the table. I moved to the other side. The dummy
sneered at me. His glassy eyes were cold and cruel.
Such a nasty expression.
“How did he get down here?” Zane asked. He stared hard at the dummy, as
if expecting the dummy to answer.
“Only one way,” I murmured. “He sure didn’t walk.”
Zane turned to me. “You mean Dan?”
I sighed. “Of course. Who else? Mister Dumb Jokes.”
“But how did your brother know we’d be coming down to the kitchen
tonight?” Zane asked.
“Let’s go ask him,” I replied.
I knew Dan was awake. Probably sitting on the edge of his bed, waiting
eagerly to hear us scream from the kitchen. Giggling to himself. So pleased with
himself.
So pleased that he broke his promise to Dad. And gave Zane and me a little
scare.
I balled both hands into tight fists. I could feel the anger rising in my chest.
When I get really furious like that, I usually go to the back room and pound
the piano. I pound out a Sousa march or a hard, fast rock song. I pound the keys
till I start to calm down.
Tonight, I decided, I would pound my brother instead.
“Come on,” I urged Zane. “Upstairs.”
I took one last glance at Rocky, slouched over the kitchen table. The
dummy stared blankly back at me.
I really hate that dummy, I thought. I’m going to ask Dad to put him away
in a closet or a trunk.
I forced myself to turn away from the sneering, wooden face. Then I put
both hands on Zane’s shoulders and guided him back to the stairs.
“I’m going to tell Dan that we’re both fed up with his dumb jokes,” I
whispered to my cousin. “Enough is enough. We’ll make him promise to stop
leaving that dummy everywhere we go.”
Zane didn’t reply. In the dim light, I could see the grim expression on his
face.
I wondered what he was thinking about. Was he remembering his last visit
to our house? Was he remembering how Dan and I terrified him then?
Maybe he doesn’t trust me, either, I told myself.
We climbed the stairs and crept down the dark hallway to my brother’s
room.
The door was half open. I pushed it open the rest of the way and stepped
inside. Zane kept close behind me.
I expected Dan to be sitting up, waiting for us. I expected to see him
grinning, enjoying his little joke.
Silvery moonlight flooded in through his double windows. From the
doorway, I could see him clearly. Lying on his side in bed. Covers up to his chin.
Eyes tightly closed.
Was he faking? Was he really awake?
“Dan,” I whispered. “Da-an.”
He didn’t move. His eyes didn’t open.
“Dan—I’m coming to tickle you!” I whispered. He could never keep a
straight face when I threatened him. Dan is very ticklish.
But he didn’t move.
Zane and I crept closer. Up to the bed. We both stood over my brother,
staring hard at him, studying him in the silvery light.
He was breathing softly, in a steady rhythm. His mouth was open a little.
He made short whistling sounds. Mouse sounds. With his pointy chin and
upturned nose, he really did look like a little mouse.
I leaned over him. “Da-an, get ready to be tickled!” I whispered.
I leaned back, expecting him to leap out at me, to shout “Boo!” or
something.
But he continued sleeping, whistling softly with each breath.
I turned to Zane, who hung back in the center of the room. “He’s really
asleep,” I reported.
“Let’s go back to our rooms,” Zane replied in a soft whisper. He yawned.
I followed him to the bedroom door. “What about your cereal?” I asked.
“Forget it. I’m too sleepy now.”
We were nearly to the door when I heard someone move in the hall.
“Ohhh.” I let out a low moan as a face appeared in the doorway.
Rocky’s face.
He had followed us upstairs!
9
I grabbed Zane’s arm. We both shouted cries of surprise.
The dummy moved quickly into the room.
I cut my cry short as I saw that he wasn’t walking on his own. He was being
carried.
Dad had the dummy by the back of the neck.
“Hey—what’s going on?” Dan called sleepily from behind us. He raised his
head from the pillow and squinted at us. “Huh? What’s everybody doing in my
room?”
“That’s what I’d like to know,” Dad said sharply. He gazed suspiciously
from Zane to me.
“You—you woke me up,” Dan murmured. He cleared his throat. Then he
propped himself up on one elbow. “Why are you carrying that dummy, Dad?”
“Perhaps one of you would like to answer that question,” Dad growled. He
had pulled a robe over his pajamas. His hair was matted to his forehead.
He wasn’t wearing his glasses, so he squinted at us.
“What’s going on? I don’t understand,” Dan said sleepily. He rubbed his
eyes.
Was he putting on an act? I wondered. His innocent-little-boy act?
“I heard noises downstairs,” Dad said, shifting Rocky to his other hand. “I
went down to see what was going on. I found this dummy sitting at the kitchen
table.”
“I didn’t put him there!” Dan cried, suddenly wide awake. “Really. I
didn’t!”
“Neither did Zane or me!” I chimed in.
Dad turned to me. He sighed. “I’m really sleepy. I don’t like these jokes in
the middle of the night.”
“But I didn’t do it!” I cried.
Dad squinted hard at me. He really couldn’t see at all without his glasses.
“Do I have to punish you and your brother?” he demanded. “Do I have to ground
you? Or keep you from going away to camp this summer?”
“No!” Dan and I both cried at once. Dan and I were both going to summer
camp for the first time this year. It’s all we’ve talked about since Christmas.
“Dad, I was asleep. Really,” Dan insisted.
“No more stories,” Dad replied wearily. “The next time one of my dummies
is somewhere he shouldn’t be, you’re both in major trouble.”
“But, Dad—” I started.
“One last chance,” Dad said. “I mean it. If I see Rocky out of the attic
again, you’ve both had it!” He waved Zane and me to the door. “Get to your
rooms. Now. Not another word.”
“Do you believe me or not?” Dan demanded.
“I don’t believe that Rocky has been moving around the house on his own,”
Dad replied. “Now lie down and get back to sleep, Dan. I’m giving you one last
chance. Don’t blow it.”
Dad followed Zane and me into the hall. “See you in the morning,” he
murmured. He made his way to the attic stairs to take Rocky back up to the
Dummy Museum. I heard him muttering to himself all the way up the stairs.
I said good night to Zane and headed to my room. I felt sleepy and upset
and worried and confused—all at once.
I knew that Dan had to be the one who kept springing Rocky on Zane. But
why was he doing it? And would he quit now—before Dad grounded us or
totally ruined our summer?
I fell asleep, still asking myself question after question.
The next morning, I woke up early. I pulled on jeans and a sweatshirt and
hurried downstairs for breakfast.
And there sat Rocky at the kitchen table.
10
I peered around the kitchen. No one else around.
How lucky that I was the first one downstairs!
I grabbed Rocky up by the back of the neck. Then I tucked him under one
arm and dragged him up to the attic as fast as I could.
When I returned to the kitchen a few moments later, Mom had already
started breakfast.
Whew! A close call.
“Trina—you’re up early,” Mom said, filling the coffee maker with water.
“Are you okay?”
I glanced at the table. I had the sick feeling that Rocky would be sitting
there sneering at me.
But of course he was upstairs in the attic. I had just carried him up there.
The table stood empty.
“I’m fine,” I told her. “Just fine.”
It was definitely Be Kind to Zane Day. After breakfast, Dad hurried off to the
camera store. A short while later, Mom and Uncle Cal left for the mall to do
some shopping.
It was a bright morning. Yellow sunlight streamed in through the windows.
The sky stretched clear and cloudless.
Zane brought down his camera. He decided it was a perfect day to take
some photographs.
Dan and I expected him to go outside. But our cousin wanted to stay
indoors and shoot.
“I’m very interested in moldings,” he told us.
We followed him around the house. Dan and I had made a solemn vow to
be nice to Zane and not to scare him.
After breakfast, when Zane was upstairs getting his camera, I grabbed my
brother. I pinned him against the wall. “No tricks,” I told him.
Dan tried to wriggle away. But I’m stronger than he is. I kept him pinned
against the wall. “Raise your right hand and swear,” I instructed him.
“Okay, okay.” He gave in easily. He raised his right hand, and he repeated
the vow I recited. “No tricks against Zane. No making fun of Zane. No dummies
—anywhere!”
I let him go as Zane returned with his camera. “You have some awesome
moldings,” Zane said, gazing up at the living room ceiling.
“Really?” I replied, trying to sound interested.
What could be interesting about a molding?
Zane tilted up his camera. He focused for what seemed like hours. Then he
clicked a photo of the molding above the living room curtains.
“Do you have a ladder?” he asked Dan. “I’d really like to get a closer shot.
I’m afraid my zoom lens will distort it.”
And so Dan hurried off to the basement to get Zane a ladder.
I was proud of my brother. He didn’t complain about having to go get the
ladder. And he’d lasted a whole ten minutes without cracking any molding jokes
or making fun of Zane.
Which wasn’t easy.
I mean, what kind of a nerd thinks it’s cool to take photos of ceilings and
walls?
Meanwhile, we had no school, and it was the sunniest, warmest, most
beautiful day of March outside. Almost like spring. And Dan and I were stuck
holding the ladder for Zane so he could use his macro lens and get a really tight
molding shot.
“Awesome!” Zane declared, snapping a few more. “Awesome!”
He climbed down the ladder. He adjusted the lens. Fiddled with some other
dials on the camera.
“Want to go outside or something?” I suggested.
He didn’t seem to hear me. “I’d like to get a few more banister shots,” he
announced. “See the way the sunlight is pouring through the wooden bars? It
makes a really interesting pattern on the wall.”
I started to say something rude. But Dan caught my eye. He shook a finger
at me. A warning.
I bit my lip and didn’t say anything.
This is sooooo boring, I thought. But at least we’re keeping out of trouble.
We stood beside Zane as he photographed the banister from all angles.
After about the tenth shot, his camera began to hum and whir.
“End of the roll,” he announced. His eyes lit up. “Know what would be
really cool? To go down into the basement to the darkroom and develop these
right now.”
“Cool,” I replied. I tried to sound sincere. Dan and I were both trying so
hard to be nice to this kid!
“Uncle Danny said I could use his darkroom downstairs,” Zane said,
watching the camera as it rewound the film roll. “That would be awesome.”
“Awesome,” I repeated.
Dan and I exchanged glances. The most beautiful day of the century—and
we were heading down to a dark closet in the basement.
“I’ve never watched pictures get developed,” Dan told our cousin. “Can
you show me how to do it?”
“It’s pretty easy,” Zane replied, following us down the basement stairs.
“Once you get the timing down.”
We made our way through the laundry room, past the furnace, to the
darkroom against the far wall. We slipped inside, and I clicked on the special red
light.
“Close the door tightly,” Zane instructed. “We can’t let in any light at all.”
I double-checked the darkroom door. Then Zane set to work. He arranged
the developing pans. He poured bottles of chemicals into the pans. He unspooled
the film roll and began to develop.
I’d watched Dad do it a hundred times before. It really was kind of
interesting. And it was cool when the image began to appear and then darken on
the developing paper.
Dan and I stood close to Zane, watching him work.
“I think I got some very good angles on the living room moldings,” Zane
said. He dipped the large sheet of paper in one pan. Then he pulled it up, let it
drip for a few seconds, and lowered it into the pan beside it.
A grin spread over his face. “Let’s take a look.”
He leaned over the table. Raised the sheet of paper. Held it up to the red
light.
His grin faded quickly. “Hey—who shot this?” he demanded angrily.
Dan and I moved closer to see the photo.
“Who shot this?” Zane repeated. He furiously picked up another sheet from
the developing pan. Another one. Another one.
“How did these get on the roll?” he cried. He shoved them all toward Dan
and me.
Photos of Rocky.
Close-up portraits.
Photo after photo of the sneering dummy.
“Who shot them? Who?” Zane demanded angrily, shoving the wet photos in
our faces.
“I didn’t!” Dan declared, pulling back.
“I didn’t either!” I protested.
But then, who did? I asked myself, staring hard at the ugly, sneering face on
each sheet.
Who did?
11
“What’s going on up here, guys?”
The dummies stared back at me blankly. None of them replied.
“What’s the story?” I demanded. My eyes moved from one dummy to the
next. “Come on, guys. Speak up or I’ll come back here with a buzz saw and give
you all haircuts!”
Silence.
I paced back and forth in front of them, gazing at them sternly, my arms
crossed in front of my chest.
It was late in the afternoon. The sun had begun to lower itself behind the
trees. Orange light washed in through the dusty attic windows.
I had crept up to the attic to search for clues. Something weird was going
on.
How did all those photos of Rocky get onto Zane’s roll of film? Who took
those photos?
The same person who kept carrying Rocky downstairs and sitting him
where he would frighten Zane.
“It was Dan—right, guys?” I asked the wide-eyed dummies. “Dan came up
here—right?”
I searched the floor. The couch. Under all the chairs.
I didn’t find a single clue.
Now I was questioning the dummies. But of course they weren’t being very
helpful.
Stop wasting time and get back downstairs, I told myself.
I turned and started to the stairs—when I heard soft laughter.
“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry and spun around.
Another quiet laugh. A snicker.
And then a hoarse voice: “Is your hair red? Or are you starting to rust?”
“Excuse me?” I cried, raising a hand to my mouth. My eyes swept quickly
from dummy to dummy.
Who said that?
“Hey, Trina… you’re pretty. Pretty ugly!” That was followed by another
soft snicker. Evil laughter.
“I like your perfume. What is it… flea and tick spray?”
My eyes stopped on the new dummy, the one Dad called Smiley. He sat
straight up in the center of the couch. The voice seemed to be coming from him.
“Pinch me. I’m having a nightmare. Or is that really your face?”
I froze. A cold shiver ran down my back.
The hoarse voice did come from the new dummy!
He stared blankly at me. His mouth hung open in a stiff, unpleasant grin.
But the voice came from Smiley. The rude insults came from Smiley.
But that’s impossible! I told myself.
Impossible!
Ventriloquist’s dummies can’t talk without a ventriloquist.
“Th-this is crazy!” I stammered out loud.
And then the dummy started to move.
12
I let out a scream.
Dan popped up from behind the couch.
The dummy toppled onto its side.
“You-you-you—!” I sputtered, pointing furiously at my brother.
My heart was pounding. I felt cold all over. “That’s not funny! You—you
scared me to death!” I shrieked.
To my surprise, Dan didn’t laugh. His eyes were narrowed. His mouth hung
open. “Who was making those jokes?” he demanded. His eyes darted from
dummy to dummy.
“Give me a break!” I shot back. “Are you going to tell me it wasn’t you?”
He scratched his short brown hair. “I didn’t say a word.”
“Dan, you’re the biggest liar!” I cried. “How long have you been up here?
What are you doing here? You were spying on me—right?”
He shook his head and stepped out from behind the couch. “What are you
doing up here, Trina?” he asked. “Did you come up to get Rocky? To take Rocky
downstairs again and try to scare Zane?”
I let out an angry growl and shoved Dan with all my might.
He stumbled backwards and fell onto the couch. He cried out as he landed
on top of the new dummy. He and the dummy appeared to wrestle for a moment
as Dan struggled to climb to his feet.
I stepped up close to the couch and blocked his way. As he tried to get up, I
pushed him back down.
“You know I’m not the one who’s been moving Rocky around,” I shouted.
“We all know you’ve been doing it, Dan. And you’re going to get the two of us
in real trouble with Dad.”
“You’re wrong!” Dan declared angrily. His little mouse face turned bright
red. “Wrong! Wrong! Wrong!”
He burst up from the couch. The dummy bounced on the cushion. Its head
turned. It appeared to grin up at me.
I turned to my brother. “If you weren’t planning more trouble, what were
you doing up here?”
“Waiting,” he replied.
“Excuse me? Waiting for whom?” I demanded, crossing my arms over my
chest.
“Just waiting,” he insisted. “Don’t you get it, Trina?”
I kicked at a ball of dust on the floor. It stuck to the toe of my sneaker. “Get
it? Get what?”
“Don’t you see what’s going on?” Dan demanded. “Haven’t you caught on
yet?”
I bent down and pulled the dust ball off my sneaker. Now it stuck to my
fingers. “What is in your little mouse brain?” I asked. I rolled my eyes. “This
should be good.”
My brother stepped up beside me. He lowered his voice to a whisper. “Zane
is doing it all,” he said.
I laughed. I wasn’t sure I’d heard him.
“No. Really.” He grabbed my arm. “I know I’m right, Trina. Zane is doing
everything. Zane is moving the dummy, bringing it downstairs, then pretending
to be scared. Zane made it slap him. Zane carried it to the kitchen table both of
those times.”
I shoved Dan’s hand off my arm. Then I spread my hand over his forehead
and pretended to check his temperature. “You are totally losing it,” I told him.
“Go lie down. I’ll tell Mom you’re running a high fever.”
“Listen to me!” Dan screeched. “I’m serious! I’m right. I know I’m right!”
“Why?” I demanded. “Why would Zane do that, Dan? Why would he scare
himself?”
“To pay us back for last time,” Dan replied. “Don’t you get it? Zane is
trying to get us in trouble.”
I dropped down onto the couch beside Smiley. I thought hard about what
my brother was saying. “You mean Zane wants Dad to think that you and I are
using the dummies to scare Zane.”
“Yes!” Dan cried. “But Zane is doing it all. He’s scaring himself. And
making it look as if we’re doing it—to get us in big trouble.”
I fiddled with the dummy’s hand as I thought about it some more. “Zane
scare himself? I don’t think so,” I replied finally. “What gave you this idea?
What proof do you have?”
Dan dropped down on the couch arm. “First of all,” he started, “you didn’t
carry Rocky downstairs all those times, did you?”
I shook my head. “No way.”
“Well, neither did I,” Dan declared. “So who does that leave? Rocky isn’t
walking around by himself—right?”
“Of course not. But—”
“It was the camera that gave it away,” Dan said. “The photos Zane
developed of Rocky were the biggest clue.”
I let the dummy hand fall to the couch. “What do you mean?” I asked. I
really wasn’t following my brother’s thinking at all.
“That camera is never out of Zane’s sight,” Dan replied. “Most of the time,
he keeps it around his neck. So who else could have snapped all those photos of
Rocky?”
I swallowed hard. “You mean that Zane—?”
Dan nodded. “Zane was the only one who could have taken those pictures
of Rocky. He sneaked up to the attic. He snapped them. Then he acted scared
and angry when he developed them.”
“But it was all an act?” I asked.
“For sure,” Dan replied. “It’s all been an act. To scare us. And to get us in
trouble with Dad. Zane is trying to pay us back for how we scared him last
time.”
I still had my doubts. “It isn’t like Zane,” I argued. “He’s so wimpy, so
quiet and shy. He’s not the kind of boy who plays tricks on people.”
“He’s had months to plan it!” Dan exclaimed. “Months to plan his revenge.
We can prove it, Trina. We can hide up here and wait for him. That’s why I was
up here. Hiding behind the couch.”
“To catch him in the act?”
Dan nodded. He whispered even though we were alone. “After everyone
goes to bed tonight, let’s sneak up here and wait. Wait and see if Zane comes.”
“Okay,” I agreed. “It’s worth a try… I guess.”
Was Dan right?
Would we catch Zane in the act?
I couldn’t wait for everyone to go to sleep. I was dying to find out.
13
Gusts of wind rattled the attic windowpanes. Heavy clouds covered the moon.
We crept up the attic stairs into the darkness. Up a step. Then stop. Up a
step. Then stop. Trying to be silent.
The old house moaned and groaned beneath us.
The attic stretched blacker than the stairway.
I reached for the light switch. But Dan slapped my hand away. “Are you
crazy?” he whispered. “It has to be dark. Totally dark. Or else Zane will know
that someone is up here.”
“I know that,” I whispered sleepily. “I just wanted to take one look at the
dummies. You know. Make sure they’re all here.”
“They’re all here,” Dan replied impatiently. “Just keep moving. We’ll hide
behind the couch.”
We crept on tiptoe over the attic floorboards. I couldn’t see a thing. The
heavy clouds kept any light from washing in through the windows.
Finally, my eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see the arms of the couch.
I saw dummy heads. Dummy shoulders. Shadows against shadows.
“Dan—where are you?” I whispered.
“Back here. Hurry.” His whisper came from behind the couch.
I could feel the dummy eyes on me as I made my way around the couch. I
thought I heard a soft snicker. The evil laughter again.
But that had to be my imagination.
I trailed my hand over the couch arm. Felt a wooden dummy hand resting
on the arm. The dummy hand felt surprisingly warm.
Humanly warm.
Don’t start imagining things, Trina, I scolded myself.
That dummy hand is warm because it’s hot up in this attic.
The wind rattled the glass. Strong gusts roared against the roof, so low over
our heads.
I heard a loud groan. A soft chuckle. A strange whistling sound.
Ignoring all the attic noises, I ducked down on the floor beside my brother.
“Well? Here we are,” I whispered. “Now what?”
“Sssshhhh.” In the darkness, I could see him raise a finger to his lips. “Now
we wait. And listen.”
We both turned and rested our backs against the back of the couch. I raised
my knees and wrapped my arms around them.
“He isn’t coming,” I whispered. “This is a waste of time.”
“Ssshhh. Just wait, Trina,” Dan scolded. “Give him time.”
I yawned. I felt so sleepy. The heat of the attic was making me even
sleepier.
I shut my eyes and thought about Zane.
At dinner, he couldn’t wait to pass around the photographs of Rocky. “I
don’t know who took these shots,” Zane complained to my dad. “But they
wasted half a roll of film.”
Dad glared angrily at Dan and me. But he didn’t make a fuss. “Can we talk
about it after dinner?” he suggested quietly.
“I’m kind of scared,” Zane told Dad in a trembling voice. “So many weird
things have been happening. It’s like the dummies have lives of their own.” He
shook his head. “Wow. I hope I don’t have nightmares tonight.”
“Let’s not talk about the dummies now,” Mom chimed in. “Zane, tell us
about your school. Who is your teacher this year? What are you studying?”
“Could I have a second helping of potatoes?” Uncle Cal interrupted. He
reached for the bowl. “They’re so good. I may have to make a pig of myself.”
Dad took another quick glance at the close-up snapshots of Rocky. He
flashed Dan and me another angry scowl. Then he set the photos down on the
floor.
After dinner, Dan and I were careful to keep as far away from Dad as we
could. No way we wanted to hear another lecture about how we were terrifying
our poor cousin. And how we’d be punished if we didn’t stop it at once.
Now it was a little before midnight. And we were huddled in the dark attic.
Listening to the swirling wind and the moans and groans of the house. Backs
pressed against the couch. Waiting…
I kept my eyes closed. Thinking hard. Thinking about Zane. About Rocky.
Dan and I aren’t alone up here, I thought drowsily. There are thirteen
wooden dummies up here with us. Thirteen pairs of eyes staring into the heavy
darkness. Thirteen frozen grins. Except for Rocky’s sneer, of course.
Empty, lifeless bodies…
Heavy, wooden heads and hands…
Thinking about the dummies, the dummies all around, I guess I drifted off
to sleep.
Did I dream about the dummies?
Maybe I did.
I don’t know how long I slept.
I was awakened by footsteps. Soft, shuffling footsteps across the attic floor.
And I knew the dummies had come alive.
14
I jerked my head up, listening hard.
My hands were still wrapped around my knees. Both hands had fallen
asleep. They tingled. The back of my neck ached. My mouth felt dry and sour.
I uttered a silent gasp as I heard the shuffling, scraping footsteps move
closer.
Not dummies walking around, I realized.
A single figure. One. One person. Moving slowly, carefully toward the
couch.
Why did I think I heard dummies moving? It must have been a picture left
over from my dream.
I shook my hands, trying to make them stop tingling.
I was wide awake now. Totally alert.
The footsteps scraped closer.
Could it be Dan? Where was Dan?
Had he climbed up while I slept? Was he making his way back to the
couch?
No.
Squinting into the darkness, I saw Dan beside me.
He had climbed to his knees. He saw me move. He waved his hand and
signaled for me to be silent.
Dan gripped the back of the couch with both hands. Then he leaned forward
and peered out into the room.
I crawled to the other end of the couch. Then, keeping low, I poked my
head out and squinted into the deep shadows. All grays and blacks.
The wind howled around the house. Across the big attic room, the
windowpanes rattled and shook.
I wanted to jump out. To scream and jump out. And flash on the light.
But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm. He must have read my thoughts. He raised
a finger to his lips.
We both waited. Frozen there behind the couch. Crouching low. Listening
to each footstep. Each creak of the floorboards.
The dark figure stopped in front of the folding chair next to the couch. He
stood inches from Dan and me. If I wanted to, I could reach out and grab his leg.
I struggled to see his face. But it was hidden by the couch. And I didn’t dare
raise myself up higher.
I heard the clonk of wood against wood. Two dummy hands hitting each
other.
I heard the rustle of heavy cloth. The thud of leather shoes bumping each
other.
The intruder had picked up a dummy off the chair.
Squinting into the deep blackness, I could see him swing the dummy over
his shoulder. I could see the dummy arms swaying, swaying at his back.
The dark figure turned away quickly. And began walking to the attic stairs.
I crept out from behind the couch. Moving on tiptoe, I began to follow the
intruder.
Pressed against the wall, tiptoeing as silently as I could, I moved across the
room. I held my breath. I could hear Dan close behind me.
I reached the light switch just as the intruder made it to the stairs.
My hand fumbled against the wall as I reached.
Reached… reached for the light switch with a trembling hand.
Yes!
I flicked on the light. And Dan and I both shrieked at the same time.
15
“Zane!”
My brother and I both screamed his name.
Zane’s eyes bulged. His mouth opened in a high, frightened wail.
I saw his knees bend. I think he nearly crumpled to the floor.
He uttered several squeaks. Then his mouth hung open. I could see he was
gasping for breath.
“Zane—we caught you!” I managed to choke out.
He had Rocky draped over his shoulder.
“What—what—?” Zane struggled to speak, but no words came out. He
sputtered and started to choke. The sneering dummy bounced on his shoulder.
“Zane—we figured it out,” Dan told him. “Your little tricks aren’t going to
work.”
Our cousin was still sputtering and coughing.
“We know it’s been you all along,” Dan told him.
He stepped over and slapped Zane hard on the back a few times.
After a few seconds, Zane stopped sputtering.
Dan picked Rocky up off Zane’s shoulder and started to carry him back to
his chair.
“How-how-how did you know?” Zane stammered.
“We just figured it out,” I told him. “What’s the big idea, anyway?”
Zane shrugged. He lowered his eyes to the floor. “You know. Just having
some fun.”
I glared at him. “Some fun?” I cried angrily. “You tried to get us in huge
trouble. You—you could have ruined our whole summer!”
Zane shrugged again. “It was kind of my turn. You know?”
“Well, we’re even now,” Dan chimed in.
“Right,” I agreed quickly. “We’re all even now—right, Zane?”
He nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” A grin spread slowly over his face. “I had you
guys going, didn’t I? With that stupid dummy popping up everywhere you
looked.”
Dan and I didn’t grin back.
“You fooled us,” I murmured.
“You fooled everyone,” my brother added.
Zane grinned. A gleeful grin. I could see how pleased he was with himself.
“I guess Dan and I deserved it,” I confessed.
“Guess you did,” Zane shot back. Would he ever stop grinning?
“So now that we’re even, do we have a truce?” I demanded. “No more
joking around with the dummies? No more trying to scare each other or get
anyone in trouble?”
Zane bit his lower lip. He thought about it a long, long time. “Okay. Truce,”
he said finally.
We all shook hands solemnly. Then we slapped each other high fives. Then
the three of us started laughing. I’m not sure why. The laughter just burst out of
us.
Crazy giggling.
I guess because it was so late and we were so sleepy. And we were so glad
we could be friends now. We didn’t have to play tricks on each other anymore.
As we made our way down the stairs, I felt really happy.
I thought all the scary stuff with the dummies was over.
I had no way of knowing that it was just beginning.
16
The next morning, Dan, Zane, and I went for a long bike ride. The strong winds
had faded away during the night. A soft breeze, warm and fresh-smelling,
followed us as we pedaled along the path.
The trees were still winter bare. The ground glistened with a silvery
morning frost. But the sweet, warm air told me that spring was on its way.
We biked slowly, following a dirt path that curved into the woods. The sun,
still low in the sky, warmed our faces. I stopped to unzip my jacket. And pointed
to a patch of green daffodil leaves just beginning to poke up from the ground.
“Only three more months of school!” Dan cried. He raised both fists in the
air and let out a cheer.
“We’re going to camp this summer for the first time,” I told Zane. “Up in
Massachusetts.”
“For eight weeks!” Dan added happily.
Zane brushed back his blond hair. He leaned over the handlebars of my
dad’s bike and began pedaling harder. “I don’t know what I’m doing this
summer,” he said. “Probably just hanging out.”
“What do you want to do this summer?” I asked him.
He grinned at me. “Just hang out.”
We all laughed. I was in a great mood and so were the guys.
Dan kept pulling wheelies, leaning way back and raising his front tire off
the ground. Zane tried to do it—and crashed into a tree.
He went sailing to the ground, and the bike fell on top of him. I expected
him to whine and complain. That’s his usual style. But he picked himself up,
muttering, “Smooth move, Zane.”
“I want to see that one again!” Dan joked.
Zane laughed. “You try it!”
He brushed the dirt off his jeans and climbed back onto the bike. We
pedaled on down the path, joking and laughing.
I think we were in such great moods because of the truce. We could finally
relax and not worry about who was trying to terrify who.
The dirt path ended at a small, round pond. The pond gleamed in the
sunlight, still half-frozen from the long winter.
Zane climbed off his bike and rested it on the tall grass. Then he stepped up
to the edge of the pond to take photos.
“Look at the weeds poking up from the melting ice!” he exclaimed, clicking
away. “Awesome. Awesome!” He knelt down low and snapped a bunch of weed
photos.
Dan and I exchanged glances. I couldn’t see what was so special about the
weeds. But I guess that’s why I’m not a photographer.
As Zane stood up, a tiny brown-and-black chipmunk scampered along the
edge of the pond. Zane swung his camera and clicked off a couple of shots.
“Hey! I think I got him!” he declared happily.
“Great!” I cried. Everything seemed great this morning.
We hung out at the pond for a while. We took a short walk through the
woods. Then we started to get hungry for lunch. So we rode back to the house.
We were about to return the bikes to the garage when Zane spotted the old
well at the back of our yard. “Cool!” he cried, his blue eyes lighting up. “Let’s
check it out!”
Holding his camera in one hand, he hopped off his bike and went running
across the grass to the well.
It’s a round, stone well with green moss covering the smooth gray stones. It
used to have a pointed red roof over it. But the roof blew off during a bad storm,
and Dad hauled it away.
When we were little, Dan and I used to scare each other by pretending that
monsters and trolls lived down inside it. But we hadn’t paid much attention to
the old well in years. Dad kept saying he was going to tear it down and cover it
up. But he never got around to it.
Zane clicked a bunch of photos. “Is there still water down there?” he asked.
I shrugged. “I don’t know.”
Dan grabbed Zane around the waist. “We could toss you down and see if
you make a splash!” he declared.
Zane wrestled himself out of my brother’s grasp. “I’ve got a better idea.”
He picked up a stone and dropped it down the well.
After a long wait, we heard a splash far down below.
“Cool!” Zane exclaimed. He took several more pictures until he had
finished the roll.
Then we made our way inside the house for lunch. We hurried upstairs to
clean up.
Zane stopped at the doorway to his room.
I saw his eyes bulge and his mouth drop open. I saw his face go white.
Dan and I ran up next to him.
We stared into the bedroom—and cried out in horror.
17
“The r-room—it’s been trashed!” Dan stammered.
The three of us huddled in the doorway, staring into the bedroom. Staring at
an unbelievable mess.
At first I thought maybe Zane had left the windows open all night, and the
strong winds had blown everything around.
But that didn’t make any sense.
All of the clothes had been pulled out of the closet and tossed over the floor.
The dresser drawers had all been pulled out and dumped over the carpet.
The bookshelves had been emptied. Books littered the floor, the bed—they
were tossed everywhere. One bed table was turned on its side. The other stood
upside down on top of the bed. A lamp lay on the floor in front of the closet. Its
shade was ripped and broken.
“Look—!” Zane pointed into the center of the room.
Sitting on a tangled hill of clothes was Rocky. The dummy sat straight up,
his legs crossed casually in front of him. He sneered at us as if daring us to enter.
“I-I really don’t believe this!” I cried, tugging at the sides of my hair.
“What don’t you believe?”
Mom’s voice made me jump.
I turned to see her coming out of her bedroom. She tucked her blue sweater
into her jeans as she walked toward us.
“Mom—!” I cried. “Something terrible has happened!”
Her smile faded. “What on earth—?” she started.
I stepped aside so she could see into Zane’s room.
“Oh, no!” Mom cried out and raised both hands to her cheeks. She
swallowed hard. “Did someone break in?” Her voice sounded tiny and
frightened.
I peered quickly into my room across the hall. “No. I don’t think so,” I
reported. “This is the only room that’s messed up.”
“But—but—” Mom sputtered. Then her eyes stopped on Rocky on top of
the pile of clothes. “What is he doing down here?” Mom demanded.
“We don’t know,” I told her.
“But who did this?” Mom cried, still pressing her hands against her cheeks.
“We didn’t!” Dan declared.
“We’ve been outside all morning,” Zane added breathlessly. “It wasn’t
Trina, or Dan, or me. We weren’t home. We were riding bikes.”
“But—someone had to do this!” Mom declared. “Someone deliberately tore
this room apart.”
But who was it? I wondered. My eyes darted around the mess, landing on
the sneering dummy.
Who was it?
18
We all pitched in and helped get the room back together. It took the rest of the
afternoon.
The lamp in front of the closet was broken. Everything else just had to be
picked up and put back where it belonged.
We worked in silence. None of us knew what to say.
At first, Mom wanted to call the police. But there was no sign that someone
had broken into the house. All the other rooms were perfectly okay.
Dad returned home from the camera shop while we were still cleaning up.
He, of course, was furious. “What do I have to do? Bolt the attic door?” he
shouted at Dan and me.
He grabbed up Rocky and slung the dummy over his shoulder. “This isn’t a
joke anymore,” Dad said, narrowing his eyes at both of us. “This isn’t funny.
This is serious.”
“But we didn’t do it!” I protested for the hundredth time.
“Well, the dummy didn’t do it,” Dad shot back. “That’s one thing I know
for sure.”
I don’t know anything for sure, I thought. I stared at Rocky’s sneering face
as Dad started down the hall to the attic stairs. Then I bent down to pick up the
broken lamp from the floor.
That night I dreamed once again about ventriloquist’s dummies.
I saw them dancing. A dozen of them. All of Dad’s dummies from upstairs.
I saw them dancing in Zane’s room. Dancing over the tangled piles of
clothes and books. Dancing over the bed. Over the toppled bed table.
I saw Rocky dancing with Miss Lucy. I saw Wilbur doing a frantic, crazy
dance on top of the dresser. And I saw Smiley, the new dummy, clapping his
wooden hands, bobbing his head, grinning, grinning from the middle of the room
as the other dummies danced around him.
They waved their big hands over their heads. Their skinny legs twisted and
bent.
They danced in silence. No music. No sound at all.
And as their bodies twisted and swayed, their faces remained frozen. They
grinned at one another with blank, unblinking eyes. Grinned their frightening,
red-lipped grins.
Bobbed and bent, tilted and swayed, grinning, grinning, grinning the whole
time in the eerie silence.
And then the grins faded as I pulled myself out of the dream.
I opened my eyes. Slowly woke up.
Felt the heavy hands on my neck.
Stared up into Rocky’s ugly face.
Rocky on top of me. The dummy on top of my blanket. Over me.
Reaching. Reaching his heavy wooden hands for my throat!
19
I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror.
My hands shot out. I grabbed the dummy’s hands.
I thrashed my legs. Kicked off the blanket. Kicked at the dummy.
The big eyes stared at me as if startled.
I grabbed his head. Shoved him down.
I sat up, my entire body trembling. Then I grabbed the dummy’s waist.
And flung him to the floor.
The ceiling light flashed on. Mom and Dad burst into my room together.
“What’s happening?”
“Trina—what’s wrong?”
They both stopped short when they saw the dummy sprawled on the floor
beside my bed.
“He—he—” I gasped, pointing down at Rocky. I struggled to catch my
breath. “Rocky—he jumped on me. He tried to choke me. I-I woke up and—”
Dad let out a loud growl and tore at his hair. “This has got to stop!” he
bellowed.
Mom dropped down beside me on the bed and wrapped me in a hug. I
couldn’t stop my shoulders from trembling.
“It was so scary!” I choked out. “I woke up—and there he was!”
“This is out of control!” Dad screamed, shaking his fist in the air. “Out of
control!”
Mom calmed me down. Then she and I both had to calm Dad down.
Finally, after everyone was calm, they turned out the light and made their
way out of the room. They closed the door. I heard Dad carrying Rocky back up
to the attic.
Maybe Dad should get a lock for the attic door, I thought.
I shut my eyes and tried not to think about Rocky, or Zane, or the dummies
—or anything at all.
After a while, I must have drifted back to sleep.
I don’t know how much time passed.
I was awakened by a knock on the door. Two sharp knocks and then two
more.
I sat straight up with a gasp.
I knew that Rocky had come back.
20
The bedroom door creaked open slowly.
I took a deep breath and held it, staring through the dark.
“Trina—?” a voice whispered. “Trina—are you awake?”
As the door opened, a rectangle of gray light spilled into the room from the
hallway. Dan poked his head in, then took a few steps across the floor.
“Trina? It’s me.”
I let out my breath in a long whoosh. “Dan—what do you want?” My voice
was hoarse from sleep.
“I heard everything,” Dan said, stepping up beside the bed. He pulled down
one pajama sleeve. Then he raised his eyes to me. “Zane put Rocky on your bed.
Zane did it!” Dan whispered.
“Huh? Why do you say that? We all have a truce—remember? Zane agreed
the tricks were all over.”
“Right,” Dan whispered. “And now Zane thinks he can really scare us.
Because we don’t suspect him any longer. Zane hasn’t given up, Trina. I’m sure
of it.”
I bit my lower lip. I tried to think about what Dan was saying. But I was so
sleepy!
Dan leaned close and whispered excitedly. “This morning before we went
biking, Zane went up to his room—remember? He said he forgot his camera.
So… he had time to mess up his room. Before he left the house.”
“Yeah. Maybe,” I murmured.
“And tonight he brought Rocky down and set him up on your bed. I’m sure
of it,” Dan insisted. “I’m sure it’s Zane. We have to hide up in the attic again.
Tomorrow night. We’ll catch Zane again. I know we will.”
“Hide up there again? No way!” I cried. “It’s hot up there. And too creepy.
And I’m staying as far away from those dummies as I can.”
My brother sighed. “I know I’m right,” he whispered.
“I don’t know what I know,” I replied. “I don’t know anything about
anything.” I slid under the covers, pulled the blanket over my head, and tried to
get back to sleep.
The next night, Mom and Dad had a dinner party in honor of Zane and Uncle
Cal. They invited the Birches and the Canfields from down the street, and
Cousin Robin and her husband Fred.
Fred is a great guy. Everyone calls him Froggy because he can puff out his
cheeks like a frog. Froggy is short and very round and really looks like a frog.
He always makes me laugh. He knows a million great jokes. Robin is
always trying to get him to shut up. But he never does.
Mom and Dad don’t have many dinner parties. So they had to work all day
to get the dining room ready. To set the table. And to cook the dinner.
Mom made a leg of lamb. Dad cooked up his specialty—Caribbean-style
scalloped potatoes. Very spicy.
Mom bought flowers for the table. She and Dad brought out all the fancy
plates and glasses that we usually see only on holidays.
The dining room really looked awesome as we all sat down to dinner. Dan,
Zane, and I were down at the far end of the table. Froggy sat at our end. I guess,
because he’s just a big kid.
Froggy told me a moron joke. Someone asks a moron: “Can you stand on
your head?” And the moron says, “No, I can’t. It’s up too high.”
I started to laugh when I saw Zane jump up from the table. “Where are you
going?” I called after him.
Zane turned back at the dining room doorway. “To get my camera,” he
replied. “I want to take some pictures of the table before it gets all messed up.”
He disappeared upstairs.
A few seconds later, we all heard him scream.
Chairs scraped the floor as everyone jumped up. We all went running up the
stairs.
I reached Zane’s room first. From the doorway, I saw him standing in the
center of the room.
I saw the sick look on Zane’s face.
And then I saw the camera in his hand.
Or what was left of the camera.
It looked as if it had been run over by a truck. The film door had been
twisted off and lay on the floor. The lens was smashed. The whole camera body
was bent and broken.
Zane turned the camera over in his hands, gazing down at it sadly, shaking
his head.
I raised my eyes to the bed. And saw Rocky sitting on the bedspread. A roll
of gray film unspooled across his lap.
Dad burst into the room. All of our other guests pushed in after him.
“What happened?” someone asked.
“Is that Zane’s camera?”
“What’s going on?”
“That’s what happens when you try to take my picture!” Froggy joked.
No one laughed. It wasn’t funny.
Dad’s face turned dark red as he took the camera from Zane’s hand. Dad
examined it carefully. His expression remained grim.
“This isn’t mischief anymore,” he murmured. I could barely hear him over
all the other voices in the room. Everyone had begun talking at once.
“This cannot be allowed,” Dad said solemnly. He raised his eyes to Dan,
then me. He stared at us both for the longest time without saying anything.
Zane let out a long sigh. I turned and saw that he was about to cry.
“Zane—” I started.
But he uttered an angry shout. Then he pushed past Froggy and Mr. and
Mrs. Birch. And went running from the room.
“Someone here has done a very sick thing,” Dad said sadly. He raised the
camera to his face, running a finger over the broken lens. “This is a very
expensive camera. It was Zane’s most prized possession.”
All of our guests became very quiet.
Dad kept his eyes on Dan and me. He started to say something else.
But then we all heard the deafening crash from downstairs.
21
“What is going on here?” Dad cried. He tossed the broken camera onto the bed
and darted from the room.
The others went hurrying after him. All talking at once. I heard their shoes
pounding down the stairs.
I turned to Dan. “Still think Zane is doing these things?”
Dan shrugged. “Maybe.”
“No way,” I told him. “No way Zane is going to smash his own camera. He
loved his camera. No way he would smash it just to get you and me in trouble.”
Dan raised troubled eyes to me. “Then I don’t get it,” he said in a tiny
voice. I could see the fear on his face.
I heard startled shouts and cries of alarm from downstairs. “Let’s check out
the next disaster,” I said, rolling my eyes.
We reached the bedroom door at the same time and squeezed through
together. Then I led the way along the hall and down the stairs.
I fought back my own fear as we approached the dining room.
Something very strange was going on in this house, I knew. Dad was right
when he said it was no joke.
Tearing Zane’s room apart wasn’t a joke. It was evil.
Wrecking Zane’s camera was evil, too.
Thinking about Rocky gave me a chill. The dummy was always there.
Whenever something evil happened, there sat Rocky.
Trina, don’t be crazy! I scolded myself. Don’t start thinking that a wooden
ventriloquist’s dummy can be evil.
That’s crazy thinking. That’s really messed up.
But what could I think?
My throat tightened. My mouth suddenly felt very dry.
I took a deep breath and led the way into the dining room.
I saw Dad in the kitchen doorway. He had his arm around Mom’s shoulders.
Mom had her head buried against Dad’s shirtsleeve.
Was she crying?
Yes.
The guests all stood against the wall, shaking their heads, their expressions
grim and confused. They muttered quietly, staring at the disaster.
The disaster. The terrible disaster.
The dining room table.
I saw the overturned platters first. Dad’s scalloped potatoes smeared over
the tablecloth. Clumps of potatoes stuck to the wall and the front of the china
hutch.
The salad poured over the floor and the chairs. The bread ripped into small
chunks, the chunks tossed over the table. The flowers ripped off their stems. The
vase on its side, water pouring over the tablecloth, puddling on the floor.
The glasses all turned over. A bottle of red wine tipped over, a dark red
stain spreading over the tablecloth.
I heard Mom’s sobs. I heard the sounds of Dad’s muttered attempts to calm
her down. I saw the other guests shaking their heads, their faces so upset, so
concerned, so puzzled.
And then Dan grabbed my shoulder and pointed me toward the head of the
table. And I saw two dummies sitting there on dining room chairs.
Wilbur and the new dummy. Wilbur and Smiley.
They sat at the table, grinning at each other, wine glasses in their hands. As
if celebrating. As if toasting each other.
22
That night, Dan and I hid behind the couch in the attic once again. The attic
stretched dark and silent. So dark, I could barely see my brother sitting beside
me.
We were both in pajamas. The air was hot and dry. But my hands and my
bare feet felt cold and clammy.
We talked softly, our legs stretched out on the floor, resting against the back
of the couch. As we talked, we waited—and listened. Listened to every sound.
It was nearly midnight, but I didn’t feel sleepy. I felt alert. Ready for
anything.
Ready to catch Zane in the act once again.
This time, I brought my little flash camera with me. When Zane crept up
here to carry one of the dummies downstairs, I’d snap his photo. Then I’d have
proof to show Mom and Dad.
Yes, I finally decided that Dan was right. Zane had to be the one who was
destroying our house.
Destroying our house and trying to scare everyone into thinking the
dummies had come to life.
“But why?” I whispered to Dan. “Did we scare Zane so badly the last time
he was here? So badly that he’ll do anything to pay us back?”
“He’s sick,” Dan muttered. “That’s the only answer. He’s totally messed
up.”
“So messed up that he wrecked his own camera,” I murmured, shaking my
head.
“So messed up that he ran downstairs and trashed the dining room,” Dan
added.
The dining room. That’s what convinced me that Zane was guilty.
All of us were upstairs in Zane’s room, examining his broken camera.
Zane was the only other person downstairs.
Zane was the only person in the house who could have trashed the dining
room and wrecked the dinner.
Of course he acted horrified and shocked. Of course he acted as if he didn’t
have a clue about what had happened.
What a sad, sad night.
The dinner guests didn’t know what to say to Mom and Dad. It was such a
frightening mystery. No one had an answer.
The guests helped clean up the mess. The food was ruined. It couldn’t be
eaten. No one felt like eating, anyway.
Everyone left as soon as the dining room was cleaned and cleared.
As the last guest left, I turned to Dan. “Uh-oh,” I whispered. “Family
Conference Time. We’re in for a major lecture now.”
But I was wrong. Mom hurried up to her room. And Dad said he was too
disgusted to talk to anyone.
Uncle Cal asked if Dad would like him to take the car and pick up some
fried chicken or hamburgers or something.
Dad just scowled at him and stomped away. He carried Smiley and Wilbur
up to the attic. I heard him slam the attic door. Then he disappeared into the
bedroom to help comfort Mom.
Zane turned to his dad. “I-I can’t believe my good camera is smashed,” he
whimpered.
Uncle Cal placed a hand on Zane’s shoulder. “I’ll bet your uncle Danny has
a new camera at his shop that he’ll want to give you.”
“But I liked my old camera!” Zane wailed.
And that’s when I decided he was guilty. He’s a phony, I decided. He’s
carrying on like this—putting on a show for Dan and me.
But I wasn’t going to fall for it. No way.
I made sure I had film in my little camera. Then I grabbed Dan and we
crept up to the attic to wait. To wait in the darkness and catch Zane.
To end the disasters in our house once and for all.
We didn’t have to wait long.
After about half an hour, I heard the tap of soft footsteps on the attic floor.
I sucked in my breath. My whole body tensed, and I nearly dropped the
camera.
Beside me, Dan raised himself to his knees.
My heart pounding, I crept to the edge of the couch.
Tap tap. Shuffling footsteps on the bare floorboards.
I saw a dark figure bend down and lift a dummy off a chair.
“It’s Zane,” I whispered to Dan. “I knew it!”
In the heavy darkness, I could see him carrying the dummy to the stairs.
I stood up. My legs trembled. But I moved quickly.
I raised the camera. Stepped in front of the couch.
Pushed the shutter button.
The room flashed in an explosion of white light.
I clicked off another one.
Another bright white flash.
And in the flash, I saw Rocky dangling over Zane’s shoulder.
No.
Not Zane!
Not Zane. Not Zane.
In the flash of light, I saw Rocky dangling over another dummy’s shoulder!
Smiley! The new dummy.
The new dummy was shuffling toward the stairs, carrying Rocky away.
23
The dummy turned.
My hand fumbled for the light switch. I clicked on the light.
I stood frozen in front of the couch. Too startled to move.
“Smiley—stop!” I screamed.
The dummy’s grin faded. The eyes narrowed at me. “I’m not Smiley,” he
croaked. He had a hoarse, raspy voice. “My name is Slappy.”
He turned back to the stairs.
“Stop him!” I cried to my brother.
We both made a dive for the dummy.
Slappy spun around. He pulled Rocky off his shoulder—and heaved him at
Dan.
I grabbed Slappy around the waist and tackled him to the floor.
He swung both hands hard. One of them slammed into my forehead.
“Unh.” I let out a groan as the pain shot through me.
My hands slid off the dummy’s slender waist. Slappy jumped nimbly to his
feet, his grin wide and leering.
He was enjoying this!
He kicked me in the side with the toe of his big leather shoe.
My head still throbbing, I rolled out of the way. And turned back in time to
see Dan grab the dummy from behind.
Dan drove his head into the dummy’s back. They both dropped hard to the
floor.
“Let go of me, slave!” Slappy demanded in his ugly, hoarse voice. “You are
my slave now! Let go of me! I order you!”
I pulled myself to my knees as Dan and Slappy wrestled over the floor.
“He’s so… strong!” Dan called out to me.
Slappy rolled on top of him. Started to pound him with his wooden fists.
I grabbed Slappy by the shoulders and tugged with all my strength. Slappy
swung his arms, thrashing at my brother.
I pulled hard, trying to tug him off Dan’s stomach.
“Let go! Let go!” the dummy shrieked. “Let go, slave!”
“Get off him!” I cried.
We were making such a racket, I didn’t hear the attic door open downstairs.
And I didn’t hear the footsteps running up the stairs.
A face appeared. And then a large body.
“Dad!” I cried breathlessly. “Dad—look!”
“What on earth—!” Dad exclaimed.
“Dad—it’s alive! The dummy is alive!” I shrieked.
“Huh?” Squinting through his glasses, Dad lowered his gaze to the dummy
on the floor.
The dummy sprawled lifelessly on its back beside Dan. One arm was
twisted beneath its back. Both legs were bent in two.
The mouth hung open in its painted grin. The eyes stared blankly at the
ceiling.
“It is alive!” Dan insisted. “It really is!”
Dad stared down at the still, silent dummy.
“The dummy picked up Rocky!” Dan declared in a high, excited voice. “He
said his name was Slappy. He picked up Rocky. He was carrying him
downstairs.”
Dad tsk-tsked and shook his head. “Give it up, Dan,” he murmured angrily.
“Just stop it right now.” He raised his eyes to Dan, then to me. “I knew you two
were the troublemakers.”
“But, Dad—” I protested.
“I’m not an idiot,” Dad snapped, scowling at me. “You can’t expect me to
believe a dumb story about a dummy coming to life and carrying another
dummy around. Have you both lost your minds entirely?”
“It’s true,” Dan insisted.
We both gazed down at Slappy. He sure didn’t look alive. For a moment, I
had the frightening feeling that I’d dreamed the whole scene.
But then I remembered something. “I have proof!” I cried. “Dad, I can
prove to you that Dan and I aren’t lying.”
Dad rubbed the back of his neck. “I’m so tired,” he moaned. “It’s been such
a long, horrible day. Please. Give me a break, Trina.”
“But I took some pictures!” I told him. “I have pictures of Slappy carrying
Rocky!”
“Trina, I’m warning you—” Dad started.
But I spun away, searching for my camera. Where was it? Where?
It took me a few seconds to spot it on the floor against the wall back by the
couch. I hurried across the room to grab it.
And stopped halfway.
The back of the camera—it had sprung open. The film was exposed. The
pictures were ruined.
The camera must have flown out of my hand when I tried to tackle Slappy, I
realized. I picked it up and examined it sadly.
No pictures. No proof.
I turned back to find Dad scowling at me. “No more wasting my time,
Trina. You two are grounded until further notice. I’m so disgusted with both of
you. Your mother and I will think of other punishments after your cousin
leaves.”
Then Dad waved a hand at Slappy and Rocky. “Put them away. Right now.
And stay out of the attic. Stay away from my dummies. That’s all I have to say
to you. Good night.”
Dad turned away sharply and stomped down the stairs.
I glanced at Dan and shrugged. I didn’t know what to say.
My heart was pounding. I was so angry. So upset. So hurt. My chest felt
about to explode.
I bent down to pick up Slappy.
The dummy winked at me.
His ugly grin grew wider. And then he puckered his red lips and made
disgusting, wet kissing sounds.
24
“Don’t touch me, slave,” Slappy growled.
I gasped and jumped back. I still couldn’t believe this was happening. I
wrapped my arms around myself to stop my body from trembling.
“You—you really are alive?” Dan asked softly.
“You bet your soft head I am!” the dummy roared.
“What do you want?” I cried. “Why are you doing this to us? Why are you
getting us in all this trouble?”
The ugly grin spread over his face. “If you treat me nice, slaves, maybe I
won’t get you in any more trouble. Maybe you’ll get lucky.” He tapped his head
and added, “Knock on wood.”
“We’re not your slaves!” I insisted.
He tossed back his head and let out a dry laugh. “Who’s the dummy here?”
he cried. “You or me?”
“You carried Rocky downstairs all those times?” Dan asked. I could see that
my brother was having a hard time believing this, too.
“You don’t think that bag of kindling can move on his own, do you?”
Slappy sneered. “I had some fun with that ugly guy. I put him at the scene of the
crimes to throw you off the track. To keep you slaves guessing.”
“And you smashed Zane’s camera and ruined the dinner party?” I
demanded.
He narrowed his eyes to evil slits. “I’ll do much worse if you slaves don’t
obey me.”
I could feel the anger rising through my body. “You—you’re going to ruin
everything!” I screamed at him. “You’re going to ruin our lives! You’re going to
keep us from going to camp this summer!”
Slappy snickered. “You won’t be going to camp. You’ll be staying home to
take good care of me!”
And then I exploded.
“Nooooo!” I uttered a long wail of protest.
I grabbed his head in both hands. I started to tug.
I remembered his head had been split in two when Dad found him. I
planned to pull his head apart—to split it in two again!
He kicked his legs frantically and thrashed his arms.
His heavy shoes kicked at my legs.
But I held on tight. Pulling. Pulling. Struggling to pull his head apart.
“Let me try! Let me try!” Dan called.
I let out a sigh and dropped the dummy to the floor. “It’s no use,” I told
Dan. “Dad did too good a job. It’s glued tight.”
Slappy scrambled to his feet. He shook his head. “Thanks for the head
massage, slave! Now rub my back!” He laughed, an ugly dry laugh that sounded
more like a cough.
Dan stared at the dummy in wide-eyed horror. “Trina—what are we going
to do?” he cried, his voice just above a whisper.
“How about a game of Kick the Dummy Down the Stairs?” Slappy
suggested, leering at us. “We’ll take turns being the dummy. You can go first!”
“We—we have to do something!” Dan stammered. “He’s a monster! He’s
evil! We have to get rid of him!”
But how? I wondered.
How?
And then I had an idea.
25
Slappy must have read my thoughts. He turned and started to run.
But I dove fast—and wrapped my hands around his skinny legs.
He let out a harsh, angry cry as I began twisting his legs around each other,
struggling to tie them in a knot.
He swung an arm. The wooden hand caught me on the ear.
But I held on.
“Dan—grab his arms! Hurry!”
My brother moved quickly. Slappy tried to bat him away. But Dan ducked
low. And when he came up, he grabbed Slappy’s wrists and held on.
“Let me go, slaves!” the dummy rasped. “Let me go now. You’ll be sorry!
You’ll pay!”
I saw the fear on Dan’s face.
Slappy swung a hand free. He tried to swipe at Dan’s throat.
But Dan reached out and grabbed onto the loose arm again.
I felt eyes on me. I glanced up to see the other dummies around the room.
They appeared to watch us struggle. A silent, still audience.
I pulled a red kerchief off a dummy’s neck. And I stuffed it into Slappy’s
mouth to keep him quiet.
“Downstairs! Hurry!” I instructed my brother.
The dummy twisted and squirmed, trying to break free.
But I had his legs tied around each other. And Dan kept a tight grip on his
arms.
We began making our way to the attic stairs. “Where are we taking him?”
Dan demanded.
“Outside,” I replied. The dummy bucked and squirmed. I nearly dropped
him.
“In our pajamas?” Dan asked.
I nodded and began backing down the stairs. Slappy struggled hard to get
free. I nearly lost my balance and toppled over backwards.
“We’re not going far,” I groaned.
Somehow we made it all the way downstairs. I had to let go with one hand
to open the front door. Slappy bucked his knees, trying to untangle his legs.
I pushed the door open. Grabbed the legs again.
Dan and I carried the squirming dummy outside.
A cold, clear night. A light, silvery frost over the grass. A half moon high
over the trees.
“Ohhh.” I let out a moan as my bare feet touched the frozen grass.
“It’s c-cold!” Dan stammered. “I can’t hold on much longer.”
I saw him shiver. The front lawn suddenly darkened as clouds rolled over
the moon. My legs trembled. The damp cold seeped through my thin pajamas.
“Where are we taking him?” Dan whispered.
“Around to the back.”
Slappy kicked hard. But I held on tightly.
Something scampered past my bare feet. I heard scurrying footsteps over
the frosty ground.
A rabbit? A raccoon?
I didn’t stop to see. Gripping Slappy’s ankles with both hands, I backed up.
Backed along the side of the house.
“My feet are numb!” Dan complained.
“Almost there,” I replied.
Slappy uttered hoarse cries beneath the kerchief that gagged his mouth. His
round eyes rolled wildly. Again, he tried to kick free.
Dan and I hauled him to the back of the yard. By the time we got to the old
well, my feet were frozen numb, too. And my whole body shook from the cold.
“What are we going to do?” Dan asked in a tiny voice.
The clouds rolled away. Shadows pulled back. The silvery moonlight lit up
the old stone well.
“We’re going to toss him down the well,” I groaned.
Dan stared at me, surprised.
“He’s evil,” I explained. “We have no choice.”
Dan nodded.
We lifted Slappy onto the smooth stones at the top of the well. He bucked
and kicked. He tried to scream through his gag.
I saw Dan shiver again.
“It’s a wooden dummy,” I told him. “It isn’t a person. It’s an evil wooden
dummy.”
We both shoved hard at the same time.
The dummy slid off the stone wall and dropped into the well.
Dan and I both waited until we heard the splash from far below.
Then we ran side by side back to the house.
He’s gone! I thought gratefully. Joyfully. The evil thing is gone for good.
I slept really well that night. And I didn’t dream about dummies.
The next morning, Dan and I met in the hall. We both were smiling. We felt
so good.
I was actually singing as I followed Dan down the stairs for breakfast.
Dad greeted us at the kitchen door with an angry frown. “What is he doing
down here?” Dad demanded.
He pointed into the kitchen.
Pointed at the breakfast table.
Pointed to Slappy, sitting at the breakfast table, grinning his ugly painted
grin, his eyes wide and innocent.
26
Dan’s mouth dropped open.
I let out a sharp cry.
“Don’t act stunned. Just get him out of here,” Dad said angrily. “And why is
he all wet? Did you have him out in the rain?”
I glanced out the kitchen window. Lightning flashed through a dark gray
sky. Sheets of rain pounded the glass. Thunder rumbled overhead.
“Not a very nice morning,” Uncle Cal said, stepping up behind Dan and me.
“I’ve got coffee ready,” Dad told him.
“I see your friend here beat us down to breakfast,” Uncle Cal said,
motioning to Slappy.
The dummy’s grin seemed to grow wider.
“Get him out of here, Trina,” Dad repeated sharply. “Anyone want pancakes
this morning?” He moved to the cabinet and started searching for a frying pan.
“Make a few extra for me. I’m starving,” Uncle Cal said. “I’ll go see if
Zane is up.” He turned and hurried out of the kitchen.
Dad leaned into the cabinet, banging pots and pans, searching for the one he
always used for pancakes.
“Dad, I have to tell you something,” I said softly. I couldn’t hold it in any
longer. I had to tell Dad the truth. I had to tell him the whole story.
“Dad, Slappy is evil,” I told him. “He’s alive, and he’s evil. Dan and I threw
him down the well last night. We had to get rid of him. But now—he’s back. You
have to help us, Dad. We have to get rid of him—now.”
I took a deep breath and let it out. It felt so good to get the story off my
chest.
Dad pulled his head from the cabinet and turned to me. “Did you say
something, Trina? I was making such a racket, I couldn’t hear you.”
“Dad, I-I—” I stammered.
“Get that dummy out of here—now!” Dad shouted. He stuck his head back
into the cabinet. “How can a whole frying pan disappear into thin air?”
I let out a disappointed sigh. A loud burst of thunder made me jump.
I motioned with my head for Dan to help me. We lifted Slappy off the chair.
I held him around the waist, as far away from me as possible.
His gray suit was sopping wet. Water dripped off his black leather shoes.
We were halfway up the attic stairs when Slappy blinked and let out a soft
chuckle. “Nice try, slaves,” he rasped. “But give up. I’m never going away.
Never!”
27
What a dreary morning.
Rain pounded the windows. Lightning crackled through the charcoal-gray
sky. Thunder boomed so close it rocked the house.
I felt as if the storm were inside my head. As if the heavy, heavy storm
clouds were weighing me down. As if the thunder erupted inside my brain,
drowning out my thoughts.
Dan and I slumped on the couch in the den, watching the storm through the
Venetian blinds over the big window. We were trying to come up with an idea, a
way to get rid of Slappy.
The room was chilly. Damp, cold air leaked through the old window. I
rubbed the sleeves of my sweater, trying to warm myself.
We were alone in the house. Mom, Dad, Uncle Cal, and Zane had gone into
town.
“I tried to tell Dad,” I said. “You heard me, Dan. I tried to tell him about
Slappy. But he didn’t hear me.”
“Dad wouldn’t believe you anyway, Trina,” Dan replied glumly. He sighed.
“Who would believe it?”
“How can a wooden dummy come to life?” I asked, shaking my head.
“How?”
And then I remembered.
And then I had an idea.
I jumped up from the couch. I tugged my brother by the arm. “Come on.”
He pulled back. “Where?”
“To the attic. I think I know how to put Slappy to sleep—for good.”
I stopped at the attic door and held Dan back. “Be very quiet,” I instructed
him. “Maybe Slappy is asleep. If he’s asleep, my plan will go a whole lot better.”
Thunder roared as I opened the door. I led the way up the stairs, moving
slowly, carefully, one step at a time. I could hear the rain pounding down on the
roof. And I could see the flicker of lightning on the low ceiling.
I stopped as I reached the top of the stairs and turned toward the dummy
collection. A flash of lightning through the window cast the shadows of their
heads on the wall. As the lightning flickered, the shadows all seemed to be
moving.
Dan stepped up behind me. “Here we are. Now what?” he whispered.
I raised a finger to my lips and began to tiptoe across the floor. Thunder
boomed. It sounded so much louder up here under the roof!
When Dan and I dragged Slappy up here this morning, we had tossed him
down on the floor. We were too freaked and frightened to spend the time
propping him up on his chair. We just wanted to dump him and get away from
the attic.
I saw Slappy in the flickering white lightning. Lying on his back in the
center of the floor. The other dummies sat around him, grinning their silent grins.
I took a step closer. And then another. Moving as silently as I could.
I peered down at the evil dummy. His arms were at his sides. His legs were
twisted around each other.
And his eyes were closed.
Yes!
His eyes were closed. He was asleep.
I took another few steps toward Slappy. But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm,
tugging me back. “Trina—what are you going to do?” he whispered.
My eyes darted to Slappy. Still asleep. Thunder roared all around. It
sounded as if we were standing in the middle of it.
“Remember those weird words I read?” I whispered to my brother, keeping
my eyes on the evil dummy. “Remember those weird words on that slip of
paper?”
Dan thought for a moment. Then he nodded.
“Well, maybe it was those words that brought him to life,” I whispered.
“Maybe it’s some kind of secret chant.”
Dan shrugged. “Maybe.” He didn’t sound too hopeful.
“I saw you tuck that slip of paper back into Slappy’s jacket pocket,” I told
my brother. “I’m going to take it out and read the words again. Maybe the same
words that bring him to life will also put him back to sleep.”
Of course it was a crazy idea.
But a dummy coming to life was crazy, too. And a dummy trying to turn
you into his slave was crazy.
It was all crazy. So maybe my idea was just crazy enough to work.
“Good luck,” my brother whispered, his eyes on the sleeping dummy on the
floor.
I made my way over to Slappy.
I knelt down on my knees beside him.
I took a deep breath and held it. Then slowly, slowly, I began to reach my
hand down to his jacket pocket.
I knew the slip of paper was inside that pocket. Could I pull it out without
waking up Slappy?
I lowered my hand. Lowered it.
My fingers touched the top of the jacket pocket.
Still holding my breath, I began to slip two fingers inside.
“Gotcha!” Slappy shrieked as his hands shot up. He grabbed both of my
wrists and began to squeeze.
28
I was so stunned, I nearly fell on top of him.
As I struggled to keep my balance, his wooden hands dug into my wrists.
They tightened around me, cutting into my skin.
“Let go of me!” I screamed. I struggled to pull my arms away. But he was
too strong. Too strong.
The hard fingers dug into my wrists. They squeezed harder, harder—until
they cut off all circulation.
“Let go of me! Let go!” My cry came out a shrill wail.
“I give the orders, ssssslave!” Slappy hissed. “You will obey me. Obey me
forever! Or you will pay!”
“Let go! Let me go!” I shrieked. I tugged. I struggled to my feet. I jerked
my arms up and down.
But Slappy didn’t loosen his hold.
His whole body bounced in the air. Hit the floor. Bounced back up as I
pulled.
But his hands gripped even harder.
I couldn’t free myself. And the pain—the intense pain—shot down my
arms. Down my sides. Down my whole body.
“Pick me up, sssslave!” the dummy hissed. “Pick me up and put me on my
chair.”
“Let go!” I cried. “You’re breaking my wrists! Let go!”
The dummy uttered a cold laugh in reply.
The pain shot through my body. My legs wobbled. I dropped back to my
knees.
I turned in time to see Dan dive toward us.
I thought he was going to grab the dummy’s hand and try to set me free.
Instead, Dan grabbed for the jacket pocket.
Slappy let go of my wrists. But not in time.
Dan pulled the slip of paper from the pocket.
Slappy swiped at Dan’s hand, trying to grab the paper away.
But Dan swung around. He unfolded the paper and raised it to his face. And
then he shouted out the mysterious words that were written there:
“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.”
Would it work?
Would it put Slappy back to sleep?
29
I rubbed my aching wrists and stared down at the grinning dummy.
He gazed back at me. And then winked.
His laughter roared over the thunder, over the hard, steady drumming of
rain on the roof.
“You cannot defeat me that way, slave!” Slappy cried gleefully.
I took a step back. A chill ran down my back, making my whole body
shudder.
My plan hadn’t worked.
My only plan. My last, desperate plan. A total failure.
I caught the disappointment on Dan’s face. The slip of paper fell from his
fingers and floated to the floor.
“You will pay for this!” Slappy threatened. “You will pay for your foolish
attempt to defeat me.”
He pushed his hands against the floor and started to climb to his feet.
I backed up.
And saw the other dummies move.
All of them. They were sliding off their chairs. Lowering themselves from
the couch.
They stretched their skinny arms. Flexed their big, wooden hands.
Their heads bobbed, their knees bent as they started to shuffle toward us.
They had all come to life! Twelve dummies, brought to life by those strange
words Dan had cried out.
Twelve dummies staggering toward Dan and me.
We were trapped between them. Trapped in the circle as they shuffled,
dragging their heavy shoes. Their eyes wide. Locked on Dan and me.
As they staggered and shuffled. Moving stiffly, grinning, grinning so coldly.
Closing in on Dan and me.
30
Wilbur limped toward us, his big, chipped hands stretched out, ready to grab us.
Lucy’s big blue eyes gleamed coldly as she staggered toward us. Arnie let out a
high-pitched giggle as he pulled himself closer.
Closer.
Dan and I spun around. But we had nowhere to turn. Nowhere to escape.
The dummies’ big shoes scraped heavily over the wooden floorboards.
Their knees bent with each step. They looked as if they would tumble to the
floor.
But they kept coming. Lurching forward. Bodies bending. Heads bobbing.
Alive. Wooden creatures. Alive!
Dan raised his hands over his face as if to shield himself.
I took a step back. But the dummies behind me were closing in, too.
I took a long, deep breath and held it.
Then I waited.
Waited for their wooden hands to grab us.
I uttered a loud gasp as Wilbur and Arnie staggered right past me.
The dummies all brushed past Dan and me.
As if we weren’t there.
I stared in shock as they circled Slappy. I saw Rocky grab Slappy by the
collar. I saw Lucy grab Slappy’s shoes.
Then the circle of dummies moved in closer. Tighter.
I couldn’t see what they were doing to Slappy. But I saw their skinny arms
jerking and tugging. I saw them all struggling together.
Wrestling with him.
Were they pulling him apart?
I couldn’t see. But I heard Slappy’s scream of terror.
Dan and I clung to each other, watching the strange sight. It looked like a
football huddle. A huddle of dummies.
The dummies grunted and groaned, muttering in low tones as they worked
over Slappy.
We couldn’t see Slappy in the middle.
We heard only one scream.
We didn’t hear him scream again.
And then I heard the attic door open.
Footsteps on the stairs!
Someone was coming up.
31
I poked Dan and turned him to the stairs.
We both cried out as Zane climbed up to the attic and squinted across the
long room at us.
Did he see the struggling dummies? Did he see that they were all alive?
I turned back—in time to see the dummies all collapse in a heap.
“Whoa!” I cried, my heart pounding. I blinked several times. I didn’t
believe what I saw.
The twelve dummies lay lifeless on the floor, arms and legs in a wild tangle.
Mouths open. Eyes gazing up blankly at the low ceiling.
Slappy lay sprawled in the middle. His head tilted to one side. I saw the
blank stare in his eyes. Saw the open-mouthed, wooden grin.
He was completely lifeless now. As lifeless as all the others.
Had the other dummies somehow destroyed his evil?
Would Slappy remain a lifeless block of wood forever?
I didn’t have time to think about it. Zane came hurrying across the attic, an
angry scowl on his face. His eyes were on the pile of dummies.
“Caught you!” Zane cried to Dan and me. “Caught you both! Planning your
next trick! I knew you two were the ones! I’m telling Uncle Danny what you’re
doing!”
32
Of course no one believed Dan and me.
Of course everyone believed Zane.
We were in the worst trouble of our lives. Dan and I were grounded forever.
We probably won’t be allowed to leave the house until we are in our forties!
The next day, Zane and Uncle Cal were at the front door, saying good-bye.
It’s a terrible thing to say—but Dan and I were not sad to see Zane go.
“I hope I never have to come back here,” he whispered to me in the hall.
Then he put on a big, phony smile for Mom and Dad.
“Zane, what kind of camera would you like?” Dad asked, putting a hand on
Zane’s shoulder. “You have a birthday coming up. I’d like to send you a new
camera for your birthday.”
Zane shrugged his big shoulders. “Thanks,” he told my Dad. “But I’m
really not into photography anymore.”
Mom and Dad raised their eyebrows in surprise.
“Well, what would you like for your birthday, Zane?” Mom asked. “Is there
something else you’re interested in?”
Zane shyly lowered his eyes to the floor. “Well… I’d kind of like to try
being a ventriloquist—like you, Uncle Danny.”
Dad beamed happily.
That creep Zane had said just the right thing.
“Maybe you have a spare dummy you can lend Zane,” Uncle Cal suggested.
Dad rubbed his chin. “Well… maybe I do.” He turned to me. “Trina, run up
to the attic. And pick out a good dummy for Zane to take home. Not one of the
old ones. But a nice one that Zane can enjoy.”
“No problem, Dad,” I replied eagerly. I hurried up to the attic. I hoped they
didn’t see the enormous grin on my face.
Can you guess which dummy I picked out for Zane?
I know it’s horribly mean. But I really had no choice—did I?
“Here’s a good one, Zane,” I said a few seconds later. I placed the grinning
dummy in Zane’s arms. “His name is Slappy. I think you two will be very happy
together.”
I hope Zane has fun learning to be a ventriloquist.
But I have the feeling he may have a few problems. Because as Zane
carried Slappy into the car, I saw the dummy wink at me.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.
